United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:11:42:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"ST. MORITZ SECURITY SERVICES JOB FAIR Wednesday, July 6, 2016 St. Moritz is hiring Full time, Part time, and Flex Armed & Unarmed Security Officer professionals in the Orange County, Costa Mesa, & Los Angeles, CA areas.  Experience working as a Security Officer at a High-End Retail establishment is a plus! Sign On Bonuses offered! We offer an attractive compensation package including competitive wages, benefits including health, dental, vision, voluntary benefits, 401(k), training and opportunities for advancement.This JOB FAIR will take place on Wednesday, July 6, 2016 from 9:00am-5:00pmat the following address.  There is free parking: Crowne Plaza Costa Mesa Orange County3131 Bristol StreetCosta Mesa, CA 92626***To expedite the selection and hiring process, please bring along your resume and personal identification documents sufficient to complete a Form I9 if you are offered a position.  Please also bring your Guard Card/Armed expose Guard Card. Description of Armed & Unarmed Security Professionals:Observe and Report all areas of the sites as an Armed/Unarmed Security Officer while protecting the site. Report unusual incidents to management.All St. Moritz Security Officers will maintain a physical security presence on the site while interacting with customers (if needed) to ensure a safe and pleasant experience.You will utilize your sense of urgency to respond to all emergency situations and monitor daily activity on site to ensure policies and procedures are maintained. Job Requirements for Armed/ Unarmed Security Professionals:A minimum of 2 years of Armed security and 1 Year Unarmed related experience which includes customer/client interaction.We seek an individual with experience in a public housing environment that effectively analyzes situations to make practical, realistic decisions while maintaining a positive and enthusiastic attitude.Must be able to stand and for a majority of your tour.Must have working phone.Reliable transportation is required.All applicants must have a valid California Guard Card, Expose firearm permit (for Armed positions), and Valid Driver license with a clean record. St. Moritz Security Services, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/VPPO #16862 ",ST. MORITZ SECURITY SERVICES JOB FAIR Wednesday,Employee,"Costa Mesa, CA 92626",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/st-moritz-security-services-job-fair-wednesday-july-6-2016-job-costa-mesa-ca-us-168994966.aspx?mescoid=3300599001001&jobPosition=20,,Security/Protective Services,a241cda205021cba0ee2ed8cd051ad23
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:10:49:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB OVERVIEW:With a role in the Macy's Cosmetics Department, you will have the opportunity to help others look their best every day. You'll make one-on-one connections with customers to learn their sense of beauty and style, develop your artistic side through customer consultation and make-up and product application, and attain a sense of accomplishment when your skills combine with your passion for beauty to reach personal and team sales goals. Previous cosmetics experience is nice to have, but is not required to begin a career in beauty at Macy's. Performs other duties as assigned.The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:- Assist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment by demonstrating proficient use of proprietary devices and applications; proactively create enhanced shopping experiences through the heightened use of tools, technology and collaboration- Partner with Sales Manager and Counter Manager to identify business driving opportunities and stock needs- Develop a repeat-business customer base in order to regularly communicate: upcoming events, new merchandise receipts and product replenishment to increase incremental sales- Participate in pre-selling and sales driving events as well as processing of new receipts, damages, testers, and return to vendors (RTVs)- Attend product training classes and seminars- Regular, dependable attendance & punctualityQUALIFICATIONS:Education /ExperienceHigh school diploma or equivalent. Previous cosmetic or fragrance sales experience a plusCommunication SkillsAbility to read, write, and interpret labels including warnings and ingredient lists on products. Ability to effectively communicate with and present information to customers, vendors, buyers, peers, and all levels of managementMathematical SkillsBasic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to calculate percentages and ratios. Must be able to make change using American Monetary units.Other SkillsSuperior organizational and time management skills. Must be able to build relationships and influence others. Ability to set and achieve goals. Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment. Must possess a strong sense of urgency and a thirst for knowledge. Must be able to lead by example.Work HoursAbility to work a flexible schedule including days, nights, weekends, holidays, and sales events,based on department and store/company needs.This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's, Inc. is an EqualOpportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",Retail Cosmetics Sales - Beauty Advisor Clinique,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-cosmetics-sales-beauty-advisor-clinique-full-time-dallas-tx-macy%E2%80%99s-northpark-center-job-dallas-tx-us-168972963.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=3,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,f1da0684660f3b460a2578be9d099e3d
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:10:48:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer $10/hr—Nashville Area 3132BR Tennessee 615-331-5201 Job Description Family-Owned & Operated WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Young adults seeking a career, a career move, or change Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students, trade school students Retirees, semi-retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest  in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our client locations in the NASHVILLE area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to speed up your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 3354 Perimeter Hill, Suite 142 (off Harding Place & I-24, behind Applebee's) in Nashville to apply in person. Visit us without an appointment on WALK-IN WEDNESDAYS, every Wednesday from 9am to 4pm.   For more information, you can also call us at 615-331-5201. Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Nashville, TN 37217",Security Officer $/hr—Nashville Area Job in Tennessee US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,TN,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-10-hr%E2%80%94nashville-area-job-tn-us-168941346.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=12,,Security/Protective Services,8da1b8cc8594d8361b2f9c3aab174579
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:09:46:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"BioQ Pharma is seeking a competent ""can-do"" International Logistics Coordinator to join their San Francisco teamWe are seeking a multi-tasker as this role also involves logistics, A/P and purchasing support with some office management. This individual is responsible for developing shipping and logistics solutions for international shipping needs of our customers; including preparing documentation for and coordinating all export shipments, planning and implementing customer support strategies and operations; managing systems and processes for International business as a whole.Job Duties:* Coordinating shipping and receiving - with emphasis on international shipping, receiving, and associated logistics* Includes processing incoming shipments and dealing with packing slips, etc.* Includes executing shipping authorizations for critical pharmaceutical products and components* Purchasing - coordinating purchase orders, generating purchase orders, receiving / uploading invoices, matching receipts (basic AP functions)* Support inventory database management (maybe tacked on later)* Expense report generation* Other general admin support/office management duties* Must be able to multi-taskQualifications:* College degree or significant/appropriate working experience* A minimum of 2 years of international shipping and logistics experience* Analytical skill (Familiar with logistics concept and planning concept)* Strong computer skills including MS Office and PowerPoint * Understanding of international commerce (Import/export regulations, customs regulations, government regulations etc.) required* Excellent verbal and written communication abilities required",International Logistics Coordinator Job in San Francisco,Full Time,"San Francisco, CA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/international-logistics-coordinator-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167789041.aspx?mescoid=1100026001001&jobPosition=17,,,db8d5f2e898775c9c7609f6a421e3147
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:09:45:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Prince Security Services is seeking reliable and dependable individuals who are committed to excellence, honesty, teamwork and integrity to join our team. We are a trusted provider of protective security services within the Washington, DC area. As a Special Police Officer you will help protect and secure buildings, critical infrastructures, personnel, and equipment. If you are interested in joining our team, please read-understand our qualifications and apply today.Special Police Officer / Washington, D.C.Full time and part time positions are available. Must be a dependable and reliable team member. Must be available to work shifts including weekends and/or holidays. Prior security, military, or law enforcement experience is preferred but not required. Veterans, senior citizens and retirees are welcome.Job Location: Washington, DC.Job Responsibilities / Duties:Responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the ability to deal with the public in a professional and courteous manner, must have excellent customer service skills, must be dependable and reliable, conducting security patrols, access control, operating CCTV cameras, report writing and enforcing local laws. Knowledge of company policy and the demonstration of strong interpersonal skills. Other security related duties are required.Job Requirements / Qualifications:Must be able to obtain and maintain an unarmed D.C. SPO commission or Security Officer license.U.S. CitizenshipMinimum of 21 years of ageH.S. Diploma or GEDRead, speak, and understand English language fluently.Ability to communicate and prepare detailed written reports and fill out forms.Must have excellent customer service skills.Must be dependable and reliable.Successfully pass an employment physical and background check to include criminal and reference checks.Must be able to pass all training and obtain required certifications.Must wear a security uniform while on duty.Some qualifications are required in order to obtain a special police officer commission which is needed for work. Prince Security Services is committed to a drug-free workplace. As such, we may conduct pre-employment, reasonable cause, random and contract-mandated drug testing in accordance with federal and state law.",Monster,,"Prince Security Services is seeking reliable and dependable individuals who are committed to excellence, honesty, teamwork and integrity to join our team. We are a trusted provider of protective security services within the Washington, DC area. As a Special Police Officer you will help protect and secure buildings, critical infrastructures, personnel, and equipment. If you are interested in joining our team, please read-understand our qualifications and apply today.Special Police Officer / Washington, D.C.Full time and part time positions are available. Must be a dependable and reliable team member. Must be available to work shifts including weekends and/or holidays. Prior security, military, or law enforcement experience is preferred but not required. Veterans, senior citizens and retirees are welcome.Job Location: Washington, DC.Job Responsibilities / Duties:Responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the ability to deal with the public in a professional and courteous manner, must have excellent customer service skills, must be dependable and reliable, conducting security patrols, access control, operating CCTV cameras, report writing and enforcing local laws. Knowledge of company policy and the demonstration of strong interpersonal skills. Other security related duties are required.Job Requirements / Qualifications:Must be able to obtain and maintain an unarmed D.C. SPO commission or Security Officer license.U.S. CitizenshipMinimum of 21 years of ageH.S. Diploma or GEDRead, speak, and understand English language fluently.Ability to communicate and prepare detailed written reports and fill out forms.Must have excellent customer service skills.Must be dependable and reliable.Successfully pass an employment physical and background check to include criminal and reference checks.Must be able to pass all training and obtain required certifications.Must wear a security uniform while on duty.Some qualifications are required in order to obtain a special police officer commission which is needed for work. Prince Security Services is committed to a drug-free workplace. As such, we may conduct pre-employment, reasonable cause, random and contract-mandated drug testing in accordance with federal and state law.",,http://jobview.monster.com/special-police-officer-job-washington-dc-us-168274651.aspx?mescoid=3300589001001&jobPosition=18,,,4cb7409992f1db6ada223c4530b7a737
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:09:36:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer - Joplin, MO 3794BR Arkansas (800) 823-8828 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Joplin area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately.  For more information, you can also call us at (479) 238-3413.  Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Joplin, MO 64801",Security Officer - Joplin,Full Time Employee,AR,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-joplin-mo-job-ar-us-168941517.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=11,,Security/Protective Services,6ef0e411d566cd65e77d61f68b096964
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:09:21:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"At AT&T, we have found a better way to keep up with network demand. It’s a model developed in the IT world, where you emulate the functions of those complex pieces of hardware with software, and run that software on standard, off-the-shelf hardware. You can add capacity faster and push out upgrades at the speed of the Internet. That’s the model for our next-generation network, powered by technologies including software-defined networking (SDN) and network function virtualization (NFV). By 2020, we plan to virtualize and control over 75 percent of our network using this new software-defined architecture to meet the growing demands of data and video-hungry users. AT&T's Domain 2.0 Architecture and Design group is looking for high energy candidates for the Technology Integration team in the AIC Architecture and Integration organization. The candidate would lead technical solutions for complex AT&T Integrated Cloud (AIC) initiatives that introduce significant technology changes that span various platform elements as well as projects. The work in this group would focus on one or more related themes of technologies and would often lead cross organizational efforts from early concept or POC phases through high level design and end to end integration challenges during the implementation phases of the projects. Candidates would focus on the following: Integration, linkages, and interdependencies across multiple technologies Collaboration with architecture, system engineering, design and implementation experts responsible for different areas across the main D2 Platform areas (AIC infrastructure and SW, ECOMP, Network as well as CSO and operations planning teams).Education and Experience: Candidate shall have a PhD in an approved field from an accredited university and a minimum of 4 years of relevant experience, or a Master's degree in an approved field from an accredited university and a minimum of 6 years of relevant experience, or a Bachelor's degree in an approved field from an accredited university and a minimum of 8 years of relevant experience What Makes You Stand Out: Able to lead technical efforts and expertize in one or more of the following areas, with familiarity with other technologies, is a must: Cloud/Virtualization (OpenStack experience preferred), SDN, IP networking, Cloud/Data Center Technologies including Networking, SW development (especially in the area of network and/or cloud functions). Proven ability to quickly learn new technologies, ability to grasp architecture and lower level design level nuances when appropriate, and be able to solution across multiple technologies, including developing data models, flows, user cases and interdependencies Demonstrate solid communication skills especially with respect to defining/describing solutions at architecture or design level across many components and strong analytical and problem solving skills. Awesome Points: Strong preference for candidates who are open to new technologies, ideas and concepts, driven by challenges and opportunities, proactively stay current with recent technologies and industry trends. Able to lead technical projects Great team players Can collaborate well Familiarity with AIC, ECOMP and/or AT&T Network solutions is a plus. Familiarity with agile process, DevOps and CI/CD models and on-line collaboration tools is a plus.",Principal Member of Technical Staff Technology Integration Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/principal-member-of-technical-staff-technology-integration-job-dallas-tx-us-168653687.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=4,,,89a2599ba3900318d64c6c4bccd71a0d
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:09:19:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client in the Dallas area is currently seeking an experienced Data Entry Coordinator with recent Certiflex Dimensions software experience. The ideal candidate will possess strong communication and customer service skills with a keen eye for attention to detail.Requirements and responsibilities:Data entry of vendor information into Certiflex DimensionsExperience working in a high volume deadline driven environmentStrong data entry and Excel skillsFind Us on Facebook!!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Company Profile: Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com. We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Data Entry Coordinator Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,DallasTX,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/data-entry-coordinator-job-dallas-tx-us-169003438.aspx?mescoid=4300751001001&jobPosition=4,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,28cb3bc52888a530521c3a990c58069d
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:09:14:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company DescriptionHeadquartered in Littleton, Colorado, Terracare Associates is a diverse employer expanding across the Western United States. Established in 1985, TCA now operates multiple offices within California, Colorado, Texas, and Utah!We are not just a landscape company; we are pride ourselves as being Leaders in Outdoor Maintenance, specializing in Commercial Landscape Maintenance & Public Infrastructure. We offer a variety of positions from field team workers to office staff and management.TCA's Centennial, CO office is looking for 10-15 qualified drivers to effectively run tandem trucks for local hauling! Valid Medical Card + Class A license required!To learn more about Terracare Associates, visit www.myterracare.com ! Job DescriptionActive drivers will be earning $19/hr with an opportunity to stay in the winter at $25/hr snow differential rate! Positions are well-suited for those with the following background: Individuals with 3-5 years driving tandem or dump trucks hauling materials in local environments;Individuals with knowledge of basic construction fundamentals; Individuals with operator experience.Monday-Friday with some occasional Saturdays Drivers will safely and effectively haul aggregate materials, asphalt, and/or landscape material through city and residential streets during the summer months.Valid CDL license IS required. QualificationsPreference to those with 3+ years experience operating tandem and hauling trucks. Qualified applicants must: Must have current CDL Operators license (Class A), valid medical card and a qualifying MVR and background record; Additional InformationHow to Apply?Interested individuals can submit their resume and/or qualifications on the ""APPLY NOW"" link on this page and might be contacted by a TCA Representative if their skills match. Please note, this may take 1-2 weeks. We are a Equal Opportunity Employer and enforce a drug-free workplace. Drug screen will be completed upon hire.",Class A Skilled Haulers Job in Centennial,Full Time,"Centennial, CO",All,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-skilled-haulers-job-centennial-co-us-168679184.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b8163713175f0221f52d6df73908c7e2
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:09:08:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Supervisor 3118BR Arizona 602-635-3077 Job Description Security Supervisor Whelan Security is searching for bright and talented professionals who wish to share in the unique culture of our family business – one where people feel inspired, encouraged, and rewarded. Now is your opportunity to join our world-class team as one of the fastest growing contract security companies in the country!  The shift supervisor will lead up to 5 security personnel per shift, including EMTs at a large financial service center. The shift supervisor is fully responsible for the operational requirements of the shift, as well as the continued training and development of security officers. The supervisor will also ensure that exceptional customer service is provided at all times.  Starting pay is $12.00+ per hour, plus full benefits. Qualifications Personal Characteristics:  The ideal candidate has a positive attitude, great communication skills, the ability to perform under pressure, and prior leadership experience. Those available 2nd shift (1400-2200) and 3rd shift (2200-0600) will be given priority. Former members of the military and law enforcement are encouraged to apply. Company-Wide Culture - High Integrity (Character Beyond Reproach), Servant Leader (Never Asking Anyone to Do What You Aren’t Willing to Do), Hands-On Leader, Detail-Oriented, Thick-Skinned, Fun. Education Why Whelan? Be Supported:  Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more! Be Challenged:  Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded: We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program. Be Valued: We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry.  Apply Now!If you are looking for a great opportunity to work in North Phoenix for a leader in the contract security industry – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 11225 N. 28th Dr., Suite A209, Phoenix, AZ 85029 to apply in person. For more information, you can also call us at 602-635-3077. Not convinced? Listen to what our team members have to say!Phoenix, AZ 85029",Security Supervisor Job in Arizona US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,AZ,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-supervisor-job-az-us-168941777.aspx?mescoid=3300570001001&jobPosition=17,,Security/Protective Services,7de548340570270c4fb50b5653167116
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:09:07:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"RF Engineer - Radio Frequency, RF Engineer, Analog Job in Englewood 80111, Colorado US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders RF Engineer Apply Englewood, CO Full-Time $70,000 - $100,000 Job Details If you are a RF Engineer with experience, please READ ON and send your resume to anthony.hampton@cybercoders.com!Salary: ($70-100K DOE)Location: Englewood, COWe have been in business for more than 30 years delivering top of the line and very advanced spacecraft memory systems.Top Reasons to Work with UsWe are an award-winning organization and the first ever supplier to be awarded a Diamond award. We have a state-of-the-art electronics manufacturing facility.What You Will Be Doing- Analog design, development and test - Primarily responsible for performing entry level engineering tasksWhat You Need for this PositionExperience with most of the following:- Multi-section analog filters (Butterworth, Chebychev, and Elliptical) in the 10 KHz to 1 GHz bands, A/D and D/A conversion from 10 KS/sec to 1 GS/sec- Low level signal RF amplifiers, impedance matching, stabilizing gain and RF layout techniquestesting circuit designs and verifying actual performance meets design expectations and design requirements.Bonus:Configuration Management and Quality Control ProcessesRequired:Bachelor's, Electrical EngineerWhat's In It for You- Great compensation: ($70-100K DOE)So, if you are a RF Engineer with experience, please APPLY today and email your resume to anthony.hampton@cybercoders.com! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Anthony Hampton is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: AH3-1296390 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Anthony.Hampton@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: AH3-1296390 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Anthony Hampton | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",RF Engineer,,"RF Engineer - Radio Frequency, RF Engineer, Analog Job in Englewood 80111, Colorado US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders RF Engineer Apply Englewood, CO Full-Time $70,000 - $100,000 Job Details If you are a RF Engineer with experience, please READ ON and send your resume to anthony.hampton@cybercoders.com!Salary: ($70-100K DOE)Location: Englewood, COWe have been in business for more than 30 years delivering top of the line and very advanced spacecraft memory systems.Top Reasons to Work with UsWe are an award-winning organization and the first ever supplier to be awarded a Diamond award. We have a state-of-the-art electronics manufacturing facility.What You Will Be Doing- Analog design, development and test - Primarily responsible for performing entry level engineering tasksWhat You Need for this PositionExperience with most of the following:- Multi-section analog filters (Butterworth, Chebychev, and Elliptical) in the 10 KHz to 1 GHz bands, A/D and D/A conversion from 10 KS/sec to 1 GS/sec- Low level signal RF amplifiers, impedance matching, stabilizing gain and RF layout techniquestesting circuit designs and verifying actual performance meets design expectations and design requirements.Bonus:Configuration Management and Quality Control ProcessesRequired:Bachelor's, Electrical EngineerWhat's In It for You- Great compensation: ($70-100K DOE)So, if you are a RF Engineer with experience, please APPLY today and email your resume to anthony.hampton@cybercoders.com! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Anthony Hampton is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: AH3-1296390 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Anthony.Hampton@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: AH3-1296390 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Anthony Hampton | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",,http://jobview.monster.com/rf-engineer-radio-frequency-rf-engineer-analog-job-englewood-co-us-169024524.aspx?mescoid=1700170001001&jobPosition=17,,,b1cc1257411aa3c612294dd56f2b3793
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:09:00:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Help Desk Technician II Job in Coppell, TX A top multinational IT Service Provider is looking to fill a Help Desk Technician II job at their Coppell, TX location. This position is a 12 month contract, full time, first shift.  Requirements:• MUST be bilingual- (Spanish)• 2+ Field Tech Experience• 2+ years Helpdesk experience• High School Diploma  Main Responsibilities: • Provides technical support to users for basic computer related technical problems• Enters tickets into the call tracking tool; ensures information is accurate, prioritized and assigned to a queue• Answers help desk telephones and responds to basic customer inquiries to ensure customer needs are met• Assists customers in resolving basic technical problems by providing scripted guidance regarding software and hardware problems• Resolves and/or refers more complex technical problems through a defined escalation process• Logs and tracks inquiries using a problem management database and maintains history records and related problem documentation. Identifies, evaluates, and prioritizes customer problems and complaints to ensure that inquiries are resolved appropriately. • Experience with solving computer related problems• Experience with company products, operation systems and escalation policy• Good communication, interpersonal and organizational skills.• Ability to work in a team environment  Is this job tailored just for you?  Our client is ready to begin interviewing for this Help Desk Technician II job at their Coppell, TX location so please upload your most recent resume and apply today!   ",Help Desk Technician II Job In Coppell,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Coppell, TX 75019",,http://jobview.monster.com/help-desk-technician-ii-job-in-coppell-tx-job-coppell-tx-us-168609812.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=15,,IT/Software Development,7cf28db933c80732b863f8e06a62d34c
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:08:59:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security SpecialistMust have active Top Secret clearanceMonday - Friday: 8 am - 5 pmProvide guidance to GE Aviation employees in security matters relating to the compliance with GE Aviation, government, and customer requirements for the protection of classified informationMaintain liaison with government and customer security organizations to plan and coordinate security requirements for classified programsMonitor and audit classified security program requirements ensuring compliance with applicable government regulationsInvestigate suspected violations of improper safeguarding or compromise of classified informationProvide security awareness training as requiredMaintain security information management tools and databases; conduct Security Self-assessments and assist in the monitoring of security metricsPackage and ship classified material as requiredControl classified inventoryChange combinations, replace locks, and maintain secure containersFamiliarity with security clearance processPhysical security duties (changing locks and document management)Qualifications/Requirements:Demonstrated ability to interface with all levels of employeesExcellent written and oral communication skillsMust have active Top Secret clearanceHigh proficiency using PC applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, etc)Desired Characteristics:Working knowledge and hands on experience with the requirements as set forth in the National Industrial Security Program Operating Manual (NISPOM), Joint Personnel Adjudication System (J-Pas), Communication Security (COMSEC), & Electronic Questionnaires for Investigation Processing (eQIP)Associates degree in Management/Criminal Justice or equivalent experience1 year assignment at 32/hr.",Security Specialist Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time , Temporary/Contract/Project","Cincinnati, OH 45215",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/security-specialist-job-cincinnati-oh-us-168862436.aspx?mescoid=1300095001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),afa3df38032f01601cf5cb5bb73d401a
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:08:36:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assistant Project Manager for $10M Projects Well established GC in Texas is looking for a dynamic addition to its workforce. Working as part of a large project team, you will assist in the management of significant projects ranging up to $10M. You will serve as a liaison and support for the Project Manager. You will substitute as necessary for the PM in coordination and management of daily activities. You will keep the Project Manager fully apprised regarding all project related activities and events. Assist in the oversight of project related documentation including but not limited to; RFI's, submittals, meeting minutes, correspondences, close out documents, change proposals, and miscellaneous documentation. Helps coordinate activities and documentation work flow with Project Administrators and Project Engineers. Duties and Responsibilities Assist in the oversight of project related documentation including, but not limited to, RFIs, submittals, meeting minutes, ASI's, correspondence, change proposals and miscellaneous documentsConduct quality control activities in accordance with instructions, inspection programs, using specified control measuring and testing equipment.Participate in the continuous updating and accurate generation of as-built documents, assist with the research and preparation of field change requests to resolve design issuesSchedule and walk jobs for bid, to ensure proper scope verification, and estimate verification with clients, management, project superintendents, or subcontractors as necessary.Coordinate with project superintendents, subcontractors, project engineer, and project administrator to ensure the project close-out is in accordance with plans and specificationsCoordinate with project superintendents, subcontractors, project engineer, and project administrator to ensure the project close-out is in accordance with plans and specifications.",Assistant Project Manager Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-project-manager-job-dallas-tx-us-168652042.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,"55,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Building Construction/Skilled Trades,d6ddba6bae6703c5ec85e2488c58e7ba
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:08:26:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer 3825BR Southern California 818-649-7556 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Valid California guard card Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Westwood, CA area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; For more information, you can also call us at 818-649-7556 .  CA PPO # 16344Not convinced?  Listen to what our team members have to say!At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one?  Westwood, CA 90024",Security Officer Job in California US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,CA,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-ca-us-168941326.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=17,,Security/Protective Services,0781f73585064ae3d3227e526ab03e1a
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:08:07:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Unarmed Security Officer There is an immediate job opportunity for an experienced Security Officer (Part-Time) in Seattle, Washington with a background in security operations and customer service.  This position is in support of a client with a prominent global presence.  This is a high visibility position and requires exceptional interpersonal skills.FLSA Status:  Non-Exempt $15 per hour during training. After successful completion of training, pay will increase to $21.90 per hour. Hiring part-time with potential for full-time employment.  Position Responsibilities: Must be available for duty in support of a 24/7 operation.Either possess or can easily obtain certifications in CPR/First Aid and Washington State Guard License. Training will be provided by Inter-Con Security Systems.Understand security operations and response requirements.Interact well with all levels of individuals and possess exceptional customer service skills.Ability to communicate effectively, both verbal and written, to support the protection of people, assets, and infrastructure.Qualifications:Possess at least a high school diploma or GED equivalent.Prior security, law enforcement, or military experience.Must possess a minimum of three years full-time work experience.Must be able to meet and maintain any applicable Washington State licensing or certification requirements.Valid Driver’s licenseWork history to include:◦ Ability to respond to critical incidents and effectively communicate information to stakeholders and decision makers.◦ Critical thinker◦ Ability to meet compliance requirements, monitor personnel and assets, and make appropriate notifications through technological platforms.◦ Strong communication skills◦ Strong customer service skills and diplomacy with all levels of personnel.◦ Proficient in Microsoft Office ◦ Ability to assess and act appropriately to a variety of critical incidents including but not limited to emergency response and management of large groups/entities.◦Attention to detail relative to all aspects of security operations. Inter-Con Security Systems, Inc. provides Equal Employment and Affirmative Action opportunities to minorities, females, veterans, and disabled individuals, as well as other protected groups.  PPO License Number 6822.  ",Unarmed Security Officer Job in Seattle,Part Time,"Seattle, WA",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/unarmed-security-officer-job-seattle-wa-us-168827231.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=20,15.00 - 21.90 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),d5af70c0541a05cc173241aa576a0344
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:08:07:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"FSA, a rapidly growing professional services company delivering highly qualified personnel in support of the government's mission, has an immediate vacancy for a Data Analyst/Intelligence Analyst with the US Postal Inspection Service (New York City). A Data Analyst executes the following duties:Provide organization and management of case filesReview data (completeness of information, proper execution)Extract data from data baseObtain additional information from other investigative agencies/data baseEstablish/maintain physical filePrepare notices/advertisementsReceive, suspense petitions, claims, process sharing requestsReconcile inconsistenciesPrepare declarationsGather information and organize investigative packageVerify case files and case tracking systemMaintain internal status information on the disposition of all forfeited assetsAssure information is accurate and perform analytical computations necessary to process dataConduct and reconcile inventoriesDistribute and receive documentsAssist lead analyst or official in obtaining/collecting all documents/information to complete case fileProvide administrative information and assistance concerning case to other investigative agencies, local law enforcement agencies, US Attorney, and other DOJ processing units, and higher headquartersExtract data from agency data base for management and program reportsPerform word processing relevant to case documentationPerform data entry relevant to caseA Data Analyst must meet the following qualifications:High School diploma, bachelor's Degree preferredAbility to review and analyze data and information from multiple sourcesAbility to establish case/project filesAbility to enter and retrieve data from data basesAbility to prepare and format management reportsAbility to manipulate, transfer, and compute and print informationAbility to create and manipulate spreadsheetsAbility to prepare and correct reports and correspondence using word processing softwareThis position requires U.S. Citizenship and a 7 (or 10) year minimum background investigation.Forfeiture Support Associates (FSA), LLC is proud to be an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer. We recruit, employ, train, compensate, and promote qualiﬁed persons in all job titles without regard to age, ancestry, color, gender, HIV status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation (including gender expression and identity), veteran status, family leave status or any protected group status as deﬁned by applicable law.",Data Analyst (Intelligence Analyst) at USPIS Job in New York,Full Time Employee,"New York, NY 10007",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/data-analyst-intelligence-analyst-at-uspis-job-new-york-ny-us-168740312.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=10,26.92 - 26.92 $ /hour,Security/Protective Services,0ffbcc42063bd6729cbbbaf693b4073e
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:08:01:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Project Manager - Corporate Systems (SAP)SUMMARYThe Corporate Systems Project Manager is responsible for the successful management of multiple medium to large, complex, multi-phased projects by leading cross-functional teams to define scope, plan, execute and deliver exceptional business value on time and within budget. The Project Manager will manage all aspects of new and existing projects from start to finish and be the single point of contact for all project activities, schedule and status. This position receives very broad guidance from management and requires a high level of initiative and problem solving ability. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESProvide leadership and facilitate the work of cross-functional project teams by clarifying project objectives and defining tactics necessary to accomplish these objectivesManage a portfolio of multiple projectsDrive cross-functional team members to develop detailed project schedules and milestones, project plans, budgets, scope, timeline and risks and risk mitigation plans to meet project requirements while maintaining positive team moraleDevelop project budgets and integrate project costs into the organization-level budgets and financial forecastsContinually manage project expectations with team members, stakeholders and management by monitoring progress against the plan, escalating problems and issues that impact cost, scope or scheduleManage external delivery partners and contractors when requiredEDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE REQUIRED:Bachelor's Degree preferred in computer systems or related field or equivalent combinaton of education and experienceCurrent Project Management Professional (PMP)® or Program Management Professional (PgMP)® certification required.7+ years Project (or Program) Management experience.Prior experience as an IT Project Manager is required.Prior experience in defining development plans for large and complex projects.Strong background in application development methodologies, SDLC, Aglile, Scrum, and other IT industry standards.Solid technical skills and background as needed to support the oversight of development and management of complex applications.Solid technical understanding of SAP core technologies plus BW, Fiori, UX, PI, and HANAPeople management skills to lead and influence professional resources of high caliber.Proven ability to manage in a matrix environment and partner with IT and business area representatives in leading and supporting development activities.Experience with innovative & emerging technologies.Develop and manage project timelines, resources, vendors, and budgetary requirements for large, complex projects.To apply, please forward resume to ITCadDAL@addisongroup.com",Corporate Systems PM Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/corporate-systems-pm-job-dallas-tx-us-168830883.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=20,"$120,000.00+ /year",IT/Software Development,ab84ec8b0b261ba3b7dddc4fba0b3a2f
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:08:00:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview: Regional Design and Construction Director Provide design and construction services to Regional Market Officer, Regional VP and the local Property Management Team.  Direct and oversee a team of designers, architects and contractors.  Responsible for the overall performance of the team, including supervising and evaluating their work.  Manage the workload, monitor deadlines, assign and schedule projects to individual team members, hire contractors and/or sub trades and employees as needed.  Develop and implement the team's design strategy and workflow for best practices.  Oversee implementation of standards for drawings, specifications, and CAD management.  Gather and lead a team of engineers and consultants as appropriate for specific projects.  Learn the estimating program and provide construction estimates based on SteelWave's standard estimating procedure.  Oversee all the construction activities performed by in-house and outside project managers and contractors.  Understand building regulations, codes, and the permitting process.  Interface with the client to ensure quality of service and that scope of work is appropriate.  Work with contractors to stay current on construction methods and estimating accuracy.  Implement the company's business plan and monitor profitability.  Perform annual reviews of individual team members. The Regional Design and Construction Director will report directly to the Managing Directors of SteelWave Construction and Design Services. Responsibilities: Manage a wide variety of diverse interior improvement and shell renovation of commercial projects from inception to completion. Coordinate all preconstruction activities to facilitate timely and accurate definition of scope, schedule and cost. Establish and maintain construction resources capable of providing high value and efficient work product. Supervise construction team to assure on time and on budget project completion. The Regional Director will supervise the on-site staff including Design Project Managers, production team and consultants, on-site Project Managers, Superintendents as well as contractors, subcontractors and vendors performing work.  Opportunity to also manage and supervise consultants performing design and construction in states of Washington and Texas. Qualifications: Requirements: Successful candidate will have a bachelor's degree in architecture, architecture license, and minimum 10 years experience in the architecture and construction industry. Solid subcontractor relationships are essential.   Ideal candidate will have excellent oral and written communication skills in addition to demonstrated commitment to customer service, supervision, estimating, safety and quality.   Travel: Candidate must have the ability to travel up to 25% of time by car within the Denver and Boulder Area.  Some limited travel outside of Colorado by using air and ground transportation may be required.   Physical Demands: The physcal demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.   While performing the duties of this job the employee is frequently required to sit and use hand to finger, handle, or finger. 10 pounds.  The vision equirements include close vision and and ability to ajjust focus.   Work Environment: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommoations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Work is performed in an office setting with exposure to CRT's and UV rays.  Working extended hours may be required as needed.  While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally exposed to outside weather conditions.  The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet.  ",Regional Design and Construction Director Job in Denver,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-design-construction-director-job-denver-co-us-168937863.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=18,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,eb13ed052577ac22f2c369f398ceaabf
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:07:59:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Flex Officer - Mt Juliet/Lebanon ($11/HR + $200 Hiring Bonus) 3851BR Tennessee 615-331-5201 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING Flex Officers who can work 2nd or 3rd shifts No set schedule from week-to-week, but 40 hours+ Fill-ins for vacations and days off at varying locations in Mt Juliet, Lebanon and Southeast Nashville Pay higher than post pay due to flexibility No experience necessary, just flexible schedule with reliable transportation and communication Shifts are 8 or 12 hours depending upon post $200 Hiring Bonus after 90 days of work! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Whelan will help with obtaining security licensing in TN Fingerprinting and licensing fees will come from employee’s pay after employment Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Middle TN area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located in Nashville at 3354 Perimeter Hill Drive, Suite 142 to apply in person. For more information, you can also call us at 615-331-5201 . Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Mt Juliet, TN 37122",Security Flex Officer - Mt Juliet/Lebanon ($/HR + $ Hiring Bonus) Job in Tennessee US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,TN,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-flex-officer-mt-juliet-lebanon-11-hr-200-hiring-bonus-job-tn-us-168941205.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=6,,Security/Protective Services,b7ec21f500e109980b42acdbbdafba57
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:07:58:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Business Analyst - Health and Welfare (PITTCSDG) at Willis Towers Watson Date Posted: 6/20/2016  Employee Type: Full-Time Location: Dallas, TX   Experience: 3 to 5 years Date Posted: 6/20/2016 The CompanyWillis Towers Watson is a leading global advisory, broking and solutions company that helps clients around the world turn risk into a path for growth. With roots dating to 1828, Willis Towers Watson has 39,000 employees in more than 120 territories. We design and deliver solutions that manage risk, optimize benefits, cultivate talent, and expand the power of capital to protect and strengthen institutions and individuals. Our unique perspective allows us to see the critical intersections between talent, assets and ideas — the dynamic formula that drives business performance. Unlock your potential at Willis Towers Watson.The BusinessOur Technology and Administration Solutions business provides benefits administration and outsourcing solutions to many of the world’s leading organizations. Our purpose is to help our clients’ employees realize the full potential of their benefits; helping them be happier, healthier and more secure.Awards & Recognition: The International Association of Outsourcing Professionals (IAOP) has named Willis Towers Watson a leader on the Global Outsourcing 100 since 2011. Everest Research named Willis Towers Watson a Star Performer in the Leaders category in 2014, and has recognized Willis Towers Watson as an industry leader since 2010. Fortune magazine ranked Willis Towers Watson number one in the diversified outsourcing industry on its annual World’s Most Admired Companies list in 2015. Willis Towers Watson has been listed on Fortune magazine’s World’s Most Admired Companies list since 2012. The RoleAs a Business Analyst working with Systems, Data, and the Client you will serve a key role for our outsourcing business by serving as the link between consultants, external clients and our internal team of system developers. You will contribute to the implementation of new services, and ongoing business by translating business needs into actionable programming and process steps for developers, practicing the fundamentals of systems analysis, design and testing. You will also consult to clients concerning implementation best practices, provide ongoing technical support, and train client teams.Note that this role will involve some travel to client sites and other Willis Towers Watson offices. A Few Select Responsibilities: Ensure that all documentation starts from baseline and adheres to standards; communicate back to base team suggestions for changes or enhancements to standard documentation. Attends client meetings relevant to the components they have responsibility for, to establish client relationship and ensure complete understanding. Responsible for developing requirements documentation. Responsible for system configuration based on client requirements. Responsible for creating test plans, and testing system changes and enhancements to ensure completeness and accuracy. Regression testing as necessary based on the nature of the system change/enhancement. Identify reporting needs and requirements. Understand SOW and be responsible for change order identification and assist with providing work and hours necessary to draft the change order. Work closely with developer to ensure project requirements/requests for changes are understood and within standards. Provide guidance to other team members regarding best/standard practices. Provide guidance/assistance to team members where needed to help ensure issues are resolved by assigned due date. Escalate concerns with ability to meet due dates to PM. Lead analyst for annual enrollment with similar responsibilities as Implementation BA during OE project. Train and help transition ongoing processing requirements to BSA. Lead client requirements meetings as needed. Maintain and update all requirements documents, ensuring adherence to standards. Research issues and cases to determine root cause and provide impact analysis for ongoing issues and changes and requests for new functionality. Addresses all calc or data issues that impact carriers. Assist PM with development of Project Plan for open enrollment and significant change orders. Responsible for any vendor file updates and ongoing support. Provide training for client on large-scale change orders to client, BOC and Service Center, as needed.",Business Analyst - Health and Welfare (PITTCSDG) at Willis Towers Watson Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/business-analyst-health-welfare-pittcsdg-at-willis-towers-watson-job-dallas-tx-us-168838304.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1b2f5c5a522d9088b941171f58a65df4
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:07:58:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Project Manager 3746BR Houston 713-977-0030 Job Description Whelan Security is looking for a talented and driven leader to manage our service in Houston, TX. Whelan Security is a performance-based company that cares deeply about maintaining our conservative business culture.  The Project Manager is an operational leader of the company responsible for the personnel a larger strategic account, typically reporting into a GM or MSS.  The Project Manager is responsible for the management, employee development and engagement of all personnel in the assigned client site, as well as operational support for the account to include scheduling, payroll, compliance, post order development and performance metrics tracking, and employee recruiting, discipline, recognition, training and inspections.  The Project Manager role is 100% tactical and operational.  The Project Manager is expected to build upon a culture of employee engagement and set the example for all employees in the assigned account of servant leadership and personal commitment to the Whelan Values. Qualifications Performance Metrics: The Project Manager is expected to achieve the following metrics within Whelan’s performance-based business environment: Manage to 2.5% unbilled overtime or less on assigned account Year over year improvement in Employee Engagement Scores in the account Retention of the account Period over period improvement (usually quarterly) of performance metrics specific to the account Personnel inspections and training of 100% of assigned personnel each month Personnel recruiting to ensure full staffing levels on assigned accounts Personally recruit a minimum of one new supervisor for your account annually Develop a minimum of one supervisor for promotion annually Become proficient in all company software systems (on-boarding, scheduling, financial, CRM) 100% compliance to the Whelan Mandatory Requirements Lead by example of living up to the Whelan Values Personal Characteristics: Company-Wide Culture - High Integrity (Character Beyond Reproach), Servant Leader (Never Asking Anyone to Do What You Aren’t Willing to Do), Hands-On Leader, Financially Prudent, Detail-Oriented, Thick-Skinned, Fun. Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: A college degree (Associates or greater) is preferred although equivalent experience will be considered Why Whelan? Be Supported: Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more! Be Challenged: Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded: We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program. Be Valued: We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry.  Apply Now!If you are looking for an outstanding opportunity to work at a family-owned, industry leading organization – APPLY NOW!Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 13333 NW Freeway, Ste 630, Houston, TX 77040 to apply in person. For more information, you can also call our branch office at 713-977-0030. Not convinced?  Listen to what our team members have to say! Houston, TX 77040",Project Manager Job in Texas US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,TX,,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-tx-us-168941699.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=17,,Security/Protective Services,7cb156d565d95a90e53b4290eff5ad81
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:07:57:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"In AT&T Labs we are always looking for new talent for Software Development in Overlay Networking and Cloud technologies. We envision and create cutting edge technologies that will revolutionize how networks and new services are architected, developed and managed. Our architects and engineers have a unique combination of access to real-world network, system and services, the ability to work with collaborators across the industry, opportunity to create the next generation network that will impact hundreds of millions of consumers and some of the largest corporations in the world. AT&T is currently embarking on a transformative initiative towards intelligent services by leveraging cloud technologies and Software Defined Networking (SDN). This modern architecture will simplify and scale AT&T’s network to help support the continued growth of Internet traffic, enable rapid deployment of an advanced cutting-edge features and services, provide industry leading security, performance and reliability. This transformation opens up exciting and challenging opportunities for young and dynamic individuals to work in a fast paced and rewarding environment to integrate AT&T’s next generation network and systems. We are looking for individuals with strong background in the following areas: Software development in an open source environment Leading software contributor to one or more open source software projects like ODL, Openstack, OpenContrail, Open vSwitch, vRouter, etc. Familiarity with API web service design Ability to learn and extend existing open source software Experience working in large scale systems Software development of network protocols like BGP, EVPN, QoS, etc. Experience developing controllers like Open Contrail or ODL or ONOS Good understanding of Openstack networking Experience integrating modules into Openstack Education and Experience: Candidate shall have a PhD in Computer Science from an accredited university and a minimum of 4 years of relevant experience, or a Master's degree in an Computer Science from an accredited university and a minimum of 6 years of relevant experience, or a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science from an accredited university and a minimum of 8 years of relevant experience. What Makes You Stand Out: Network development experience in Python, C/C++, Java Strong coding skills in Python, with emphasis on writing modular, scalable code Prototyping and developing solutions that involve Openstack, Open Contrail and ODL Experience with network virtualization using Open vSwitch, SR-IOV/DPDK, and Contrail vRouter in general server-based networking Knowledge of server-based networking, including hardware and software related to NICs and SmartNICs. Data center TOR switching experience is a plus. Knowledge in requirements for server virtualization, network virtualization, NFV and network orchestration Competent in TCP/IP networking development, performance optimization and efficient packet processing development Knowledge of networking datapath programming in software and hardware Speaking engagements at industry conferences or open source conferences Awesome Points: Strong verbal and written communication skills Desire to be a team player and work in a highly-collaborative environment",Principal Member of Technical Staff Open Source Software Development Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/principal-member-of-technical-staff-open-source-software-development-job-dallas-tx-us-168812968.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=18,,,d581f4a60a5e84cb8d0c68c7245dae59
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:07:55:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Combined Insurance is seeking Sales Agents to join our fast-paced, high energy, growing company. We are proud of our tradition of success in the insurance industry of over 90 years. Come join our team of hard-working, talented professionals! JOB SUMMARY: An Agent position with Combined Insurance offers you a full-time, direct employee position where you’ll receive company support and comprehensive training. We offer unlimited income potential, including expense-paid training, a limited guaranteed income to start, and a competitive benefits package. No experience is required, but prior exposure to sales and customer service is helpful. Experienced and licensed insurance agents are highly encouraged to apply. RESPONSIBILITIES: Conduct needs-based, consultative sales presentations to a wide range of individuals and independent business people Utilize marketing tools and resources to generate new business Secure referrals and set appointments to present to prospective customers Deliver excellent customer service to existing policyholders and prospective customers alike Develop and maintain a professional presence in the communities in which you work SKILLS/EXPERIENCE: While no specific experience selling insurance is necessary, prior exposure to commissioned sales, customer service and marketing experience can be helpful. Our training program will give you most of the tools and knowledge to help you succeed. One year of work experience required; commissioned sales and customer service experience in real estate, auto sales, and/or as an insurance agent is a plus Your respective state’s license to sell accident, health and life insurance, or a willingness to obtain proper licensing Strong interpersonal communication skills An outgoing, positive person who enjoys building relationships Driven, disciplined, resilient, achievement-focused, coachable professional Basic computer skills, including knowledge of Microsoft Windows, a plus A valid driver’s license, reliable transportation with liability and property insurance coverage on the vehicle EDUCATION: High school diploma or GED equivalent is preferred, college-level education is a plus Bilingual English/Spanish a plus OUR BENEFITS As a Combined corporate employee, you have access to one of the most comprehensive benefit plans in the business, designed to meet your needs and help you reach your financial goals.  We are committed to supporting its employees with a comprehensive compensation package that is appropriate in the market where they work. Below are several of the many benefits we offer our employees: Health insurance Dental insurance Tuition reimbursement A company-match 401(k) plan Disability insurance Life insurance Employee referral bonuses ABOUT COMBINED INSURANCE Combined Insurance is a leading provider of individual supplemental accident, disability, health and life insurance products. With a field sales force and corporate staff in excess of 5,000 people worldwide, Combined Insurance meets the growing coverage needs of policyholders around the globe. We pride ourselves on being customer-centric, people-driven, accountable, performance-minded, and ethical. We invest in our employees and take the time to focus on their development, needs and career aspirations. Connect with us onTWITTER, FACEBOOK, LINKEDIN, INSTAGRAM and GOOGLE+ Read our blog, SUPPLEMENTALLY SPEAKING, for more info on health and wellness topics  ",Sales Agent Job in Plano,Full Time,"Plano, TX",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-agent-job-plano-tx-us-168953510.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=11,,,96d09367b1a5d9e6e481fd5e19be9e11
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:07:49:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:                        To manager and supervise TNT Air Network operational interests in all related matters at an airport on a daily basis. Status:                        Full-time  Essential Job Functions:·     Manage all aircraft related activities at the ramp during the airside operation (inbound/outbound).·     Manage network exceptions and incidents.·     Manage local day-to-day interface between TNT Network operations and local operations.·     Manage service improvement activities based on air operations management reporting.·     Thorough planning of the loads to ensure correct weight connectivity, freight connection and daily verification of resources.·     Receipt and action of inbound load messages·     Co-ordinate loads with LCC, Warehouse + preceding/following airports.·     Timely use of Skymaster.·     Timely transmission of accurate outbound load advice and ULD Control message to the LCC and next airport.·     Meet aircraft and manage problem resolution to meet on time performance targets.·     Supervise arrivals, departures or turnarounds to ensure agreed schedules are met·     Liaise with Flight crews and local taxi company.·     Ensure crews are briefed on local arrival/departure procedures i.e. hotel accommodation, taxis, reporting point, etc.·     Monitor ground operations to ensure agreed schedules are met.·     Monitor handling performance, highlight and correct under-performance.·     Alert LCC of potential Air network problems and enforcement of agreed solutions.·     Ensure ULD control in compliance with TNT policy.·     Ensure aircraft operated on behalf of TNT are protected from damage during the operation by TNT suppliers and/or other users of the airport or through adverse weather conditions Qualifications:·       Good knowledge of English language. ·       Airport ramp and/or cargo experience preferred.  (Initial and recurrent training will be provided)·       Computer literate.·       Able to make decisions.·       Able to work independently as well as in a team.·       Able to work in stressful, time-sensitive environment.·       Commitment to safety and quality.·       Current Dangerous Goods certification; CAT 6 / radioactive certification will be required for the successful candidate.  ",Airport Coordinator Job in John F Kennedy Airport,"Full Time , Employee","John F Kennedy Airport, NY","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/airport-coordinator-job-john-f-kennedy-airport-ny-us-168923851.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=12,,Security/Protective Services,c9852103374f09306824fefc4735fbc8
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:07:48:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"TransFirstInside Sales Account ExecutiveAurora, COAn Industry Leader:                                              Since 1995, TransFirst has been helping business owners with the most critical aspect of their business: their revenue and bottom line! TransFirst is committed to helping our customers and partners grow their own businesses, through providing cutting-edge payment processing hardware, software and top-caliber servicing and merchant support. In today's quickly evolving payment processing world, we're leading the pack with proprietary Mobile and tablet-based POS solutions in addition to state-of-the-art traditional terminals. Through utilizing existing referral partnerships, we provide industry leading payment processing solutions to more than 200,000 merchants.  Our organization is proud to be named to Ethisphere’s 2015 World’s Most Ethical Companies List. Our Customer CovenantWe will take 100% responsibility for every customer experience through collaboration, innovation and unparalleled service delivered by caring team members. We will treat our customers the way we want to be treated — building lasting relationships, trust and integrity.Develop into a skillful expert:Training and mentorship is provided from top professionals in the industry to develop and expand your knowledge of this growing industry.  You will participate in a formal training program as you begin your career, followed by on-going training and support throughout your career to ensure that you are a subject matter expert. Inside Account Executive Career Description:You will leverage our relationship with top-performing financial institutions, where you will utilize your well-honed sales ability to assist both TransFirst and our partner to exceed the merchants’ expectations.  We require a self-starter with a strong desire for success and the ability to accomplish attainable goals.  If you want to allow your passion and drive for sales take you further than you could have imagined, then we want you on our team! Inside Account Executive responsibilities include selling TransFirst’s merchant payment processing and the corresponding hardware and software.  You will partner with the financial institution to sell these products and services through their marketing efforts.  Referrals are generated from our financial institution partner, and you must also be a hunter to self-generate additional referrals for your portfolio of business. Necessary Skills and Requirements:High School Diploma, or equivalent2+ years in inside or outside B2B sales (Previous experience in Merchant Services is a plus)Quantifiable results of success requiredProven track record of pipeline development and closing ratesOutstanding command of prospecting, communication, presentation, and networking skillsExperience in a performance-based compensation modelExperience dealing directly with small to mid-sized business owners and decision makersAbility to pass background check and drug screening  Benefits:Base Salary + uncapped commissions (First year at plan average of $50K to 60K)Excellent Benefits - starting first of the month following hire Strong Management Support and Team Selling EnvironmentOpportunity to grow your business and financial futureIf you are a focused and driven professional, with a strong work ethic and excellent communication skills, consider joining the TransFirst team!    ",Inside Sales - Account Executive Job in Aurora,Full Time,"Aurora, CO 80014",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/inside-sales-account-executive-job-aurora-co-us-168957235.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=5,"55,000.00 - 65,000.00 $ /yearBase + Uncapped Commissions + Benefits",Experienced (Non-Manager),6dd2ba3369f0b5995556150b3a564a4c
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:07:45:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Business Analyst - Health and Welfare (PITTCSDG) at Willis Towers Watson Date Posted: 6/3/2016  Employee Type: Full-Time Location: Dallas, TX   Experience: 3 to 5 years Date Posted: 6/3/2016 The CompanyWillis Towers Watson is a leading global advisory, broking and solutions company that helps clients around the world turn risk into a path for growth. With roots dating to 1828, Willis Towers Watson has 39,000 employees in more than 120 territories. We design and deliver solutions that manage risk, optimize benefits, cultivate talent, and expand the power of capital to protect and strengthen institutions and individuals. Our unique perspective allows us to see the critical intersections between talent, assets and ideas — the dynamic formula that drives business performance. Unlock your potential at Willis Towers Watson.The BusinessOur Technology and Administration Solutions business provides benefits administration and outsourcing solutions to many of the world’s leading organizations. Our purpose is to help our clients’ employees realize the full potential of their benefits; helping them be happier, healthier and more secure.Awards & Recognition: The International Association of Outsourcing Professionals (IAOP) has named Willis Towers Watson a leader on the Global Outsourcing 100 since 2011. Everest Research named Willis Towers Watson a Star Performer in the Leaders category in 2014, and has recognized Willis Towers Watson as an industry leader since 2010. Fortune magazine ranked Willis Towers Watson number one in the diversified outsourcing industry on its annual World’s Most Admired Companies list in 2015. Willis Towers Watson has been listed on Fortune magazine’s World’s Most Admired Companies list since 2012. The RoleAs a Business Analyst working with Systems, Data, and the Client you will serve a key role for our outsourcing business by serving as the link between consultants, external clients and our internal team of system developers. You will contribute to the implementation of new services, and ongoing business by translating business needs into actionable programming and process steps for developers, practicing the fundamentals of systems analysis, design and testing. You will also consult to clients concerning implementation best practices, provide ongoing technical support, and train client teams.Note that this role will involve some travel to client sites and other Willis Towers Watson offices. A Few Select Responsibilities: Ensure that all documentation starts from baseline and adheres to standards; communicate back to base team suggestions for changes or enhancements to standard documentation. Attends client meetings relevant to the components they have responsibility for, to establish client relationship and ensure complete understanding. Responsible for developing requirements documentation. Responsible for system configuration based on client requirements. Responsible for creating test plans, and testing system changes and enhancements to ensure completeness and accuracy. Regression testing as necessary based on the nature of the system change/enhancement. Identify reporting needs and requirements. Understand SOW and be responsible for change order identification and assist with providing work and hours necessary to draft the change order. Work closely with developer to ensure project requirements/requests for changes are understood and within standards. Provide guidance to other team members regarding best/standard practices. Provide guidance/assistance to team members where needed to help ensure issues are resolved by assigned due date. Escalate concerns with ability to meet due dates to PM. Lead analyst for annual enrollment with similar responsibilities as Implementation BA during OE project. Train and help transition ongoing processing requirements to BSA. Lead client requirements meetings as needed. Maintain and update all requirements documents, ensuring adherence to standards. Research issues and cases to determine root cause and provide impact analysis for ongoing issues and changes and requests for new functionality. Addresses all calc or data issues that impact carriers. Assist PM with development of Project Plan for open enrollment and significant change orders. Responsible for any vendor file updates and ongoing support. Provide training for client on large-scale change orders to client, BOC and Service Center, as needed.",Business Analyst - Health and Welfare (PITTCSDG) at Willis Towers Watson Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/business-analyst-health-welfare-pittcsdg-at-willis-towers-watson-job-dallas-tx-us-168838765.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c7805d93863e1e2db4bdb67b0ef26ba4
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:07:44:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Premier Security Officer (Palo Alto/Redwood City) 3623BR Northern California 408-326-0210 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING! We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees A Premier Security Officer is required to provide security and other safety related functions to the highest of standards – capable of representing Whelan as the premier provider of security services in the industry. Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now!   If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at some of our outstanding client locations in the Greater Palo Alto/Redwood City area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 4 N 2nd Street, Suite 598, San Jose CA 95113 t o apply in person. For more information, you can also call us at 408-326-0210. Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! California Private Patrol Operator License Number 16344 Palo Alto, CA 94301",Premier Security Officer (Palo Alto/Redwood City) Job in California US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,CA,,http://jobview.monster.com/premier-security-officer-palo-alto-redwood-city-job-ca-us-168941295.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=4,,Security/Protective Services,c9ff8c9170d66a99454097e81b726657
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:07:44:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"SR. .NET DEVELOPER – CONTRACT – DALLAS, TXA Dallas based telco provider seeks a Sr. Full Stack .Net developer to work on responsive web applications for customer support, automated deployment and cloud management tools. The developer is responsible for everything from specifications gathering and analysis to development, documentation, test/debug and deployment.Sr. .Net Developer Skills & Requirements:• 5+ Years C#/.Net development• Angular with Node.js and JavaScript mastery• 5+ Years Database experience (MS SQL, MySQL, Cassandra, MongoDB)Plus Skills:• Openstack development experience• Understanding of web networking infrastructure (VPN, Firewall and Networking platforms) Follow us on our BLOG to see more jobs like this: http://dallas.vereduscorp.com / Why Veredus?Candidates work with a professional Recruiter whose average experience is eight years in the industry. That means they have intimate knowledge of the Information Technology industry and market trends - who is in demand now and who will be next. Your Veredus Recruiter will lead you through a thorough screening process in order to understand your skills, experience, needs, and desires. They also counsel their candidates in resume writing, interviewing, and career planning so when there’s a position you really want, you’re fully prepared to get it. . Additionally, if the position is a consulting opportunity Veredus provides full benefits starting Day 1, and at virtually no cost to you. • Medical • Dental • Vision • 401K • Life Insurance ($20,000 benefit)• ATOP - Accrued Time Off Program• Consultant Lunches and Outings • Consultant Web-Site• Name Plates• Care packages/Survival packs• Dedicated Consulting Services RepresentativeVeredus has been recognized as one of the “Best Staffing Firms to Work For” by Staffing Industry Analysts the last 3 years in a row. Nervous about an upcoming interview? Want to be as prepared as possible?Click on the link below and you will have access to the Veredus Interview Prep Video - culled from hundreds of years of collective experience in preparing candidates for that all important job interview: http://vereduscorp.com/career-center / Veredus Corporation is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer M/F/D/V.Drug testing may be required; please contact Recruiter for more information.",Sr. .Net Developer Job in Dallas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-net-developer-job-dallas-tx-us-168964163.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=6,55.00 - 65.00 $ /hour,IT/Software Development,5c9db47b9e72997c30378ae4ef383e58
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:06:56:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"U.S. Security Care is seeking security officers with prior experience in high retail establishments. Primary responsibility is to ensure the safety and protection of the client assets in accordance with all local, state and federal laws. Positions available in Newark, DE; 30 hours/week; steady work with opportunity to become full-time.Major ResponsibilitiesPerform security operating procedures and site specific tasks in accordance with organizational policy and practices. Convey information between client, staff and organization. Execute basic security functions such as perimeter and interior foot/mounted patrols, loss prevention, monitor CCTV and other systems, secure client property and assets, stand posts and perform other service related duties.Essential Job FunctionsTo provide logistical support regarding security of the client assets; To enforce operating procedures and site specific instructions; Setup and execute basic security functions, i.e. perimeter and access control, identification procedures, secure assets/property and post standing duties; Communicate and coordinate movement with client, US Security staff and US Security Care Management; Observe and report any event that may have an impact on operations; To provide assistance to any position or post on a designated detail; Prepare reports that detail incident findings; Collaborate with other agents and agencies to exchange information and coordinate activities; Monitor, note, report, and investigate suspicious persons and situations, safety hazards, and unusual or illegal activity in detail area; Communicate information and ideas in a manner so that others will understand; Performs duties as needed and directed by the Operations Manager. Basic Qualifications  High school diploma or GED; Military/Law Enforcement experience preferred; Minimum 3 years of asset protection experience (upscale retail preferred); No felony conviction; no misdemeanor convictions involving moral turpitude; Ability to comprehend and utilize the English language, written and verbal; Currently possess a valid Delaware State Security Guard License;Reliable transportation; Reliable means of communication (active e-mail and cell phone); CPR/First Aid Certification preferred; Benefits    As a part time unarmed officer with US Security Care you will receive paid training each year and PTO.US Security Care, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer.",Upscale Unarmed Security Officer Job in Newark,Part Time,"Newark, DE",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/upscale-unarmed-security-officer-job-newark-de-us-168610247.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=14,14.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),bc4635c29a331d26eef0759903a3d700
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:06:55:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior IT Systems Administrator Skills: Active Directory, Exchange, Citrix, VMWare, Troubleshooting, Security, Networking, WindowsLocation: Dallas, TexasPay rate: $64-72/hr, up to $105,000 once permanent We are looking for a Senior IT Systems Administrator to be a jack of all trades for our client in the financial industry. They have a great tenured team and an amazing company culture. Your core function will be as their Systems Engineer but you will also get to dabble in security and networking. Day to day duties will involve the troubleshooting and maintenance of Active Directory, Exchange, Citrix and VMware. You will have ownership of the production system and be responsible for making sure the system is running and healthy. Experience we’d like to see: 7+ years of Systems Administrator experienceStrong Active Directory experienceExchange experienceCitrix experienceVMware experienceSQL Server experienceSecurity knowledgeNetworking knowledgeMust be able to pass a credit check and background check   ",System Administrator Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/system-administrator-job-dallas-tx-us-168830823.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=1,"90,000.00 - 105,000.00 /year",IT/Software Development,9d8ddcd34d1bc9b1349e7403f45337ee
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:05:59:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview We are currently seeking an Intake/Referral Coordinator for our Utilization Review department in Dallas, TX. Responsibilities Main responsibilities include, but are not limited to: Communicate with external and internal customers via phone, email, fax, etc Establish and maintain effective working relationships with customers Support management staff by performing data entry, calling medical providers and insurance adjusters to obtain information necessary to process utilization review cases; as well as, filing and answering incoming phone calls. Work closely with Utilization Management staff and registered nurses regarding case specific information. Qualifications High school diploma or general education degree (GED) required; Associate or Bachelor’s degree preferred CPT and ICD-9 coding strongly preferred At least 1 year experience in the worker’s compensation arena including utilization review and/or telephonic case management strongly preferred Excellent interpersonal skills, phone etiquette and strong organizational skills are essential Excellent computer skills and working knowledge of Microsoft office programs such as Word and Excel Must be detail oriented, able to prioritize and use resources available and able to multi-task.",Intake Coordinator Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/intake-coordinator-job-dallas-tx-us-168837553.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=17,,"High school diploma or general education degree (GED) required; Associate or Bachelor’s degree preferred CPT and ICD-9 coding strongly preferred At least 1 year experience in the worker’s compensation arena including utilization review and/or telephonic case management strongly preferred Excellent interpersonal skills, phone etiquette and strong organizational skills are essential Excellent computer skills and working knowledge of Microsoft office programs such as Word and Excel Must be detail oriented, able to prioritize and use resources available and able to multi-task.",67bcf8463d03704fd3de4700c7ace7b0
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:05:50:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Delivery Assurance Field Rep (DAFR) The delivery assurance Field Rep (DAFR) key responsibility is to address Delivery Assurance risks at suppliers based on business short and mid-term priorities. Responsibilities: Review weekly metrics and Business Units requests for support and prioritize accordingly in support of customers Support supplier line of balance, WIP tracking and recovery plan establishment and on site verification. Define and follow associated action plan. Help with Quality or Engineering issues between both parties. Must be experienced in ""Composites"" manufacturing Understand Aerovantix, Supplier Portal, Scorecards, etc. and be able to train suppliers as needed. Communicate status to stakeholders Support: Lean Events, Assessments, Playbook Roll Out, Supplier Gold Program, Program Reviews Assist suppliers with outside processing and sub tier expediting 　Candidates must be able to speak German and willing to travel to Germany when required 　 Experience desired: experience in a Supply Chain / Quality / Operations environment Lean / ACE, lead change/improvement　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　　 product knowledge aerospace preferred strong communication skills Experience in SAP an advantage Travel above 50% br{line-height:1px;}",Delivery Assurance Job in Wolverhampton,Full Time,"Wolverhampton, CA",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/delivery-assurance-job-wolverhampton-ca-us-168808678.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ae1215566b48bb2502978d2383eaf6bd
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:05:47:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer 3494BR Mid-Atlantic 301-459-2355 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Virginia Beach - Hampton Roads - Norfolk  area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately. For more information, you can also call us at 301-459-2355. Not convinced? Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Hampton Roads, VA 20785",Security Officer Job in Georgia US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,GA,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-ga-us-168941943.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=5,,Security/Protective Services,283c59a7658745acd414d3c693736196
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:05:47:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Supervisor 3437BR Oklahoma (405) 241-9472 Job Description Whelan Security is searching for bright and talented professionals who wish to share in the unique culture of our family business – one where people feel inspired, encouraged, and rewarded. Now is your opportunity to join our world-class team as one of the fastest growing contract security companies in the country!  Whelan Security is a performance-based company that cares deeply about maintaining our conservative business culture.  The Site Supervisor is the operational employee responsible for the personnel in an account, typically reporting into an MSS or CSM.  The Site Supervisor is an hourly position that includes manning a security post while also providing operational support for the account to include scheduling, payroll, compliance, post order development, performance metrics tracking, training, employee recognition and inspections during working hours.  The Site Supervisor role is 100% tactical and operational.  The Site Supervisor is expected to build upon a culture of employee engagement and set the example for all employees in the assigned account of servant leadership and personal commitment to the Whelan Values. Qualifications Performance Metrics:  The Site Supervisor is expected to achieve the following metrics within Whelan’s performance-based business environment: Manage to 2.5% unbilled overtime or less on assigned account Retention of the account Period over period improvement (usually quarterly) of performance metrics specific to the account Personnel inspections and training of assigned personnel each month 100% compliance to the Whelan Mandatory Requirements Lead by example of living up to the Whelan Values Personal Characteristics:  Company-Wide Culture - High Integrity (Character Beyond Reproach), Servant Leader (Never Asking Anyone to Do What You Aren’t Willing to Do), Hands-On Leader, Financially Prudent, Detail-Oriented, Thick-Skinned, Fun. Education Why Whelan? Be Supported:  Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more! Be Challenged:  Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded: We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program. Be Valued: We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry.  Apply Now!If you are looking for a great opportunity to work in Tulsa for a leader in the contract security industry – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately. For more information, you can also call us at (405) 241-9472. Not convinced? Listen to what our team members have to say!Tulsa, OK 74134",Security Supervisor Job in Oklahoma US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,OK,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-supervisor-job-ok-us-168941977.aspx?mescoid=3300570001001&jobPosition=15,,Security/Protective Services,312ddfec1b308348287bfc937b68ea50
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:04:31:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOBSUMMARY:Under the general supervision of theSite Manager, performs related duties in the daily operation of the OfficeServices Center, at all times striving to meet or exceed the requirements andexpectations of the customer’s employees in their requests.  Consistently works in an enthusiastic,positive, motivated, professional, detail- and deadline-oriented manner, withan ongoing commitment to increasing customer satisfaction.ESSENTIALFUNCTIONS:Performsrelated tasks requiring the use of various office equipment including copying,binding, faxing, mail, and switchboard.Identifiesand meets or exceeds the requirements of all requests for services.Evaluatesand ensures the quality and accuracy of all materials and completed requests.Checks,cleans, and supplies all BSC and convenience copiers, mail machines and faxmachines according to the daily schedule. Keeps equipment and work areas clean and orderly.Assistsin the sorting and delivery of mail, faxes, and completed projects.Assistsin interoffice duties including drop box runs, rush pick-ups and fax runs.Maintainsaccurate tracking of jobs, pick-ups/deliveries and other documentation.Monitorssupplies and note when re-orders are needed. ADDITIONALRESPONSIBILITIES:Providessupport for switchboard/receptionist duties as requested.Performsexternal messenger responsibilities, as needed.Assistsin housekeeping and conferencing duties and office moves as contracted with thecustomer.Assistsin the move, storage, and retrieval of records and files as needed.Performsother related duties as assigned. QUALIFICATIONS:Highschool diploma or equivalent.Abilityto work cooperatively and communicate effectively.Workinvolves quality control and a strong attention to detail.Abilityto perform duties outside under various weather conditions and temperatures.Workinvolves varying degrees of standing, walking, bending, lifting, and repetitivemotion.Abilityto lift a minimum of 50 lbs. with or without reasonable accommodation.",Office Services Associate - District Associate Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Legal ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/office-services-associate-district-associate-job-dallas-tx-us-168829356.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=5,13.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,Administrative/Clerical,413cffb197d6c65d29e2f9680bb11fef
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:03:47:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking an Optical and IP Customer Support Engineer in Richardson, Texas (TX).Optical Technology refresh with new IP+ Optical platforms, below are some examples: New Optical platforms such as NCS4K, is launching in April 2015 This platform actually brings Optical + IP customers on one single platforms and introduces Optical SDN controller NCS1K(ROSCO) solution is already launch and many of our Data Centers are buying this solution to provide Datacenter Transport InterconnectRole & Responsibilities: Provide second/third level technical support for Optical and Data/IP technologies to Cisco customers, partners, account teams, and other TAC Engineers Apply analytical skills and technical knowledge to solve product and network problems of moderate to high complexity Act as a technical expert and provide support on a world-wide basis Work on problems of diverse scope where analysis requires evaluation of identifiable factors Provide technology/product/troubleshooting training and intellectual property material as required Act as focal point for large account network problem resolution Submit complete and correct defect reports in area of expertise Interact across TAC teams and development teams at peer level Receive minimal supervision, no instruction on routine work, and general instruction on new assignments Report to Manager, Technical Support Typically interface with lower level CSE's, VARs, OEMs, Service Providers, end-users & internal engineering departmentsREQUIREMENTS: BS in CS or EE or equivalent, or 4-7 years' experience related to the position 2+ years with one or more Optical skills (SONET, DWDM, OC, SDH, ML, MSTP, etc.) 2+ years working knowledge of Networking industry, products and protocols Strong analytical and troubleshooting skills Ability to communicate effectively both verbally and in writing Ability to determine problems and deliver known solutions Ability to determine root cause and resolution for previously unknown problems Ability to work effectively with and provide guidance to other members of the workgroup Effectively utilize moderate to complex lab setups to recreate and solve problems Experience with handling critical customer issues/problems Working with cross-functional teams Presentation skills Previous Customer Support experience Database experience (Oracle, SQL, Sybase) Unix experience CCOS certification (either SONET or SDH) CCNA, CCNP or higher networking certification",Optical and IP Customer Support Engineer Job in Richardson,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Richardson, TX 75082",,http://jobview.monster.com/optical-ip-customer-support-engineer-job-richardson-tx-us-168581237.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),818f2c21c41d7f6cca9f0becf2ff7d84
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:03:46:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"HIRING - PART TIME ALTERATIONS SPECIALISTA Career That’s Meant to BeAt David’s Bridal, we empower our customers and our employees to stay true to their dreams and find the one, whether that means the wedding dress that matches her personal style—or the career that’s a perfect fit.We’re looking for people with diverse backgrounds and fresh ideas to help create a uniquely personal retail experience.Now Accepting Applications for our busy Season in March for Part TimeAlterations SpecialistThe Alteration’s Specialist is responsible for completing all alteration fittings and sewing services necessary to meet our customers’ needs. The Alterations Specialist suggests product options to our customers to help each one complete the overall look of her event.Our most successful Alterations Specialist are self-motivated individuals with outgoing personalities, and excellent technical sewing and fitting skills. They love special occasion fashion and have expertise on how to tailor a garment to ensure the best fit possible. Through the Alterations Specialist skills, vision, and informed recommendations, they will give our customers the confidence they need to choose the “one”, her dress.If you would like to be part of a dynamic team, help our customers dress for the most important days of their lives, and earn a competitive income, we would love to discuss your future at David’s Bridal.Our store will host interviews over the next two weeks.Alterations SpecialistResponsibilities:Perform all necessary customer garment fittings to David’s Bridal standardsPerform all types of alterations on bridal gowns, bridesmaid dresses, flower girl dresses, special occasion dressesPress, steam, and spot clean garments/merchandise as necessaryFollow quality control guidelines and inspect all garments to verify pristine condition before final delivery to customerSchedule alterations appointments in person or by telephone as neededFill out alterations tickets accurately and completely, ensuring correct fees and pricingResolve alterations customer service issues or complaints and refer any unresolved matter to floor managerAssist in closing sales by partnering with stylists to validate garment fit and suggest product additionsCommunicate supply needs to the Alterations Manager to ensure all supplies are available at all timesEnsure preventative maintenance of equipment and report any damage or broken equipment immediatelyFlexibility to work retail schedules such as weekends, evenings, and holidaysManual dexterity to perform non-selling responsibilities, such as use of POS (Point of Sale) terminals, counting money, accessing computers and initiating and receiving telephone callsManual dexterity to sew and perform fittingsAbility to move throughout the store, lift up to 10 pounds, stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, stand, and reach with armsPart Time AvailableProfessional EnvironmentGenerous Employee Discount After First Pay PeriodIf you are interested in working in our stores, please note that the online application process will take approximately 30 minutes.Now that we’ve popped the question, please say “I do”.<br />#CJT_jobBodyContent p {<br /> margin: 10px !important;<br /> min-height: 13px !important;<br />}<br />",Alterations Specialist [Part-Time] Job in Arlington,Full Time Employee,"Arlington, TX 76018",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/alterations-specialist-part-time-job-arlington-tx-us-168272321.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=8,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,f8ee1d33465db8d598ff8a4f0f33162a
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:02:35:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Peak Incorporated is hiring for an entry level full time sales, marketing and management training position. At Peak Inc. we feel sales and marketing is a critical part of how to exist in the world. Sales and marketing skills are needed throughout your entire life.At Peak Inc. we want to teach sales and marketing fundamentals and then move individuals into management as soon as possible! It’s how we expand our company.This position is full time and involves responsibilities in:·         Entry level sales & marketing ·         Entry level management training ·         Sales and marketing presentations ·         Face to face sales and marketing of new services for our clients ·         Sales and marketing techniques ·         Training sales and marketing representative Peak Inc. cross-trains all employees within leadership development which includes:·         interviewing ·         sales and marketing training fundamentals ·         team building and mentoring ·         entry level marketing and sales consulting  Benefits & Our CultureThe management, sales & marketing team at Peak Inc. offers an environment where our employee’s ideas are not only heard but implemented. We offer a team based and structured environment, however employees are expected to be self-disciplined in managing their own time and work schedule. · Fun, team building environment · Travel Opportunities · Leadership workshops & development · Financial management, business management, time management · Philanthropy events – a chance to give back to the community · Recognition for top performers · Advancement to management based on performance Philanthropy is an important part of our cultureOur management & marketing team and employees are involved in organizations Nationally as well as Locally.  Qualified candidates:· must possess excellent interpersonal communication skills· maintain a high level of professionalism & integrity· Experience with public speaking for presenting to groups a plus· 4 year degree preferred, not required· 1-2 years of customer service· Demonstrated leadership ability. Sales and Marketing experience is not required· Demonstrated critical thinking and problem solving skillsEmployees who achieve promotions into management at Peak Inc. are:·         highly coachable team players ·         willing to follow a proven training and support system designed to help employees achieve their goals·         team player·         amazing attitudes·         looking for an amazing future Ideal candidates have an uncommon combination of attributes. They are self-motivated, entrepreneurial individuals who are ready to leave behind the constraints of the traditional corporate job model and build a secure future of their own.    Candidates with interest in the following industries should apply: marketing, sales, entry level marketing, marketing management, director of sales, director of sales promos, director of sales promotions, distribution sales manager, district sales manager, field rep, field representative, field sales engineer, floor supervisor, independent consultant, inside sales, inside sales rep, inside sales representative, international sales account manager, internet sales manager, major, account exec, major account executive, major account manager, major account rep, major, account representative, manufacturers rep, manufacturer’s representative, market research, marketing, medical sales, merchandise manager, national account manager,",Entry Level Manager Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO 80226",Advertising and PR ServicesManagement Consulting ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-manager-job-denver-co-us-168882044.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=13,,Marketing/Product,972c46d1e5264ef0505f53a8e74fc7c0
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:01:46:46,No,jobs.monster.com,Subcontracts Manager will be responsible for onsite program managment through completion of identified product (Circuit Card Assembly). Experience in Military/Aerospace environment dealing with the manufacture and procurement of circuit card assemblies. Must have electronics assembly experience. Must be experienced project/program manager. Hours: 40Duration: 90 days br{line-height:1px;},Subcontracts Manager Job in Ankara,Full Time,"Ankara, CA",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/subcontracts-manager-job-ankara-ca-us-168808659.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f7539c4b1d68d08a6e095807b3243fb9
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:01:46:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"VRC Investigations is currently expanding our investigations division.  Veracity Research Co. Investigations (VRC), is one of the nation’s leading and most experienced investigation companies.  We currently have career opportunities for experienced, self-determined, and highly motivated SURVEILLANCE INVESTIGATORS that would like to join our team of professionals in our efforts to deter and combat insurance fraud.  We have part-time and full-time positions available in our rapidly growing Investigations Unit.  We offer advancement opportunities in our Claims Investigations and Special Investigations Units.  The surveillance investigator position is a work from home, hourly, and non-exempt position.The primary responsibilities of this position include but are not limited to: conducting various types of investigations, covert surveillance, and background checks.  Investigators will be required to record all findings into a clear and concise report, obtain video evidence, obtain recorded statements, testify as needed at hearings and trials, and work independently with minimal supervision.The successful candidate will have related experience as either:*A private investigator*Honorably discharged from any military branch*Law enforcement*Loss prevention*Security*Criminal Justice degree  Applicants must meet the following requirements:*Excellent verbal and written communication skills*Demonstrate ability to analyze information, develop logical questions and accurately report findings*Proficient in Microsoft Office programs*Excellent time management skills*Possess a valid driver’s license and provide MVR*Own a windows based laptop not older than 2 years*Own a suitable surveillance vehicle*Be willing to travel *Private Investigator license is mandatory in some states*Must pass a drug test and pre-employment testing*Upon job offer you must attend 2 weeks of formal training at our corporate training academy.  Training will be followed up by on-the-job and specialized training.Benefits:VRC provides their investigators with necessary equipment and comparable pay, to include drive time, above normal commute mileage reimbursement, company paid licensing fees in most states, and allowance for non-reimbursed business expenses.  VRC also offers medical, dental, disability benefits, as well as paid vacation, and a 401K/Profit Sharing retirement plan.Compensation:VRC full time employees are paid on a bi-weekly basis. Investigators are paid an hourly wage to commensurate with experience.  For more information, please visit our web site located at www.vrcinvestigations.com.",Surveillance Investigator Job in Minneapolis,"Full Time, Employee","Minneapolis, MN",InsuranceSecurity and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/surveillance-investigator-job-minneapolis-mn-us-168405675.aspx?mescoid=3300593001001&jobPosition=11,$16.40+ /hour,Security/Protective Services,c77087c948753c9d9dfb63ce19d65069
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:00:58:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Talent Hub 360 is looking for a Telecom Engineer to join the IT Infrastructure Engineering Department which will provide additional support and capacity to the Telecommunications Team.  The client is in Health Care Services.Job Summary:This role will be responsible for the design, implementation, support and management of corporate telecommunications architectures. The candidate should have excellent technical, client, people, writing and presentation skills with experience in design and/or implementation for multi-site contact centers from small to large in scope. Essential Functions:Design, Architecture and Maintenance Analyze, design and document the telecommunications infrastructure architecture.Coordinate the installation of telecommunications hardware/phone lines for the main campus and remote offices.Maintain and document software level and patch maintenance for telecommunications hardwareAdheres to IT standards/policies including Change Management.Possess and apply comprehensive knowledge to complete difficult assignments with minimal supervision.Mentor/train entry level personnel in technical complexities of telecommunications infrastructure.Planning and directing multiple projects to coordinate software applications from the development environment to staging environment through the build process and ultimately migration to production. Education/Experience: Preferred BS/BA in related discipline (Computer Information Systems, Management Information Systems) and / or 5+ years of related experience in the field (i.e., Voice Engineering, Cisco UCCE).Experience with Cisco Unified Communications Manager (CUCM)Experience integrating with Unified Contact Center Enterprise (UCCE)Experience with H.323 and SIP ProtocolsKnowledge of IP telephony desktop, server based applications and hosted environments.Knowledge of MS Active Directory and DNSDemonstrated ability to perform complex problem isolation with TelecommunicationsDemonstrates the ability to perform and troubleshoot complex problems in an Enterprise environment.Working knowledge of Windows and Linux Operating SystemsWorking knowledge of Cisco Routing and SwitchingSupports business customers in the engineering processParticipates in the Engineering of IPT systems and updating documentationPerforms timely engineering reviews and planning of maintenance and upgrades for our production IPT Infrastructure (hardware and software).Strong verbal and written communication skills requiredUp to 25% travel PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:Third Party Recording Software: NICE VoIP and Screen RecordingsCisco UC and UCCE Platforms and Applications (UCM, ICM, CVP and VXML).Knowledge of Nuance, VXML and CVPBasic knowledge MS SQL and Oracle Database EnvironmentsPREFERRED CERTIFICATIONSCCENT: Certified Cisco Entry Network TechnicianCCVP: Certified Cisco Voice ProfessionalComputer Skills:Type at least 25 words a minute for data and configuration entryAdvanced knowledge of Microsoft Office including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, Visio and Project",Telecommunications Engineering,"Full Time, Employee","New York City, NY 10036",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/telecommunications-engineering-other-job-new-york-city-ny-us-168263731.aspx?mescoid=1500133001001&jobPosition=13,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,1b3146b5a47928a98ad55100b7b14557
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:00:57:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ciber is currently seeking a Systems Architect in Plano, TX!       Leads PMO technical streams. Works with partners to develop engineering, installation, and commissioning teams to deploy. systems for the application architecture supporting transformation programs. Directs automation and tool development team to automate the process and insure smooth implementation and operations. Provides guidance to teams responsible for infrastructure sizing, installation and testing. Manage risks associated with systems integration through appropriate standards and security policies. Conduct and lead design activities with respect to future state reference architecture.   BA/BS in Computer Science or related field, or equivalent; advanced technical educational degree preferred. Minimum 15+ years of experience in application development and architecture design. Experience in managing complex, multi-vendor IT technical transformation programs to meet Telco quality, performance and resilience requirements. Prefer familiarity and experience with NFV/SDN, cloud architectures, ability to work in multi-vendor scenarios, preferably including Network Equipment Suppliers (NEPs) Experience in telco solutions and integrations to BSS/OSS applications. Prefer familiarity with Telco architectures, component integration, and industry policy standards such as provided by ETSI and the Telemanagement Forum. Excellent communication skills (written and oral). This position requires the successful completion of a background investigation and/or drug screen.  Ciber, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Females/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.  Learn. Ciber Transformation Services help our clients accelerate the pace of change. Through effective talent identification, thoughtful implementation and reskilling, we help IT organizations modernize their workforce, meet emerging industry requirements and ultimately shift their labor pyramid. Grow.  For more than 40 years, Ciber has delivered the technical savvy and IT solutions that help businesses achieve strategic goals. A global IT consulting company with some 6,500 people, Ciber has offices on four continents and in 15 countries. Founded in 1974, Ciber remains client focused and results driven. The company trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE: CBR). For more information, visit http://www.ciber.com/.",Systems Architect Job in Plano,"Full Time, Employee","Plano, TX 75023",,http://jobview.monster.com/systems-architect-job-plano-tx-us-168490206.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=6,,IT/Software Development,e84aad533bd3568820c59ac0b2d1e4f1
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:13:00:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Not only is AT&T the industry leader in telecommunications, high-speed Internet, and pay TV, but we are a top competitor in government services. With an AT&T career, you could find yourself on a team facing a range of challenges -- from chasing artificial intelligence, resolving quantum computing, or working cybersecurity opportunities; to building tomorrow’s global network. If you would like to be at the forefront of the ever-expanding world of information technology, AT&T is the career choice for you. We are looking for candidates with great communication skills as well as strong problem solving abilities to provide 24/7 Help Desk Tier 1 support. Communication skills will be extremely important as - phone and in-person support for a variety of services including email, LAN/WAN, desktop applications and COTS/GOTS applications will be required. Shift work is required for this position. A competitive candidate will have a minimum of 3 years of Help Desk experience as well as a Bachelor’s degree in Business, Technical or Math. Five (5) years with an Associate’s Degree or seven (7) years’ experience may be substituted for the Bachelor’s Degree. A TS/SCI clearance with polygraph is required.Here at AT&T we are proud to be one of the top companies to work for in the United States. As a top 10 Fortune company, you have the amazing opportunity to work for the largest telecommunications company in the world. Ranking #4 on the DiversityInc top 50 list, whatever your interests may be, there is definitely a place for you at AT&T. We offer a great benefits package with health and flexible spending accounts, 401k, medical and dental plans, Paid and Sick time off. We also offer an extensive list of employee discounts, from DirectTV, mobile devices, to vacation packages and tuition reimbursement. Your opportunities at AT&T are endless, and we can’t wait to watch you grow with us.",Help Desk Specialist II (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/help-desk-specialist-ii-government-job-columbia-md-us-169893135.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=14,,,00a59f449ce454dcba18c8edf8909fda
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:12:59:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Candidate should be a highly skilled and motivated individual with proven experience in leading and supervising multiple geo-dispersed teams in support of providing installation services. Oversee the planning and installation teams working on IDS and ACS equipment (such as Lenel On-Guard1000-7000, BICSI Level 2 Copper/Fiber) to support varied Technical Task Orders. This includes scheduling of technical resources to meet customer and mission needs. Candidate will be responsible for direct interaction with customer to address and resolve quality and satisfaction concerns. Installation Manager will also have direct profit & loss responsibilities for those projects and programs to which they are assigned. Job may require short duration travel within the Continental United States, Hawaii, and OCONUS. Has responsibility for geo-dispersed technical teams who provide support to installation of security equipment as well as Information Assurance efforts of Government Networks. Key Roles and Responsibilities: Supervises a team responsible for managing the ongoing relationships and operational delivery of services to clients. Serve as the primary point of contact to the client(s) regarding overall and day- to-day customer service. The Installation Manager will be responsible for managing and scheduling a team of engineers working various IT and security programs. This includes managing and scheduling day to day activities, customer escalations, profit & loss metrics, and interfacing with other contract entities This individual must have at a minimum of 10 years' experience working with highly technical teams responsible for the delivery and installation of complex and innovative mission critical solutions. The candidate should have excellent leadership skills and background as well as strong oral and written communication skills; must be able to articulate high level/detailed level to peers, managers, and customers. Required Clearance: Preferred TS/SCI clearance with polygraph. Desired: Fully cleared Installation Manager with extensive experience in government programs",Installation Manager (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/installation-manager-government-job-columbia-md-us-170252355.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=4,,,3b01ea936f3b5715be90559130101044
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:11:50:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T is seeking a senior security architect proficient in information assurance and security services design. The architect must have superb engineering credentials with in-depth, recent experience with both network architecture and systems design to enable guiding/leading a cross-functional cyber defense team. Furthermore, architect should have excellent customer facing presentation skills, as s/he will be expected to lead customer presentations on future cyber countermeasure design. Required Skills, Experience, and Education: Qualified candidates shall: Have at least 10 years of experience in security engineering, network engineering, or an INFOSEC related field; be knowledgeable in network protocols (TCP, IP, ICMP, UDP), routers, networking applications and related protocols (e.g. SMTP, HTTP, HTTPS, FTP, etc), firewalls, VPNS, and intrusion detection systems (IDS); Have experience with formal systems and operational testing; Have strong coordination, organization, and teaming abilities; have superior oral and written communication abilities; have familiarity with known exploitation methods, mitigation techniques for known vulnerabilities, and system attack methods (Botnets, DDOS, etc) within enterprise networks; Have the ability to work under pressure and time constraints; Knowledge of and experience with Government contracting a significant plus. BS in Computer Science or Electrical Engineering. MS Desired Required Clearance: TS/SCI",Applied Security Engineer (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/applied-security-engineer-government-job-columbia-md-us-169636975.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=15,,,731131fd2cffb92c3fa9afa55d078125
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:11:49:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"The candidate will be a member of the Network Assurance Team and will be principally engaged to support timely response based on customer criteria to customer requests for assistance as well as to provide the customer an overall accurate picture of the well-being of organizations networks and enclaves with regards to Network Assurance activity directed against the customers' assets. Primary tasks include, but are not limited to:- Perform surveillance and reconnaissance, cybersecurity defense, attack vector analysis, Computer Network Defense (CND), incident handling, vulnerability management/reporting, risk analysis and readiness and strategic planning analysis. - Correlate actionable security events, perform network traffic analysis using raw packet data, net flow, IDS, IPS and custom sensor output as it pertains to the cyber security of communications networks - Participate in the coordination of resources during incident response efforts. - Provide the customer with technical support, analysis, and recommendations. - Provide technical assistance as requested or directed by lead agency or its mission partners. - Assist in refining Tactics, Techniques, and Procedures (TTPs) and for reporting criteria, structure, and operational reports. - Provide technical support, analysis, and recommendations in the areas of: 1. Surveillance and Reconnaissance 2. Perimeter Defense 3. Malicious Software (Malware) Analysis 4. Attack vector analysis 5. Computer Network Defense (CND) 6. Incident Handling 7. Vulnerability Management/Reporting, 8. Risk Analysis and Readiness 9. Strategic Planning Analysis Basic Qualifications - strong communication skills (both written and verbal) - experience working with DoD\Government Leadership at all levels - Familiar with network design and security infrastructure - possess a CompTIA Security+ with Continuing Education (CE) Certification - Bachelor’s degrees from an accredited college in a related discipline, or equivalent experience/combined education, with 5 years of professional experience; or 3 years of professional experience with a related Master’s degree. - possess a minimum CompTIA Security+ with Continuing Education (CE) certification - experience supporting Computer Network Defense (CND) or related teams. - experience working CND duties (e.g., Protect, Defend, Respond, and Sustain). - experience working with DoD / Government Leaders at all levels. - strong communication skills (both written and verbal). - in-depth understanding of TCP/IP protocols, ports, and services - obtain a Certified Ethical Hacker certification within 180 days of hireDesired Qualifications: 1. Splunk 2. Palo Alto 3. Network Firewalls 4. SourceFire/Cisco IDS/IPS 5. HBSSRequired Clearance: Personnel shall possess a final TS/SCI eligible security clearance (granted full SCI eligibility by a U.S. Government Adjudication Authority within the past 60 months) and have not had a break in SCI access of more than 24 months during this period.",Cyber Security Fusion\Metrics Specialist (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/cyber-security-fusion-metrics-specialist-government-job-columbia-md-us-169992460.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=4,,,0a9c8674a300ad962d0c3dca0b425fbb
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:11:04:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Analyzes user’s requirements, concept of operations documents, and high level system architectures to develop system requirements specifications. Analyzes system requirements and leads design and development activities. Guides users in formulating requirements, advises alternative approaches, and conducts feasibility studies. Provides technical leadership for the integration of requirements, design, and technology. Incorporates new plans, designs and systems into ongoing operations. Develops technical documentation. Develops system Architecture and system design documentation. Guides system development and implementation planning through assessment or preparation of system engineering management plans and system integration and test plans. Interacts with the Government regarding Systems Engineering technical considerations and for associated problems, issues or conflicts. Ultimate responsibility for the technical integrity of work performed and deliverables associated with the Systems Engineering area of responsibility. Communicates with other program personnel, government overseers, and senior executives.The Senior Cloud / Virtualization Systems Engineer in the Infrastructure Engineering group is a technical leadership role responsible for evaluation, recommendation, design, implementation, and ongoing support of the computer infrastructure services and to ensure high availability, redundancy, recoverability, and capacity. These technical areas include: Operating systems (Linux and Windows ), Virtualization (VMware and RHEV / KVM), OpenStack and Amazon systems hardware. The Senior Cloud / Virtualization Systems Engineer will also provide support to the Engineering Operations and application development groups. The position will also work closely with the other groups in the Infrastructure Engineering area - networking, data center, storage, security and architecture Required Skills, Experience, and Education: Fourteen (14) years’ experience in programs and contracts of similar scope, type and complexity within the Federal Government is required. Bachelor’s degree in System Engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering Science, Engineering Management, or related discipline from an accredited college or university is required. Five (5) years of additional SE experience may be substituted for a bachelor’s degree. Required Clearance: Candidate must have a TS/SCI clearance with polygraph.Desired: VMWare/Cloud Engineer (System Engineer (SE) L2) with DoD 8570.01-M appropriate certification.",VMware\Cloud Engineer \ System Engineer (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/vmware-cloud-engineer-system-engineer-government-job-columbia-md-us-169893184.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=11,,,ec73c703dee0bee5f424e56f4b1eb922
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:10:56:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T GSI is searching for a Space Acquisition Logistics Analyst experienced in providing direct, on-site support to the Geosynchronous Space Situational Awareness Program (GSSAP) Office at Los Angeles Air Force Base, CA. The ideal candidate is experienced in providing the following functions:Review provide input to design documentation (TRDs, Specifications, interface control documents, drawings), requirements documents (ICDs, CDDs, CPDs), ECPs, PWSs Develop Training System Requirements Analysis, Logistics Planning Documents, and Life Cycle Sustainment Plans Review and provide input to enabling concepts, concept of operations, and ensuring supportability requirements are addressed and part of upfront planning for systems Developing strategies, plans and packages for classified and unclassified Depot Source of Repair Successful candidate may be tasked by Air Force to lead one or more acquisition logistics programs with responsibility for budget and schedule development and execution Assist in integration across project spectrum Coordinate and lead Integrated product teams (IPT) Ability to provide a wide variety of acquisition/sustainment technical analyses, and program management support to a government PM Provides analysis of proposed costs, contractor Statements of Work, and technical content Ensures adherence to Government acquisition policies, master plans and schedules, and develops solutions to program problems Have a working knowledge of system acquisitions, specifically in Air Force and DoD environments, covering the DoD 5000 series Assist in the execution of acquisition strategies, including drafting Statement of Work, Statement of Objectives, Request for Proposal preparations, monitoring deliverables, and attending acquisition related meetings. Travel requirement: Approximately 25% 10 or more years of experience is required in the following areas:Acquisition Logistics supporting space acquisition programs and/or industry experience Experience in Space Control, SSA, or Space C2 desired as a space systems acquisition logistics experience preferred; prior work as Air Force Operator or Maintainer is desirable Familiar with a variety of acquisition concepts, phases, and procedures; participate in technical studies, and performance reviews; ability to function in a multi-contractor/customer environment, performs a variety of complicated tasks, a wide degree of creativity and latitude is expected; demonstrated leadership and interpersonal skills; and effective written and oral communication skills required.Security Clearance Requirement Education and Training Requirements: B.A./B.S., preferably in systems engineering, or other technical degree Acquisition Logistics DAU Level 2 (Level 3 preferred)/or equivalent for non-Government candidates",Senior Acquisition Logistics Analyst (Government) Job in El Segundo,Full Time Employee,"El Segundo, CA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-acquisition-logistics-analyst-government-job-el-segundo-ca-us-170365509.aspx?mescoid=1300086001001&jobPosition=4,,Logistics/Transportation,262e12b61553e01559f1ba332c1109e6
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:10:56:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position will provide systems engineering, technical project management, and space systems acquisition support to the United States Air Force, Space and Missile Systems Center, Space Superiority Systems Directorate, Ground Based Electro-Optical Deep Space Surveillance (GEODSS) Program Office (SMC/SYG) at Peterson Air Force Base, CO. The candidate must demonstrate applicable acquisition skill level and experience in Space Radars, Space Control, Space Situational Awareness, Command and Control, or Space Superiority. This includes DoD life cycle program support, DoD systems engineering processes, documents, reviews, and test (development and/or operational). Review provide input to design documentation (TRDs, Specifications, interface control documents, drawings), requirements documents (ICDs, CDDs, CPDs), ECPs, PWSs • Organizes, analyzes, conducts, and/or monitors/oversees RF engineering activities relating to the design, development, fabrication, installation, modification, sustainment, and/or analysis of systems or systems components • Applies RF/systems engineering technical and technical management processes to a functional specialty in IPT environments • Review and provide input to enabling concepts, concept of operations, and ensuring supportability requirements are addressed and part of upfront planning for systems • Coordinate and lead Integrated product teams (IPT) • Ability to provide a wide variety of acquisition/sustainment technical analyses, and program management support to a government PM • Provides analysis of proposed costs, contractor Statements of Work, and technical content • Ensures adherence to Government acquisition policies, master plans and schedules, and develops solutions to program problems • Have a working knowledge of system acquisitions, specifically in Air Force and DoD environments, covering the DoD 5000 series • Assist in the execution of acquisition strategies, including drafting Statement of Work, Statement of Objectives, Request for Proposal preparations, monitoring deliverables, and attending acquisition related meetings. • Travel requirement: Approximately 25%DoD Secret requiredBaccalaureate degree in engineering, science (physics or chemistry), mathematics or related field or 4 years acquisition/logistics/sustainment experience.Desired: Master’s Degree in Systems Engineering; DAU SPRDE Level 2",Systems Engineer\Project Tech Manager (Government) Job in Co Springs,,"Co Springs, CO",,http://jobview.monster.com/systems-engineer-project-tech-manager-government-job-co-springs-co-us-166469458.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=20,,,071629cf2fb3047b1f8b14361b79d821
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:10:55:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Provide Network and Data Center Operations Support at the Marine Corps University (MCU). Provide support for the operation of the data center and associated data network currently located at the Gray Research Center (GRC) and associated data network, including C2 systems, located at the Expeditionary Warfare School (EWS), MCU, Quantico, VA, with additional elements at other MCU locations at Quantico. This support includes the operation, maintenance, and installation of upgrades and any additional capabilities required for the data center and network to ensure network availability for customers. This task supports the network, data center and C2 systems. Provide network build/configuration/test and network troubleshooting. Maintain the MCU networks including the configuration of servers and network devices (e.g., routers and switches) and performing routine maintenance that affects network operations during non-working hours. In the event emergency maintenance is required (i.e. system goes down), the contractor shall restore the network to full operational capability as soon as possible. Troubleshoot hardware/software problems, conduct back-ups, establish and maintain connections to proxy servers, Acquire SSL certificates as necessary. Manage user accounts, mail, and user profiles. Provide support for software applications running on the network. Provide user help desk support and desk-side support during normal working hours (currently MCU hours Monday - Thursday 0730 - 2000, Friday 0730 - 1800,and Saturday 1000 - 1800). This position will require an occasional Saturday and occasional evening work, though the majority of the hours are standard daytime hours High School Diploma; 3 - 5 years’ experience; CompTIA Security+; familiar with VMWare, networks Required Clearance: Secret Desired: Cisco Certified Design Associate (CCDA) certification; ITIL Foundation V3 certification; VMware Certified Professional (VCP); Microsoft Certified Technology Specialist (MCTS): Windows XP, Configuration; Microsoft Certified Technology Specialist (MCTS): Business Desktop Deployment Working Towards Microsoft Certified System Administrator (MCSA); Microsoft Certified Desktop Support Technician (SCDST); CompTIA A+ or Network+ Certification; CompTIA Linux+ Certification; Junior Level Linux Professional (LPIC-1); Cisco CCENT(Cisco Certified Entry Network Technician); Cisco CCNA™ Certification Network certifications will be given higher consideration.",Network Engineer (Government) Job in Stafford,,"Stafford, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/network-engineer-government-job-stafford-va-us-170368491.aspx?mescoid=1500132001001&jobPosition=2,,,7af5f060357f903b8d7ed69001db0384
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:01:00:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  695023Description:SHIFT: M-F 3pm-1230amContract: Through end of the year with possibility of extensionPay Rate: 10/hrPosition Summary: Picking, labeling, and otherwise preparing the finished prescription as well as other light warehouse duties.  Duties:Key Responsibilities: Prep for the day; set up totes Fills daily drug orders accurately and efficiently in a timely manner, under the supervision of a pharmacist.Assists in processing returned drugs and recycle/dispose per procedure.Review facility pre-list and prepare 30 day cards with the appropriate drug for the full fill.Assists in monthly fills by delivering and exchanging medications to scheduled nursing home.Assist in pre-packing frequently ordered medications, label, and store, as needed during low volume times.Packages materials and products manuallyReceives packing order and pull items to be delivered from order sheetsDetermines that the correct packing materials are available at packing stationChecks packing list for accuracyApplies labels, and stack boxes according to directions Coordinate STAT deliveriesShip UPS ordersKeeps record of departure times and items packed and attaches to order Follow all applicable government regulations including HIPAA.Other duties as assigned; Job duties may vary by location.Physical Demands: May sit, stand, stoop, bend and walk intermittently during the day. May sit or stand seven (7) to ten (10) hours per day. May be necessary to work extended hours as needed. Finger dexterity to operate office equipment required. May need to lift up to twenty-five (25) pounds on occasion. Visual acuity to see and read fine prints.Specific vision abilities required by this role include close vision, color vision and the ability to adjust focus.Must be able to hear normal voice sounds. The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this role. Work Environment: Work in a climate-controlled, smoke-free internal environment.  TO APPLY: PLEASE SUBMIT YOUR RESUME AND CONTACT INFO TO ABOGNAR@APEXSYSTEMSINC.COM EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",OMNI - Picking Technician Job in West Chester,Full Time Employee,"West Chester, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/omni-picking-technician-job-west-chester-oh-us-174643130.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),47b38934466e476798c448bb231c8359
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:01:09:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"91B Light-Wheel Vehicle Mechanic Job ID: 779149 Job Views: 279 Location: CINCINNATI, Ohio, United States ZIP Code: 45215 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 10.19.2016 Job DescriptionGot a knack for keeping cars and trucks on the road? Then join the Army National Guard as a Light-Wheel Vehicle Mechanic and help keep freedom moving forward.As a Light-Wheel Vehicle Mechanic, you will have the opportunity to supervise and perform unit maintenance and recovery operations on gasoline - and diesel - fueled light-wheeled vehicles. In short, if it's on wheels, you'll work on it. And after your paid training, you'll be qualified to maintain and repair any number of vehicle systems and components, preparing you to step right into a civilian vehicle maintenance career.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 10 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Light-Wheel Vehicle Mechanic Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"91B Light-Wheel Vehicle Mechanic Job ID: 779149 Job Views: 279 Location: CINCINNATI, Ohio, United States ZIP Code: 45215 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 10.19.2016 Job DescriptionGot a knack for keeping cars and trucks on the road? Then join the Army National Guard as a Light-Wheel Vehicle Mechanic and help keep freedom moving forward.As a Light-Wheel Vehicle Mechanic, you will have the opportunity to supervise and perform unit maintenance and recovery operations on gasoline - and diesel - fueled light-wheeled vehicles. In short, if it's on wheels, you'll work on it. And after your paid training, you'll be qualified to maintain and repair any number of vehicle systems and components, preparing you to step right into a civilian vehicle maintenance career.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 10 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/91b-light-wheel-vehicle-mechanic-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174491825.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=12,,Entry Level,d3a755b88d85e2b08168a7e54d57b303
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:01:45:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client located in Northern Cincinnati, Ohio (OH) that is seeking 3 experienced General Ledger Accountants to assist with the transition of all finance and accounting functions from individual operating companies into a shared services center and document all of the processes accordingly. Summary:The General Ledger Transition team will manage and lead the transition of R2R (Record to Report) activities (Journals, Fixed Assets, Reporting, etc.). This is a key role within the Project Team to ensure successful delivery of internal transition strategy. Supporting the finance transformation, the candidate will work alongside the Transition Lead, the R2R Lead within Shared Services, and Accounting Analysts within Operating Companies to ensure the service visions are defined and implemented in line with overall finance strategy.Duties and Responsibilities: Focus on the transition of all operating companies finance and accounting functions through all phases of the migrations to the shared services model Lead account mapping sessions between OpCo current Chart of Account and new corporate chart of account Undertake detailed change impact assessments, focused around process, technology, people and business continuity, and design mitigation protocols Ensure controls and quality standards are metREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Accounting preferred but not required Thorough understanding of R2R (Record to Report) and the processes represented Experience within a Shared Service environment; BPO or Finance Transformation Strength working collaboratively with a variety of disciplines and team members Ability to travel 40% - 50% of the timeKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Accounting Systems Conversion Analyst Job in West Chester,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"West Chester, OH 45069",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-systems-conversion-analyst-job-west-chester-oh-us-174858326.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=3,25.00 - 35.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),0c08af16bb3054ee78bb1335c2dbad79
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:01:47:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc.,we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! Andthat means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, whileproviding our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever andhowever they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do italone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re anenthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle,godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a funplace to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team –become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kidseverywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hearstraight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves! Job Summary: To operate cashregisters in a store, process Guest payments, bag Guest goods, and do relatedwork as required.Responsibilities:Guest service. Smile andengage every Guest.  Address allquestions and inquiries by Guests. If asked a question that they cannot answer,will locate the appropriate subject expert to further help the Guest.  Obtain Guest’s phone number upon check-out(explaining Guest delight survey, if necessary).  Ask Guest about shopping experience andsuggest add-ons (e.g., batteries). Interacts with Guests of all ages.Operates cash registerand verifies purchase price. Identify and locate UPC codes on items, correctlyscan codes, and obtain assistance for price checks when a price code is notreadable or is missing.Packages Guest goods.Packages a Guest’s goods unassisted and place goods in the Guest’s shoppingcart.Processes Guestpayments. Accurately process all forms of Guest payments accepted by the store,including cash, store credit, checks and credit cards. Payment processingduties include counting cash and making change, use of electronic credit cardreceipts, verification of Guest identification for checks, communication withGuests to obtain identifying information (such as driver’s licenses),recordation of Guest information on checks, and communication with storemanager for authorization on checks over $100.Retention and executionof tasks. Able to learn to perform all essential job functions at an acceptablelevel with minimal supervision within 3 weeks. Qualifications Ability to read pricetag information, ability to read English language sufficient to read Guestchecks, Guest identification and similar written materials.Basic English languagewriting skills for completion of payment processing, Guest checks and voidpaperwork on void transactions.Basic mathematicalskills, including addition and subtraction, necessary to verify cash registerfunctions and make change. **Please note that werecruit for this position on an on-going basis in order to build a talent poolof potential candidates. When a position becomes available, we will reviewapplicants at that time. Due to the volume of resumes that we receive, onlythose candidates selected for interviews will be contacted. Thank you for yourinterest in Toys""R""Us, Inc.! Stay connected with us on Facebook,LinkedIn, Instagram, Twitter & YouTube @ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-KY-FlorenceWork Locations: Florence, KY BRU 4999 Houston Rd  Florence 41042-5126 Schedule: Flexible",Babies R Us Seasonal Cashier Job in Florence,Full Time ,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc.,we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! Andthat means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, whileproviding our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever andhowever they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do italone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re anenthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle,godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a funplace to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team –become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kidseverywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hearstraight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves! Job Summary: To operate cashregisters in a store, process Guest payments, bag Guest goods, and do relatedwork as required.Responsibilities:Guest service. Smile andengage every Guest.  Address allquestions and inquiries by Guests. If asked a question that they cannot answer,will locate the appropriate subject expert to further help the Guest.  Obtain Guest’s phone number upon check-out(explaining Guest delight survey, if necessary).  Ask Guest about shopping experience andsuggest add-ons (e.g., batteries). Interacts with Guests of all ages.Operates cash registerand verifies purchase price. Identify and locate UPC codes on items, correctlyscan codes, and obtain assistance for price checks when a price code is notreadable or is missing.Packages Guest goods.Packages a Guest’s goods unassisted and place goods in the Guest’s shoppingcart.Processes Guestpayments. Accurately process all forms of Guest payments accepted by the store,including cash, store credit, checks and credit cards. Payment processingduties include counting cash and making change, use of electronic credit cardreceipts, verification of Guest identification for checks, communication withGuests to obtain identifying information (such as driver’s licenses),recordation of Guest information on checks, and communication with storemanager for authorization on checks over $100.Retention and executionof tasks. Able to learn to perform all essential job functions at an acceptablelevel with minimal supervision within 3 weeks. Qualifications Ability to read pricetag information, ability to read English language sufficient to read Guestchecks, Guest identification and similar written materials.Basic English languagewriting skills for completion of payment processing, Guest checks and voidpaperwork on void transactions.Basic mathematicalskills, including addition and subtraction, necessary to verify cash registerfunctions and make change. **Please note that werecruit for this position on an on-going basis in order to build a talent poolof potential candidates. When a position becomes available, we will reviewapplicants at that time. Due to the volume of resumes that we receive, onlythose candidates selected for interviews will be contacted. Thank you for yourinterest in Toys""R""Us, Inc.! Stay connected with us on Facebook,LinkedIn, Instagram, Twitter & YouTube @ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-KY-FlorenceWork Locations: Florence, KY BRU 4999 Houston Rd  Florence 41042-5126 Schedule: Flexible",,http://jobview.monster.com/babies-r-us-seasonal-cashier-job-florence-ky-us-173672261.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=5,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,9d16e3128b5c00ffdfc15aed1d6aaced
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:01:48:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Retail PROJECT Merchandiser PART Time   The foundation of retail is built with strong displays for consumers to easily spot the brand names and quality products they love. Help increase sales of premium consumer products by applying for our part time Retail Project Merchandiser job. You will have the chance to build and craft retail merchandising displays at our client’s retail locations within assigned territories. This position is responsible for calling in for project work for merchandising products and maintaining strong relationships with in-store management. Bring your skills to Advantage Solutions, the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, where you will receive in-depth training and competitive pay rates.   Responsibilities:   Meet and achieve objectives by maintaining full distribution on existing SKUs and ensuring signage is in place. They must ensure the placement of new items at all assigned stores. Maintain schematic standards and integrity through consistent communication with Retail Supervisor and other retail personnel. Deep cleaning of existing sections and fixtures. Hang shelf signs, place coupons and assemble cardboard displays. Travel and driving are essential to this position.  Qualifications:   High School Diploma or GED or equivalent experience required. Strong analytical and research skills. Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment and able to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting from one to another with frequent interruptions and competing deadlines. Excellent written communication and verbal communication skills. Ability to work independently and prioritize duties with minimal supervision, in order to meet deadlines. Ability to understand and follow specific instructions and procedures. Engage in physical activity, lift and/or push up to 50 pounds, stand, stoop and bend for long periods of time, potential use of cleaning chemicals and work in environments susceptible to temperature changes i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections. Basic computer skills and Internet usage. Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.    Advantage Sales & Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.  ",Retail Project Merchandiser Part Time Job in Cincinnati,Part Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-project-merchandiser-part-time-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175019882.aspx?mescoid=2700412001001&jobPosition=10,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,32ccf2cf99e1996499278cf5b2623795
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:02:18:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Service Manager Job in Cincinnati OH, Are you ready to work for a company that appreciates you as an individual, and not just a number? Our Executive Recruitment team has an exciting opportunity for a Service Manager Job, in the greater Cincinnati OH area.  Our client has received the “Top Work Places to Work” award in 2013-2016, and has been the finalist for the award in 2011-2012. Our client is a leader in the HVAC, and plumbing industry, and looking for an experience Service Manager that can manage the entire plumbing division in the greater Cincinnati market.  This position requires strong operations skills, mentorship, and experience implementing procedures and strategies.   Service Manager Job Requirements:• Develops strategies, and goals to achieve  KPI’s, and operating budget for the plumbing division• Leads the division to maximize profitability and efficiency • Responsible for interviewing and hiring of personnel, directs work, and review employee performance• Manages any escalation of issues related to service of work, or billing• Provides key direction for the plumbing division, fleet management, and overall safety/functionality of commercial vehicles.• Strategic in regards to pricing, and implantation of new services.• Acts as a mentor, coach, and role model in order to continue the success of “Top Places to Work” Qualifications:• 5-7 years’ experience in  Service Management, HVAC,  Construction, or Plumbing• Bachelor’s degree preferred, or relevant work experience in the service industry• 3-5 Years’ experience in a supervisory, manager, or team lead role If you are interested in this Service Manager Job in Cincinnati, or other opportunities in the area, please visit www.ajilon.com and apply, or email your Resume to Raymond.Woods@Ajilon.com Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled  ",Service Manager Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45202",,http://jobview.monster.com/service-manager-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174744641.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=14,,Business/Strategic Management,a6c568caeee055b604b329cad98c6e3d
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:02:59:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis a leader in the world of work is looking for an experienced End-User Analyst who provides strong knowledge of Agile. Required skills:Experience supporting electronic data interchange (EDI) file issues- Experience in an inbound phone support or customer service environment- Experience supporting proprietary software applications- Experience simultaneously handling multiple inbound work streams such as phone, email, ticket queue, and IM- Experience in an EDI implementation role a plus- Experience/familiarity with AS2 and FTP/SFTP protocolsPosition Requirements:Education or Equivalent:- Degree in Computer Science, MIS or related field. Minimum two years related experience required.Knowledge/Skills Requirements:- Microsoft Windows XP/Vista/7- Microsoft standard desktop applications including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Exchange, Visio- Demonstrated experience supporting customer interactions and troubleshooting- Troubleshooting knowledge of PC hardware issues including modems, monitors, printers, hard drives, PDAs- Experience supporting database software such as Fox Pro- Experience supporting proprietary software applications- Fundamental understanding of networking including Novell, NT, TCP/IP, WINS, DNS- Troubleshooting web browsers and security settings- Using AS/400 applicationsExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Analyst,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Analyst, End User Customer","Columbus, OH",http://jobview.monster.com/analyst-end-user-customer-job-columbus-oh-us-175193634.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=12,16.00 - 18.00 $ /hour,IT/Software Development,315c205b424cef1033554c66e5c3ed7a
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:03:00:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Hello,My name is Shubhangi and I am currently working as a Recruitment Lead in iLink-Systems.I have currently an opening with us.If you are interested you can drop an email to me with your resume on shubhangi@ilink-systems.com  or call me on 425-440-9721.Job Title : Lead Data Warehouse and BI ArchitectLocation : Dallas TX/Cincinnati OH Lead Data Warehouse and BI Architect: BI Architect primary responsibilities will be to designing and developing business intelligence solutions. The Architect serves as Business Intelligence expert, and develops and manages Business Intelligence products and solutions. The position requires a broad business perspective and a willingness to step into multiple roles. The role is primarily focused on developing business intelligence solutions leveraging the Microsoft technology platform (SQL Server, SSIS, SSAS, SSRS, Tabular, SharePoint, and Excel BI tools).  The role needs to be able to work independently, and within excellent communication skills with experience of working effectively within a team and the ability to multi-task and prioritize.Key ResponsibilitiesHigh level:·         Delivering and presenting BI proof of concept to prospective customers·         BI requirements analysis and solution architecture design.·         Data modelling and data architecture design.·         Create ETL, data integration and data migration designs.·         Design and implement Master Data Management systems and processes.Detail Level·         Develop information architecture.·         Manage current and future needs in data design and content.·         Resolve semantic discrepancies in data definitions that arise among multiple sources and projects.·         Gain consensus among users on common business data definitions.·         Determine optimal approach for obtaining data from diverse source system platforms and move to BI.·         Implement ETL infrastructure used at a project level.·         Establish and enforce technical standards for projects deliverables.·         Coach project ETL specialists on data acquisition techniques, decision rules and its application.·         Assess current technical architecture.·         Estimate system capacity to meet short and long-term processing requirements.·         Define BI strategy/processes for:1.     Operations·         Technical architecture·         Hardware, DBMS, Middleware and Network requirements·         Server and Client configurations o    Estimate costs for technical components.o    Develop ETL technical architecture.o    Evaluate and select ETL tool.·         Develop access/analysis tool technical architecture.·         Evaluate and select access/analysis tools.·         Interface with DBA and Development staff.Professional Skills/Experience:·         7+ years’ experience working with Microsoft business intelligence tools and systems such as OLAP, data modeling, data warehousing.·         5+ years of experience architecting, developing and/or managing the implementation of Business Intelligence solutions using (preferably) Microsoft BI stack.·         Experience identifying, analyzing and translating business requirements and rules into intuitive analytical solutions, business scorecards and management dashboards.·         Understanding of Business Intelligence solutions: operational and analytical, strong knowledge of relational and multi-dimensional database architectures·         Expertise in the Microsoft BI solution offerings including SQL Server 2016/2012/2008 R2 stack (SSRS, SSAS, SSIS), PowerBI.·         Experience in Azure and/or Microsoft HDInsight is a definite plus    RegardsShubhangiRecruitment LeadiLink Systems Inc.9840 Willows Rd #202, Redmond, WA 98052, United StatesPhone: 425-440-9721Email: shubhangi@ilink-systems.comWebsite: http://www.ilink-systems.com     Report","ILink Systems Inc Job Application for Lead Data Warehouse and BI Architect | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Hello,My name is Shubhangi and I am currently working as a Recruitment Lead in iLink-Systems.I have currently an opening with us.If you are interested you can drop an email to me with your resume on shubhangi@ilink-systems.com  or call me on 425-440-9721.Job Title : Lead Data Warehouse and BI ArchitectLocation : Dallas TX/Cincinnati OH Lead Data Warehouse and BI Architect: BI Architect primary responsibilities will be to designing and developing business intelligence solutions. The Architect serves as Business Intelligence expert, and develops and manages Business Intelligence products and solutions. The position requires a broad business perspective and a willingness to step into multiple roles. The role is primarily focused on developing business intelligence solutions leveraging the Microsoft technology platform (SQL Server, SSIS, SSAS, SSRS, Tabular, SharePoint, and Excel BI tools).  The role needs to be able to work independently, and within excellent communication skills with experience of working effectively within a team and the ability to multi-task and prioritize.Key ResponsibilitiesHigh level:·         Delivering and presenting BI proof of concept to prospective customers·         BI requirements analysis and solution architecture design.·         Data modelling and data architecture design.·         Create ETL, data integration and data migration designs.·         Design and implement Master Data Management systems and processes.Detail Level·         Develop information architecture.·         Manage current and future needs in data design and content.·         Resolve semantic discrepancies in data definitions that arise among multiple sources and projects.·         Gain consensus among users on common business data definitions.·         Determine optimal approach for obtaining data from diverse source system platforms and move to BI.·         Implement ETL infrastructure used at a project level.·         Establish and enforce technical standards for projects deliverables.·         Coach project ETL specialists on data acquisition techniques, decision rules and its application.·         Assess current technical architecture.·         Estimate system capacity to meet short and long-term processing requirements.·         Define BI strategy/processes for:1.     Operations·         Technical architecture·         Hardware, DBMS, Middleware and Network requirements·         Server and Client configurations o    Estimate costs for technical components.o    Develop ETL technical architecture.o    Evaluate and select ETL tool.·         Develop access/analysis tool technical architecture.·         Evaluate and select access/analysis tools.·         Interface with DBA and Development staff.Professional Skills/Experience:·         7+ years’ experience working with Microsoft business intelligence tools and systems such as OLAP, data modeling, data warehousing.·         5+ years of experience architecting, developing and/or managing the implementation of Business Intelligence solutions using (preferably) Microsoft BI stack.·         Experience identifying, analyzing and translating business requirements and rules into intuitive analytical solutions, business scorecards and management dashboards.·         Understanding of Business Intelligence solutions: operational and analytical, strong knowledge of relational and multi-dimensional database architectures·         Expertise in the Microsoft BI solution offerings including SQL Server 2016/2012/2008 R2 stack (SSRS, SSAS, SSIS), PowerBI.·         Experience in Azure and/or Microsoft HDInsight is a definite plus    RegardsShubhangiRecruitment LeadiLink Systems Inc.9840 Willows Rd #202, Redmond, WA 98052, United StatesPhone: 425-440-9721Email: shubhangi@ilink-systems.comWebsite: http://www.ilink-systems.com    ",,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-data-warehouse-bi-architect-job-cincinnati-oh-us-173720934.aspx?mescoid=1500143001001&jobPosition=4,,,0f5293cf3d568d1d69be82ec9b6030c7
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:03:00:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Marketing InternWest Chester, OHJob DescriptionLaunch your career with TWO MEN AND A TRUCK® as a Marketing Intern and discover the opportunities for growth or movement to other franchises. At TWO MEN AND A TRUCK® your opportunities for growth are endless. More than one quarter of our franchise owners originally started as employees in our system!  The Marketing Intern is responsible for working with a team to develop, implement and oversee the marketing plan for the Butler County TWO MEN AND A TRUCK® Market with the objective of promoting all products and services both internally and externally.   Job ResponsibilitiesAssesses marketing opportunities and target marketsDevelops, implements and reviews marketing plan; Tracks marketing plan goalsTracks and evaluates lead sources through various toolsUpdate and maintain local web page unique contentTracks and reports on all marketing initiativesPlaces and tracks all radio, television, online, print and other advertising including yellow page adsDevelops print materials/advertisementsReviews and edits all external communication including any and all social media reviewsInitiates and develops relationships with apartment and senior communities, local realtors, mortgage agencies, and other potential commercial customersDevelops, distributes and tracks all media releasesEvaluates, documents and coordinates all donation requests and community involvement; Documents resulting PRDevelops PR calendar and seeks new PR opportunitiesCoordinates and attends networking eventsCoordinates internal mystery shops to ensure high level of customer serviceCoordinate bi-annual competitor mystery shopDevelop social media content and calendar; monitor social conversationsDocument best practices for system training purposesMust be available to work evening and weekend events on occasionOther duties as assigned by Sales Manager & General Manager  Job RequirementsPursing a degree in Marketing, Public Relations, Advertising, Business, or related field is required. Previous experience in a related environment or industry is preferred.General knowledge of TWO MEN AND A TRUCK® system and practicesFamiliar with standard concepts, practices and procedures within the Marketing fieldHighly creative and motivatedAbility to work independentlyFriendly, professional personalityExceptional oral and written communication skills; comfortable with public speakingExcellent organizational skills; must be able to multi-task under time constraintsMust be proficient with the following Microsoft applications:WordExcelPower PointPublisherOutlookWorking Conditions:Work is performed in an office setting with no unusual hazards.  Some travel may be required.The qualifications listed above are intended to represent the minimal skills and experience levels associated with performing the duties and responsibilities contained in this job description.  The qualifications should not be viewed as absolute standards, but as general guidelines that should be considered with other job-related criteria.",Marketing Intern Job in West Chester,Full Time Employee,"West Chester, OH 45069","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-intern-job-west-chester-oh-us-172300639.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=14,,Marketing/Product,f17f35303db2668f24eff96b78c41c73
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:03:48:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: The Seasonal Sales Fragrance Specialist is responsible for providing outstanding customer service, meeting personal sales and Star Rewards goals on a personal and departmental basis, demonstrating superior product knowledge to customers, and creating a shopping experience that will make the customer feel welcome and comfortable. Additionally, the Fragrance Specialist is responsible for becoming an expert on fragrances as well as developing and impacting sales through the growth and implementation of the preferred customer list. Performs other duties as assigned. The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here. In order to present our customers with the best holiday shopping experience, many of our Seasonal Sales Fragrance Specialists arrive prior to store opening and remain after closing to ensure we are ready to make Macy's magic. Seasonal associates will have the opportunity to work a flexible schedule on a temporary basis, which may include early mornings, evenings, weekends and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving and the day after Christmas. And don't forget - just in time for holiday shopping, you will receive an employee discount of up to 20% starting your first day! Essential Functions:Assist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment by demonstrating proficient use of proprietary devices and applications; proactively create enhanced shopping experiences through the heightened use of tools, technology and collaborationExplain and demonstrate use of cosmetics through actual application Be knowledgeable of and perform sales support functions related to POS procedures Alert Fragrance Counter Manager or GSM of Cosmetics and Fragrances of inventory and other inaccuracies Regular, dependable attendance and punctualityQualifications: Education/Experience: High School degree or equivalent. Previous selling experience is required, preferably in fragrances.Communication Skills: Ability to read, write, and interpret labels including warnings and ingredient lists on products. Ability to effectively communicate with customers, peers, and management.Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to calculate percentages and ratios. Must be able to make change using American monetary units.Other skills: Superior organizational and time management skills. Must be able to multi-task in a fast-paced environment during constant periods of high volume. Must be able to build relationships and influence others. Must possess a thirst for knowledge. Must be flexible in regards to hours workedWork Hours: Ability to work a flexible schedule, including mornings, evenings, and weekends, and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving, special Big Event days, and the day after Christmas, based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy’s, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Cosmetics Sales.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Seasonal Holiday Retail Sales - Fragrance Specialist** Full Time: Macy's Northgate OH Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-retail-sales-fragrance-specialist-full-time-macy's-northgate-oh-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175140762.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=4,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,3689a676084ea2fb7b9e9a2543463e85
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:03:49:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Associate, StoreDepartment: Remote-Store OperationsReports to: Store ManagerDirect Reports: NoFLSA Status: Non-ExemptLocation:U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Store Associate will be responsible for assisting customers with product location, selection, availability, pricing, returns and sales items. The Associate will also assist in setting up displays, stocking shelves, cashiering and opening/closing store.  Deliverables: Ensure great customer service by assisting in location, availability and selection of merchandiseMaintain store selling floor, fitting rooms, visual displays, presentation and conditionsAssist in daily store recovery, before, during or after store opening hoursPromote current sales and promotions to customers, including pricing of merchandiseAdhere to company policies, procedures, and loss prevention practicesComplete sales transactions and maintain proper accountability at registersProcess merchandise returns and exchanges courteously and under company guidelinesSupport all management, visuals, and sales team at all timesKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must be at least 18 years oldA high school diploma or equivalent is preferredMinimum of one year of retail sales experience preferred and previous cash handling experience preferredMust have superior communication, organizational and time management skillsMust have excellent interpersonal skills and be able to act with integrity and business maturity to ensure that all business is conducted without bias or prejudiceMust be able to complete sales transactions in POS register systemMust to able to work under close supervision and comprehend detailed instructionMust be able to spend up to 100% of the working time standing and walkingMust be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shifts.Must be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicals.At Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 22431 Division : Field - Region : Central Location : 0767 - XXI - Polaris Fashion Place, Columbus OH US 43240 Job Type : Part Time",Store Associate - Polaris Fashion Place # Job in Columbus,"Full Time , Employee","Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Associate, StoreDepartment: Remote-Store OperationsReports to: Store ManagerDirect Reports: NoFLSA Status: Non-ExemptLocation:U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Store Associate will be responsible for assisting customers with product location, selection, availability, pricing, returns and sales items. The Associate will also assist in setting up displays, stocking shelves, cashiering and opening/closing store.  Deliverables: Ensure great customer service by assisting in location, availability and selection of merchandiseMaintain store selling floor, fitting rooms, visual displays, presentation and conditionsAssist in daily store recovery, before, during or after store opening hoursPromote current sales and promotions to customers, including pricing of merchandiseAdhere to company policies, procedures, and loss prevention practicesComplete sales transactions and maintain proper accountability at registersProcess merchandise returns and exchanges courteously and under company guidelinesSupport all management, visuals, and sales team at all timesKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must be at least 18 years oldA high school diploma or equivalent is preferredMinimum of one year of retail sales experience preferred and previous cash handling experience preferredMust have superior communication, organizational and time management skillsMust have excellent interpersonal skills and be able to act with integrity and business maturity to ensure that all business is conducted without bias or prejudiceMust be able to complete sales transactions in POS register systemMust to able to work under close supervision and comprehend detailed instructionMust be able to spend up to 100% of the working time standing and walkingMust be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shifts.Must be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicals.At Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 22431 Division : Field - Region : Central Location : 0767 - XXI - Polaris Fashion Place, Columbus OH US 43240 Job Type : Part Time",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/store-associate-polaris-fashion-place-767-job-columbus-oh-us-175269362.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2d1340c33daa583e9f6fe4bdf306be63
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:03:49:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Learns how to conduct inspections to identify infestations or conditions conducive to infestations of wood destroying organisms and/or insects, birds, or other vertebrate pests for the purpose of making proposals and presentations to obtain sales contracts. Responsibilities • Attends company training programs and accompany other associates or managers during ride-alongs in order to learn job skills such as: • Recording accurate measurements and writing correct descriptions of property and/or other areas inspected • Preparing appropriate specs and treating instructions in accordance with existing laws, regulations, and company policy • Calculating job treating costs from company pricing instructions • Executing contracts on behalf of the company, observing company policy pertaining to credit terms of sale • Maintaining equipment, vehicle, and personal safety equipment in clean, working order • Learning sales techniques and product knowledge in order to sell termite control protection and renewals and/or monthly pest control protection to owners or agents of homes, stores, or industry • Gaining experience in dealing courteously with customers, leaving customers' premises and furnishings clean and as found • Passes all state licensing and/or company requirements • Attends call sessions to learn how to effectively collect on delinquent accounts of personal sales contracts • Contacts customers after service is performed to ensure satisfaction and develop additional prospects • Develops termite and/or pest control sales leads for each respective office lead furnished Education and Experience Requirements • High school education or general education degree (GED) required • Six to twelve months related experience and/or training in sales and dealing with the public or equivalent combination of education and experience is strongly preferred • Valid driver’s license from current state of residence required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals • Ability to calculate rate, ratio, and percent, and to draw and interpret bar graphs Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability 100713",Sales Rep / Outside Sales / Territory Sales Job in Erlanger,"Full Time, Employee","Erlanger, KY",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-outside-sales-territory-sales-job-erlanger-ky-us-173927104.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=5,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,6f6937cae2570ff7c557ee14ed2cc775
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:04:11:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job React JS / Javascript Engineer - Will Learn React JSLocation: Cincinnati, OHDuration: 6 Month Contract to Hire, Direct Hire, or Long Term ContractHire Method: Phone / ONSITE INTERVIEW - Local Candidates PreferredSalary Range: $100,000 - $120,000 + 15% Bonus + Health, Dental, Vision, and 401kRate: $50.00-$75.00/hr C2C or W2 BOE (includes Health, Vision, 401k Benefits) Principle Solutions Group is searching for an innovative Javascript / React JS Engineer, who has experience implementing newer UI technologies (such as WebPack, React, Aurelia, Meteor, etc.)  to consume and interact wtih REST APIs.Currently we are implementing newer JS features, such as React.JS, Webpack, and Node.JS, and innovating websites to become more mobile and responsive. We are searching for someone who is passionate about coding and enjoys solving complex problems through software.  Requirements5+ years experience working with front-end technologies and website performance improvement.Hands on experience with Angular, Node, React, Webpack, Meteor, or other JS Libraries is preferred.Experience with consuming and integrating REST APIs. Experience optimizing web page performance.Solid expertise in responsive web design strategies.Extensive experience and proficiency with cross-browser and cross-platform development.Hands on experience with Agile development practices & Agile, XP, or Scrum project methodologies. For immediate consideration, please send updated MS Word resume to john.pearce@principlesolutions.com  Report","Principle Solutions Group Job Application for React JS / JavaScript Engineer | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","React JS / Javascript Engineer - Will Learn React JSLocation: Cincinnati, OHDuration: 6 Month Contract to Hire, Direct Hire, or Long Term ContractHire Method: Phone / ONSITE INTERVIEW - Local Candidates PreferredSalary Range: $100,000 - $120,000 + 15% Bonus + Health, Dental, Vision, and 401kRate: $50.00-$75.00/hr C2C or W2 BOE (includes Health, Vision, 401k Benefits) Principle Solutions Group is searching for an innovative Javascript / React JS Engineer, who has experience implementing newer UI technologies (such as WebPack, React, Aurelia, Meteor, etc.)  to consume and interact wtih REST APIs.Currently we are implementing newer JS features, such as React.JS, Webpack, and Node.JS, and innovating websites to become more mobile and responsive. We are searching for someone who is passionate about coding and enjoys solving complex problems through software.  Requirements5+ years experience working with front-end technologies and website performance improvement.Hands on experience with Angular, Node, React, Webpack, Meteor, or other JS Libraries is preferred.Experience with consuming and integrating REST APIs. Experience optimizing web page performance.Solid expertise in responsive web design strategies.Extensive experience and proficiency with cross-browser and cross-platform development.Hands on experience with Agile development practices & Agile, XP, or Scrum project methodologies. For immediate consideration, please send updated MS Word resume to john.pearce@principlesolutions.com ",,http://jobview.monster.com/react-js-javascript-engineer-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174340171.aspx?mescoid=1500129001001&jobPosition=2,,,7e0c9cf1e494f16fd9576585d86cda15
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:04:48:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Payroll Processor Job in Downtown Cincinnati Accounting Principals is partnering with a client in Downtown Cincinnati that is looking to ad a Payroll Processor to their team on a temporary basis. The ideal candidate will have 1-2 years of payroll processing experience along with some experience with ADP.  Job Duties:• Processing manual checks in ADP system• Processing verification forms• Sorting and distributing mail• Answering phone calls and taking messages• Will be cross trained on several payroll tasks to provide needed support for processing payroll Qualifications:• 1-2 years of payroll processing experience• Experience with ADP is highly preferred but not required• Must be proficient with Microsoft Excel• Excellent written and verbal communication skills• Must be a team player and have the ability to work independently If you or anyone you know is qualified and interested in learning more about this opportunity, please email me directly at christopher.riley@accountingprincipals.com or apply directly at www.accountingprincipals.com  ;",Payroll Processor Job in Downtown Cincinnati Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Cincinnati, OH 45202",,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-processor-job-in-downtown-cincinnati-job-cincinnati-oh-us-173478394.aspx?mescoid=4300702001001&jobPosition=1,,Human Resources,5710fec7ed2a00bbca60b2e57a1eb5a3
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:04:49:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Job Description XTRA Lease, the nation&rsquo;s leader in truck trailer leasing, has an excellent opportunity for a mechanic to maintain and repair trailers. We offer a competitive salary and a generous benefits package including medical, dental and life insurance, and retirement plan. You should possess a minimum of 1 year of trailer repair experience, including experience working on trailer brakes.  Qualifications: High School (or GED Equivalent) and 1 year previous trailer repair experience and/or specialized training via an apprenticeship and/or trade school. Must possess own tools. Must have 1 year trailer repair experience to complete FHWA inspections consistent with the Department of Transportation requirements. Must possess current/legal driver&rsquo;s license. Knowledge of air, electronic, braking, and suspension systems as well as general knowledge of mechanical operation and body repair. Ability to make quality minor welds while insuring personal safety. Responsibilities include but are not limited to: Diagnosis, services, and repairs all XTRA Lease equipment as indicated on repair orders and consistent with XTRA Lease repair standards. Performs safety and legally required inspections (FHWA/BIT). Maintains parts and yard organization (with direction from operations management) to ensure a clean and safe working environment. Report","XTRA Lease Job Application for Mechanic | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name JOB WRAPPING,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/mechanic-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174719740.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=17,,,b7d7700bde9352f883c18d3187d1cbdb
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:04:56:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  704375If interested in this position, please email Vimal at vtailor@apexsystemsinc.com Position: Data Center AssociateDuration: 4-6 month contractPay: $15-17/hr paid weekly on a W2 BasisShift: Full Time Position in a Dynamic 24x7x365 organization. 7Pm to 7AM will be the primary hours but could change based on business needs; need flexibilityRequirements:-Operates one or more complex computer systems and all associated peripheral equipment-Monitors performance of systems utilizing software support tools-may handle hardware or software support for associated data center equipment-1-2 years of relevant experience-Need to be comfortable bending, crawling, sitting, lifting, and standing for long periods of time-High school diploma or equivalent required. Associates degree, technical college or some college course work preferredIf interested in this position, please email Vimal at vtailor@apexsystemsinc.com EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",Data Center Associate Job in Florence,Full Time Employee,"Florence, KY",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/data-center-associate-job-florence-ky-us-175001009.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b7d25b5a0e5e613663b7b27fd4a80568
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:05:08:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Payroll Specialist Job- West Chester, OH An organization located in the West Chester, OH area is looking to add a Payroll Specialist to their team. If you are currently looking for a new Payroll Specialist job opportunity and have 3 or more years of high volume payroll processing experience, please apply today. The Payroll Specialist Job Benefits and Compensation Information:- This position is an hourly paid temp-to-hire opportunity located in Cincinnati, OH- Our client provides a great work environment with an excellent work/life balance- They are experiencing significant growth with future internal advancement opportunities- Comprehensive medical benefits will be offered including: medical, dental and vision  Payroll Specialist Job duties include:- Process weekly payroll for 500+ employees both salary and hourly (exempt and nonexempt) - Manage all benefit plan administration, including employee eligibility- Processes all bonus adjustments, state/local tax returns, and garnishments - Calculate hours for union pension and legal benefits- Audit payroll register to ensure payroll is accurate and/or needed changes have been made - Maintain sick/personal leave reporting for nonexempt employees- Answer and assist with any payroll related questions in a timely manner- Ensure on-boarding documentation is in compliance with company policies and procedures- Assist with additional ad hoc projects as outlined by the Payroll Manager Requirements for the Payroll Specialist Job:- At least 3+ years of previous payroll experience- Intermediate knowledge of MS Excel- Exceptional attention to detail- Must have the ability to be both a team player as well as a leader- Must be punctual and have consistent attendance - ADP and Kronos experience is a plus but not required If you are interested in the above Payroll Specialist Job located in the West Chester, OH, please apply by submitting your resume to christopher.riley@accountingprincipals.com or go to www.accountingprincipals.com    ;",Payroll Specialist Job in West Chester,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"West Chester, OH 45069",,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-specialist-job-in-west-chester-oh-job-west-chester-oh-us-173973540.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=12,,Human Resources,3d7f21767bb15df538559faa6b4ad650
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:15:38:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Performs maintenance service and repairs in the areas of plumbing, carpentry, painting, plastering, machine servicing, electrical, or vehicle servicing. Maintain the facilities to keep the up-time to optimal amounts and to meet/exceed performance standards utilizing skills and mechanical knowledge and abilities. The position is familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within a particular field. Perform a variety of tasks. A certain degree of creativity and latitude is required. Lead by example for others and help to find new ways to improve process/procedures. Demonstrate safe work habits and adhere to Schwan Cosmetics, USA policies and procedures.Essential Responsibilities: Maintain the facilities to keep the up-time to optimal amounts and to meet/exceed performance standards. Performs maintenance service and repairs in the areas of plumbing, carpentry, painting, plastering, machine servicing, electrical, or vehicle servicing. Perform periodic inspections of fire sprinkler system, fire extinguishers, eye wash stations, and other hazardous clean up equipment. Scheduling/ performing routine maintenance on HVAC system, Waste Water Treatment, RO Water System, compressed air system (changing filters, lubrication, cleaning, using safety guidelines such as lock-out/tag-out). Perform maintenance, and inspections of boiler machines and equipment. Maintain parts for upkeep and to eliminate any downtime, etc. Participate in continuous improvement activities including LEAN and Kaizens, apply root cause analysis and take appropriate corrective action. Perform other duties as required.Minimum Qualifications:Education Industrial Maintenance Certificate or equivalent knowledge and experience (including knowledge of HVAC, boiler, and fire protection systems). Must be able to read and interpret blue prints and drawings. Must demonstrate intermediate shop math principles and formulas. Must be able to speak, read/comprehend, and write in EnglishExperience:Functional Competencies: Minimum of 3-5 years or work experience in HVAC, boiler, and fire protections systems or related field",Facilities Maintenance Job in Smyrna,Full Time,"Smyrna, TN 37167",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Facilities-Maintenance-Job-Smyrna-TN-US-164966231.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=1,17.34 - 20.62 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),ee85f7480c7ecd20c6dc2fcb6df77fa1
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:15:30:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Exciting position for the right candidate.  Our company raises the bar on luxury rentals in Westchester and Rockland.  We are the new brand of luxury apartments in New York's northern suburbs, with market-leading design, amenities and services.Summary: Engages in and coordinates the repair, maintenance, and installation of machines, tools, and equipment of the building, by performing the following duties personally or through outside vendors. Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned.Schedules and works with property manager to get units ready for occupancy.Reviews work orders to determine priorities and performs the work, as necessary.Manages, inputs, and closes out work order tickets in Yardi and/or Building Link management softwareSchedules repair, maintenance, and installation of machines, tools, and equipment to ensure thesmooth operation of the property. Directs maintenance activities on utility systems to provide continuous supply of heat, steam, electric power, gas, or air required for operations.Develops preventive maintenance program in conjunction with engineering and maintenance needs.Reviews maintenance reports and statistics to plan and modify maintenance activities.Inspects operating equipment for conformance with operational standards.Plans, develops, and implements new methods and procedures designed to improve operations, minimize operating costs, and effect greater utilization of labor and materials.Reviews new equipment needs and modifications with Property Manager.Requisitions tools, equipment, and supplies required for operations.Confers with management, engineering, and quality control personnel to resolve maintenance problems and recommend measures to improve operations and conditions of machines and equipment.Assists in the preparation of department budgets and monitors expenditure of funds in budget. Supervisory Responsibilities: Directly supervises contractors.  Competencies: To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:Technical Skills- Pursues training and development opportunities; Strives to continuously build knowledge and skills.Customer Service- Manages difficult or emotional customer situations; Responds promptly to customer needs; Responds to requests for service and assistance; Meets commitments.Managing People- Provides regular performance feedback; Continually works to improve supervisory skills. Qualifications: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education and/or Experience: Four to ten years related experience and/or training. Language Skills: Ability to read, analyze, and interpret technical procedures, or governmental regulations.  Ability to write reports and business correspondence.  Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and the general public. Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to stand; walk; use hands to handle, or feel; reach with hands and arms; climb or balance; stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl and communicate or hear. The employee must regularly lift and /or move up to 50 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move 100 or more pounds.",Building Maintenance Supervisor Job in Westchester,Full Time,"Westchester, NY",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Building-Maintenance-Supervisor-Job-Westchester-NY-US-165101374.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=17,,,e4c30606db84a3a250fbd61836798075
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:15:29:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have IMMEDIATE OPENINGS for HVAC Lead Installers.  As an employee of John Moore, you are a part of Houston’s elite HVAC installers and paid accordingly!  With our strong growth, we are a frontrunner in the local  HVAC industry.  You will benefit from our name recognition, the offers and quality service we provide.  Treated with appreciation, dignity and respect, we invite you to join our family.We are looking for HVAC installers with 2 years residential experience.  We are not looking for apprentices. The candidates we are looking for are reliable, self-motivated and hard working. Where do you want to be in the future? If you want to work where you can truly make a difference every day, then your choice is clear. John Moore Services is where you need to be.Here are some of the John Moore Benefits:·        Drive a reliable truck with paid fuel & EZ Tag·        Plenty of hours (We are busy NOW)·        Flexible Work Shifts·        The latest tools and exceptional training    John Moore offers THE BEST PIECE RATE COMPENSATION PLAN in the city.  We offer full benefits, including medical, dental, vision, life and 401K retirement savings.     REQUIREMENTS: Previous experience installing HVAC equipment in occupied residential homesEPA CardRegistered with TDLRGood driving record (no DUIs in the past 5 years)No felonies within the past 7 years",HVAC LEAD INSTALLER Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX 77064",,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-LEAD-INSTALLER-Job-Houston-TX-US-165100064.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=3,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,8a1e28bcd6ef1a09689b9057bbdfca4d
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:14:58:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dynamic manufacturing company in Columbia City, IN, specializing in heavy mechanical technology seeks a hands-on Equipment Supervisor. Must enjoy working in a continuous improvement culture. Responsibilities:•    Prioritize and plan preventative and corrective maintenance tasks including follow-up and documentation•    Troubleshoot machine operating issues and lead all projects regarding upgrades or new installations•    Work with engineering and mechanical services and parts vendors•    Create detailed engineering plans, designs and drawings, documenting cost estimates and procedures•    Maintain parts inventory paying attention to tools management and shop operating procedures Qualifications:The ideal candidate will have a combination of but not necessarily all of the following skills:•     A degree is not required but a love for learning new skills is a must•     At least ten years of combined industry and academic experience is preferred•     Understanding of safety procedures •     Experience with high pressure hydraulic and Allen Bradley PLC systems•     Understanding of mechanical conveyors and mechanical equipment such as shredders, magnetic drums and screens•     Background in shop procedures such as milling, welding, grinding, diagnostics and pneumatics, etc.•     Must be able to take responsibility and ownership for tasks and projects Excellent compensation and benefits. ",Equipment Supervisor Job in Columbia City,Full Time,"Columbia City, IN 46725",,http://jobview.monster.com/Equipment-Supervisor-Job-Columbia-City-IN-US-164946620.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),16e9553f62cf3d485e34310a62654074
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:14:57:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Mobile, Alabama has a new long term opportunity for a Heavy Equipment Diesel Mechanic. We are searching for a Technicians with experience diagnosing mechanical, hydraulic and electrical systems on equipment such as excavators, cranes, loaders, graders and skid steers. The ideal candidate will have strong skills using Diagnostic Software, and have exceptional engine rebuild capabilities. Dealer experience will be considered an asset. Pre-employment drug test and background check will be required.Compensation:$20.00 - $29.00/hour. Experience will determine starting pay rate. Benefits and company uniforms are supplied.Shifts:Days, 7:30am - 4:00pm (Monday to Friday)We encourage all who are qualified and interested to apply in confidence, however, only those in consideration will be contacted for this role.  ",Heavy Equipment Mechanic Job in Mobile,Full Time Employee,"Mobile, AL",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Heavy-Equipment-Mechanic-Job-Mobile-AL-US-164496080.aspx?mescoid=4900873001001&jobPosition=8,,,2ba679256962f2eba49a99fa85e13df3
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:14:30:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Description   SUMMARY/GENERAL DESCRIPTION OF JOB:   Incumbent uses various tools, testing instruments and equipment to install, inspect, repair, maintain, adjust and troubleshoot various high voltage and peripheral low voltage systems/equipment up to 115KV.   ESSENTIAL DUTIES & JOB FUNCTIONS: Performs work on various high voltage and peripheral low voltage systems/equipment up to 115KV. Installs, operates, maintains and repair transmission, distribution, and generation equipment including transformers, generators, poles and pole line conductors, circuit breakers, switchboards, controls, and underground conductors.  Installs and climbs poles and steel towers. Installs and repairs overhead power lines in both normal maintenance situations and in storm damage situations. Operates bucket trucks and digger/derrick trucks.  Installs, splices, and terminates medium voltage cable.  Operates breakers and switches to isolate circuits. Reads and understands blueprints and drawings, specification, and switching orders.  Services battery systems. Troubleshoots and evaluates system components for serviceability.  Makes basic electrical computations for load requirements and use all standard test equipment.  Uses electrical and pneumatic hand tools, chain saws and tree trimming equipment. Performs other related duties as assigned. May perform work in other classifications when incidental work is necessary to the accomplishment of the work assignment.  Significant work in another job classification may be required if accompanied by any wage adjustments applicable. Accountable For: The proper use of tools and equipment commonly used in the High Voltage Electrician field. Completing all mandated training requirements per government and management directives. Timely and cost effective performance of duties. Timely completion and accuracy of all departmental work. Dealing with a variety of people in a professional, courteous manner in diversified situations. Adherence to established company safety policies and good industrial and office safety practices. Compliance with company Standard Operating Procedures and Personnel policies and procedures. Having the ability to work well under pressure. Qualifications   Mandatory Completion of a 4 year technical training program. Technical Training may include an accredited technical training program or recognized, established apprenticeship program.  Training may be substituted with progressive “hands on” experience, specifically in the high voltage area, on a year for year basis, with at least two years at an apprentice level. Four (4) years’ experience in power distribution and maintenance up to 115KV. Must possess at a minimum a general journey level electrician (01). Ability to read blueprints, follow switching orders and safety procedures.  Ability to demonstrate a thorough knowledge of air and oil switches, circuit breakers, switchgear, overhead and underground power distribution systems, including operation, maintenance, troubleshooting, and repair.  Proficiency in medium voltage cable splicing and terminating.  Ability to work at various heights and in manholes.  Experience in bucket truck, auger/derrick truck operation. Must have and maintain hand tools of the trade to perform the normal work of the classifications. Must have knowledge of, and know how to use, specialized tools needed to perform repair functions. Ability to troubleshoot equipment. Ability to meet and maintain company physical and security requirements and clearance eligibility when required.  Must possess good communication skills for a service team environment. Valid state driver’s license with acceptable driving record. Must possess or obtain a Washington State Commercial Driver’s License within 6 months of hire.  Ability to successfully pass any background checks and/or drug testing required on the contract. U.S. Citizenship. Ability to successfully obtain and maintain a SECRET clearance, post-employment.",Electrician,Full Time Employee,"Silverdale, WA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Electrician-High-Voltage-UNION-Job-SILVERDALE-WA-US-165678768.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=5,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,20c0572194890dd35a6481644b8a375f
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:13:47:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"This company is an industry leader in the repair, design and manufacturing of aircraft instruments. They have earned a reputation for highly responsive customer service with innovative product lines and a Global impact.  To date they have a commitment to provide a full range of avionics services.   Over the years we have worked with them, they have shown steady excellent growth and a strong interest in their employees.Excellent Benefits:Health InsuranceSection 125 Flexible Spending Accounts401(k) Profit SharingTerm, Voluntary, and Supplemental Life Insurance and DisabilityAdditional Insurance Options:Vacation and Sick LeaveLeave ProgramsPaid HolidaysSkills Necessary to be Considered:This is an exciting opportunity to closely work interdepartmentally to plan, oversee and implement the processes necessary to manufacture new technical products.Five (5)Years Operations in Manufacturing environment - Long term PlanningDirect Supervisory ExperienceExcellent Leadership Skills (Motivate, Coach, Mentor, Train)Project Management Skills - Cradle to GraveExcellent Problem Solving SkillsDirect production of New High-End Technical Products Staffing ExperienceFacility maintenance coordinationOversee meeting AS9100 regulatory requirementsPartner with Sales to establish and achieve goalsCustomer and Vendor involvementEssential Corporate Culture Comfort ZoneTeam OrientedHigh Level of integrity and ethical standardsSelf-StarterContinuous ImprovementInterviews have already begun.  If you believe you are an excellent candidate for this position please call:            Lonna Treichler - 610-944-8049Please Send over your Resume in WORD ASAP.We look forward to discussing the position in detail.",Operations Manager - Manufacturing Job in Wichita,Full Time,"Wichita, KS",,http://jobview.monster.com/Operations-Manager-Manufacturing-Job-Wichita-KS-US-166042974.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=11,Excellent Base,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),55625e4695da2fb5a6cb3b1f98c7be4d
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:13:46:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Environmental Services DirectorSeeking an Independent, Motivated Individual who will be responsible for Managing the Environmental Services Department. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to, planning, organizing and directing all administrative aspects of the environmental services operations, and general maintenance duties, in accordance with governmental regulations. Supervisory and long term care experience preferred. Full-time position with generous benefits package. Please contact Administrator at 814-267-4212or fax resume to 814-267-6213.EOE, Drug free workplaceThis job listing brought to you by The Johnstown Tribune Democrat",Environmental Services Director Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,15530,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Environmental-Services-Director-Job-US-165734831.aspx?ch=newsjtpa&mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=20,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),5022ea2c9d6d0a4c3c872c358917d967
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:13:16:51,No,jobs.monster.com,Mount Laurel food manufacturing company seeks experienced packaging machine operators to run powder/pharmaceutical food packaging equipment on 2nd shift.  Must be quality/production oriented with good attention to detail.  Mechanical ability a plus.E-mail resume to hr@foodsciences.com or FAX to 866-361-6209,Packaging Machine Operator Job in Mount Laurel,Full Time,"Mount Laurel, NJ 08054",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Packaging-Machine-Operator-Job-Mount-Laurel-NJ-US-165404662.aspx?mescoid=5101012001001&jobPosition=12,"bonus eligible, shift differential",Experienced (Non-Manager),64c6fb6c28e55f201c8a409adb6752f4
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:13:15:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"HVAC INSTALLERS:Are you at the top of your field? Do you want to be recognized for your hard work?We are looking for someone that resides in the Wilmington, DE area.We are seeking an ELITE STAR- an HVAC Installer with 2+ years experience! We hire only the best and the brightest. We are Horizon Services, a dynamic, rapidly-growing HVAC Installation & Service Company and we have been voted by our employees as one of the best places to work in Delaware and Pennsylvania- isn't it time you found out why?Our reputation is growing in the region as a Top Notch Company, and we are looking to hire only Top Notch Installers for our New Jersey location.As the area's Leading HVAC Company, this is what you will receive:• Work 4- 10 hour days• Ability to earn the highest wages paid in our industry (base wage combined with an exceptional bonus program)• Incentives, bonuses, contests, awards • Full family benefits package available, including medical, dental, vision, company uniforms, life insurance, Long term disability, short term disability, tool fund, truck policy, 401K with company match and much more! • Paid Vacation Time • Weekly training with a Nate certified instructor• Great working environment and a superb support staff • Opportunity for advancementIf you consider yourself to be one of the Best HVAC Installers in the region, please forward your resume. Pre-employment motor vehicle check, drug screening and background check required. For more information, or to apply now, you must go to the website below. Please DO NOT email your resume to us as we only accept applications through our website. https://horizonservices.applicantpro.com/jobs/375585-19566.html",HVAC Experienced Installers $ SIGN ON! Job in Wilmington,Full Time,"Wilmington, DE 19808",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Experienced-Installers-1500-SIGN-ON!-Job-Wilmington-DE-US-165775699.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=5,,,d46a89d7557b4ff947404e52cf7e6e39
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:13:01:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: HVAC InstallerCompany: Slayton Mechanical Contractors, Inc.Location: Lakeside, CA 92040Positions: Installer; PipefitterIndustry: Commercial/Industrial; Residential/Light Commercial-------------------install sheet metal duct systems, read blue prints, work in close communication with office, foreman and other employees. must have own hand tools. The ability to work well with others. self starter with a good sense of urgency.",HVAC Installer Job in Lakeside  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Lakeside 92040,All,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Installer-Job-Lakeside-165265213.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6f8fa3cce17c9842f565a3021d371501
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:13:00:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"LCS Lawn and Tree Service, Inc., a leader providing quality organic based lawn and tree care, is looking for individuals who have a desire for career growth and the potential for a leadership role in our company. If you enjoy making a difference, being part of a team, and take pride in your career you might be the perfect person for our company.RESPONSIBILITIES:- Mowing and trimming customers turf throughout the growing season- Blowing off any debris/clippings to make sure the property is left cleaner then when you started- Provide excellent customer service and respond to inquiries- Inspect and diagnose weeds, diseases and other conditions on clients' propertiesREQUIREMENTS/QUALIFICATIONS:- Valid drivers license and clean driving record- Must be available to work 24 hours a day 7 days a week throughout winter- Experience with commercial mowing equipment- Ability to work in a team environment- Excellent written and oral communication skills- Ability to lift 50+lbs. regularly- Enjoy working outsideBENEFITS:- Competitive compensation package plus sales commission- Medical and Dental insurance- 401K (company match up to 4%)- Paid holidays, vacation, sick and personal days- Career growth opportunities-- We promote from within!COMPANY:L.C.S. Lawn & Tree Service is an award winning, TOP RATED Lawn and Tree Care Company servicing Southeastern Wisconsin. We offer a fun and friendly atmosphere!",Lawn Maintenance Job in Butler,Full Time,"Butler, WI 53007",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Lawn-Maintenance-Job-Butler-WI-US-164083042.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=3,,Entry Level,54b57c7f661ec645090e7e9b237f5a33
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:12:49:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Staffmark is hiring now.. Come join our team.Weekly paychecks - Electronic pay available - Pay day is every FridayPay Rate/Salary: $10.25-11.75 / HourJob Description: Entry Level - General Labor - Warehouse AssociateStarting Immediately!$10.25 to $11.75 per hour We are looking for you!Entry Level - General Labor - Warehouse Associate workers that can start right away.You can walk in and apply in person! This is a computer board building company and you will be doing assembly or material handling in their warehouses.The following positions are open:·  Assembly·  Warehouse workerAll positions in a warehouse environment All these positions are temp to hire warehouse positionsIf you are interested in being hired on for permanent job the possibility is available and based on your personal performance!These are ALL currently full time positions.  There are 2 shifts available to choose from:Day shift starts at 6:45MSwing shift starts at 3:45PMOur client's warehouses are in Fremont, CAEntry Level - General Labor - Warehouse Associate Apply Online: www.mystaffmark.comSelect Fremont as your locationTell a friend, send this to a friend...bring a friend with you!We want to get you to work - Apply or call us NOW!!Walk ins are welcome - Come and Apply in person! Staffmark is an EEOC Employer Job RequirementsJob RequirementsNo experience requiredMust have reliable transportationMUST want to have fun working in a team environment...someone has to do it, right?Apply now: www.mystaffmark.comSend me your resume: Hilda.Hernandez@Staffmark.com   Walk in applicants are welcome44111 Nobel Dr.Fremont, CA 94538 Bring a friend who needs work and lets get you working NOW...Staffmark is committed to providing equal employment opportunity for all persons regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital status, national origin, citizenship status, disability or veteran status. ",Assembly Job in Fremont,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Fremont, CA 94538",,http://jobview.monster.com/Assembly-Job-Fremont-CA-US-165996283.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=6,10.25 - 11.75 $ /hour,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,eed5cadd69b9755ae4d16f981160fdc7
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:50:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are an equal employment opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.  Description SUMMARY: The Field Installer will work with the production team to remove and install audiovisual equipment for clients.PRIMARY DUTIES: The Field Installer shall be responsible for but not limited to the following:Custom audiovisual installationsWire pulling and terminationEquipment installation and removal when necessary. Install display (projector/flat panel), screen and check for simple functionalityLabeling all wire and equipmentUse hand and power toolsSite cleanupSafe use of ladders, scaffolding and liftsLift heavy and bulky equipmentUse CAD drawings and blueprintsGiving excellent customer service and having a professional attitudeGENERAL DUTIES: Timely submission of all required paperworkAn ability to use discretion and good judgment with regard to sensitive or confidential informationFull compliance with company's policies and proceduresWork to achieve 100% customer satisfaction 100% of the timeOther duties as deemed necessary by management COMPETENCY: Strong client and service focused mindset Ability to maintain a professional attitudeHigh degree of accuracy, attention to detail and confidentialityEffective verbal, listening and written communication skillsEffective organizational, stress and time management skillsDemonstrates a sense of urgency and ability to meet deadlinesAbility to work independently and/or as a team memberMust have a clean driving recordQUALIFICATIONS: To perform the job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed above are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.LANGUAGE SKILLS: EnglishPHYSICAL DEMANDS:Regularly move from sitting to standing positions effortlesslyRegularly use hands and fingers to handle, control or feel objectsRegularly see details of objects that are less than a few feet awayRegularly understand the speech of another personFrequently work on projects that require deadlinesLift and carry up to 50 poundsWORK ENVIRONMENT: Advanced AV office and client sitesEXPECTED HOURS OF WORK: Business hours are Monday through Friday 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM. However, required work hours may vary depending on business needs. Overtime is possible.TRAVEL: 80% travel within a 2 hour radius required. Possible 20% overnight travel. ",AV Field Installer Job in West Chester,Full Time,"West Chester, PA 19382",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/AV-Field-Installer-Job-West-Chester-PA-US-165635373.aspx?mescoid=2700446001001&jobPosition=16,,Entry Level,eefbc6419abc0649825d8abea5e4e208
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:49:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Plans and conducts activities concerned with the support of quality, inspection, production and process improvement for complex aerospace products.   GENERAL DUTIES:   Plans and conducts the analysis, inspection, design, test and/or integration to assure the quality of assigned product or component. Performs quality engineering reviews of design documentation for compliance with stated requirements, including vendor quality manuals and company quality records. Reviews all purchased products or components and provides input to the decision of whether to accept the product and future purchases from the vendor. Documents data obtained during all quality assurance activities, consistent with company policies and procedures. Perform process reviews in order to streamline processes and increase quality throughput by utilizing common business quality practices. Perform in-house audits and reviews and compile results for reporting to management.  Act as a quality point of contact for external customer and FAA audits. Perform supplier audits/reviews and approvals at supplier facilities. Develops new approaches to solve problems identified during quality assurance activities. Communicates significant issues or developments identified during quality assurance activities and provides recommended process improvements to management. Maintains a working knowledge of government and industry quality assurance codes and standards. Prepares and presents technical and program information to team members and management. Maintain calibration database including scheduling and overseeing outside calibration requirements   Job Requirements: Bachelor’s degree in related field; or three to five years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Five to seven years of relevant quality assurance experience. Strong interpersonal and written communication skills, with the ability to effectively interact with team members of all levels. Must be highly responsive to requests, with a high attention for detail and accuracy. Must be flexible and able to multi-task in a time sensitive environment. Ability to develop effective working relationships with customers and suppliers. Audit experience in both internal and external customer systems. Knowledge of ISO and AS Quality Systems required. Knowledge of FAA regulations, including FAR21 and FAR145 desired. Lean/Sigma Six experience desired. Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports. Read/Write Fluently in English Must be well-organized, flexible and able to work in a fast paced, manufacturing environment MS Office Suite including; Outlook, Excel, Access, and MSWord. Sustained dependable attendance. Cooperation with others in team environment for cross training and conference on operational issues. Initiative in learning and changing work methods to accomplish assigned tasks on a timely basis. PHYSICAL DEMANDS / WORK ENVIRONMENT:   Regularly required to sit, stand, and walk. Regularly required to walk up and down stairs. Regularly required to talk or hear. Schedule is Monday - Thursday, 7:00am - 5:30pm PLEASE INCLUDE SALARY REQUIREMENTS WITH YOUR RESUME SUBMISSION.Req. Code : 1525 Division/Department : Radiant Power",Quality Engineer Job in Sarasota,Full Time,"Sarasota, FL 34243",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Sarasota-FL-US-165913193.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=3,,,61a47cfe726a3db3e989d69425cb6427
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:20:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"CLEANING SPECIALIST Looking for an individual to do weekly office cleaning. Duties include cleaning offices, kitchen & conference area, as well as 3 employee bathrooms. Estimate 5-6 hours on average to complete cleaning duties. We require use of non-toxic cleaning supplies. Experience with ""green"" cleaning practices is preferred, but we're willing to teach them if you're willing to learn. Located outside of Viroqua and about 4 miles from Chaseburg. Job may be done after-hours on a week day or on Saturday or Sunday. Please email resume and/or application to bookkeeper@harmonyvalleyfarm.com Application available at www.harmonyvalleyfarm.com",Cleaning Specialist Job in Viroqua,Part Time,"Viroqua, WI 54665",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Cleaning-Specialist-Job-Viroqua-WI-US-165842563.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=12,,,87a11c82c7620fc696cd2eb212b84f11
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:10:03:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"This positions requires you to work with team lead to understand tasking and deliver system to required specifications. Strong communication skills would be a benefit as you will be working with stakeholders to understand and implement system components. You will participate as a member of the SCRUM team in creating innovative solutions to customer requirements. Specific duties will include: Interface with sub-system software and systems engineers; responsible for gathering user requirements, assisting with implementation, and support to system integration & test. Creativity is a must as you will perform design, coding and unit test of new system components as they are defined. Programming to include new development, bug fixes, and enhancements, as well as installation, monitoring and configuration programs and scripts will also be a key component of this position. You will be asked to document all designs/software developed and include application and interface documentation, Version Description Documents (VDD), User’s Manuals, and Trouble Shooting guides. You will have to be able to perform software testing, installation, configuration and upgrading. The following web application development experience is needed: Spring Frameworks, Restful Web Services development, Enterprise integration patterns. Additional experience is preferred in some applicable programming language such as the following: JAVA XML, XSD, UNIX scripting languages, and MongoDB. Exposure to Agile and SCRUM methodology, implanting containers with DockerCandidate, as well as experience with the Atlassian Suite of software development tools JMS, GWT, extJS would be a plusAT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/VA Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or related discipline from an accredited college or university is required.Four (4) years of additional software engineering experience on projects with similar software processeA strong candidate for this senior position must have 20+ years’ experience as a software developer.s may be substituted for a bachelor’s degree and experience. A Minimum 20 years in a technical role, working on software intensive projects and programs for Government or Industry customers, of which 20 years’ experience as a Software Engineer supporting software architecture development, requirements analysis, process execution and evaluation. Required Clearance: Candidate must have TS/SCI with Polygraph Desired: Preferred Experience: Experience optimizing system resource usage in a virtual environment",Software Engineer L (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/software-engineer-l3-government-job-columbia-md-us-170368569.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,,,a0fcaab178e4e937418387dac16b5a42
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:09:54:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Under broad direction, develop the network transition plan, conducting discovery of source legacy environment (including IP space) and documentation of the domain collapse process and migration implementation. Oversee the infrastructure and network transition operations, responding appropriately to alerts and events. Oversee transition incidents, resolutions, ensuring appropriate response to escalations. Coordinate transition infrastructure repairs, including directing remote activities to ensure continuity for service delivery. Review root cause analysis documentation to address performance management and incident correlation issues. Provide transition data center support where appropriate. Oversee daily transition/network collapse activities and document in appropriate reporting and ticketing tools and ensure continuity for any outstanding issues. Provide incident notification to Government representatives. Work is performed in 24/7 environment and must be able to work second/third shifts, weekends, and holidays. 8+ years of experience required. 8+ years of experience required. Certified in accordance with DODD 8570.1m Information Assurance Technician III, or as required by the environment. IAT 3: CISA, GCIH, GCED, CISSP (or Associate), CASP. Cisco CCNP Certification required. Candidate must possess a fully adjudicated SECRET clearance based on an ADP-I (AKA: IT-1): SSBI/SBPR/PPR background investigation. Desired: Experience in network transitions and domain collapse consolidation.ITIL Foundation V3 certification; CompTIA Security+ Certification.",Network Engineering (Routing\Switching) (Government) Job in Quantico,,"Quantico, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/network-engineering-routing-switching-government-job-quantico-va-us-169068530.aspx?mescoid=1500132001001&jobPosition=12,,,e1a1d69b9758f34473f1909480b2ea6c
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:09:48:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T is seeking hard-working and dependable candidates to support of the GSM-O contract at Defense Information Systems Agency (DISA) located at Scott AFB, IL. DISA acts as the provider of GIG/Defense Information System Network (DISN) services to its customers the Department of Defense (DoD) and national security organizations. This position directly supports the DISA-provided GIG capabilities and services in our 24x7 Global Network Support Center (GNSC). We work in a performance-based environment where our performance is based on pre-determined Acceptable Levels of Performance (ALP's). Candidate will be ""mission essential"" and able to support rotating 12, 10, or 8hrs shifts based upon the requirement and resources available. Candidate is required to support the development, documentation and tracking of measurements and metrics relevant to the ALP's. Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.Basic Qualifications Network Operations and Maintenance: Experience with one or more of the following: alarm surveillance, fault management, configuration management, LAN maintenance, performance management. Expertise in one or more of the following: Routers; Crypto devices; Routing, Network appliances (CSU, DSU, etc), DSN/DRSN, DVSG, GVS, ATM General understanding of network topologies, both transport and IP. Ability to work in a team focused, dynamic environment. Requires expertise in one or more of the following devices/vendors: CISCO, Juniper, SONET, SONUS, Nortel, Avaya or Marconi. Ability to perform troubleshooting, configuration, and restoration of services across multiple platforms. Requires experience in one or more of the following Crypto devices: KG-340, KG-175A/D, KIV-7, KIV-19. GTMS/ITSM Remedy: Understands the customer relationship tool which can be used to log/monitor the issues or problems faced by customers by the means of incident management tickets. Understand the functions multiple RFO, and charging the correct Fault Durations Hours to each Fault Category. Supports team members in taking ownership of tickets and updates the Action/Work log (troubleshooting steps performed during the selected course of action). - Hold DoD-8570 IAT Level 2 baseline certification (Security+ CE, CISSP or equivalent) prior to start date Required Skills, Experience, and Education: • 2-5 years of experience specific experience in telecommunications network management, operations, installation or development. • CCNA is preferable but not required. • General experience includes increasing technical responsibilities in network management.Desired skills: CCNA, ITIL v3 Foundation certifiedClearance: Active Secret clearance",Network Controller\Operator Intermediate (Government) Job in Collinsville,,"Collinsville, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/network-controller-operator-intermediate-government-job-collinsville-il-us-169068440.aspx?mescoid=1500135001001&jobPosition=18,,,d0f1b801039ca092f0ca081f1902fd78
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:09:47:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"• Possesses an advanced understanding of OCO, DCO, and DODIN OPS and is able to identify, develop, and recommend prioritization of requirements • Leverages advanced analytics experience and knowledge of cloud computing technologies, computer science, statistics, mathematics, and other cutting-edge technologies • Conducts research and designs solutions and plans for the development of innovative technologies and test activities that defend against cyberspace threats • Studies and provides solutions to complex cyberspace technology and operations challenges • Researches revolutionary cyber technology concepts and provides direction based on research for the development of prototypes, and test activities on innovative technologies that defend against cyberspace threats and support cyberspace operations • Designs new approaches to computing technology and provides innovative uses for existing technology, including pushing the boundaries of original intent of hardware and software • Conducts empirical evaluation of a broad spectrum of networking technologies under adverse conditions • Develops techniques that provide a means to leverage expertise and applications from alternative cyber intelligence assessment perspectives and merges them to provide a SA perspective • Provides expertise in systems and affordability/failure analysis, experimental testing, training, technical assurance oversight and evaluation of OCO capabilities, hardware design and development, and software development • Summarizes and conveys findings to technical and non-technical clients through verbal and written means Required Skills, Experience, and Education: • Minimum 15 years of experience as a Cyberspace Scientist • 8140 IAM Level II - CAP, GSLC, CASP CE, CISM or CISSP • Minimum of Ph.D. from an accredited college or University in Computer Science, Cybersecurity, Computer Engineering, or related discipline • Strong attention to detail and organizational skills. Excellent communications skills. • Strong analytical and problem solving skills Required Clearance: Must have and maintain an active Top Secret/ SCI clearance and in scope successful Polygraph",Cyberspace Scientist III (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/cyberspace-scientist-iii-government-job-columbia-md-us-170033348.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=12,,,07fb5fdbb00eef37cb0ff99b10806479
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:09:00:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"The System Administrator is responsible for provisioning, installation/configuration, operation, and maintenance of Linux and Windows systems hardware and software and related infrastructure.The System Administrator configures and manages operating systems and installs/loads operating system software, troubleshoots, maintains integrity and configures network components along with implementing operating systems enhancements to improve reliability and performance in accordance with standards and project/operational requirementsResponsibilities include the tasks for building servers such as: • Providing technical configuration, setup, installation services, hardware and coordination for application projects, • Providing remote access to servers, • Establishing and documenting server baseline configurations, • Assisting in server maintenance and special projects, occasionally during extended work hours, • Communicating outage/degradation of server to management, • Understanding and implementing established technical and workflow procedures.The Systems Administrator is responsible for responding to change requests; performing technical evaluations, analysis, and troubleshooting for all supported servers; building servers by providing technical configuration, setup, installation services, IP addressing and provisioning, and operating and maintaining servers. The System Administrator performs operations and support, maintenance and research and development to ensure continual innovation. They develop and maintain installation and configuration procedures and contribute to and maintain system standards. They research and recommend innovative, and where possible automated approaches for system administration tasks and identify approaches that leverage our resources and provide economies of scale. Education requirements are flexible depending on experience. Typically a Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, or other related discipline, is required with three years’ experience applying fundamental skills and concepts using established procedures and standard practices to work problems. The candidate should have appropriate certifications that justify skills in the job disciplines. The candidate must be willing to work on customer site in Northern Virginia (west of Tysons Corner up to and including Dulles Airport Vicinity).Required Clearance: TS/SCI with Poly",Systems Administrator (Government) Job in Oakton,,"Oakton, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/systems-administrator-government-job-oakton-va-us-169945763.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=2,,,86279549ea39d50d1c60caaac4a8ba10
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:08:59:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Thinking of taking your career to another level? AT&T is the place for you. We show our employees how much they’re appreciated with extraordinary perks that are hard to find anywhere else. From great pay and health insurance to exclusive discounts and the tools you need to grow, you’ll find that there are a lot of benefits to a career at AT&T..Net developer needed! We’re looking for a developer with experience in both internal libraries and external object models with strong debugging skills. PowerShell, SharePoint 2013 object model, and web part experience is a big plus but not required. If you are an experienced .Net developer with a strong familiarity in web technologies (IIS, HTTP(S), SSL, Certificates, etc.) and a desire to learn SharePoint we are willing to train. Must be willing to respond to after-hours requests for support. A competitive candidate will have a Master’s degree in a Technical, Computer or Math related field with (5) years’ experience in Domain Name Server (DNS), Network Time Protocol (NTP) and IP routing protocols. A Bachelor’s Degree with seven (7) years’ experience; an Associate’s Degree with ten (10) years of experience may be substituted for the Master’s Degree. No degree with 10 years of experience implementing information technology solutions is acceptableCandidate must have a TS/SCI clearance with a polygraph. Desired: SharePoint Developer (Subject Matter Expert L2) with DoD 8570.01-M appropriate certification",SharePoint Developer\Administrator (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/sharepoint-developer-administrator-government-job-columbia-md-us-169893181.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=12,,,74b3503477fce3ef3d01c6478129fde8
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:08:21:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-Time (Must be able to work from 3:00 pm to 7:00 pm)Robin Run, IN 5354 West 62nd Street Indianapolis, IN 46268 Job #: 063247Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Your responsibilities:* Provide quick, efficient and pleasant delivery of food, ensuring that quality standards and service are being delivered* Take food orders and deliver meals to residents and guests in a timely manner* Ensure safety and proper handling of dishes, glassware and utensilsRequired skills and qualifications:* One year restaurant experience preferred* High degree of service orientation and a positive attitude* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Server Job in Indianapolis,Part Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN 46268",Healthcare Services Hotels and Lodging Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/server-job-indianapolis-in-us-169633128.aspx?mescoid=3500614001001&jobPosition=9,,Food Services/Hospitality,7ca5bf6787fd9579e85f853317c9f5a9
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:08:19:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce, professional staffing services firm, has a leading Healthcare Solutions client seeking a Medical Biller with Medicaid or Medicare experience in Bergen County, New Jersey (NJ). The position is responsible for accounts receivable, collection and follow-up. Experience with Medicaid or Medicare is a plus.REQUIREMENTS: Collection and follow-up experience Hospital, ambulatory or physician billing experience Proficiency with MS Office",Medical Biller - Government Job in Saddle River,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Saddle River, NJ 07458",,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-biller-government-job-saddle-river-nj-us-170257937.aspx?mescoid=2900531001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ab05c22a72f8dfe274de4ac844c3cf8a
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:08:15:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position will be part of a MCESG Support Team responsible for the delivery of operations support, database management, preventative and corrective maintenance and logistics support. Specifically, the database management specialist will: • Evaluate and recommend available Database Management System (DBMS) products to support validated MCESG requirements. • Define file organization, indexing methods, and security procedures for specific MCESG applications. • Develop, implement, and maintain database backup and recovery procedures for the processing environments (MS SharePoint) and ensures that data integrity, security, and recoverability are built into the DBMS applications. • Provide weekly back-up of archival of an average of 200 sets of documentation • Create links and conduits of archival in no more than 30 days for initial set-up and 3 days for new initiatives • Provide weekly summary of archived documents • Develop and exercise contingency data recovery plan on a semi-annual basis Required Skills, Experience, and Education: One (1) to five (5) years’ experience in database administration installing, configuring, and maintaining Structured Query Language (SQL) Server database management system (DBMS). REQUIRES: IAT Level II - One of the following: GSEC, Security+CE, SSCP, or CCNA-Security.Required Clearance: Must hold a current Secret security clearance and be DoD 8570 Level 2 IAT certified. Desired: Candidate must be able to prepare and deliver presentations on database management support concepts. Develop data models, policies, and standards for data management. Coordinate with system designers, other database managers and users to standardize data definitions, data formats, and usage.",Database Management Specialist (Government) Job in Stafford,,"Stafford, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/database-management-specialist-government-job-stafford-va-us-170368537.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=1,,,ad885050abd91322005028a888a91cd0
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:07:49:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director of Operations Popular Southern California Concept When our founders wanted to open their first restaurant, they drew inspiration from home. Memories of delicious meals, made from scratch with fresh ingredients, should be shared…and that’s exactly what they did. Our food should do the talking around the clock, and after our first restaurant opened, many customers wanted a location closer to home. Since then, we have grown across Southern California to several locations with more on the horizon. We’re always on the hunt for talented Management that want to advance in their careers and join a growing restaurant group. Title of Position: Director of Operations Job Description: The Director of Operations will be accountable for overseeing the operations of the Southern California market while creating a strong group of professionals through recruitment, coaching, mentoring and development. The Director of Operations is in a position to lead their team by example, following guidelines, procedures and our businesses values. As the Director of Operations, you will be engaged in all aspects of generating a multi-million dollar company from building guest relationships to promoting local community involvement. You’ll assemble techniques to put together sales and revenue targets, and integrate our strategic blueprint. We have been searching for a Director of Operations with value-driven leadership who's prepared to make the choices essential to achieve excellent outcomes. If you have the Director of Operations skill for building others and a passion for excellent service, this can be the best opportunity to enhance your career! Qualifications: Minimum of 5+ years current Restaurant Multi-Unit Management (District Manager, Regional Manager, Director of Ops, etc.) experience Family Dining background a huge plus Strong track record of hiring and developing talented Managers Ability to prioritize and delegate tasks effectively Outstanding oral, written, and verbal communication skills Passion for customer service and taking care of guests Dedication to excellent food quality and ensuring our restaurants maintain high levels of hygiene and consistency Must be proficient with financials (P&L's, inventory, food/labor cost, etc.) Apply Now - Director of Operations in Riverside, California!",Director of Operations Job in Riverside,Full Time Employee,"Riverside, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-operations-job-riverside-ca-us-169463147.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=18,"100,000.00 - 135,000.00 $ /year ",Food Services/Hospitality,ac27177668796c0b04cebdbb2e6d647e
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:07:48:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T IT Service Delivery Rep is a Field Services mid-level network technician. Working as an IT Service Delivery Rep Mid, you work as part of a Team of Network Technicians and Engineers responsible for servicing large scale Enterprise networks. Network includes Cisco, Aruba, Brocade, Juniper, Riverbed and McAfee networks. Devices to include Routers, Switches, Access Points, Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), Virtual Private Networks (VPN) and WAN Accelerators. Roles and responsibilities include but are not limited to the following: Install and maintain network devices at the site Work with the NOC technicians and Managers to troubleshoot outages and resolve network related issues. Create ticket for maintenances using HPE Service Manager. Understand, implement, and follow processes in accordance with current policies and procedures. Perform escalation and additional tasks as directed. Take direction from the Regional Leader and Site Leaders Ability to travel as needed Qualified applicant has the following skills and experience: 4 or more years experience as a Network Technician Innovative technical professional, customer service oriented, and knowledgeable engineer in the field of Ethernet and IP data engineering High level of project coordination skills to manage the execution of maintenance activities and network outages. Fundamental understanding of the OSI Model A passion for excellence and continual improvement, combined with an entrepreneurial spirit, strong written and oral communication skills, strong interpersonal skills, innovative thinking in a fast-paced, ever-changing environment. Strong customer service and communication is necessary to ensure customer satisfaction and network reliability. Ability to lift up to 50lbs is required. Operational support, and configuration of network devices such as servers, routers, switches, associated software tools, and cabling in a large LAN/MAN/BAN/WAN environment. Fundamental understanding of the OSI Model is required Some Travel will be required. Desired skills and experience: Problem-solving and troubleshooting skills in severs and Cisco devices as needed Knowledge of network protocols such as OSPF, BGP, and EIGRP is a Plus. Knowledge and experience working with wireless technologies, Virtual Private Networks (VPN), Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), and WAN Accelerators and associated technologies is highly desirable. Education: A Background Information Technology field or a related technology field is highly desirable. Other evidence of intellectual, technical, business accomplishments, and related technology leadership experiences will be considered. Certifications: Active Comp TIA Security Plus CE is required Cisco CCNA desired ITIL foundation V3 certification is highly desirable. Must be a US Citizen and have an ACTIVE Secret Clearance AT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V",IT Service Delivery Rep Mid (Government) Job in Bothell,,"Bothell, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-service-delivery-rep-mid-government-job-bothell-wa-us-170368553.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=20,,,e14096342fb971579195af085dd66609
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:06:57:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Service Desk Officer - Network Operations Center Watch Administrator position is in support of a Government Solutions customer in the Northern Virginia area. This position is for 12 hour shifts (nights), which runs from 6PM to 6AM, over a two week rotating schedule that consists of Sunday through Tuesday every week and Wednesday every other week including weekends and holidays. Work is technical in nature providing Tier 1 support a telephone and trouble ticket oriented Service Desk in support of a customer's mission oriented IT infrastructure. The Watch Administrator monitors Network and Server Infrastructure, performs initial troubleshooting on LAN & WAN voice and data telecommunications equipment plus the supporting applications and services. This requires Tier 1 troubleshooting and problem solving using on-the-job experience, documentation, knowledge bases, and deployed network and IT management tools. Candidate will serve as liaison between the end users / customers and senior technical staff if problems are escalated. The Watch Administrator also processed routine customer work orders such as adding routes and adding system accounts.Education requirements are flexible depending on experience. The following skills / prerequisites are required: Willingness to work Shift (24x7) - Willingness to work 12 hour night shifts Excellent verbal (Phone customer interaction skills) and written communication skills. Experience with general information technology. Experience with WAN / LAN / Telecommunication Technologies. Experience with Voice Telecommunications, Equipment and Applications Experience with MS Windows, Linux or Solaris Administration. Experience with LAN Cabling (CAT5, Fiber, Ethernet etc.) Experience using SolarWinds or other IT Management system Experience using Remedy or other ticket-tracking system Excellent verbal and written communication skills. Knowledge of Voice Telecommunications, Equipment and Applications Willingness to work in Northern Virginia (west of Tysons Corner up to and including Dulles Airport Vicinity) Required Clearance: TS/SCI with Poly AT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V",Service Desk Officer Watch Stander (Government) Job in Oakton,,"Oakton, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/service-desk-officer-watch-stander-government-job-oakton-va-us-170252339.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=16,,,4b7276d8d0f8bd23c1b48a67b009e480
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:06:56:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position’s primary role will be an NGEN TRMP Mid-Level Network Technician servicing a large scale Enterprise network. You will be part of a Team of Network Technicians and Engineers focused on the technology refresh of a large scale Enterprise Network. This network includes Cisco, Aruba, Brocade, Juniper, Riverbed and McAfee network devices to include Routers, Switches, Access Points, Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), Virtual Private Networks (VPN) and WAN Accelerators. As a Mid-Level Technician you will be expected to work with the on-site customers, NOC technicians and Managers to execute Network Device replacements within a region. You will be responsible for the entire process including ticket creation using HPE Service Manager, executing the network device replacement and asset management of the new and old network devices. Candidates will be expected to understand, implement, and follow processes in accordance with current policies and procedures. You may also be asked to perform additional field services tasks as directed. The successful candidate will be a detail-oriented technical professional, customer service oriented and knowledgeable in the areas of Ethernet and TCP/IP with 4 plus years’ experience as a Network Technician. Position requires a high level of project coordination skills to manage the execution of maintenance activities and network outages. Fundamental understanding of the OSI Model is required. Experience must include operational support, and configuration of network devices such as servers, routers, switches, associated software tools, and cabling in a large LAN/MAN/BAN/WAN environment. Knowledge of network protocols such as OSPF, BGP, and EIGRP is a plus. Knowledge and experience working with wireless technologies, Virtual Private Networks (VPN), Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), and WAN Accelerators and associated technologies is highly desirable. You will be part of a team of Network Technicians and Engineers. Travel will be required. Ability to obtain a Government Secret Security Clearance is required. The ideal candidate will have a passion for excellence and continual improvement, combined with an entrepreneurial spirit, strong written and oral communication skills, strong interpersonal skills, innovative thinking in a fast-paced, ever-changing environment. Strong customer service and communication is necessary to ensure customer satisfaction and network reliability. Good problem-solving and troubleshooting skills related to servers and network devices are a plus. Ability to lift up to 50lbs is required. A background in the Information Technology field or a related technology field is highly desirable. Other evidence of intellectual, technical, business accomplishments, and related technology leadership experiences will be considered. Cisco CCNA and Security+ required. ITIL foundation V3 certification is highly desirable. Required Clearance: Active DoD Secret",IT Service Delivery Rep Mid (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-service-delivery-rep-mid-government-job-columbia-md-us-169422366.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=9,,,fc5125cf2e5709003f9cf51896012f9b
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:06:51:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position’s primary role will be an NGEN TRMP Mid-Level Network Technician servicing a large scale Enterprise network. You will be part of a Team of Network Technicians and Engineers focused on the technology refresh of a large scale Enterprise Network. This network includes Cisco, Aruba, Brocade, Juniper, Riverbed and McAfee network devices to include Routers, Switches, Access Points, Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), Virtual Private Networks (VPN) and WAN Accelerators. As a Mid-Level Technician you will be expected to work with the on-site customers, NOC technicians and Managers to execute Network Device replacements within a region. You will be responsible for the entire process including ticket creation using HPE Service Manager, executing the network device replacement and asset management of the new and old network devices. Candidates will be expected to understand, implement, and follow processes in accordance with current policies and procedures. You may also be asked to perform additional field services tasks as directed. The successful candidate will be a detail-oriented technical professional, customer service oriented and knowledgeable in the areas of Ethernet and TCP/IP with 4 plus years’ experience as a Network Technician. Position requires a high level of project coordination skills to manage the execution of maintenance activities and network outages. Fundamental understanding of the OSI Model is required. Experience must include operational support, and configuration of network devices such as servers, routers, switches, associated software tools, and cabling in a large LAN/MAN/BAN/WAN environment. Knowledge of network protocols such as OSPF, BGP, and EIGRP is a plus. Knowledge and experience working with wireless technologies, Virtual Private Networks (VPN), Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), and WAN Accelerators and associated technologies is highly desirable. You will be part of a team of Network Technicians and Engineers. Travel will be required. Ability to obtain a Government Secret Security Clearance is required. The ideal candidate will have a passion for excellence and continual improvement, combined with an entrepreneurial spirit, strong written and oral communication skills, strong interpersonal skills, innovative thinking in a fast-paced, ever-changing environment. Strong customer service and communication is necessary to ensure customer satisfaction and network reliability. Good problem-solving and troubleshooting skills related to servers and network devices are a plus. Ability to lift up to 50lbs is required. A background in the Information Technology field or a related technology field is highly desirable. Other evidence of intellectual, technical, business accomplishments, and related technology leadership experiences will be considered. Cisco CCNA and Security+ required. ITIL foundation V3 certification is highly desirable. Required Clearance: Active DoD Secret",IT Service Delivery Rep Mid (Government) Job in Norfolk,,"Norfolk, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-service-delivery-rep-mid-government-job-norfolk-va-us-169422351.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=10,,,4b34576a8a77b9945102a6b2ca12a978
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:06:50:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T GSI is searching for a Space Acquisition Logistics Analyst experienced in providing direct, on-site support to the Geosynchronous Space Situational Awareness Program (GSSAP) Office at Los Angeles Air Force Base, CA. The ideal candidate is experienced in providing the following functions: Review provide input to design documentation (TRDs, Specifications, interface control documents, drawings), requirements documents (ICDs, CDDs, CPDs), ECPs, PWSs Develop Training System Requirements Analysis, Logistics Planning Documents, and Life Cycle Sustainment Plans Review and provide input to enabling concepts, concept of operations, and ensuring supportability requirements are addressed and part of upfront planning for systems Developing strategies, plans and packages for classified and unclassified Depot Source of Repair Successful candidate may be tasked by Air Force to lead one or more acquisition logistics programs with responsibility for budget and schedule development and execution Assist in integration across project spectrum Coordinate and lead Integrated product teams (IPT) Ability to provide a wide variety of acquisition/sustainment technical analyses, and program management support to a government PM Provides analysis of proposed costs, contractor Statements of Work, and technical content Ensures adherence to Government acquisition policies, master plans and schedules, and develops solutions to program problems Have a working knowledge of system acquisitions, specifically in Air Force and DoD environments, covering the DoD 5000 series Assist in the execution of acquisition strategies, including drafting Statement of Work, Statement of Objectives, Request for Proposal preparations, monitoring deliverables, and attending acquisition related meetings. Travel requirement: Approximately 25% 10 or more years of experience is required in the following areas: Acquisition Logistics supporting space acquisition programs and/or industry experience Experience in Space Control, SSA, or Space C2 desired as a space systems acquisition logistics experience preferred; prior work as Air Force Operator or Maintainer is desirable Familiar with a variety of acquisition concepts, phases, and procedures; participate in technical studies, and performance reviews; ability to function in a multi-contractor/customer environment, performs a variety of complicated tasks, a wide degree of creativity and latitude is expected; demonstrated leadership and interpersonal skills; and effective written and oral communication skills required. Security Clearance Requirement Education and Training Requirements: B.A./B.S., preferably in systems engineering, or other technical degree Acquisition Logistics DAU Level 2 (Level 3 preferred)/or equivalent for non-Government candidates",Senior Acquisition Logistics Analyst (Government) Job in El Segundo,,"El Segundo, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-acquisition-logistics-analyst-government-job-el-segundo-ca-us-170368303.aspx?mescoid=1300086001001&jobPosition=3,,,ff2acb3d60cc36936aa246da89329808
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:06:17:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Network Engineer is considered a Senior Level Analyst who must have the ability to support detailed discovery and analysis of intrusion detection security events that traverses the Judiciary Network, and assures that quality work is performed. Act as the second tier escalation supporting Information Assurance Engineers and the Shift Team Lead.The Senior Level Analyst will ensure that all incidents are correct in review, and will construct all email notification messaging. Responsibilities include: aggressively monitoring and responding to alerts triggered in the SEIM tool or requests for assistance from customers. use a variety of tools to investigate incidents and take immediate action or recommend a course of action to safeguard the U.S. Courts systems. will document all incidents and create a clear narrative that supports their conclusions. General Experience: Six years of security intrusion detection examination experience involving a range of security technologies that product logging data; to include wide area networks host and Network IPS/IDS/HIPs traffic event review, server web log analysis, raw data logs; the ability to communicate clearly both orally and in writing. Candidate will have at least three years of experience working at a senior level, performing analytics examination of logs and console events in the following working experience areas of; creating advance queries methods in Splunk or advance Grep skills, firewall ACL review, examining Snort based IDS events, Pcaps, web server log review, and working in a SIEM environment.Required Clearance: Public Trust type background check with finger-printing and drug screening",Senior Cyber Security Analyst (Government) Job in Washington,,"Washington, DC",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-cyber-security-analyst-government-job-washington-dc-us-170252394.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=2,,,56cb108d694c3a1caae20dc9d1193fc7
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:05:49:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Job Title        : Legal Editor-Sr (Government Contracting and Commercial Transactional Practice)  Location        : Saint Paul, MN Duration        : 3+Months   Job Description:         Our Client is looking for a temporary Commercial Attorney Editor with substantial experience in government contracting and commercial transactional practice. This contractor will work remotely on an hourly basis, 35-40 hours per week for three months.  ResponsibilitiesOur Client is looking for a temporary government contract specialist contractor to work on resources for our online services. The specialist contractor will:Write, edit, and update government contracting resources in accordance with Client writing style, including practice notes, checklists and standard documents, which address bidding, contracting and compliance issues faced by companies that contract (or sub-contract) to provide goods or services to the federal government.Be available to answer questions and perform research on discrete issues that arise in Client’s final review of these resources. Requirements At least eight (8) years’ recent experience as an attorney in a law firm or as in-house counsel, advising on and handling a broad range of government contracting and procurement matters, including eligibility, contracting procedures (bidding and bid protests), subcontracting, drafting and negotiating contracts and subcontracts, contract disputes, and auditing, accounting and other ongoing compliance.Enthusiasm and ambition, with a desire to improve the efficiency of legal services.A good understanding of the needs and priorities of law firm attorneys, in-house counsel and the legal market in general.Strong communication skills, particularly given remote nature of position.Strong work ethic and ability to meet deadlines.Self-motivated and good at working independently.  For more jobs with us visit: http://www.vsoftconsulting.com/hotjobs.aspx About Us:- V-Soft Consulting Group is a staffing company headquartered in Louisville for the last 16 years primarily focused into Professional Staffing, Managed Services, Outsourced software development projects, Management consulting & Business Process Consulting with new initiatives accepting broader challenges in the high end Information Technology Industry.  V-Soft adapt a well-defined and exclusive recruitment process instrumented by priority, precision, pragmatism and expediency. To satisfy our constant need for expertise, we actively seek talented Technical professionals to join us and to get explored with wonderful opportunities with us in making their career. Report",Monster,,"Job Title        : Legal Editor-Sr (Government Contracting and Commercial Transactional Practice)  Location        : Saint Paul, MN Duration        : 3+Months   Job Description:         Our Client is looking for a temporary Commercial Attorney Editor with substantial experience in government contracting and commercial transactional practice. This contractor will work remotely on an hourly basis, 35-40 hours per week for three months.  ResponsibilitiesOur Client is looking for a temporary government contract specialist contractor to work on resources for our online services. The specialist contractor will:Write, edit, and update government contracting resources in accordance with Client writing style, including practice notes, checklists and standard documents, which address bidding, contracting and compliance issues faced by companies that contract (or sub-contract) to provide goods or services to the federal government.Be available to answer questions and perform research on discrete issues that arise in Client’s final review of these resources. Requirements At least eight (8) years’ recent experience as an attorney in a law firm or as in-house counsel, advising on and handling a broad range of government contracting and procurement matters, including eligibility, contracting procedures (bidding and bid protests), subcontracting, drafting and negotiating contracts and subcontracts, contract disputes, and auditing, accounting and other ongoing compliance.Enthusiasm and ambition, with a desire to improve the efficiency of legal services.A good understanding of the needs and priorities of law firm attorneys, in-house counsel and the legal market in general.Strong communication skills, particularly given remote nature of position.Strong work ethic and ability to meet deadlines.Self-motivated and good at working independently.  For more jobs with us visit: http://www.vsoftconsulting.com/hotjobs.aspx About Us:- V-Soft Consulting Group is a staffing company headquartered in Louisville for the last 16 years primarily focused into Professional Staffing, Managed Services, Outsourced software development projects, Management consulting & Business Process Consulting with new initiatives accepting broader challenges in the high end Information Technology Industry.  V-Soft adapt a well-defined and exclusive recruitment process instrumented by priority, precision, pragmatism and expediency. To satisfy our constant need for expertise, we actively seek talented Technical professionals to join us and to get explored with wonderful opportunities with us in making their career.",,http://jobview.monster.com/legal-editor-sr-government-contracting-commercial-transactional-practice-_8419-job-saint-paul-mn-us-170363289.aspx?mescoid=2300335001001&jobPosition=8,,,535575e015d7307dc81e6757b582ee2c
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:05:48:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have a strong desire to lead and develop an area that has high growth potential and a generous compensation package? Do you want to work for Government and Fortune 1000 organizations ?We have expanded our services portfolio to include staff augmentation and outsourced IT support services! Two recent contract staffing awards have created a demand for an experienced and highly-motivated full time IT Recruiter who also possesses strong IT sales, sourcing, presentation, interviewing and negotiation skills.Top Reasons to Work with UsWe are industry leader in support of government, education and commercial organizations nationwide to design and implement custom IT solutions that achieve our client’s business objectives.Our portfolio includes the top government system integrators such as Lockheed Martin, General Dynamics, Alion Science and Harris Corporation. Our direct relationships with the federal government agencies include customers such as the U.S. Army, U.S. Navy and Department of Energy.What You Will Be Doing- Develop relationships with hiring managers and procurement departments within targeted account list and seek new IT staffing or project-related opportunities;- Manage and develop existing contract staffing relationships;- Source, recruit, and screen applicants for a variety of technical positions, including software engineers, business analysts, project- Develop a system for the management of the entire recruitment process;- Assist with salary and benefit negotiations;- Assist HR with onboarding of resources;- Attend industry related trade shows and seminars to promote services.What You Need for this PositionIT recruiting experience including sourcing candidates, screening, interviewing, and negotiating terms of contractIT staffing and business development experienceProficient with recruitment tracking and CRM systems and Microsoft Office applicationsNice to have:Experience with IT Healthcare and Government accoutnsWhat's In It for YouJoin our professional team and expand your skills providing great service!Please apply today!",IT Recruiter - enterprise IT solutions,"Full Time, Employee","Minnetonka, Mn, MN 55343",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/it-recruiter-enterprise-it-solutions-government-contracts-job-minnetonka-mn-mn-us-170128727.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=3,,Human Resources,50b3eb96f215d01e0b64534673fe3ec0
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:04:58:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T is seeking an experienced staff that shall be responsible for effective provisioning, installation/configuration, operation, and maintenance of systems hardware and software and related infrastructure. Qualified individuals shall participate in continuing innovation within the infrastructure, and verify that system hardware, operating systems, software systems, and related procedures adhere to organizational values. Required Skills, Experience, and Education: Have 5+ years of hands-on experience in Linux system administration. Experience in virtualization technologies such as VMware, vSphere ESXi, and VDI. Related industry certifications such as RHCE (Red Hat Certified Engineer). Familiarity with storage technologies, networking, and configuration management tools. Individual will be responsible for all aspects of customer solutions including designing, developing, integrating, testing, deploying, and supporting. Candidates should possess the ability to work both as part of a team as well as independently. Must be a self-starter and be able to prioritize work and manage time in order to meet schedules in a dynamic work environment. Ability to multitask, have strong organizational skills, and attention to detail. Must possess strong oral and written communication skills. Required Clearance: TS/SCI Desired: A BS degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or related field preferred.AT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V",System Administrator (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/system-administrator-government-job-columbia-md-us-170303657.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=10,,,3c6e8bf133a4c27e9f818347c0e1767a
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:04:56:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Would you like to make a difference in people’s lives every day? How about working with a company that nearly doubles in size every three to five years? Where your growth potential is only limited by your desire! If you answered yes to these questions then we are the company you want to work with! We are looking for passionate, service oriented individuals to work for our senior population in our nursing homes!MANAGEMENT RESPONSIBILITIESOur Food Services Directors play an integral part in the success of our centers and satisfaction of our residents. We are looking for individuals that want to make a difference and are committed to the growth of their co-workers, their staff, the company and themselves. As a Food Service Director for Healthcare Services Group, your responsibilities will include:·         Managing a staff of 10-25 employees-coaching praising and monitoring the quality and quantity of their work·         Responsibility for daily payroll and budget management·         Recruitment and training of all front line staff·         Overseeing food production·         Ordering food and supplies·         Managing inventory·         Ensuring daily compliance with operational systems and procedures·         Client relations·         Various paperwork compiling and filingCAREER OPPORTUNITIES AND PROGRESSIONThe ability to attract and develop individuals with a strong entrepreneurial spirit has enabled us to dominate an industry traditionally not known for its professional management structure. A structured 90-day training program prepares our managers for success. This position is the door that opens to all middle and upper management positions in operations, training and sales.TRAINING AND DEVELOPMENTHCSG’s success is built around a culture of employee development. We have a very detailed training program that will provide each employee with the tools and real life experience to be successful. Our Management training program has been tweaked and developed over the 40+ years we have been in business and we continue to adapt it to the industry changes.In addition to our training program, we make it a priority to give immediate performance feedback along with doing a more formal evaluation on all employees to ensure that each employee including our managers have a clear understanding as to what they are doing well and what opportunities they have to improve. This commitment to the development of our staff and management team has allowed us to maintain our mission of providing excellent service and be the leading provider of hospitality services to Healthcare centers across the United StatesCan you see yourself moving up into middle and upper management positions such as:·         Training Manager·         Area Manager·         District Training Manager·         District Manager·         Regional Training Manager ",Food Service Manager Job in Kansas City,Full Time Employee,"Kansas City, MO",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/food-service-manager-job-kansas-city-mo-us-168449787.aspx?mescoid=3500602001001&jobPosition=3,"30,000.00 - 42,000.00 $ /year",,d4be675e5701999525794a500322e0db
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:03:47:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T is seeking staff that shall provide critical support and hands-on expertise in the areas of network applications design, configuration, and deployment assistance. This position shall provide Tier 3 support to the operations staff. The engineer shall work as part of a system design team to research emerging technologies and develop new technologies. Required Skills, Experience, and Education: Qualified candidates shall: Be responsible for designing and delivering engineering services; Have experience in engineering, concept development and systems architecture definition; Have hands-on implementation experience with network security devices and protection platforms; Have hands-on configuration and real world experience with enterprise class routers and switch product lines; Provide hands-on support during system installation/deployment and infrastructure upgrades; Have knowledge of IPv6 and its impact on future network designs; Have demonstrated expertise in supporting WAN technologies; Have a BS in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or equivalent Required Clearance: TS/SCI Desired: MS in related field; DOD 8570 IAT Level II certification (Security+, SSCP, etc.)",Senior Network Engineer (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-network-engineer-government-job-columbia-md-us-168699329.aspx?mescoid=1500132001001&jobPosition=18,,,d9139281649e968d53edeecc81ace1a6
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:03:46:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"As America""s Un-carrier, T-Mobile US, Inc. (NYSE: TMUS) is redefining the way consumers and businesses buy wireless services through leading product and service innovation. The company""s advanced nationwide 4G and 4G LTE network delivers outstanding wireless experiences for customers who are unwilling to compromise on quality and value. Based in Bellevue, Wash., T-Mobile US operates its flagship brands, T-Mobile and MetroPCS. It currently serves approximately 58 million wireless subscribers and provides products and services through 70,000 points of distribution.Be dynamic. Sell big. Unleash your potential.Welcome to a different kind of sales role, and a different kind of company. As America""s Un-carrier, T-Mobile is redefining the way organizations buy wireless services through leading product and service innovation. Thanks to an advanced nationwide 4G and 4G LTE network that delivers outstanding wireless experiences, we""re proud to serve approximately 50 million wireless subscribers and growing. We""re looking for bold, uncompromising sales professionals to bring our products and services to market. In the process, we can turn the wireless industry on its head, un-limit what customers expect, and unleash your true potential.This sales role isn""t for everyone. It""s for bold individuals with that perfect mix of technical expertise and people-first sales abilities. Ready to apply yet? Great! Let""s take a quick look at a few key qualifications: You""re a top producer in your current role You""ve got at least three years of sales experience with a history of documented sales achievements in a commissioned environment You""ve also put in your time developing your ability to manage customer portfolios and relationship building You are, simply put, an excellent negotiator and effective closer Your background in wireless telecommunications isn""t required, but it will go a long way toward your success here Needless to say, you""re organized with the kind of time management skills others can only dream of having You also know how to address highly-complex customer issues with serious professionalism As this role is 70% local and out-of-town travel, you""ll be working in the field the majority of the day, and that means a valid license, good driving record, and proof of insurance are all must haves A Bachelor""s degree and government sales experience is ideal, but not requiredOkay. You""ve got all the makings of a top performer. Here""s what we can offer you in exchange for your amazing work: Competitive base pay plus strong commissions package Ongoing sales training to keep you at the top of your game Medical, dental and vision benefits Matching 401(k) Generous paid time-off programs Phone service discounts Education reimbursement Serious growth potential for your careerThis is more than your average sales role. It""s a chance to build your own territory selling products and services you can believe in. And in the process, you can set the bar for your own success. So what are you waiting for? It""s time to explore an opportunity that could change the direction of your career. We invite you to apply today.Exceptional sales professional wanted. But here""s the twist: we""re looking for someone who knows the legal ins and outs of working with government accounts like a pro. That""s where you come in. You""re the rare sales expert who combines a winning approach to solution selling with an eye for details. Details like reporting and compliance procedures, and the boilerplate-style collection of complex legal and contractual agreements you""ll be handling on a regular basis. Sound like you""re kind of challenge? Let""s get into the details: You""ll be responsible for hunting and developing new government business based on T-Mobile""s Five Pillars - State, County, City, Education (K12/Public/Higher Ed), and Public Healthcare This role requires daily prospecting within your assigned states; in fact, most GAMs have one to three states in which they prospect This is all about solutions selling, as you focus on implementing static IP, private APN, Persistent Communications, Hosted Mobility Management, Public Safety Solutions, and E-Rate You""ll team with lobbyists to move sales forward in highly technical and complex situations Of course, meeting and exceeding monthly sales quota objectives is the name of the game here, and that means always hunting for new business while growing your assigned government accounts We""re looking for hunters and closers who understand the importance of closing the small business and leading the account team to close the more complex longer sales cycle opportunities A key part of your role that sets T-Mobile apart is the way you define and deliver post-sales care services to your clients, providing service solutions like billing and expense management, post-sale customer education on service and equipment, implementation, and technical troubleshooting Along the way, you""ll be using sales force automation to find new business opportunities, reporting on your sales activities, and providing billing reports and rate plan analysis We""ll also depend on you to continuously update your know-how in wireless products, services, industry trends, and your marketplaceWe Take Equal Opportunity Seriously - By Choice T-Mobile USA, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All decisions concerning the employment relationship will be made without regard to age, race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, marital status, veteran status, the presence of any physical or mental disability, or any other status or characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. Discrimination or harassment based upon any of these factors is wholly inconsistent with our Company values and will not be tolerated. Furthermore, such discrimination or harassment may violate federal, state, or local law. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Government Account Manager - St. Louis/Kansas City MO Job in Overland Park,,"Overland Park, KS 66213",,http://jobview.monster.com/government-account-manager-st-louis-kansas-city-mo-job-overland-park-ks-us-170203657.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=20,,,1fa0932325ae5254ba3a505bfb241373
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:01:46:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you are a government consultant with 3+ years of experience, please read on!Based in San Francisco, CA, we one of the most highly respected, and fastest growing public accounting firms in the country. We specialize in a wide variety of industries, and we work with companies of all shapes and sizes. Currently, we are looking to hire a highly bright and motivated Senior Government Consultant with management consulting experience. If you have experience solving business issues, and helping to improve business processes, then we would love to tell you more about this amazing opportunity.Top Reasons to Work with Us1. Career and Income Growth 2. Incredible Benefits Benefits including Bonus, Vacation, and 401k3. Work with the best in the industryWhat You Will Be Doing- Define solutions to meet client needs and address critical issues and business challenges;- Assist in business development activities and written proposals;- Analyze business processes and programs and define recommendations;- Develop and maintain relationships with clients;- Research and analyze background documents, program issues, and best practices;- Interview and facilitate meetings with client staff and stakeholders;- Document workload, staffing, technology systems, and costs;- Prepare written documents and presentations;- Present to clients findings and recommendations.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 3+ Years of experience and knowledge of:- Undergraduate degree with 5 to 8 years of experience; or, graduate degree with 3 to 5 years of experience- Excellent analytical and quantitative skills- Strong communication, writing, and organizational skills- A track record of producing high-quality work products on-time and within budget- Ability to be flexible and to learn quickly about different client programs- Ability to work independently and contribute as a member of the project team- The applicant must be proficient with Microsoft Office software (i.e., Microsoft Word and Excel)- Ability to work closely with project manager and other team members to drive project results- Solid project planning and management skills- Understands business process concepts and principles.So, if you are a Government Consultant with 3+ years of experience, please apply today!",Senior Government Consultant - Massive Growth Potential! Job in San Francisco,"Full Time, Employee","San Francisco, CA 94102",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-government-consultant-massive-growth-potential!-job-san-francisco-ca-us-169487998.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,Other,db8205afa5d2dcfafb5e868d48eceff5
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:01:46:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you are a DE Mortgage Underwriter with 3+ years experience and local to the greater Irvine/Orange County area, please read on!Founded in 1998 we are a family owned and operated direct lender in Irvine California. We are committed to providing the “Single Point of Solutions” for the wholesale lending and correspondent market. We provide a diversified product line and competitive pricing and a hospitality centered view to banking. With over 20 years of industry experience and a staff of seasoned professionals, we prioritize sound business practices and relationships over the bottom line.What You Will Be Doing- Review borrower’s income and assets accordance to our, FHA, Agencies and investor’s guidelines.- Review subject property and appraisal accordance to our, FHA and investor’s guidelines.- Review all forms and disclosures making sure they are in compliance with both (Federal & State).- Must be able to make loan decision independently (Approve or Decline).- Sign off conditions submitted by our brokers and clear conditions in DataTrac.- Make sure to check borrower’s signatures throughout file – same signatures.- U/W to run final AUS based final information.- Complete appropriate FHAC screens as needed (including Credit reject) – DE Underwriter- Complete assigned files within established time frame. New submissions: must be completed within 24 hours or established time frame.- Conditions: must be reviewed and completed within 24 hours or established time frame.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Must have FHA direct endorsement designation. - Well versed in appraisal practices and procedures. - Proficient in loan origination systems, AllRegs, Fannie Mae DU and Freddie Mac LP. - Excellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills to build and support an extensive network of retail, wholesale and correspondent relationships. - Minimum 3 years underwriting experience to include conventional, FHA and VA with no less than 2 years of current underwriting experience.- Ability to work under pressure of multiple projects and deadlines; Ability to effectively prioritize workload and manage changes in direction- Ability to interpret and apply required policies and procedures with minimal supervision- Ability to work in a team environment- Ability to work flexible hours when neededWhat's In It for You- Competitive Compensation + OT - Great benefits- Positive work life balanceSo, if you are a DE Mortgage Underwriter with 5 + years experience, please apply today!",Government Underwriter: FHA Approved Underwriter Job in Irvine,"Full Time, Employee","Irvine, CA 92602",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/government-underwriter-fha-approved-underwriter-job-irvine-ca-us-169408628.aspx?mescoid=1300110001001&jobPosition=4,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,de837a69020244562a8d58277f5d0e83
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:01:00:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"• Possesses a general understanding and knowledge of existing joint cyberspace policies • With minimal guidance, conducts research and analysis, and contributes to the development and coordination of strategy, policy, and doctrine for cyberspace operations • Plans and prepares for interactions with researchers and policy makers and provides background support and current status for documents and presentations • Assists with the development of reports and briefings on policy, strategy, and doctrine activities • Assists with policy formulations on cyberspace issues and researches authorities, concerns, and equities to ensure accurate representation • Conducts research, analysis, development, and coordination of strategy, policy, and doctrine for cyberspace operations at the national, DOD, Service, and Command level • Provides technical expertise on executive-level projects, analyzes, assesses, and develops future strategies, policies, and doctrines governing cyberspace operations • Supports inter-agency and coalition policy formulations on cyberspace issues, ensuring authorities, concerns, and equities are accurately represented • Maintains awareness of and reports significant cyber-related policy issues affecting the DOD and USCYBERCOM • Provides concise, actionable communications to senior officials, both written and orally • Performs analysis and critical thinking, assesses programmatic issues, conducts risk analysis, and proposes innovative and achievable solutions Minimum five years of experience as a Cyberspace Policy Analyst or related functional area • Minimum of Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Cybersecurity, Computer Engineering, or related discipline • Strong attention to detail and organizational skills. Excellent communications skills. Required Clearance: Must have and maintain an active Top Secret/ SCI clearance and in scope successful Polygraph",Cyberspace Policy Analyst Level I (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/cyberspace-policy-analyst-level-i-government-job-columbia-md-us-170176146.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=8,,,120517a0fa6227d4245a86e880119ad9
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:17:13,No,jobs.monster.com,".custom-description p{margin-bottom: 15px !important;font-size:14px !important;line-height: 18px !important;}.custom-description ul{margin:10px 0px !important;font-size:14px !important;line-height: 18px !important; }SUMMARY:   Assist in answering multi line phone and assist/route to appropriate person in the fleet maintenance department.  Handles all incident and accidents and warranty recovery. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:   “Essential functions” are primarily job duties that incumbents must be able to perform unassisted or with some reasonable accommodation made by the employer. Incident and Accident Duties Incident – Equipment or property damage due to driver error or neglect.Work with Director of Maintenance and Safety Department to determine estimated cost of repair and repair facility.Acquire any photos, estimates and repair invoices as time permits and provide them to Safety.Work with Director of Maintenance, Safety Department, Dispatchers, Auto Haulers and repair facilities as needed to coordinate repair.Enter repairs into TMT maintenance program.Accident –Work with Director of Maintenance and Safety Department to determine estimated cost of repair and repair facility.Acquire any photos, estimates and repair invoices as time permits and provide them to the Safety Department.Work with Director of Maintenance, Safety Department, Dispatchers, Auto Haulers and repair facilities as needed to coordinate repair. Warranty Recovery Duties Work with other member of the Fleet Maintenance Department to ensure best utilization of warranty coverage or recovery.Review maintenance invoices and submit supplemental claims whenever possible (requires parts to be kept in most cases.)Review maintenance invoices for repetitive repairs (same parts used or repairs performed.)Breakdown or repairs needed due to poor maintenance (lack of lube, improper installation, etc.)Keep track of all submitted claims and successful recoveries. Parts Source and provide parts for service locations.Monitor price and availability.Track warranty on replacement parts.Manage parts inventory at RI maintenance facility and service truck locations. Reports Provide reports on inventory, parts and useage.  KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES REQUIRED: Two years’ experience in a truck maintenance environment preferred.Experience in logistics and dispatch, preferably within auto hauling distribution, a plus.Experience in warranty collection and procedures. Paccar, Cummins, Eaton preferred.Knowledge of DOT compliance, laws, rules, regulations and safety is helpful.Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite.Knowledge of TMT and PeopleNet a plus.Ability to maintain a high level of accuracy and completion in preparing and entering information.Attention to detail and possess a high level of accuracy.Comfortable working in a fast pace environment and ability to stay calm under pressure.Strong interpersonal skills to develop and maintain positive relationships with dispatch team and auto haulers.Possess effective verbal and listening skills.Work occasionally requires a high level of mental effort and strain when performing essential duties.  Must be able to perform the essential duties of the position with time constraints, interruptions and stressed dispatchers and drivers.Work may require more than 40 hours per week.  PHYSICAL DEMANDS: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is required to sit/stand for most of his/her job duties.  There is the need to frequently walk.  There will be a moderate amount of standing, stooping, kneeling, bending, lifting and reaching for some of his/her job duties. Visual requirements include reading off a computer screen as well as printed materials.  A high degree of dexterity is required due to frequent use of a telephone console. Verbal and auditory requirements include the ability to communicate clearly over the telephone as well as in person. There is a moderate level of grasping, lifting, pushing and/or pulling of objects of less than 50 lbs. This Job Description is intended to describe the general content of and requirements for the performance of this position.  The omission of specific statements of duties does not exclude them for the position if the work is similar, related or a reasonable requirement of the position.  Additional duties may be assigned and requirements may vary from time to time.  FLSA:  Non-Exempt           REPORTS TO:   Director of Maintenance",Warranty and Parts Specialist Job in West Warwick,"Full Time, Employee","West Warwick, RI 02893",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Warranty-Parts-Specialist-Job-West-Warwick-RI-US-165178415.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=8,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,5dc1c47eea66452fe0a772a21f41791b
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:14:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chuck E. Cheese's (CEC) is currently seeking an Assistant Gameroom Technician to assist in managing the electrical and mechanical aspects of the gameroom area inclusive of the latest video games, skill games, kiddy rides, sky tubes, robotic shows, kitchen equipment, register systems, coin and ticket mechanisms. This role performs daily preventative maintenance and repair of any items that must be fixed. Minimum Qualifications:Be at least 18 years oldPossess a “fix it now” sense of urgency Willing to learn and grow with the company Have mechanical aptitude Technical skills, including rudimentary electronics knowledge is helpful Will take a technical assessment test AND of course, provides exceptional customer serviceCEC Entertainment is an equal opportunity employer and a drug-free environment. To apply for this position please click the APPLY to send your resume. ",Assistant Electronic Gameroom Technician Job in Sacramento,Full Time,"Sacramento, CA 95815",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Electronic-Gameroom-Technician-Job-Sacramento-CA-US-165086800.aspx?mescoid=1700213001001&jobPosition=11,,Entry Level,c13d9bc4c15ba35b9c1c413f62980181
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:13:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description The DIRECTV Installer is responsible for providing excellent customer service through installing, troubleshooting, maintaining, and upgrading satellite television systems and equipment. ESSENTIAL DUTIES: Installs and programs equipment Troubleshoots, diagnoses, repairs, replaces, and upgrades components Checks satellite TV systems for correct functionality and optimal performance Maintains accurate installation, service, and inventory records Ensures adequate supply levels by inventorying stock and communicating needs to warehouse Treats customers with respect, courtesy, and professionalism at all times Coordinates schedules with customers Listens to descriptions of problems, answering questions, and resolving issues Communicates the wiring plan and equipment lay-out with customer prior to the installation Educates customers by conveying verbal information clearly and concisely Follows industry codes, regulations, and standards Adheres to policies and procedures while working autonomously Maintains a safe work environment by following safe practices and adhering to safety policies, including practicing safe driving techniques Acquires and applies information needed for prompt decision making Refers to and interprets schematics, manuals, and manufacturer's instructions Updates and improves job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities, reading technical publications, and participating in on-going technical training Supports co-workers and builds positive working relationships with all team members Meets or exceeds performance goals and quality standards Meets or exceeds productivity standards by prioritizing tasks and working efficiently Other duties as assigned EXPERIENCE/QUALIFICATIONS*: Must meet DIRECTV state-specific minimum age requirement High school diploma or equivalent required Must possess a valid driver’s license in the primary state of residence Must be able to speak clearly, concisely, and to communicate effectively in a courteous and professional manner Solid written communication skills required Must be able to work full time, up to and including six days a week; which may include nights, weekends, and holidays, as required Must meet company hiring criteria for pre-employment screening, including drug test, criminal background check, fitness for duty, and MVR check Must be able to obtain all necessary certifications, including SBCA, Service, SWiM, and Ka/Ku, as required Must be able to expect and embrace change Working knowledge of Microsoft Office and inventory software systems preferred SBCA and/or other industry certifications preferred Six months experience in telecommunications, electrical, construction, or related field preferred Working knowledge of handheld electronics, including smart phones, ipads, etc., preferred PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS*: Must be able to lift up to 75 pounds and climb ladders up to 40 feet in length Must be able to work in tight spaces, including attics and crawl spaces Must be able to work outside in extreme weather conditions, including precipitation and temperature variations Must be able to stand for extended periods of time An essential duty of the position of Technician is to install satellite dishes with the use of a ladder on customers' homes. The ladders used by DIRECTV have been rated by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) to hold a maximum total weight (including tool belt and equipment) of 375 lbs. To allow for the weight of equipment an individual’s weight cannot exceed 325 lbs. DIRECTV employees are committed, dependable, professional and accountable. We value integrity, honesty and respect for others. We have high standards for how our employees conduct themselves at work and in the communities we support. Come join our team as we Entertain the Future. Job Installation Technician",Satellite Installation Technician Nashville\Lebanon\Brentwood\Murfreesboro\Madison TN Job in Nashville,,"Nashville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/Satellite-Installation-Technician-Nashville-Lebanon-Brentwood-Murfreesboro-Madison-TN-Job-Nashville-TN-US-165630695.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=3,,,e830136f44aa55e8186c4399b292fa31
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:11:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTIONHunter Family of Companies, a leader in Heavy Commercial Trucks since 1938, is actively seeking Heavy-Duty Diesel Technicians for our Wheeling, WV Branch located off of WV – Interstate 70.We are actively seeking talented, hardworking and dedicated Diesel Technicians to join our growing company.  Positions ranging from entry level to experienced technicians available.  Hunter offers a great competitive pay, shift differential, service incentive bonus and paid training!  Day, afternoon & evening shifts available.  Position Requirements: - Basic hand tools Nice to have: - High School or General Education Degree (GED) - College or Vocational technical school - State Inspection License and Commercial Driver License (CDL) - Medium and/or heavy duty truck service experience We offer paid training, a competitive pay plan, and an outstanding benefits package! Apply today to become part of the Hunter team!All positions are subject to a drug and background screening. ",Diesel Technician Job in Valley Grove,Full Time,"Valley Grove, WV 26060",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/Diesel-Technician-Job-Valley-Grove-WV-US-157899522.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=2,,,43dc2588f5866fbc37e2680af0e37746
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:05:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTIONFIRST PRESSMANPosition Summary:Directs the crew and performs manual and machine operator tasks related to the set-up, maintenance and operation of the press. Responsible for quantitative and qualitative press performance.Responsibilities:Make ready and operate pressLead, give directions to and monitor work of press crewRecord sheet counts and perform line clearanceExamines job order to determine quantity to be printed, stock specifications, colors, and specialprinting instructionsVerifies copy to customer approval or signed color standardExamines printing plate for visual defects and applies correcting solution to repair minor defects or informs manager of unrepairable platesHang plates and registerInstall correct thickness packing under blanket to meet manufacture specsMeasures paper thickness and adjusts press console so press will operateFills ink and dampening solution fountains and adjusts controls to regulate flow of ink and dampening solution to plate cylinderStarts press and examines printed copy for ink density, position on paper and registrationMakes adjustments to press throughout production run to maintain specific registration and color densityMakes adjustments to feeder and delivery mechanismRemove plates and clean all cylinders and bearersPerform preventative maintenance on press such as lubrication, cleaning and minor adjustments to rollersConforms with and abides by all regulations, policies, work procedures, security procedures and instructions. Follow all Standard Operation Procedures (SOP’s) pertaining to area of responsibilityPerforms all duties according to established safety policy, including wearing all required PPEWilling to work flexible hours as necessaryEnsures housekeeping rules are observed in departmentOther duties as assigned by the Press Room ManagerSkills & Abilities: Good computer skillsGood problem solving skillsAbility to follow written and verbal instructionsGood communication skillsAbility to work in team environmentAbility to work with little supervisionGood attendance recordGood mechanical aptitude and mathematical ability, including good understanding of measurementsIn depth knowledge of the mechanics and capabilities of pressAble to accurately distinguish color variationJOB REQUIREMENTSFIRST PRESSMANExperience:High School Diploma or GED, trade/vocational school preferredForklift certification required5-7 years Second Pressman experienceEquipment:Forklift, pallet jack, basic power and hand tools",First Pressman Job in Roanoke,Full Time,"Roanoke, VA 24019",,http://jobview.monster.com/First-Pressman-Job-Roanoke-VA-US-165992151.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=16,Comprehensive Benefits Package,Experienced (Non-Manager),8d389cd6a9f515cde4c436fb8bd5d8f4
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:01:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: Viox Services, a wholly owned subsidiary of EMCOR Group, Inc., offers a complete package of facilities services from grounds and preventative maintenance to construction services and integrated facility management. Job Title:  HVAC Technician Job Summary:Maintains, repairs, installs, inspects, and adjusts commercial and industrial HVAC systems, boiler systems, cooling tower, chillers. Also estimates, lay out, and schedules jobs as directed.     Essential Duties and Responsibilities:  Studies system blueprints, specifications, and performance data to determine configuration and purpose of system components such as compressors, motors, pumps, fans, switches, controls, ducts, or pipes.Inspects system to verify system compliance with plans and specifications and to detect malfunctions in system component parts.Open valves on equipment such as compressors, pumps, and condensers to prepare system for operation and starts equipment and auxiliary machinery.Starts systems, observes operation, read gauges and instruments, and adjusts mechanisms such as actuators, valves, control, and pumps to control system operation.Lubricate fans, motors, and control units.Performs preventative maintenance tasking on all HVAC equipment, including industrial chiller, cooling tower, and air compressors.Operates refrigerant recovery equipment, vacuum pumps, charging equipment and service gauges.Screws, bolts, rivets, welds, and brazes parts to assemble structural and functional components such as motors, controls, switches, gauges, wiring harnesses, valves, pumps, compressors, condensers, cores, and pipes.Installs wiring to connect components to electric power source.Dismantles malfunctioning systems and test components.Replaces or adjusts defective or worn parts to repair systems. Cuts, threads, gas welds, and connects pipe to functional components of HVAC systems.Troubleshoot electrical and mechanical heat and refrigeration systems.Installation of complete heat and air conditioning systems.   Qualifications:Associates degree or equivalent from two year college or technical school or 5 to 10 years related experience and/or training or equivalent combination of education and experience. 5-10 YearsValid driver’s license, Universal Recovery Certification, Refrigerant Transition and Recovery Certification, Universal – Type I, II, and IIIAbility to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals, health and safety rules, technical manuals and bulletins. Ability to write basic report and correspondence. Ability to listen carefully and speak effectively with trades people, subcontractors, and client contacts. We offer our employees a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package and are always looking for individuals with the talent and skills required to contribute to our continued growth and success.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled",HVAC Technician Job in  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Location:,Construction - Industrial Facilities and InfrastructureConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Technician-Job-US-165867774.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=12,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,d5b39662114a6c59efe8323d4e1ad0eb
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:00:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Production Associates are responsible for building our roof and floor trusses as well as our wall panel assemblies. Associates are trained in production, quality control, logistics and safety. Associates are encouraged to move up quickly to positions of more responsibility such as Crew Leader, Head Sawyer, Supervisor, Production Manager and more.La compania de 84 esta actualmente en la busqueda de individuos que tengan carrera en mente para crecer como lideres  en nuestra industria. Nosotros somos afiliados de 84 lumber, la mas privada e grande proveedor de materiales de construccion en el pais. La compania de 84 fabrica vigas para el suelo, techo de vigas y paneles de pared que se utilizan para la construccion de casas, condominios, apartamentos y edificios comerciales. Asociados en la produccion son responsables de la construccion de nuestra vigas del techo y el suelo, asi como nuestro panel de pared. Los Asociados son entrenados en produccion, calidad en control, logistica y seguridad. Se alienta a los asociados ascender rapidamente a puestos de mayor responsabilidad como Jefe de la tripulacion, Supervisor, Gerente de Produccion y mucho mas.Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions; short correspondence and memos; write simple correspondence; effectively present information to others one-on-oneAble to read and write their primary languageAble to stand or sit for long periods of timeAbility to lift up to 50 lbs. with or without reasonable accommodations. Capacidad para leer y comprender instrucciones simples, la correspondencia y notas breves; escribir la correspondencia; presentar informacion de manera eficaz a los demas uno a unoHigh School diploma or general education degree (GED); or 1 to 3 months related experience and/or training.Un diploma de escuela secundaria or de educacion general (GED); o 1 a 3 meses de experiencia o entrenamieto relacionado. ",Production Associate ( AR ) Job in Dunn,Full Time Employee,84 Lumber,,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Associate-2383-AR-002-Job-Dunn-NC-US-165789514.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=13,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,f382962a799a13717e2376f6ad9b59d4
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:00:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Schweinitz Enterprises We are seeking an experienced Industrial Electrical Crane Technician to join our growing team and fill an immediate need. Schweinitz Enterprises is the industry shaping global leader in industrial manufacturing and servicing overhead cranes and other hoists. We serve a broad range of customers, including manufacturing and process industries, shipyards, ports and industrial plants. A successful Industrial Electrical Crane Technician will have an electrical and mechanical background, and will have the ability to trouble-shoot 480 VAC 3 phase motor control systems among other duties. Industrial Manufacturing - Electrical Crane Technician  Job ResponsibilitiesAs an Industrial Electrical Crane Technician, you will be responsible for performing preventative maintenance up to and including complex repairs on electric overhead traveling cranes. The maintenance technician will also spend time consulting with customers on repair and safety related issues.Other responsibilities of the Industrial Electrical Crane Technician will include:•          Trouble-shooting equipment malfunctions •          Generating sales leads during service calls •          Completing all appropriate documentation •          Minimal overnight travel may be required to assist other branches and/or to attend training or other meetings  Industrial Manufacturing - Electrical Crane Technician   RequirementsAs an Industrial Electrical Crane Technician, you will be required to show a strong knowledge of AC/DC theory, as well as the ability to trouble-shoot 480VAC 3 phase motor control systems.Other requirements for the Industrial Electrical Crane Technician include:•          A minimum of 3 years’ experience in an industrial maintenance environment and/or equivalent military experience •          Aptitude for both electrical and mechanical environments as well as familiarity with mechanical and electrical equipment •          Willingness to work overtime and on-call rotation is required •          Possession of a valid driver’s license •          Strong communication skills •          Proven commitment to safety •          Comfort with working at heights  Industrial Manufacturing - Electrical Crane Technician  BenefitsAt Schweinitz Enterprises, we recognize and appreciate all of our team members’ hard work and dedication. Therefore, we are proud to offer our Electrical Crane Technician’s compensation package. Benefits available to the Electrical Crane Technician’s include: •          Base pay •          Great benefits •          Company vehicle •          Gas card •          Cell phone •          Extensive training  Industrial Manufacturing - Electrical Crane Technician  ",Industrial electrician Technician Job in Little Rock,Full Time,"Little Rock, AR",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Industrial-electrician-Technician-Job-Little-Rock-AR-US-164159639.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=16,21.00 - 24.00 $ /yearVehicle +Gas card+Cell+Benefits+Ot after 8 hours worked,Experienced (Non-Manager),8c0d3ac6235e18e80e0bf9e9b1fb66c6
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:00:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Building Maintenance/Handyman Principal DutiesRespond to tenant complaints and requests for service as directed by Maintenance supervisor.Monitor and operate the Building Management System (BMS).Replace ceiling tiles, light bulbs, light fixtures.Make minor repairs to include roof repairs, window leaks, doors, floors, wallpaper, woodwork, plaster, plumbing, electrical, drywall, etc.Coordinate vendor services in the absence of Maintenance supervisor Paint exteriors and interiors.Inspect buildings including all roofs, electrical, mechanical, and janitorial rooms to identify areas needing maintenance.Maintain the facility, i.e., clean parking lots/garages, outside landscaped areas and interior spaces. Use tools ranging from common hand and power tools, such as hammers, hoists, ladders, saws, drills, and wrenches, to precision measuring instruments and electrical and electronic testing devices.Use the company vehicle to visit other properties to complete work orders provided by maintenance supervisor.Drive Shuttle Bus, as needed.Requirements:Valid Driver’s LicenseAbility to obtain FDNY Certificate of Fitness (Various Certifications: Sprinkler, Fire Safety, EAP, etc.)Familiarity with computers and use of email5 Years of Building Maintenance Experience ",Building Maintenance Job in Bronx,Full Time,"Bronx, NY 10461",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Building-Maintenance-Job-Bronx-NY-US-164945621.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),190b8830993ca9207b98c82ca53e24f4
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:11:00:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY:General office and warehouse cleaning and utility worker.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:•Cleaning and upkeep of offices, bathrooms, warehouse and surrounding areas 60%•Washing company vehicles as needed 15%•Driving forklift 5%•Driving van / trucks 5%•Following instructions (verbal and written) 5%•Performing utility tasks off site 10%ACCOUNTABILITIES:All office and warehouse areas must be kept clean and presentable.  Vehicles must be washed in a timely manner.  All tasks must be completed in a timely and successful manner.QUALIFICATION STANDARDS:•Walks and stands during entire shift•Reading and writing skills required•Valid California drivers license•Ability to operate a fork lift safely•Ability to operate a motor vehicle /box truck safely•Ability to use cleaning chemicals and cleaning tools•Ability to lift up to 50 lbs. safely•Ability to pass a drug screen successfully•Ability to operate a cardboard baler•Ability to communicate and listen effectively•Interact verbally with coworkers and superiors",Utility Worker Job in Fresno,Full Time,"Fresno, CA 93721",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Utility-Worker-Job-Fresno-CA-US-164328123.aspx?mescoid=5100985001001&jobPosition=7,11.00 - 11.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,0e04a4bce919614a93d1822cdad6a28d
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:10:56:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: Viox Services, a wholly owned subsidiary of EMCOR Group, Inc., offers a complete package of facilities services from grounds and preventative maintenance to construction services and integrated facility management. Job Title:  Maintenance Technician Job Summary:   Support facility maintenance operations as part of a team. Assist in all activities and duties. Coordinate and complete preventive and reactive maintenance to include lighting, minor plumbing, painting, and other general maintenance activities as assigned by the Site Manager. Position will require rotating shift and weekend coverage. Essential Duties and Responsibilities:  • Executes all work in safe and professional manner by completing all work accurately and on time• Assists entire team in all activities and duties assigned• Assists with performing emergency service and repairs on electrical, mechanical and structural systems and equipment as necessary to satisfy service requests and to maintain the equipment as listed on the building equipment inventory in proper operating condition• Light electrical skills. Emergency lights, exit signs, lamp sweeps• Assists with performing a full range of maintenance tasks including estimating material requirements; placing and connecting electrical operating equipment, mechanical and structural systems and equipment• Performs general building maintenance i.e. lighting, plumbing, painting, carpentry, etc…• Assists with inspections and tours of the facilities, providing preventive maintenance services in accordance with a well-defined program; institutes corrective action on any deficiencies• Completes logs and performs other documentation necessary to the tasks performed• Performs minor carpentry, masonry, and metalworking repairs, installation and maintenance activities• Responds to requests for service adjustments and other trouble calls• Observes mechanical devices in operation and listens to their sounds to locate causes of trouble• Installs or assists in installing and/or replacing various types of equipment, structures and subassemblies including lubrication and cleaning• Maintain, organize, control, inventory supplies, tools and equipment • Responsible for accurate and timely paperwork related to essential duties and responsibilities• Perform other duties as needed Qualifications: High school graduate or G.E.D. is requiredOne to three year’s related experience and/or trainingValid driver’s licenseAbility to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence. Ability to speak effectively before groups of customers or employees of organization.• Must be able to adapt to rapidly changing situations • Possess the ability to work overtime on short notice• Must be self-motivated and have the ability to handle multiple jobs with minimal supervision• Experience with operations and maintenance for Corporate Commercial Space Industry is preferred. We offer our employees a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package and are always looking for individuals with the talent and skills required to contribute to our continued growth and success.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled",Maintenance Technician Job in Raleigh/Durham-Rtp,Full Time Employee,Location:,Business Services - OtherConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Raleigh-Durham-RTP-NC-US-165411108.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=18,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,cd81832b61552b063895b3e5327877f6
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:10:55:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking an Assistant Gameroom Technician to assist in managing the electrical and mechanical aspects of the gameroom area inclusive of the latest video games, skill games, kiddy rides, sky tubes, robotic shows, kitchen equipment, register systems, coin and ticket mechanisms. This role performs daily preventative maintenance and repair of any items that must be fixed. Minimum Qualifications:Be at least 18 years oldPossess a “fix it now” sense of urgency Willing to learn and grow with the company Have mechanical aptitude Technical skills, including rudimentary electronics knowledge is helpful Will take a technical assessment test AND of course, provides exceptional customer service To apply for this position please click the APPLY to send your resume. ",Assistant Electronic Gameroom Technician Job in Citrus Heights,Full Time,"Citrus Heights, CA 95610",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Electronic-Gameroom-Technician-Job-Citrus-Heights-CA-US-164997518.aspx?mescoid=1700213001001&jobPosition=10,,Entry Level,d271ac00cc9122d0763b1a75f3ce5b47
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:10:54:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"With Staff Management | SMX, you'll get a weekly paycheck, learn new skills, meet new people, and work with a great management team in a clean and safe environment. We are currently hiring Manufacturing and Distribution Associates. Associates will operate molding and assembly equipment in order to produce and/or assemble parts to meet the specification of the customer or the next process while always striving to meet Arkansas Faucet Operations goals in Safety, Quality, Delivery, and Cost.Manufacturing and Distribution Associates Job Responsibilities:1. Operate production machines as they run plastic production/components/toilet seats and assembly of parts. 2. Perform all duties associated with running plastic production and faucets assembly production.This includes the following items; remove parts from molding machine if required, inspect parts according to quality control instruction sheets.3. Use measuring devises and gauges, package parts according to packaging instructions, and assemble sub assemblies according to assembly instructions and standard operating procedures. 4. Verify skid quantities and part identification with material support associate before allowing any production to be removed from the area. Full & Part Time on All ShiftsManufacturing and Distribution Associates Requirements:Background Check Required & Drug Test RequiredAble to Lift 20 pounds & Must be at least 18 years oldMust have the ability to read and comprehend simple instructions and memos in English.Must have the ability to write simple correspondence. Must have the ability to add and subtract two-four digit numbers and to multiply and divide with 10''s and 100''s.Manufacturing and Distribution Associates Benefits:Paid TrainingMedical / DentalReferral BonusRecruiting LocationPlease bring 2 forms of ID with you. One should be a government-issued photo ID like a Driver's License, Military card or Passport Kohler - Sheridan, AR-7064 2686 Highway 270E Sheridan, AR 72150 (870) 917-6252LIKE us on Facebook: Staff Management/ SMXTweet us #SMXJOBSNOWEOE",Manufacturing / Distribution Associates Job in Sheridan,Full Time,"Sheridan, AR 72150",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Manufacturing-Distribution-Associates-Job-Sheridan-AR-US-165891644.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=12,,Entry Level,31d4f3ccb8d004198c45c22fa15d7c82
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:10:06:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Machining SupervisorMy client has an opening for a Machining Area Supervisor. We are a manufacturer of steel parts for major companies in aviation ground support, construction equipment, custom air handling and cooling equipment, mining, structural products, trucking, and waste water treatment..  This supervisor will be responsible for overseeing the fabrication, laser, and machining areas. Responsibilities will include scheduling of employees, handling employees concerns and performance issues, following company safety procedures, ensuring products meet quality standards, and meeting production schedules. Candidates should have previous experience with some of the following machinery: CNC lathes, mills, tube and flat lasers, manual drill presses, CNC brake presses, tube benders, milling machines, and cold saws. We have an opening on first and on second shift. Make sure equipment is utilized more effectively and run the machine shop like a business within a business  WHAT CANDIDATES SAY ABOUT THIS RECRUITER:I will say that it has been a pleasure working with Scott. He is easy to talk with. Gave me great interviewing tips. He knew the players that would be interviewing me. He did a great job and that’s why I am now relocating to Tennessee.Ronald Koski",Machining Supervisor Job in Overland Park,Full Time Employee,"Overland Park, KS",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Machining-Supervisor-Job-Overland-Park-KS-US-165954678.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=6,"70,000.00 - 95,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),aace4c64427a8ff02b76f4bb21964fce
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:10:06:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Manufacturing – Change Career to - Truck Driver – Entry Level,Full Time,"Dover, DE",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/Manufacturing-%E2%80%93-Change-Career-to-Truck-Driver-%E2%80%93-Entry-Level-No-Experience-Full-Time-w-Training-Job-Dover-DE-US-165910284.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=2,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,df9638aa213ac9fa50a75bbe6901aded
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:10:04:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tower Technician - ForemanWe are seeking an experienced tower crew foreman to lead a team of 3 to 4 in the construction and implementation of cell site upgrades, antenna replacements, cable installation, and all associated testing and documentation.The position will be based in the Northern California Market.Duties & Responsibilities will include, but are not limited to: Understand proper rigging techniques and rated capacities of gear that is utilized.Enforce safe work practices and 100% tie off when working on tower.Understand scope of work and bring any additional requests to the attention of the Project Manager.Work with Project Manager to determine labor and material requirements necessary to complete additional work.Produce high quality work with minimal punch list items. Work to correct issues promptly.Understand site documentation requirements and work to collect these items as the work is performed.Understand the process and concept of return loss and passive intermodulation (PIM) testing.  Familiarity with respective test equipment and assessment of test results.Responsible to maintain a safe work environment, by maintaining a well-organized, clean work site. Required Skills:Previous climbing experience and ComTrain certification (or equivalent) requiredAbility to climb heights up to and including 1000 feet; good physical condition and staminaFall Protection training certificationClimbing Safety and Rescue Training and CertificationOne (1) year of technical education or equivalent experienceMinimum two (2) years of experience required with basic mechanical and/or electrical skills and the willingness to be cross-trained in other areas of communicationsAbility to read and understand blueprints and follow installation instructions per the planGood communication, leadership and interpersonal skillsWorking knowledge of major cellular carriers’ procedures when on siteMust have a valid driver's license and a clean driving record to be insurable and able to operate a company vehicle.Applicants will be subjected to a criminal background check and drug screening, the results of which will be used to determine eligibility to hire.Organized with a strong attention to detailSelf-starter, team player, results orientedWorking Hours:Generally, Monday through Friday, with an occasional need for weekend work.  Position requires driving between worksites, availability for 24/7 response, and some possible travel outside of primary market for limited periods of time.",Tower Technician - Foreman Job in Livermore,Full Time,"Livermore, CA 94550",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Tower-Technician-Foreman-Job-Livermore-CA-US-163747688.aspx?mescoid=4701141002005&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cf11eda00d742bfb5cf6006bd5bd2156
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:09:48:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Facilities Manager is responsible for overall design, space planning, new space configuration, as well as additional space as acquired by the company. Responsible for optimal functioning of building systems including mechanical and fire/life safety as well as all building maintenance and maintenance related contracts and workload, security, and administrative services for all company properties, including remote manufacturing sites. Responsibilities: ·         Key partner in the design, planning, and utilization of space, of buildings occupied by Select Comfort. Long range planning to position the company well for future growth as it relates to space needs and considerations.·         Manages project planning, relocations and construction process for all departments, or new building(s).·         Develops program maintenance and ensure upkeep of all Select Comfort properties which will include cleaning services, routine maintenance, safety plans, and other required and assigned activities.·         Develops and lead the administrative services function to ensure conference rooms, copiers, safety and emergency preparedness, security, workplace planning, etc. are all functioning at peak effectiveness.·         Supervises security services for all of Select Comfort’s sites.·         Primary contact for all vendor and contractor relationships and work as they relate to building or administrative services. This will include providing work direction to vendors and contractors. Requirements: ·         8-10 years previous work experience in similar position·         Previous experience leading a facilities function·         Bachelor’s degree required·         Facilities management certification preferred·         Experience moving a large group of employees to another site·         Experience working with CAD plans in the design of new space, the re-configuration of existing space, or new construction·         Successful experience handling both small and large construction projects·         Effective at both the strategic level work and the execution details·         Experience successfully working with all levels of management·         Customer service rapport·         High sense of urgency, task oriented, ability to manage several high priorities at once·         Self-motivated, agile and ability to work in an autonomous environment·         Standard office environmentSome travel to other sites as needed",Facilities Manager Job in Minneapolis,,"Minneapolis, MN 55442",,http://jobview.monster.com/Facilities-Manager-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-164945536.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=5,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),dae3a015340510b2091d3ec405c153e0
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:09:47:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN (12PM-8PM SHIFT)We are seeking an experienced maintenance person for work with a Center City real estate development company.  Applicant MUST have a minimum of 2 years’ experience in residential or mixed-use apartment/condo buildings in the Center City area.  Required Experience:Residential electrical repair and maintenanceResidential plumbing repair and maintenanceResidential HVAC repair and maintenanceBasic painting and carpentryBasic roof repair and maintenanceFamiliarity with fire alarm systemsFamiliarity with keyless intercom access systemsIdeal Candidate will also possess: Ability to self-motivate and work independentlyProblem solving skillsPositive attitudeAbility to communicate with tenantsFamiliarity with building and fire codesIn addition to the experience and attributes listed above, applicants should be able to work as a team and independently.  Applicants should have relationships with contractors and be able to order and manage tools and inventory. Applicants must have reliable transportation and be available for a rotating on-call shift.  Salary(dependent on experience) is $16-$21/hour.Professional References Required",Maintenance Technician Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19102",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-163731583.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=11,16.00 - 21.00 $ /year,Experienced (Non-Manager),27e080c2cbd71dcdeea61b0dab980394
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:08:47:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Byers Ford is seeking an entry level Body Shop Estimator.  Job Purpose: Estimates automotive body repairs by ascertaining body damage; developing estimates; preparing work orders; contacting insurance company; maintaining customer rapport. Byers is family owned and operated and has been in business since 1897. We offer excellent employee benefits including health, vision, dental insurance and 401k. Please submit resume to Body Shop Manager Dick Hatfield at dhatfield@byersauto.com",Body Shop Estimator Job in Delaware,Full Time,"Delaware, OH 43015",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Body-Shop-Estimator-Job-Delaware-OH-US-165083301.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=1,,Entry Level,30ab8fd2c820af8978bef7150dad0b17
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:08:46:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Equity Lifestyle Properties, Inc. owns and operates the highest quality portfolio of resort communities in the United States.  We have a controlling interest in nearly 308 quality resorts in 28 states and British Columbia with over 119,000 sites.We believe our company wide strengths combined with the increasing popularity of the lifestyle found in our communities ensure our growth and continued success in the future.  Our goal is to create value for residents and investors by providing consistently high levels of services and amenities in attractive surroundings.  Our high standards have been recognized with several ‘Community of the Year’ awards for the outstanding quality of our communities and the professionalism of our management. JOB SUMMARY We are looking for a Maintenance Supervisor in La Conner, WA. This position performs various maintenance duties requiring technical labor skills, including but not limited to, HVAC repairs and adjustments, electrical installations, plumbing, light carpentry/construction, dry walling, and appliance repair.  Works as a team participant along with maintenance staff to ensure the community meets the quality maintenance standards set by the Company.ESSENTIAL JOB DUTIES •    Diagnoses and troubleshoots mechanical and structural problems of clubhouses, facilities and amenities etc. Reports any maintenance concerns for repairs to Resort Manager.•    Performs on-call emergency service as required.•    Assists Resort Manager with special maintenance projects as necessary.•    Assists in maintaining grounds and common areas and keeping them free from trash and debris.•    May assist in monitoring and/or controlling maintenance inventory and/or supplies.•    Moves heavy objects as requested.•    Works closely with management and maintenance staff in developing an integral team that effectively represents the quality and professionalism of the company.•    Maintains open communication with Resort Manager and Staff.•    Represents Company in a professional manner at all times.•    Coordinates and Manages third party contractors.•    Oversees Maintenance, Housekeeping, and Landscaping staff.OTHER JOB FUNCTIONS:1.Attends and participates in training programs as requested.2.Assists other staff members as needed.3.Drives motorized vehicle on or off property for company business.4.Performs other duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTSA high school diploma or equivalent is required. Eighteen months of trade school (or equivalent) with 3 -5 years hands-on technical work experience in areas such as plumbing, electrical, Carpentry, HVAC, etc. required. Must be able to lift up to 50 lbs and work with heavy equipment daily.  Valid driver’s license and good driving record along with auto insurance required.We thank all applicants. Only those selected for an interview will be contacted. No relocation funds are available.                                                                         EOE ",Maintenance Supervisor Job in La Conner,Full Time,"La Conner, WA 98257",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Supervisor-Job-La-Conner-WA-US-165772493.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=17,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),0ff83dc3cde91d5baf1861868cff5d84
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:08:31:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:A busy Heavy Truck Repair facility is seeking experienced Journeyman Level Mechanics with 8 plus years experience with class 3 through 8 trucks. The individual must also have ASE or equivalent certifications with strong capabilities in diesel engines, air and hydraulic brake systems, electrical, power train, and ECM diagnostics. Other knowledge in performing BIT and DOT inspections, cab-air conditioning, welding, forklifts, and CNG systems would be a plus. Must have a clean driving record and be able to pass an extensive background check. The company provides programs for further training in the various areas of automotive truck repair, including alternative fuel systems, diesel repair, air brakes, Transport Refrigeration, and other new technologies. Required: CDL CertifiedCompensation:$25.00 - $31.00/hour. Starting wage will reflect experience level. This also includes medical, dental and vision coverage, 401K plan, paid vacations, holidays, and personal days.Shifts:Two Shifts Available: Days or Swing, Monday - Friday.We encourage all who are qualified and interested to apply in confidence, however, only those in consideration will be contacted for this role.  ",Diesel Truck Technician - Shop & Field Job in Carson,Full Time Employee,"Carson, CA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Diesel-Truck-Technician-Shop-Field-Job-Carson-CA-US-165773019.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=14,,,afdbb38129f3e9275eba30acfaa9021b
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:08:30:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintenance Technician Job Summary:  The Maintenance Technician will be responsible for the overall maintenance of the production facility including:  troubleshooting, repair and maintenance.  This position will also be instrumental in the set-up of the facility.  The ideal candidate must be able to understand electrical troubleshooting as well as mechanical.Responsibilities:Provide direct technical support to production.Take responsibility of preventive maintenance work for ensuring reliability of equipment operation.Conduct general inspections.Troubleshoot and repair plant equipment.Make decisions with regard to diagnosing, repairing and adjusting operating parameters of equipment.Ensure that the facility, equipment and work environment are maintained in compliance with the company’s standards as well as health and safety regulations.RequirementsAssociate’s degree or postsecondary certificate in electromechanical systemsExcellent comprehension of mechanical, electronic, pneumatic and hydraulic systems including automated systems and drive & control motor knowledgeWelding skills Machining skills  SkillsAnalytical and problem solving skills Team orientated Time and priority management skillsResourceful and autonomousProactive approach in troubleshooting ",Maintenance Technician Job in Schertz,Full Time,"Schertz, TX 78154",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Schertz-TX-US-165089820.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=5,18.00 - 22.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),bf664c97babcd4e8da56248fc36d294b
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:08:18:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking ambitious and personable candidates to serve as Termite Control Technicians. You will make service calls to residential customers and apply anti-termite treatments as outlined in job orders. This will often require that you enter crawl spaces, attics, and other confined spaces to ensure complete coverage. This is a fantastic opportunity for you to start a career right out of high school with comprehensive paid training and plenty of room for advancement. We’ll even help you to get your licensure / certification! Come and see why so many of our employees have made Terminix their career home. We’re looking forward to hearing from you! This position is within our Terminix brand. ServiceMaster is a leading provider of essential residential and commercial services, operating through an extensive service network of more than 8,000 company-owned locations and franchise and license agreements. The company’s portfolio of well-recognized brands includes American Home Shield (home warranties), AmeriSpec (home inspections), Furniture Medic (furniture repair), Merry Maids (residential cleaning), ServiceMaster Clean (janitorial), ServiceMaster Restore (disaster restoration) and Terminix (termite and pest control). The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tenn. Go to www.servicemaster.com for more information about ServiceMaster or follow the company at twitter.com/ServiceMaster or Facebook.com/ServiceMaster. Applies company products to residential structures according to work orders and as needed based on service requests; completes required production forms at end of daily work order assignments. Responsibilities • Prepares job sites for termiticide treatment. • Applies termiticides to residential structures according to work order specifications, safety procedures, and label instructions. • Verifies that job specifications are appropriate for work orders. • Drives company vehicle to customers’ houses or places of business. • Maintains vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. • Completes required production forms at end of daily work order assignments. Education and Experience Requirements • High school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. • Ability to write simple correspondence. • Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals. • Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. • Maintain licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. • Maintain valid driver’s license. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Termite Control Technician – Field Service Rep (Entry Level) Job in Fort Myers,"Full Time, Employee","Fort Myers, FL",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Termite-Control-Technician-%E2%80%93-Field-Service-Rep-Entry-Level-Job-Fort-Myers-FL-US-165236911.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=6,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,3b9dd422b61dab378e69ea21f61e2757
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:07:50:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"MACHINE BUILDER MECHANIC/Machine TechnicianMechanical ability.Able to read mechanical drawings and/or have an understanding of them.Able to work on multiple types of equipment.Electrical ability, understanding of schematics diagrams, drawings.Welding experience certification, a plus.Experience in rotating equipment a plus.PLC knowledge and repair ability. SUMMARY of the Candidate We Seek:The Candidate We Seek. Ideally will be coming out of a machine building/or maintenance, repair type environment in a manufacturing oriented facility.You have good welding skills, you have better than average electrical ability and very strong machinery mechanical skills. You will be needed to break down different types of rotating machinery, equipment able to read drawings and schematics having the ability to troubleshoot and diagnose problems.We also need someone who can put machinery back together after the correct components have been replaced and on occasion test the machinery and debug any problems that might arise. The type of environment you be working in:If you have at least prior 5 to 7 years’ experience recently working as a machine builder or diversified manufacturing type of maintenance mechanic with electromechanical capabilities and are looking for an excellent career path with a growing machine manufacturing company who sells, distributes, and services various types of mixing, rotating and agitating types of equipment throughout the United States and Canada and Europe.We are looking for a career minded person with the above background and experience who has the opportunity to work hands-on repairing and troubleshooting and rebuilding equipment in-house with a steady, stable company offering excellent opportunity for advancement and the possibility of some advancement capabilities into other company areas in the future. If you demonstrate the type of skills, personality and work ethic. We are looking for.The ideal candidates live within a 15 to 20-mile radius of the Butler New Jersey area. Please respond to our monster site ASAP if you feel you are qualified for this position. If you do not have email capability, please fax your resume in to the below fax number or if you wish to leave a message on a 24/7 direct hotline a response will be returned to you within 24 hours. Thank you very much Fax Number (201) 336-9174 24/7 Hotline (201) 896-0426CallSend SMSCall from mobileAdd to SkypeYou'll need Skype CreditFree via Skype",Machine Builder-WELDER Job in Franklin Lakes,Full Time,"Franklin Lakes, NJ",,http://jobview.monster.com/Machine-Builder-WELDER-Job-FRANKLIN-LAKES-NJ-US-164801848.aspx?mescoid=5100914001001&jobPosition=18,"52,000.00 - 62,000.00 $ /yearBenefits, Vacation, Holidays, Medical",Experienced (Non-Manager),b8e2ad77bbe954c6dd5314e22ad1d82e
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:07:49:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Reports to Operations Manager; Basic knowledge of maintenance and repair; Make minor repairs and updates to equipment, stands and portables for Concessions, Retail and Premium departments; picks up and delivers supplies, product and equipment to and from Citizens Bank Park, Aramark’s off site warehouse and vendor locations; Set up and break down of special events at Citizens Bank Park and other Aramark locations in Philadelphia; Maintains a professional appearance Maintain a safe work environment by enforcing all safety standards and assisting with STEP observations Additional Job Functions: Cross-trains for all hourly positions at your location Works in other areas or departments as required by your manager Performs task as requested by your manager on a weekly, bi-weekly, or monthly basis Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team.   Qualifications Required Qualifications:   Great customer service and communication skills Must have Valid Driver’s license Strong leadership skills Time management, organization, and multi-tasking skills Ability to work successfully in a team environment promote team work Ability to use confidential information in an appropriate manner and protect employee privacy Ability to manage people and have accountability for company assets Ability to work in a fast-paced environment and effectively use problem solving and decision making skills Basic computer skills and ability to quickly learn new technology systems Previous supervisory experience or experience in the food service industry Desired Qualifications: 1 year of supervisory experience High school education or equivalent Interest in self development and desire to learn   Additional Information:",Maintenance Supervisor - Citizens Bank Park Job in Philadelphia,"Part Time, Employee","Philadelphia, PA 19148",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Supervisor-Citizens-Bank-Park-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165764289.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=10,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,b2041e9a3e5fc33be10beff87d55338d
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:07:37:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Machinist, Level I, SeniorPerform all manual and CNC machining on Process/Laboratory mixer components and fixtures. Proficient in programming 3-9 Axis in Virtual Gibbs, Mastercam or other similar software package. Proficient at reading and interpreting mechanical drawings in English and metric standards, metric being the standard. Associates degree in Machining Technology or trade school equivalent certification, or combination of education & experience. Seven year minimum hands on exper. in the setup,operation and programming of man ual and CNC lathes,mills and machining centers. Submit resume and cover letter to hr@ika.net .",Machinist Job in Wilmington,Full Time,"Wilmington, NC 28403",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Machinist-Job-Wilmington-NC-US-165325205.aspx?ch=newswtnc&mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=14,,,1ce7671c4690ec0e838e9fe962335bf9
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:07:36:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Classification:Non-ExemptRevised:05/14/2014Job Summary:The Soil Counter/Sorter handles, counts, sorts and records incoming soiled textiles from the customer. Identifies damaged or abused textiles. Prepares and transfers textiles to other departments. Performs other tasks as needed.Essential Functions:- Open bag of soiled textiles, then sort them by type, size and color.- Count textiles manually or electronically, and transfer them into sorting systems.- Identify damaged or abused textiles and record into sorting systems.- Meet efficiency and safety standards for the position.- Follow instructions as directed by supervision.Additional Functions:- Work in other production positions as needed.Requirements: Qualifications:- Recognize colors and sizes, count accurately.- Comprehend and follow direction.Typical Physical Activity:- Physical Demands consist of standing, walking, reaching overhead, pushing, pulling, grasping, lifting up to 50 lbs. and stooping.- Physical Requirements consist of being able to meet the physical demands for the entire shift.Typical Environmental Conditions:- Production areas of a typical industrial laundry facility, which includes variations in temperature, odors, humidity, lint and dust. Soiled linens come from a variety of customers such as restaurants, hotels, medical facilities and shops.Travel Requirements:- none.Education:- none.Apply Now !",Counter-Sorter Job in Kent,Employee,"Kent, WA 98032",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Counter-Sorter-Job-Kent-WA-US-166073454.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=6,10.66 - 12.54 /hour,Entry Level,3f0a97eee786addb5680e439984e8f81
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:07:14:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Associate is responsible for building loads for deliveries. In addition, must maintain a safe, clean and well organized lumber yard, load and unload lumber and/or building supplies, and operate a forklift. Other duties as assigned.Essential Functions:Build loads for deliveryLoad and unload lumber and building suppliesOperates forkliftKeeps management aware of any delays or discrepanciesKeeps lumber yard clean, well organized and safeEsta posicion es responsable de mantener un ambiente seguro, limpio y bien organizado con la madera, de carga y descarga de madera y / o materiales|de construccion, entrega de cargas de construccion, y operacion de un montacargas. Debe ser capaz de levantar los materiales de construccion a lo largo del dia. Otras tareas que le asigne.Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence and memos; write simple correspondence; effectively present information to others one-on-one.Ability to apply common sense understanding and carry out simple one or two-step instructions Capacidad para leer y comprender instrucciones simples, la correspondencia y notas breves; escribir la correspondencia; presentar informacion de manera eficaz a los demas uno a uno.High school diploma or equivalent; or 1 to 3 months related experience or training.Previous experience working in a lumber yard or similar.Forklift operation experience strongly preferred. Un diploma de escuela secundaria or de educacion general (GED); o 1 a 3 meses de experiencia o entrenamieto relacionado. Tiene la capacidad de usar el sentido comun y puede ejercer simple instrucciones de uno a dos pasos; manejar situaciones regulares con minimo o sin ninguna dificultad.",Yard Associate (Benefits) ( G ) Job in Plant City,Full Time Employee,84 Lumber,,http://jobview.monster.com/Yard-Associate-Benefits-1329-7G-002-Job-Plant-City-FL-US-165334792.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=16,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,21da30bf2e27ceb11463109472f9d3f8
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:06:57:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Lab Calibration Technician Pioneering technology, exceptional service, acknowledged professionalism - that is what makes ENV Services a nationally respected leader in calibration, certification and decontamination services for the health care, pharmaceutical and biotechnology industries.  Position will support service operations by providing Calibration services to our client in the West Chester area. The position involves calibrating and repairing various testing and measurement devices. We calibrate temperature, pressure, pipettes, weight, etc.  Candidates will have calibration experience and have a sound mechanical and electrical aptitude and a strong customer service focus.  Successful candidates will have 3-5 years of experience. Must have operational knowledge of an oscilloscope & multi-meter, soldering wires & connectors, operation of various crimping tools, wire stripping and ohm's law. Trouble-shooting skills and the ability to logically solve instrumentation problems and determine corrective action. Working knowledge of measurement techniques for temperature, pressure, flow, displacement, thermocouples and dimensional gage calibration are also highly desired.   Calibration experience in the pharmaceutical and biomedical fields are highly desired along with PMEL or GCAMS experience. Post-secondary education is preferred. ENV offers a competitive salary and full benefits package, in addition to growth potential.        ENV Services, Inc. is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.  We are dedicated to the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Must be able to identify the required data and test parameters and set up equipment to conform to those specifications.  Excellent communication (oral and written) and attention to detail.  Ability to work independently and as part of a team, self-motivated, adaptable and have a positive attitude.  Strong computer, scientific and organizational skills  Pre-employment Physical  Drug and Alcohol Screen",Calibration Technician Job in West Chester,Full Time,"West Chester, PA 19380",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Calibration-Technician-Job-West-Chester-PA-US-165716870.aspx?mescoid=1700213001001&jobPosition=12,,,7358fe09e0f93190aed83a78720f3acf
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:06:56:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"South Bay Landscape Company is currently seeking a qualified Special Projects Estimator/Project Manager to join our team. This position requires an understanding of the complete bidding process of landscape installation and renovation of projects along with the knowledge of office procedures to implement the estimating process.Responsibilities/ Daily DutiesMin 2 year experience in construction or landscape industry performing estimating duties (below) or equivalent education.Bachelor's degree preferred.Knowledge of Sage / Timberline software.Experience in landscape installation or renovation of landscaping.Experience in overseeing special projects, enhancement projects.Knowledge of landscape material, trees, plants, DG, etc.Must hold a valid California driver’s license and clean MVR.Must have excellent organization skills, planning and scheduling of time.Proficient with computer software programs including MS Office suite (Word, Excel and Outlook); is preferred.Possess a basic understanding of construction accounting including budgeted versus actual costs.Strong work ethic.Effective oral and written communication skills.Ability to prioritize and multi-task in a fast-paced environment.Customer service experience.Job is 60% estimating, 40% project managing.Work Environment:This position works principally indoors, but may on occasion work outdoors. A certain amount of strength, dexterity,and alertness is necessary due to proximity to equipment, tools and other trades.Candidates should be knowledgeable of the hazards and safety requirements of construction job sites.Our Landscape Company maintains a policy of equal employment opportunity for all employees without regard to gender, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, or any other classification protected by law.Eligibility Requirements:Interested candidates must submit a resume/online to be considered.What We Offer:Competitive salaryReasonably Priced Medical and dentalEnergetic, focused and collaborative work environmentPaid vacation and paid holidaysDesired Characteristics:Bilingual, a plus",Landscaping Estimator / Project Manager Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA 95126",Architectural and Design Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Landscaping-Estimator-Project-Manager-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-165263674.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=17,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),7c36dbec44161c27be5b7b3446d0ab64
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:06:32:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Shop ForemanThe Shop Foreman is responsible for the efficient use of shop space and equipment, and for coordinating the work load of the service department. In conformance with customer orders and requirements, advises and makes recommendations to the customer and makes decisions with respect to the best interest of the service department. The Shop Foreman will be representing General Equipment to Employees, Customers, Manufacturers, and others by following General Equipment's values of Integrity, Attitude, Honesty, Team Work, and Valuing Customers.REPORTING RELATIONSHIPS:The Shop Foreman will report directly to the Shakopee Service Manager. Direct reports are the assigned field and shop technicians of the Shakopee branch.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:Mentor shop technicians in and provide the technical assistance necessary to develop diagnostic, safe, clean, efficient and effective high quality workManage and review each work order for accuracy before closingWork with the Service Manager on scheduling the work on the fabrication sideMaintain shop supply and shop toolingComplete a final inspection on all completed jobsWork with the other Shop Foremen on customer calls and scheduling and controlling the labor required toPerform or direct walk around inspections of components/equipment for repair/remanufacturing needsWork with technicians and parts department on purchase of parts and outside materials neededHelp with field work orders when service clerk is not availableAssist shop technicians in repair circumstances and provide the technical assistance necessary to develop diagnostic, safe, clean, efficient and effective high quality workReview each work order for accuracy before closing (labor posting, sublet repairs, internal & external parts,etc.)Work to minimize unapplied time, update the duty board daily and maintain technician work loadsEnsure that all shop tools and equipment required to perform repairs are kept in good and safe operating conditions and make recommendations to the Service Manager for new tooling purchasesEnsure that equipment service manuals are properly maintained and currentMaintain a clean and safe shop environment and replenish shop supplies as needed. Also work with shop supplies vendors for the entire service department ensuring the best interests of the company are represented in the areas of price, service, and quality with our outside vendorsAssist in all aspects of operating the service department and perform other duties as assigned by the Service ManagerREQUIRED SKILLS:Strong welding and fabrication knowledgeMATHEMATICAL SKILLS: Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals. Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to read and interpret metal rule.Solid shop floor management knowledgeSupervisory experience preferredStrong working knowledge of Word, Excel, Access, Power Point, MS Outlook, and Distributor Operating systemsADDITIONAL JOB REQUIREMENTS:Must have a positive mental attitudeMaintain excellent communications skills, both oral and writtenMaintain excellent customer relations and strong organizational skillsMaintain high employee moraleAttain short- and long-term objectives through good management and planningShould be personable, highly motivated, a problem solver, ethical, and able to adapt to all forces around them, customers, suppliers, coworkers, and manufacturersWorks in an efficient and effective mannerContribution to departmental and product line goalsNATURE AND SCOPE OF JOB:Requires prolonged standing with periodic sitting, walking, lifting, bending, stooping, and stretchingRequires the ability to lift 50 lbs.Requires a valid driver's license and the ability to maintain an insurable driving recordThe duties described above are the general nature and levels of work performed, but are not intended to be a complete comprehensive list of all the duties, activities, and responsibilities required of job incumbents. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.If you’re ready to work hard in a fast-paced environment, have fun, and get paid what you’re worth, Apply Today! View our full job description and benefits package at genequip.com/careers. Apply online or by e-mail:recruiting@genequip.com",Shop Foreman Job in Shakopee,Full Time,"Shakopee, MN 55379",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Shop-Foreman-Job-Shakopee-MN-US-165534462.aspx?ch=twincities&mescoid=4701141002005&jobPosition=12,,,f86deeb073b1e0793413ba3115b35091
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:05:49:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position is with Newport News Shipbuilding, a division of Huntington Ingalls Industries, located in Newport News, VA. Supervises employees or outside contractors who construct, maintain, and repair utilities systems, buildings, and equipment via one or more of the following trades: electrical, plumbing, carpentry, air-conditioning, heating, painting, and/or general maintenance. Sets priorities and performs forecasting and allocates the resources needed to complete all preventive and corrective maintenance tasks. This position is responsible for the planning, execution, documentation, preventative, predictive, repair operation and maintenance of High Voltage Power Distribution System, Facilities Electrical Construction Section, Emergency Electrical Distribution and Pump Operations. This candidtate ensures electric utility service to Yardwide customers is safe, reliable, and within specifications as needed to support production and plant operations. This candidate supervises the efforts of maintenance supervisors and/or outside contractors. Candidate shall ensure that all employees are qualified to perform their assigned job functions. Identify and schedule required training for their employees. Candidate shall have the technical knowledge to support the direct reports in troubleshooting system problems, provide resolutions for system problems/configuration changes, and provide input to support the development of technical documentation that governs the safe operation and repair of the electrical systems. Areas of responsibility include and are not limited to: • Emergency diesel generator and pump program • Automatic transfer switch program management • High voltage relay calibration/maintenance program • Data Center UPS Systems • Secondary breaker maintenance/calibration administration • Electrical construction work cost and schedule estimating • Electrical Code compliance inspection • PowerLogic maintenance and administration • Transformer oil analysis program • System labeling and configuration management • SPCC Transformer Inspection Program • Radiological Facilities - distribution system maintenance • High and low voltage substation and switchgear maintenance • Dry Dock de-watering switchgear and pump motor maintenance • Yard wide high-voltage starter maintenance (yard wide air compressor and draft fans) • Yard wide outdoor lighting • Duties also include succession planning including training, development and coaching of all team members • Responsible for ensuring all employees are qualified to perform their assigned job functions by identifying and scheduling required training for their employees • Responsible for the adherence and administration of all NNS Policies and Procedures • Responsible for ensuring that all facilities and systems are operated in a safe and efficient manner • Responsible for building strong customer relationshipsBasic Qualifications:This position requires an NNS Apprentice graduate, Bachelors Degree or equivalent and 6 years of applicable technical experience. A candidate must have a thorough understanding of construction, manufacturing processes, and operations.Preferred Qualifications: * It is highly preferred that a candidate have strong leadership and management skills and the ability to interface with management, regulatory agencies, engineering, and trades. *A candidate should possess the ability to think strategically, act tactically, delegate appropriately, work well with others, possess strong interpersonal and communication skills, and promote a safe work environment. *A candidate should possess comprehensive knowledge of electrical power distribution systems, with a strong understanding of system operation and casualty control practices. (Specific configuration and operational knowledge of Newport News Shipbuilding High Voltage System is a plus) *A candidate should possess comprehensive knowledge of electrical maintenance and planning experience which includes detailed high voltage system maintenance practices (cable testing, cable splicing, breaker testing etc.) *It is preferred that a candidate have a strong knowledge of National Electric Code, NFPA 70E, and 29 CFR 1910.269. (A master’s electrician license a plus) *It is also preferred that a candidate have experience in 1. Life Cycle Asset Management practices, 2. High voltage electrical protective relays (Cutler Hammer (Digitrip) and Schneider Electric (Sepam) or similar), and 3. Expertise in configuration and use of Scada Monitoring systems (Schneider Electric “Powerlogic” system or similar).",Facilities Maintenance Manager Job in Newport News,Full Time,"Newport News, VA 23606","Newport News Shipbuilding, a division of Huntington Ingalls Industries",http://jobview.monster.com/Facilities-Maintenance-Manager-Job-Newport-News-VA-US-165085191.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=20,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),5d646c7cbaf7924a91eb8d12bebad4a6
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:05:48:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"NOW HIRING Automotive Technicians. Hourly & flat rate positions available. General Motors and ASE certifications would be nice, but are not necessary or required. Full time positions available with benefits. Call or stop in for details. Barker Chevrolet 1887 PJ Keller HWY Lexington, IL 61753 309-365-2161",Automotive Technicians Job in Lexington,Full Time,"Lexington, IL 61753",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Automotive-Technicians-Job-Lexington-IL-US-165032551.aspx?ch=bloomington&mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=12,,,578ac0495bf3323855a4a73a770ce323
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:04:57:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:   Maintains friendly, efficient, positive customer service attitude toward customers, clients and co-workers.  Is responsive to customer needs. Maintain all assigned ancillary areas and department areas in a clean neat and sanitary manner. Maintains all assigned ancillary areas, department areas, and corridors with the correct preventative maintenance procedures as outlined in department policy as requested. Assists in enhancing productivity and efficient operations of the department. Promotes effective interpersonal and interdisciplinary relationships, maintaining professional conduct at all times. Demonstrates commitment to professional growth and competence by adherence to component and departmental annual training commitments. Inspects and utilizes judgment in determining which cleaning techniques outlined in orientation guidelines to follow. Demonstrated efficient and safe use of housekeeping equipment and solutions as observed by supervisor. May disinfect and sterilize equipment and supplies, using germicides and sterilizing equipment. Maintains a clean and orderly environment in the assigned area to protect safety and health of others. Diligently employs universal precautions when disposing of trash and bio-hazardous materials. Thoroughly mops and vacuums floors in accordance with established guidelines. Keeps cart properly stocked with equipment and cleaning supplies; ensures all chemicals are properly labeled, and all equipment is in good working condition. Performs other tasks, as needed, to maintain the assigned area in a clean and orderly fashion. Keeps utility and storage rooms in clean and orderly condition. Cleans rooms, hallways, lobbies, lounges, rest rooms, corridors, elevators, stairways, and other areas. Performs all other related duties.   Qualifications Ability to communicate effectively with clients, senior management, and Aramark support staff. Ability to respond effectively to changing demands.   *Day shift, rotating weekends and holidays Additional Information:Position Start Date: 2016-04-04",Custodian Service Worker-Winchester Medical Center-EVS Job in Winchester,"Full Time, Employee","Winchester, VA 22601",,http://jobview.monster.com/Custodian-Service-Worker-Winchester-Medical-Center-EVS-Job-Winchester-VA-US-165077095.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=16,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,264c08e27b66a4ec1ef08ff93d16db63
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:00:59:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Campus Dining and Shops at the University at Buffalo is NOW HIRING Full Time Cashiers at its North Campus (Amherst) Location!  No experience needed!  Apply today at ubdiningjobs.com$10.15/hr. Benefits included plus yearly increases based on union contract                                        Present Schedules Available:        OPTION #1:  Mondays 10:45am-6:45pm, Tuesdays 10:45am-6:45pm, Wednesdays 10:45am-6:45pm, Thursdays 10:45am-6:45pm, Fridays 10:45am-6:45pmOPTION #2:Monday through Friday LATE NIGHT SHIFTS 645pm-245am OPTION #3:OVERNIGHT AND LATE NIGHT SHIFTS Saturdays 9pm-5am, Tuesdays through Fridays 7pm-3amOPEN POSITION #4:Sun, Tues, Wed, Thu   Sundays Tuesdays Wednesdays Thursdays Fridays 1:30pm - 9:30pm(Note that stated hours and days may vary)                          PRESENT JOB REQUIREMENTS:Minimum one-year verifiable cashier and money handling experience required. Previous experience with computer based point of sale cash register system and food preparation experience preferred. Barista experience required. Experience making specialty coffee drinks using espresso machines required.  Must be able to read, write, and speak English, and have excellent customer service skills. Must be able to work quickly and efficiently in a high-volume operation.  Professional appearance, demeanor, and hygiene required. Ability to lift in excess of 30 pounds and be able to stand and walk for 8 hours per day, and bend, and reach, as the job requires. Regular attendance and reliable transportation is required.  Must attend a food safety class. PRESENT JOB ASSIGNMENTS (Please note that these assignments are subject to change): Accurate cash handling, food preparation, and serving customers in a friendly & courteous manner.  Station set up, breakdown, restocking, and occasionally putting orders away.  Keep a neat, clean, and sanitized work area.  Must work consistently and productively during entire shift.  General cleaning and other food service duties as requested by management.                      All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to an individual’s age, race, creed, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, military status, sex, disability, predisposing genetic characteristics, familial status, or domestic violence victim status.   Report",Monster,,"Campus Dining and Shops at the University at Buffalo is NOW HIRING Full Time Cashiers at its North Campus (Amherst) Location!  No experience needed!  Apply today at ubdiningjobs.com$10.15/hr. Benefits included plus yearly increases based on union contract                                        Present Schedules Available:        OPTION #1:  Mondays 10:45am-6:45pm, Tuesdays 10:45am-6:45pm, Wednesdays 10:45am-6:45pm, Thursdays 10:45am-6:45pm, Fridays 10:45am-6:45pmOPTION #2:Monday through Friday LATE NIGHT SHIFTS 645pm-245am OPTION #3:OVERNIGHT AND LATE NIGHT SHIFTS Saturdays 9pm-5am, Tuesdays through Fridays 7pm-3amOPEN POSITION #4:Sun, Tues, Wed, Thu   Sundays Tuesdays Wednesdays Thursdays Fridays 1:30pm - 9:30pm(Note that stated hours and days may vary)                          PRESENT JOB REQUIREMENTS:Minimum one-year verifiable cashier and money handling experience required. Previous experience with computer based point of sale cash register system and food preparation experience preferred. Barista experience required. Experience making specialty coffee drinks using espresso machines required.  Must be able to read, write, and speak English, and have excellent customer service skills. Must be able to work quickly and efficiently in a high-volume operation.  Professional appearance, demeanor, and hygiene required. Ability to lift in excess of 30 pounds and be able to stand and walk for 8 hours per day, and bend, and reach, as the job requires. Regular attendance and reliable transportation is required.  Must attend a food safety class. PRESENT JOB ASSIGNMENTS (Please note that these assignments are subject to change): Accurate cash handling, food preparation, and serving customers in a friendly & courteous manner.  Station set up, breakdown, restocking, and occasionally putting orders away.  Keep a neat, clean, and sanitized work area.  Must work consistently and productively during entire shift.  General cleaning and other food service duties as requested by management.                      All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to an individual’s age, race, creed, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, military status, sex, disability, predisposing genetic characteristics, familial status, or domestic violence victim status.  ",,http://jobview.monster.com/cashiers-job-amherst-ny-us-169697872.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=10,,,caa68ee73abd447558f792c26ae7739f
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:00:37:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"The AWS Solutions Architect will provide support to the Engineering Operations and application development groups. This technical areas include: Operating systems ( Linux and Windows ), Virtualization (VMware and RHEV / KVM), OpenStack and Amazon Web Services and Systems hardware.In addition to operations, this technical leadership role will be involved in evaluation, recommendation, design, implementation, and ongoing support of the computer infrastructure services and to ensure high availability, redundancy, recoverability, and capacity. The position will also work closely with the other groups in the Infrastructure Engineering area: networking, data center, storage, security and architecture. Tasks may include using AWS to deploy and scale the new Big Data services and to process AWS metering records. Manages the launch and continued operation of the services including the onboarding of AWS service teams, establishing key operations and business metrics, and maintaining service SLAs. This role will assists Enterprise Architecture (EA) management in the EA Governance process and for the integration of EA with the enterprise mission, strategic planning, capital planning, and business and acquisition processes AT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/VA Bachelor’s degree in System Engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering Science, Engineering Management, or related discipline from an accredited college or university is required. Three years experience in programs and contracts of similar scope, type and complexity within the Federal Government is required. Broad experience with the AWS cloud computing solutions and utility computing web services (e.g., Amazon DynamoDB, Amazon S3, Amazon EC2, and Amazon CloudFront). Ability to work with architectural views for an enterprise in accordance with the common architecture frameworks (e.g. DoDAF and FEAF). Experience with ‘system of systems’ architecture development, partitioning of functionality among applications and components, and application interfaces/interoperability concerns. Experience in software development methodologies and structured approaches to system development. Awareness of systems management and operational support tools. Security and/or infrastructure experience would also be a significant benefit. The candidate must be willing to work on customer site in Northern Virginia (west of Tysons Corner up to and including Dulles Airport Vicinity).Required Clearance: TS/SCI with Poly",AWS Solutions Architect (Government) Job in Oakton,,"Oakton, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/aws-solutions-architect-government-job-oakton-va-us-170252382.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=13,,,0b5d93cc8815fd13b66c57d68b4fac77
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:04:56:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Property Management Company is seeking a full time maintenance technician for multiple site work.  Individual will be part of a team working at various sites in suburban Philadelphia area.  We are seeking individuals with knowledge of plumbing, electrical, carpentry & general contracting.  Applicant must be hardworking, punctual, organized & a team player.  We offer medical & dental benefits with, 401(k), & paid ETO. Must pass criminal check and have valid driver’s license. Compensation will be based on experience.EOE",Maintenance Technician Job in Lansdale,Full Time,"Lansdale, PA 19446",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Lansdale-PA-US-165551744.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=2,,,6751919ed327cdcaff6b1d9bb057bff3
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:03:49:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"   __________________________________________________________________ COMPANY:record automatic doors is a leading manufacturer of automatic door systems for pedestrian use and part of a global corporation with over 1900 employees.  The company provides swing, slide, and folding door systems that incorporate the latest in automation technology and provide for ease of installation and dependable operation.  record’s persistent effort to incorporate quality materials and craftsmanship has earned the confidence of architects, general contractors, and end users throughout the world.POSITION DESCRIPTION:The Automatic Door Technicianperforms installation and service of sliding, swing and revolving automatic doors. A successful technician can communicate job issues, progress and status to internal and external customers.  Automatic door experience is preferred, but training can be provided to the right candidate with a mechanical or electrical aptitude. Construction or electrical experience will be considered a benefit. Local travel and occasional overnight stays required. Some night or weekend work required. ESSENTIAL DUTIES:•         Perform installation, service and repair work as assigned in an efficient and quality fashion.•         Perform planned maintenance and service work in accordance with customer expectations.•         Maintain all work records and parts used at each job in accordance with established procedure.•         Keep updated on all changes/modifications to automatic door equipment and ANSI standards as communicated through industry norms.•         Maintain company vehicles, tools and other property safely and in compliance with company policies.•         Present neat and clean appearance personally and in workmanship, in accordance with company policies.•         Maintain accurate inventory log.•         Ensure equipment is operation correctly prior to leaving customer location; perform safety checks as necessary•         Maintain excellent customer relations and customer service.•         Other duties as may be required.QUALIFICATIONS: •         HS Diploma or Equivalent is required•         Associates Degree in related electrical, mechanical, industrial field preferred•         Prior experience servicing automated doors is preferred•         American Association of Automatic Door Manufacturers Certification (AAADM)  preferred, but not required•         Prior experience in the Construction or Electrical Field a plus•         Prior experience as a Glazier installing or servicing glass doors or windows a plus•         Prior experience in the Electrical Field a plus•         Ability to read blueprints or construction documentation•         Excellent oral and written communication skills•         Ability to work independently and alone•         Valid Driver's License•         Ability to lift and/or carry weight from 50-75 lbs•         Ability to work nights and/or weekends as necessary  ",Automatic Door Technician Job in Nashville,Full Time,"Nashville, TN",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Automatic-Door-Technician-Job-Nashville-TN-US-164666209.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=10,15.00 - 30.00 $ /hourBonus,Experienced (Non-Manager),af0f82e6acefaae0b15b088fb92d9c30
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:03:48:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"A1 Hydroflo, a Lee's Summit based Company, is looking for experienced irrigation technicians for immediate employment, at a very competitive rate of pay.Responsibilities will include start-up and winterization of irrigation systems, repair, maintenance & installation of all types of irrigation systems.  Backflow certification is a plus.Candidates must have: - A clean driving record - Valid Driver's License - Must be 18 years of age or older - Great customer service and communication skills - Able to work independently, without much supervision - Previous Irrigation experience and/or backflow certification are a plus - Good time management - Drug free.To Apply:Call (816) 347-2600Fax Resume to (844) 347-2600E-mail Resume to info@a1hf.com",Irrigation Technician Job in Lees Summit,Full Time,"Lees Summit, MO 64082",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Irrigation-Technician-Job-Lees-Summit-MO-US-165192577.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=13,,,ff68398cfdc2120defa5a1ac4344ecb5
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:03:00:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Electrical TechnicianTemp-to-perm position for the electrical testing, troubleshooting  and electro-mechanical assembly of computer based instrumentation, equipment and machinery with emphasis on wiring, assembling and testing of sub- assemblies and complete systems.Job Requirements- 3+ years experience in electrical testing, troubleshooting  and electro-mechanical assembly of instrumentation, equipment or machinery- Ability to perform re-work, test and calibration of sub-assemblies and complete systems-  Must be able Read blueprints, schematics, wiring diagrams, and technical orders - Hands on experience working with control wiring, boards, sensors, computer hardware and software. - Associate or Bachelor degree a plus",Electrical Technician Job in Little Falls,Full Time,"Little Falls, NJ 07424","Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg",http://jobview.monster.com/Electrical-Technician-Job-Little-Falls-NJ-US-165543384.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=20,20.00 - 24.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),78102bf4c74e0ea274546ebeeb1a4837
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:02:59:01,No,jobs.monster.com," Service Technician, Cincinnati, OHDriver / MechanicTennant Company is hiring a customer-focused mechanic who can establish and maintain strong working relationships with our customers in the Greater Cincinnati area.On a typical day, the Service Technician drives to our customers' facilities and troubleshoots and repairs mechanical and electrical system problems on commercial floor cleaning equipment. Additionally, you'll estimate service costs and manage service records on the customer's equipment.The Commercial Service Technician is a gateway career opportunity with excellent advancement potential within Tennant Company. To succeed as a Commercial Service Technician, you'll need mechanical aptitude, equipment repair skills and a passion for customer service. In addition to a high school diploma and valid driver's license, you'll need one year experience working with customers. Technical school training and experience troubleshooting and repairing equipment including small engine and electrical diagnostics (repairing office equipment such as copiers and printers, or working on your own vehicles or household appliances) is helpful.Tennant offers a competitive compensation and benefits package including base salary plus incentives, 401(k) with company match and profit sharing. Interviews will be held locally. Specific Responsibilities:Troubleshoot and repair mechanical, electrical, and hydraulic systems on Tennant products Schedule and perform planned maintenance on Tennant products Satisfy in a timely and complete fashion, all business reporting documentation: timesheets, repair orders, machine checklists, receiving records, expense reports, and repair order logs Receive incoming parts orders, verify quantities, store material in proper service truck bin location, assign and adjust bin locations, and ensure that excess inventory is purged Advise the customer of his/her present and/or future service needs Estimate machine repair requirements and prepare necessary data to provide an accurate repair quote to the customer, including labor and trip charges  Consistently present a professional image, both in personal appearance and condition of company equipment  Required SkillsGood mechanical aptitude. Ability to safely use hand and power shop tools, equipment, and diagnostic devices. Strong troubleshooting and repair skills in mechanical and electrical systems. Good communication skills. Ability to understand and fill out service-related documents and paperwork. Good organization skills. Basic inventory management skills. Good estimating skills.  Required ExperienceHigh school diploma or equivalent. Vocational school a plus.Experience working in direct contact with customers on service-related activities preferred.Must display positive attitude and desire to satisfy customer requirements.Valid driver's license.Must pass company-initiated pre-employment background check, physical, drug test and driving record review. Job LocationCincinnati, OH  Equal Opportunity EmployerTennant Company is an equal opportunity employer.  Employment decisions are made on the basis of individual skill, ability, reliability, productivity, and other factors important to performance.  We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, physical or mental disability, age, veteran status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, genetic information, marital status, or any other basis protected by state or federal law or local ordinance.",Commercial Service Technician Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH 45220",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Commercial-Service-Technician-Job-Cincinnati-OH-US-165760701.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=17,"16.00 - 19.00 $ /hourfull benefits, company vehicle and more",Entry Level,76ab03a55863d2eff2480ad1294230f6
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:01:47:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: * Apply pesticides to structures according to schedule, safety procedures and label instructions. * Drive company vehicle to customers’ houses or places of business. * Call customers to confirm scheduled services. * Respond on a timely basis to customers’ requests for telephone and in-person service calls. * Complete required production forms at end of day. * Maintain vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. * Assist in sales to current customers. * Other duties as assigned. SUMMARY: At Terminix®, our people bring tremendous pride and integrity to everything we do. In turn, we provide a working environment where these skilled professionals can achieve true satisfaction in their own lives. We are proud to offer our exceptional associates competitive compensation, comprehensive benefits and outstanding opportunities for professional development. If you're committed to providing the highest level of customer service, we have an ideal opportunity for you. In this position, you will apply company product to customers’ structures according to schedule and as needed based on service requests. QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE: High school diploma or general education degree (GED); One to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. LANGUAGE SKILLS: * Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. * Ability to write simple correspondence. * Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. MATHEMATICAL SKILLS: * Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals. * Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS: * Licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. At Terminix, people come for a job and stay for a career. As a Terminix associate, you’ll enjoy excellent compensation and benefits as well as the opportunity for the professional growth and respect that comes from working for an industry leader. Qualified candidates must have a high school diploma or general education degree (GED). [We] perform criminal background checks, motor vehicle record checks and drug screening. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Technician / Pest Control Job in Gaithersburg,"Full Time, Employee","Gaithersburg, MD",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Technician-Pest-Control-Job-Gaithersburg-MD-US-165728087.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=8,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,fd13dc2e19edfa5addabe0f869ffb5e7
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:01:46:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:As a member of our team, you will primarily work via telephone and email to communicate with existing customers, past customers, new leads, and sometimes cold calling with a relentless passion to grow yourself as well as the business. You will also be required to help existing customers with their order needs and provide service for existing orders.You need to possess a strong ability to be self-motivated, passionate, focused, and hard-working. Responsibilities"" Work in a fast-paced and hectic environment in a calm and collected manner"" Actively and passionately grow your list of accounts by a certain percentage with daily, weekly, monthly, and quarterly meetings with your supervisor"" Be open to traveling to domestic trade shows from time to time, including weekends"" Consult with and become the go-to contact for your list of accounts"" Actively seek to grow a decades-old family-owned business with hard work, a tireless work ethic, relentless inquisitiveness, and a burning desire to hustleMinimum Qualifications"" Fluently read and write English"" Be able to operate a PC-based computer and use typical office programs such as Microsoft Word, Outlook, and Excel"" Type a minimum of 30 wpmPreferred Qualifications"" BA/BS degree or equivalent practical experience desired"" Experience using Microsoft CRM and Microsoft NAV software programs is a plus"" Strong ability to focus on a given task without being constantly monitored"" Be passionate and determined in your approach to work"" Consistently seek personal and professional growth"" Outstanding communication skills, both verbal and written"" Excellent project manager and self-starter with a strong analytical mindHandle calls from customers calling in orders, assist with questions about products and how to use products. Assist with processing sample request We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1028652 Job Experience:,, Being a ""foodie"" is a big plus!",Customer Service - Food Manufacturing Job in Oxnard,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Oxnard, CA 93035",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Customer-Service-Food-Manufacturing-Job-Oxnard-CA-US-166088994.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=8,Up to $14.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),4f637ee646f57038c4d712ffb72f7cce
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:01:00:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Work from your home in the area of Santa Rosa, Napa, Petaluma California, providing service at customer locations.The Altec Service Group delivers on Altec's commitment to be there for the life of the equipment, through a network of mobile service technicians. If you have the broad range of skills,across the United States and Canada.Apply at https://careers.altec.com Or send resume to servicejobs@altec.com Why Join Altec?We are an industry leader in the design, manufacture, sale, and servicing of truck-mounted hydraulic utility equipment,With a commitment to on-going in-house training and technical support,Providing a state-of-the-art service vehicle for mobile technicians,Within a positive and team-oriented service environmentCustomer First - Enjoyment of Work - Family - Financial Stability - Integrity - People are our Greatest Strength - Quality - Spiritual Development - TeamworkRequirementsRelated experience or educationSpecific experience includes truck-mounted hydraulic utility equipment such as aerial devices, digger derricks, chippers, cranes, specialty equipmentExamples of related equipment are construction, mining, or farm equipment such as dozers or tractors; or military heavy equipment such as the MRAP vehicle, HMEE, or tanks.  Aircraft and Aerospace or Ground Support Equipment (AGE / GSE) repair is also good experience.Overtime may be requiredFor mobile technicians, travel is required, and schedules are not always uniform day-to-day or week-to-week.  Flexibility is key.Physical effort and dexterity is required, lifting up to 75 pounds, including service-related tools.High School or GED requiredThe job level is able to be adjusted at time of hire, if the candidate meets the qualifications for jobs of a more experienced level in the career path.Major ResponsibilitiesUphold Altec’s safety commitmentMaintain and repair Aerial Devices, Digger Derricks, and other equipmentDetermine overall condition of machines through inspectionsDiagnose issues with hydraulic and electrical systemsRestore equipment to working orderExhibit positive and effective interaction with other Altec associates, vendors, and customersMaintain accurate records of all service, repair, and other workCompetitive pay which rewards performanceComprehensive benefits including Medical, Dental and Prescription Drug Program - Retirement 401(k) Program - Vacation and Holidays - Flexible Spending Accounts - Tuition Assistance Program - Employee Assistance and Mental Health/Substance Abuse Program - Life Insurance, Accidental Death and Dismemberment InsuranceAltec Industries, Inc. and its affiliates are equal opportunity employers and maintain affirmative action plans to recruit, retain, develop, and promote qualified individuals without unlawful consideration of race, gender, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, citizenship status, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. Altec strives to maintain a work environment free from unlawful discrimination and harassment, where associates are treated with respect and dignity.",Mobile Equipment Mechanic Job in Napa,Full Time,"Napa, CA 94559",Altec Industries,http://jobview.monster.com/Mobile-Equipment-Mechanic-Job-Napa-CA-US-162749594.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=4,Full Benefits Plus Company Vehicle,,d0d536548226f8be54ce260cafd8bd31
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:00:58:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Manager, Sourcing & Development of Headwear & Accessories This position will be responsible for leading the headwear development team for ’47 by collaborating primarily with the Design team and with domestic & overseas suppliers to ensure that design integrity, quality, fit and target pricing are achieved, and established production timelines are met. SOURCINGManage Development team workload and calendarIdentify and develop new supply partners for headwear and accessories stylesCollaborate with Purchasing to source production orders with alternate vendors when neededManage all core, seasonal, and SMU vendor pricingSource new fabrics, washes, & embellishment techniques to aid Design in the creation of new style offerings for both ’47 & Fan FavoriteParticipate in vendor meetings and factory visits as neededManage all social compliance requirements for new and existing vendors.DEVELOPMENT & QUALITY CONTROLCreate and maintain key style documentation (tech packs, size specs, trim sheets, etc.) for core headwear styles/shapesDevelop and maintain all product standards for headwear and accessories styles, including standards for fit, material, colors, trims and other product elementsDirect new vendors in understanding and adhering to ’47 standards for embroidery, appliqué, and print standards for team logos across all leagues.Lead the approval process for all sample submissions (protos, TOPs, strikeoffs) from alternate vendorsCollaborate with Photography on completed samples that need internal photosCollaborate with Product Coordinator on all elements to facilitate production workflow for ’47 & Fan Favorite linesTranslate all branding with vendorsMaintain archive of past lines for ’47 & Fan FavoriteREQUIREMENTSDegree from 4 year university or institution10-5 years’ experience working with Headwear & Accessories product groupsAbility/willingness to travel to overseas factoriesStrong proficiency with Adobe IllustratorProficiency with Microsoft Office, especially Excel",Senior Manager,Full Time Employee,"Westwood, MA 02090",Sports and Physical Recreation,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Manager-Sourcing-Development-Job-Westwood-MA-US-162030846.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=20,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),3d8d56f30448a304359b65f1f4f0ac5a
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:00:32:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"For over 65 years CSC ServiceWorks has proven stability and has been the nation’s leading provider of performance-driven laundry equipment and industry-leading service solutions to the commercial and multifamily industries.  At CSC you have an opportunity to grow with us as we continue to expand our services across the United States as well as Canada and Europe.  And…we’re hiring!  At CSC we have one simple goal – to create customers for life!  As a CSC team member, you are the key to achieving our goal.  As a CSC associate you will be encouraged to challenge yourself, share your expertise, and grow both professionally and personally.  You will be part of improving every customer interaction by providing the “CSC Experience” to make sure everyone has a great experience. Our passion for delivering a positive experience doesn’t stop with our customers, it includes you!  Our core beliefs and behaviors result in creating a work environment that fosters teamwork, accountability, recognition…and is just a great place where you will want to come to work each day! Your success is important to us.  We are now accepting applications for a customer oriented, quick learner to join our team as a full-time Field Service Technician for our Alexandria, VA branch. These are some of the things you will do in this job:Efficiently troubleshoot mechanical repairs to company owned, rented, and/or leased washers, dryers, and air/water machines/vacuums and other vending/metered equipment.Recognize and troubleshoot electrical and plumbing problems in the laundry room of customers.Maintain clean machines which are consistent with the company image and a professional appearance.Responsible for inventory of company provided parts and equipment on company provided vehicle.Responsible for updating parts inventory system. Responsible for understanding and strictly following all company processes and proceduresEffectively use of company provided device to use for routing, scheduling, inventory and accurately recording customer visits.Read electrical schematics, maps, GPS, and any other routing systems.Always present a professional appearance and handle customers in a positive, professional manner. These are the basic skills and requirements you should have:High School diploma or equivalent requiredValid Driver’s License requiredAt least one year experience in mechanical repairs (does not have to be washers/dryers, but would be a plus)Maneuvering of heavy equipment up to 75lbs of lifting requiredExperience in a mechanical service/repair industryPC literate; experience with Blackberry or similar device preferred.  You should have your own basic hand tools, and we’ll supply the restProfessional appearance and excellent customer service skills a mustKnowledgeable and skilled in liquid propane and natural gas preferred.Need excellent oral and written communications skills as well as organizational and interpersonal skills.Must be highly flexible, able to work independently, able to prioritize schedule, and work on multiple projects while still meeting deadlines. CSC values and wants to retain its associates by offering you industry leading benefits including:Competitive payMedical, dental and vision insuranceLife insuranceShort-term and long-term disabilityPaid holidaysVacation and sick leave401(k) with generous company matchCompany vehicleCompany fuel card for business useBusiness travel reimbursementAward winning company training At CSC we welcome initiative, seek excellence, and reward your performance. If you are interested in joining a winning team, then apply directly today!  When you click the “apply” button you will be directed to our recruitment team at PEAR Core Solutions. Please submit your resume along with other requested information.  We look forward to hearing from you! Position: Full TimeDrug Free Workplace: Pre-employment screenings performedEOE ",Field Service Technician Job in Alexandria,Full Time,"Alexandria, VA 22305",,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-Job-Alexandria-VA-US-165720141.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=4,,Entry Level,5a71991876b4c1cf0a32c8e5e46d3e10
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:00:27:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is recruiting for full-time Trailer Shop Mechanics. Candidates must be at least 21 years of age, own personal work tools and be proficient driving standard transmission vehicles including forklifts. Knowledge of air brakes, hydraulics, electrical and ABS brake systems is highly desirable. Basic knowledge of bodywork and welding MIG, TIG, Stick and Aluminum is also desired. Trailer Shop Mechanics typically work a late afternoon shift from approximately 2:30pm to 11:00pm Monday through Friday.",UPS Mechanic - Trailer Shop Job in Santa Rosa,,"Santa Rosa, CA 95403",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/UPS-Mechanic-Trailer-Shop-Job-SANTA-ROSA-CA-US-165099386.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=14,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,ff88247d6a45e7ca564e879f441a6a6f
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:00:27:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a CONTROLS ENGINEER. Location: Hammond, INSalary: $25 - $30 hrDuration: 6+ Months - Contract to Hire  Skills Required: Bachelor of Science degree in Engineering and/or related field. The successful candidate will be computer literate, a self starter, motivated, and have a clear understanding of PLCs, Robotics, component molding, product design and error proofing. This individual will be responsible for machine design, error proofing, product launch activities, project management, customer interaction, product design for manufacturing, plant layout, time studies, process flow development & enhancement and component molding process development. Experience advantages: Experience with optical sensors for part verification Most Time Studies Project management experience Automotive experience PLC based control systems with Alan Bradley Fanuc Robotics HMI AutoCad Automation practices DVP&R Design Verification Plan & Report FMEA/ Failure Mode Effects Analysis TS16949 Automotive Quality Operating System Bachelor Degree Required",CONTROLS ENGINEER Job in Hammond,"Full Time, Employee","Hammond, IN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/CONTROLS-ENGINEER-Job-Hammond-IN-US-165906913.aspx?mescoid=1700195001001&jobPosition=16,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,4bd573aa684848100ce6be33bc09a3c3
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:00:27:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview:Mission: Repairs, modifies, tests, assembles, cleans, paints, and prepares equipment for customer shipment or the warehouse.Relationships with Others: Reports to Service Center Manager.Accountabilities:Repairs, tests, cleans, and inspects equipment for damage or wear ensuring that worn or damaged parts are repaired or replaced in accordance with established quality control procedures.Works from blueprints to assemble and prepare equipment for shipment ensuring that the equipment is ready when needed.Participates in HT&P training program to benefit current position as well as preparing for future assignments.Records maintenance of service center's hot tapping and plugging equipment.Maintains clean, orderly work area and observes company safety rules.Performs field HT&P applications as required.Required to travel to customers' locations to perform maintenance on all types of HT&P equipment.Qualifications:High-school diploma or equivalent firmly required.A minimum of 2 years of experience working on equipment with moving parts using hand and small power tools, to include hydraulic and/or pneumatic components such as pumps, jacks, presses, brakes, lifts, etc.Must have a commercial driver's license or be able to qualify for one within a month of hire; experienced with appropriate vehicles (large pickups, vans, or similar).Able to make appropriate use of lifting equipment (e.g. forklifts, cranes).Fluent in English; proficiency in Spanish would be a plus.",HT&P Mechanic -  Job in Charlotte,Full Time Employee,"Charlotte, NC 28201",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/HT-P-Mechanic-4710-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-164860215.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1fdb5d37680895d8a62e93415d6a7816
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:00:27:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking ambitious and personable candidates to serve as Pest Control Technicians. You will make service calls to residential customers and apply anti-pest treatments as outlined in job orders. In addition, you will identify opportunities to up-sell additional products and services – and receive additional commission income for doing so. This is a fantastic opportunity for you to start a career right out of high school with comprehensive paid training and plenty of room for advancement. We’ll even help you to get your licensure / certification! Come and see why so many of our employees have made Terminix their career home. We’re looking forward to hearing from you! This position is within our Terminix brand. ServiceMaster is a leading provider of essential residential and commercial services, operating through an extensive service network of more than 8,000 company-owned locations and franchise and license agreements. The company’s portfolio of well-recognized brands includes American Home Shield (home warranties), AmeriSpec (home inspections), Furniture Medic (furniture repair), Merry Maids (residential cleaning), ServiceMaster Clean (janitorial), ServiceMaster Restore (disaster restoration) and Terminix (termite and pest control). The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tenn. Go to www.servicemaster.com for more information about ServiceMaster or follow the company at twitter.com/ServiceMaster or Facebook.com/ServiceMaster. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: * Apply pesticides to structures according to schedule, safety procedures and label instructions. * Drive company vehicle to customers’ houses or places of business. * Call customers to confirm scheduled services. * Respond on a timely basis to customers’ requests for telephone and in-person service calls. * Complete required production forms at end of day. * Maintain vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. * Assist in sales to current customers. * Other duties as assigned. SUMMARY: At Terminix®, our people bring tremendous pride and integrity to everything we do. In turn, we provide a working environment where these skilled professionals can achieve true satisfaction in their own lives. We are proud to offer our exceptional associates competitive compensation, comprehensive benefits and outstanding opportunities for professional development. If you're committed to providing the highest level of customer service, we have an ideal opportunity for you. In this position, you will apply company product to customers’ structures according to schedule and as needed based on service requests. QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE: High school diploma or general education degree (GED); One to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. LANGUAGE SKILLS: * Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. * Ability to write simple correspondence. * Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. MATHEMATICAL SKILLS: * Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals. * Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS: * Licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. At Terminix, people come for a job and stay for a career. As a Terminix associate, you’ll enjoy excellent compensation and benefits as well as the opportunity for the professional growth and respect that comes from working for an industry leader. Qualified candidates must have a high school diploma or general education degree (GED). [We] perform criminal background checks, motor vehicle record checks and drug screening. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Pest Control Technician – Field Service Rep (Entry Level) Job in Moore,"Full Time, Employee","Moore, OK",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Pest-Control-Technician-%E2%80%93-Field-Service-Rep-Entry-Level-Job-Moore-OK-US-165728075.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=10,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,0b3d58ef74840e2c7ca172218aa1aec0
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:00:27:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Triumph Structures - Kansas City is a manufacturer supplying 3, 4 and 5 axis machined parts and assemblies to the military and commercial aerospace industry. Some of Triumph Structures - Kansas City's specific capabilities are precision machined components (landing gear, thrust reverser components, titanium nacelle components, guidance system components), extrusion center (manufacture of structural clips, tees, brackets and angles, as well as longer parts such as floor beams, seat tracks, and stringers as well as hot and cold joggle capabilities) and mechanical sub assemblies (guidance system components, bifurcations, landing gear components and floor beams are all sub assembled plus many other small structural extrusion parts). This position will be responsible for developing, maintaining, analyzing and coordinating the master production schedule for aircraft parts production and updating key events and critical path schedules to meet the needs of the contracts and company goals, while maintaining minimal inventory levels. Job Requirements: Bachelor's Degree with 3 to 5 years of project management and production scheduling related experience in a manufacturing environment is preferred. Project Management Professional certification or APICS training or certification helpful. Working knowledge and understanding of cost and schedule project management systems. Must be proficient in Microsoft Office including Word, PowerPoint, Excel, etc. Strong communication skills, both written and oral are essential. An Equal Opportunity Employer - Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans Job Code : TSKC41316 Division/Department : Triumph Structures - Kansas City % of Travel Required : None Shift/Hours : First Shift (Day) Hire Type : Direct",Master Scheduler Job in Grandview,Full Time,"Grandview, MO 64030",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/Master-Scheduler-Job-Grandview-MO-US-166073031.aspx?mescoid=4300738001001&jobPosition=8,,,faf0e715369d769c39407c016cf689db
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:00:27:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you are looking to become part of an auto center that really values your skills and ability to provide quality service, consider joining the sears auto center team . Now is the perfect time to join as we are going through an exciting transformation of our business!!  The Express Service Technician is responsible for the successful tire, battery, and oil installation to customer vehicles following all automotive processes and procedures. This position interacts daily with customers, Customer Service Adviser, other technicians, and the Auto Center Manager. [#video#https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YhZoUk2cM3Y{#560,315#}#/video#] QualificationsJob Duties/Responsibilities:• Participates actively with team servicing of every customer vehicle to ensure fast, expert service• Dedicates work time to providing excellent customer service• Promotes teamwork to deliver times and accurate customer care during all operating hours• Demonstrates a sense of responsive urgency to every customer no matter what service is required• Uses the Quality Service Evaluation (QSE) form to understand customer service adviser's and customer service manager's instructions• Fulfills the customer's needs the first time, every time• Communicates with Auto Center Manager, Customer Service Adviser and other Technicians to meet Sears Automotive time standards and to exceed customer requirements.• Adheres strictly to Sears Automotive Dress Code standards• Protects customer's vehicle with floor mats, seat/steering wheel covers and, if necessary, fender covers• Racks vehicle safely following Sears Automotive training• Performs Multi Point Inspection (MPI) visual inspections and communicate with customer service manager and/or customer service adviser within 10 minutes• Maintains back shop cleanliness and equipment calibration to Sears Automotive standards•  Thanks customer, expressing appreciation for the business•  Performs miscellaneous duties as assignedRequired Skills:• Valid Drivers License• Successful completion of Sears Automotive Express Technician core curriculum• Commitment to safety: Use of appropriate personal protective equipment, back belt, safety glasses and safety shoes at all times• Maintenance of individual productivity as defined by the business sales per hour standard• Ability to stand and walk for prolonged periods of time• Ability to lift up to 50 pounds• Extended workdays of up to 10 hours, weekends and nights as necessary• Ability to handle stressful situations and work in a fast-paced environment• Ability to read and utilize reports• Extensive spoken communication for customer and associate relationship skills• Must have a valid driver's license• Pre-employment drug test and background check will help assure we build teams of people who can best work with others and serve customer needs.Preferred Skills:• Speed and expertise when installing tires and batteries• Commitment to teamwork and mentoring othersEducation Requirements: HS Graduate or EquivalentLicense/Certificate Required: YesDriver's License Required: YesAge Requirement: 18+ EOE Minorities / Females / Protected Veterans / Disabled",Express Service Technician,Full Time,"Mary Esther, FL 32569",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Express-Service-Technician-Auto-Job-MARY-ESTHER-FL-US-164936757.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=20,Commensurate with Experience,Experienced (Non-Manager),32d464b42f548074a51c5cddf48d1604
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:00:25:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsibilities include integration, inventory and performance of integrated AV equipment for training and conference rooms. Will integrate professional AV systems, perform routine maintenance and upgrades, and construct custom system racks in existing and new installations. Qualified Candidates will have:AS degree in a technology related field and or 4 years of AV work experience. CTS, CTS-I, NICET (transcripts req).5+ years of experience in professional/corporate AV integration.AV Industry Certifications a plus..Able to install, operate and service most AV equipment and systems.Able to configure AV equipment such as media control systems (AMX.Crestron/Extron), matrix mixers and switchers, codecs (Tandberg/Polycom).Excellent communication skills (written and verbal)Strong attention to detail, highly organized, computer literateAbility to work well in a fast-paced professional office environmentSome travel may be required.",AV Systems Installer Job in Anaheim,Full Time Employee,"Anaheim, CA 92805",,http://jobview.monster.com/AV-Systems-Installer-Job-Anaheim-CA-US-164956666.aspx?mescoid=2700446001001&jobPosition=14,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,dffa255a118929ec56938c0bde0ead71
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:00:25:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position will contribute to the production team and help ensure goals are met safely and efficiently while conforming to all company policies. The Production Crew will process vehicles in a safe manner to produce core & scrap products, enable the customers to pull parts, and satisfy environmental requirements.Essential Functions: Follow company policy and procedures, as to set the example for the rest of the team.Degarbage: Remove Freon, power steering fluid, power brake fluid, batteries, excess garbage, and other items as prescribed by procedure.Drain: Remove gasoline, coolant, waste oil, transfer case oil, catalytic converters, and other items as prescribed by procedure.Set & Pull: Place vehicles on wheel stands so customers can safely access sellable parts. Remove vehicles and clean up the surrounding area in preparation for the next vehicle set. Other duties as prescribed by procedure.Field Decore: Loosen the motor and transmission mounts. Remove any remaining tires and selected core items as prescribed by procedure.Ground Decore: Remove heater cores, copper wire, and other items as prescribed by procedure. Maintain the crush pad work area to reduce equipment downtime, harvest cores, and ensure environmental compliance.Table Decore: Dismantle engines and transmissions. Remove selected small cores, harvest wire, sort commodity materials, and other duties as prescribed by procedure.Tire Dismantling: Use the tire machine to separate rubber tires and wheels. Remove weights and stems. Sort tires and prepare rims for shipment.Janitor: Collect and harvest core dismantled core materials. Remove debris. Identify & address safety risks in the customer area. Other duties as prescribed by procedure.Miscellaneous: Assist customers as needed in a courteous manner. Review and complete logs for regulatory and tracking purposes. Maintain and replace storm water control devices. Assist in the review and maintenance of mechanical equipment.Qualifications:Ability to wear and maintain all prescribed PPE and follow basic safety practices.Ability to follow verbal and written instructions including comprehension of basic safety messages and labels (waste oil, gasoline, flammable, etc.).Ability to complete safety, environmental, and code of conduct training.Able to work required hours which may include weekends, holidays and OT.Ability to work efficiently in a variety of weather conditions - rain, snow, sun, cold - for a full shift.Experience in automotive repair or dismantling, preferred but not required.Experience with automotive parts and/or retail customers, preferred but not required.Experience with tools and machinery, preferred but not required.Physical Activities Required to Perform Essential Functions:Standing, walking, bending, and stretching are required regularly to perform customer care, production, and environmental/safety responsibility functions.Manual dexterity to handle tools and the ability to move 50 pounds are regularly required to perform routine functions.Manual dexterity to maintain the facility, clean by mopping, sweeping, etc. as required.Vision must be sufficient to perform job functions safely as described above.Able to work on feet (stand and walk) for assigned work shift.Job Conditions:Exposure on a regular basis to outdoor weather conditions.Periodic exposure to minimal chemical hazards.",Production Crew () Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Crew-258820-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-166032417.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=2,,Entry Level,bab6824d8f1bf89753cf8e10d0224b03
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:05:25:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionIf your goal is to begin a fantastic part time career working up to 25 hours per week where your talents will be valued and respected; Murphy USA is an outstanding employer of choice. To be successful as a cashier, you need energy, excellent work ethic, a great attitude, and a smile. You will be the face of our company and deliver the legendary customer service that Murphy USA and our associates are known for providing. RESPONSIBILITIES: Providing a prompt, efficient, and courteous customer experience. Responding and resolving customer’s requests and concerns. Assisting customers with purchases and fuel transactions. Operating cash register. Restocking merchandise. Performing job related duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTS: Must be 18+ Years of age, 19 in Alabama and 21 in Illinois. Excellent customer service skills, communication skills, and a happy attitude are essential. Cash Handling Skills. Must be able to perform repeated bending, standing, and reaching. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds. HIGHLIGHTS: A job is more than just a job when it’s a career at Murphy USA. We do our best to provide the most supportive and enjoyable atmosphere possible for our employees. When you know that you are making a difference in the lives of those around you. When you go to work every day looking forward to the day ahead of you. When the decisions you make on the job really matter to those whom you serve. Murphy USA offers a fast paced environment where bright, talented individuals who are willing to work hard are valued and can make a difference. Murphy USA can help you schedule your work around your busy life. Murphy USA operates over 1,200 locations in 23 states and is adding new locations every year. The growth provides career advancement opportunities for top performing team members. ""Murphy USA Inc is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, or any other class or category protected by federal, state, or local law.""",CASHIER Job in Florence,Full Time Employee,"Florence, Kentucky",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-job-florence-ky-us-173519763.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),02ee6ae28c45acb729dbed0499af3091
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:05:33:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.Advantage Tank Lines, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Florence, KY. Apply today!We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and be home daily!Company DriversLocal, home daily positions Competitive pay Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental and Vision plans Paid vacations and holidays 401K with company match Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with Advantage Tank Lines.We require Class A CDL with 1-2 years recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank and Hazmat endorsements (or ability to obtain), TWIC - Transportation Worker Identification Credential (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.Call 800-871-4581 for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.Kenan Advantage Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Class A CDL Driver - ATL Job in Florence,Full Time Employee,"Florence, KY",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-atl-job-florence-ky-us-173506980.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=16,,Logistics/Transportation,ae791c041b7800c80be86e438fe7ec85
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:05:47:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary The purpose of this position is to join and contribute to a service conscious pharmacy team who will consistantly build relationships with patients by exceeding their needs and providing safe, accurate and efficient care to achieve optimal patient, team member and company outcomes. Job Responsibilities Immediately acknowledge and welcome patients with compassion and a smile at all pharmacy entry points. Model excellent patient care by respecting, engaging and enthusiastically meeting or exceeding all patient needs including processing orders in person and by phone, directing patients to products and merchandise and referring appropriate questions concerning prescriptions and over the counter medicine to the pharmacist Use the pharmacy computer to complete all actions necessary to maximize efficiency and customer service at drop-off, will call, drive thru, phone, filling and order receiving, including but not limited to:- search for patients and profiles- determine dates of fill and pick-up- determine prescriptions sent to Central Fill- quote cash prices of prescriptions- check on-hand counts of medications - enter invoices. Finalize sales using cash register according to established procedures including the Point of Sale Policies Answer telephone in a polite and timely manner and ensure accurate information is exchanged and customer is satisfied. Perform all supporting duties to contribute to the safe and efficient dispensing of all patient medication/durable medical equipment by following all quality assurance policy and procedures including selecting and counting medication Comply with all Giant Eagle and Pharmacy policies including HIPAA and Pseudoephedrine Perform all data entry functions including but not limited to:-Entering patient personal data and insurance information-Entering all prescription information including calculations, free form directions, medications/durable medical equipment and proper documentation for transmitting to insurance companies-Review profiles for appropriate billing choices and alert pharmacists appropriately for drug utilization reviews-Calling and resolving third party rejections and rebilling claims-Entering and processing refills and adding patients to Refills on Time Program-Processing Medical Expense Reports Assist in the execution of all company initiatives and programs Maintain proper inventory levels by submitting on line order, adding and adjusting order points, order quantities and on-hand counts in the computer and assisting manager in preparation of physical inventories Maintain a neat and clean work environment to ensure Company and government requirements are met File written prescriptions daily Assist team members with tasks to ensure department runs efficiently Review all appropriate service and business metrics and assist team on action plans to improve outcome Perform all regular duties of Pharmacy Technician Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility None Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Currently pursuing a pharmacy degree Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Normal office environment Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Data Entry Filing Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Pulling Pushing Reaching Repetitive Motion Sorting Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Typing Communication (verbal) Walking Weighing Writing Equipment Used Cash Register Deposit Safe Drive Thru Fill Station Intercom Ordering Machine Safety Cutter Scale WalkieTalkie",Pharmacy Intern - Lincoln Village Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/pharmacy-intern-lincoln-village-job-columbus-oh-us-175133644.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=4,,Medical/Health,59798d2efb21c081e84cedd0b47f5963
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:05:48:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations. Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales. Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products. Timely completion of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines . Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience. Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery. Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting. Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day. Able to work independently and as a motivated team player. Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday. Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events. Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access.   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in Montgomery,Part Time Employee,"Montgomery, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-montgomery-oh-us-174477749.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=4,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,fd400877adc93e3253f12f9b6c885730
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:05:51:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: The Seasonal Retail Merchandising Associate is responsible for providing a great shopping experience, and driving sales and profit through customer service, proper merchandising on the sales floor and accurate merchandise movement throughout the building. Duties include placement of new receipts and floor moves, stockroom organization and replenishment, fulfillment, reverse logistics, RFID, POS transactions and other duties as needed. Essential Functions:Provide an exceptional customer shopping experience by ensuring both the in store and online customer are always the #1 priorityService the customer in a helpful and friendly manner including POS transactions, credit and Plenti enrollment, and helping her to find what she is looking for Collaborate with Managers, Leads and Associates throughout the store to deliver a clean, neat and easy-to-shop store environment; maintain sales floor and fitting room recovery standards to include checking fitting room stalls, sorting merchandise and ensuring merchandise is worked back to sales floor immediately as time permits Support Omni Channel initiatives Perform all functions in an efficient manner; flex between tasks as directed by Supervisor Participate in the physical inventory process and ensure that shortage prevention initiatives are executed  Adhere to Asset Protection and inventory control and compliance procedures Regular, dependable attendance and punctuality Collaborate with peers to coordinate merchandise movement needs with other tasks (floor moves, seasonal sets, fixture needs, etc.)Execute merchandising, fulfillment, RFID and reverse logistics tasks timely and accurately to include placement of merchandise to standards (zone-o-gram, directives, fixtures, ADA compliance and visual guidelines), movement of fixtures and merchandise for seasonal sets, stockroom maintenance and organization, replenishment to the sales floor, collection and transport of picked fulfillment orders to appropriate processing areas; preparing and returning BOPS/SDD orders; RFID tag up events, cycle counts, display audits and tagging standards; processing and packing of damages, non-congruent transfers, store initiated transfers, return to vendor and mark out of stock merchandise Assist in other tasks as needed (pricing, signing) Qualifications: Education/Experience: No specific educational accomplishments are necessary. Communication Skills: Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Reasoning Ability: Self-starter, able to work independently and as part of a team and must have good time management skills.Physical Demands: This position involves constant moving and standing. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours. Involves lifting at least 30 lbs. May occasionally involve reaching, stooping, kneeling, crouching, and climbing ladders. May involve reaching above eye level. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.Other Skills: Possess strong merchandising skills. Possess vision and creativity. Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team. Must possess a strong sense of urgency. Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment.Work Hours: Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays, based on department and store/company needs.This job description is not all inclusive. Macy’s Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. Primary Location:United States-Kentucky-FlorenceJob:Receiving and Merchandising.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Seasonal Holiday Retail Merchandising** Part Time: Macy's Florence Mall Job in Florence,Full Time Employee,"Florence, KY",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-retail-merchandising-part-time-macy's-florence-mall-job-florence-ky-us-175066457.aspx?mescoid=2700412001001&jobPosition=20,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,d1e90a60127ab85663b2b4f89ff3c22e
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:15:49:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Goodman Networks is a leader in the design, engineering  and deployment of fixed and mobile networks.  With a track record of success working with the largest service providers in North America, Goodman Networks is leading the industry in the deployment of new technologies such as LTE, Small Cell and DAS solutions.   Company vehicles provided! Seeking a challenging position that rewards hard work and quality service? Wanting to have opportunity to make money based on your performance and motivation to succeed? If so, Goodman Networks Field Services has the opportunity for you!   Goodman Networks is seeking motivated individuals to install and service AT&T/DirecTV satellite systems residentially. This is a challenging and rewarding job working with the latest technology and providing excellent customer service. We offer paid training, steady work, and real opportunities for advancement. We prefer previous experience in Home Satellite System / Cable / Telephone Installation, but do provide paid training for those who have not installed before.   Essential Functions: Work independently and responsible for the installation of AT&T/DirecTV systems in residences and businesses Provide technology service and support to all of our customers Ensuring customer satisfaction at the highest level Determining the best location for customer satellites Making sure the customer is comfortable with all aspects of running the system by providing thorough explanations Running cables and hooking up receivers Stocking vehicle with necessary equipment on a weekly basis Continuing to learn about new technology We are hiring in the following locations: Attica, IN Bloomington, IN Columbus, IN Crawfordsville, IN Indianapolis, IN Spence, IN   Goodman Networks considers applicants for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital or veteran status, or any other legally protected status. At least 21 years of age and legally able to work in the United States Possess high school diploma or GED Possess a valid driver’s license Working knowledge of hand tools and power tools Basic computer skills and comfortable operating electronic devices Strong customer service skills Excellent verbal and written communication skills Available for a flexible work schedule (weekends / holidays / evenings) Requirements: Be able to lift up to 80 lbs on a regular basis Be comfortable climbing up to heights of 40 feet Be able to work safely from a ladder rated for a maximum working load of 300lbs including all tools and equipment Be comfortable working in crawlspaces and attics Comfortable working outdoors in all types of weather throughout the year Benefits: Company vehicle will be provided after training Completely paid training and certification program (paid $10 per hour during the training) Biweekly pay at or above industry standard, depending on experience (after training period, paid per job completed) Medical, dental, vision, life, and short-term disability insurance 401K Paid employee referrals Health Advocate service Tuition Assistance Program Leadership and Service Excellence training opportunities Paid Time Off (PTO) Company perks, including employee discounts and free AT&T/DIRECTV programming that includes NFL Sunday Ticket and NASCAR HotPass Additional income can also be earned by referring customers to additional products offered by Goodman Networks Field Services. Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 50%",AT&T / DirecTV Installation Technician - Indianapolis Job in Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN 46201",Telecommunications ServicesBusiness Services - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/AT-T-DirecTV-Installation-Technician-Indianapolis-Job-Indianapolis-IN-US-165015671.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=8,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,7b4ec1d86fa25f6db7652ffacfe50bdf
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:15:50:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Landscape Superintendent Shearon Environmental Design Company, one of the nation’s leading landscape firms, is searching for experienced and self-motivated landscape superintendent.  We currently have positions open in our two New Jersey locations.   The Voorhees Division  902 Cooper Road               Voorhees, New Jersey 08043Contact: Matt Shearon mshearon@shearondesign.comBasic Requirements:·         Maintain a current drivers license and drive company vehicle                                  ·         Meet or exceed quality and safety expectations·         Ability to walk, bend, lift and carry 40-80 pounds·         A degree or certification in a landscape related field strongly preferredManage Personnel and Projects:·         Train and develop employees·         Track and maintain basic upkeep of vehicles and equipment ·         Site inspections·         Experience with equipment operation·         Oversee large scale hardscape and planting projects·         Monitor irrigation systemsOffice Administration:·         Maintain and prioritize schedules·         Secure materials·         Estimate project budgets·         Understanding the costs and budgets of ongoing projectsClient Relations:·         Front line of customer contact on sites·         Understand clients’ concerns and provide solutions·         Develop relationships with new and existing clients Shearon Environmental Design Company’s dynamic professional life is defined by trust, honesty, respect, and teamwork.  It offers a chance to turn your daily job into a career surrounded by a supportive team with great opportunity for advancement. Help us inspire people and nurture landscapes to grow and thrive.  We offer competitive salary, 401K, health insurance, paid holidays/vacation, and year round employment. Shearon Environmental Design Company is proud to be an equal opportunity employer!",Landscape Superintendent Job in Kirkwood Voorhees,Full Time,"Kirkwood Voorhees, NJ 08043",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Landscape-Superintendent-Job-Kirkwood-Voorhees-NJ-US-165855172.aspx?mescoid=3700621001001&jobPosition=6,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),76ae6d4733dc2ea39b9d1479e0395441
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:16:57:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manual Machinist, Manual Machine Operator - Commercial truck, tractor, and trailer parts supplier seeks a Manual Machinist / Machine Operator to operate manual machines at their facility in Denver, CO.  This is a full-time, temp-to-hire position, where you will earn up to $20 an hour, based on your experience. There is free onsite parking and an employee lunchroom with a microwave and refrigerator available for your use. This is an established company with a great family culture. You will mostly be working with steel and using manual lathes, mills and drill presses to complete custom orders.  You will also be rebuilding and repairing hydraulic cylinders for the company’s hydraulic shop, as needed. These jobs include cutting rods, threading, and making pistons or glands for a hydraulic cylinder.  To be considered, you must:Have at least three (3) years of manual machinist experience.Have a general aptitude with manual machines due to the variation in work orders.Be able to read dial calipers and micrometers. Consent to a background check. Prior convictions may not necessarily disqualify you from working for this company.Have a high school diploma or GED.Welding skills are a plus.  If you are a skilled machinist seeking a career move to a great company, then please send your resume or work history and contact information to:Alicia.slader@chartwellstaff.com Or, to schedule an immediate interview, call:303-254-2435",Manual Machinist,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO 80239",AllAutomotive and Parts MfgManufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Manual-Machinist-Manual-Machine-Operator-Job-Denver-CO-US-165918020.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=10,15.00 - 20.00 $ /hour,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e73f13802dc00f31c126bcaa6df3704c
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:16:58:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"2014 Pillar Award winner - Multifamily Development Firm of the Year! At NRP Group, we successfully develop, build, own, manage and have partnered in numerous projects in multifamily, senior housing, single-family infill, and commercial and retail sites. From high-density urban infill sites to more suburban settings, our focus is to make every building we develop, construct and/or manage a true reflection of the special needs and desires of our customers and residents, with a commitment to excellence from concept to completion. In fact, we developed nearly 17,000 single-family and multi-family homes and apartments in the past 16 years with our eye on more to come.We develop, construct, and operate high quality market-rate and affordable rental properties. We are a dynamic and growing company that works in conjunction with many financial institutions, partners, and non-profit organizations to pursue the development and financing of real estate properties. Currently, The NRP Group has assets and operations in Ohio, Texas, Louisiana, North Carolina, Virginia, Arizona, New Mexico, Michigan, and Indiana.Falls Pointe at the Park a 312 Market/LIHTC community is currently seeking an experienced Maintenance Technician. This position is responsible for overall facility maintenance including basic plumbing, electrical, painting, cleaning and dusting of facilities. In addition, this position is also responsible for groundskeeping, pool and equipment maintenance. Ideal candidates must:• Bring a minimum of two years’ experience in building / facility maintenance including basic electrical & plumbing diagnostics/repair.• Be a TEAM PLAYER in an atmosphere of mutual respect.• Have a POSITIVE ATTITUDE.• Enjoy helping and assisting people. • Have basic tools for the trade. • Have reliable transportation.• Hold a valid driver's license and have the flexibility to occasionally respond to 'off-hour' emergency situations and tenant concerns.• HVAC (CFC Universal) certification requiredWe offer a competitive pay rate plus bonus opportunities and a benefit package that includes: medical, dental, prescription, life and disability insurance, paid time off, and 401(k) retirement plan. Qualified candidates, please apply now. You will be required to pass a criminal background and drug test.",Maintenance Technician - Falls Pointe at the Park Job in Durham,"Full Time, Employee","Durham, NC 27713",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Falls-Pointe-at-the-Park-Job-Durham-NC-US-163486888.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=19,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,3ba87f6307e78e1720182784d1367cac
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:17:49:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Promotion In Motion is one of the fastest-growing snack and candy manufacturers and marketers in North America, and was named one of the 70 largest global candy companies.  Our brands include Welch’s® Fruit Snacks, Sun-Maid® Chocolate Raisins, Sour Jacks® Sour Candies, new Juicefuls® Juice-Filled Fruit Snacks and many more. These brands are found across North America in outlets including Walmart, Target, Costco, Sam’s, BJ’s, AMC Movie Theatres, 7-11 and thousands of other grocery stores, movie theatres, convenience stores, vending machines, specialty retailers and more.Job BriefPrimary responsibility is to direct and manage the total activity of the facility, which includes the production operations, mechanical operations, safety, loss prevention, sanitation, the utilization of resources and all personnel for the assigned shiftOrganize and direct manufacturing operations, packaging and support functions that assures the delivery and execution of the production plans, the product specifications and quantities are met, proper resources are used for the correct yield and quality, safety and sanitation standards are met.Meet or exceed production schedules while ensuring the highest quality standardsInteracts with manufacturing management, production supervisors and staff, QA/QC personnel, engineering, maintenance, sanitation, warehousing, shipping and receiving, accounting and human resourcesEnsures that the facility  complies with GMP and HACCP guidelines to ensure food safety, and meets customer specificationsEnsures that facility operates within given SOP parameters that ensure desired food quality resultsEnsures that the facility operates at desired production ratesMonitors the facility and personnel for any breaches in policy or security issues.ResponsibilitiesExecute and be held responsible for achieving production and packaging plans and make appropriate personnel and equipment adjustments when and as necessaryEnforce all manufacturing procedures to ensure they are followed and proper documentation is completedReport food safety and quality issues to Plant management and SQFPFollow PIM Brands GMP rulesMonitor fellow employees for adherence to GMP’sFollow all manufacturing policies and proceduresUnderstand and enforce safety policies, rules and regulations, as well as other company policies and sanitation standards, in accordance with HACCPAssist the Plant Manager with maintaining a highly motivated teamConduct sanitation and safety inspections in the manufacturing facilityWork closely with maintenance and manufacturing leaders so as to maintain production operationsEffectively handle all emergencies and report incidents to appropriate personnelProvides training and coaching to all supervisorsMaintain operational materials by inventorying and orderingComplete all assigned tasks with an emphasis on solutions and determining root causeInvestigate all incidents at the earliest opportunity and report them to the Plant Manager and/or Human ResourcesProvide a detailed change-of-shift report and status updates to the incoming shift leaderEnsure correct reporting of production and adherence to inventory procedures including FEFO controlMust be able to work some weekend shifts on a rotational basisProvides 24/7 coverage of the manufacturing facilityHas responsibility for food safety and/or qualityManage production and packaging lines and ensure that goals are achievedManage daily and weekly schedules for the workforce on each shiftAttend production meetings to discuss and plan department performance or issuesGenerate reports to be presented to the management teamAssist in staff selection, scheduling, monitoring attendance and tracking worked hoursEnsure that workers are evaluated on a timely basisEnsure that the workforce is properly trained on all production and safety procedures and standardsProvide support for GMP training to QA/QC staff.Participate in change-of-shift meetings and provide a status checklistCreate work orders and coordinates with other departments to ensure completion.Coordinates with packaging and mogul supervisors to ensure that staffs work is directed and they have reported to their work areas.RequirementsBachelors degree in management, production or other related field is preferredMinimum 5-10 years of similar supervisory experience in a manufacturing/production environment essentialPackaged food plant experience preferredUnderstanding and knowledge of GMP’s, HACCP, SQF and OSHA standards requiredMust possess effective organization, communications and administrative skillsMust possess and knowledge and be proficient with office and manufacturing software (Microsoft Word, EXCEL, Outlook etc.)Employee BenefitsWe offer a comprehensive, flexible employee benefits package that includes medical and dental coverage, life insurance, an employer-matched 401(K) plan, vacation and PTO time, discretionary bonus and of course CANDY!",Production Manager Job in Somerset,Full Time,"Somerset, NJ 08873",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Manager-Job-Somerset-NJ-US-156729038.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=1,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),4c0d8fbc012d1cf8058d5690fe389d4a
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:17:50:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: EMCOR Facilities Services (EFS), an EMCOR core business, services over 1 billion square feet of space worldwide. From corporate campuses to single sites, EFS provides a range of services that support mission-critical areas of financial services, manufacturing, pharmaceutical, transportation, and government sectors. Job Title: Facility Technician II Job Summary: Performs tasks related to the general building operations and needs.  Inspects, tests, and performs Operation & Maintenance (O&M) preventative maintenance inspections on mechanical, electrical and automatic temperature control equipment utilizing results oriented strategies to ensure continuing operation Essential Duties and Responsibilities: include the following. Other duties may be assigned. §  Performs mechanical work required for installation and maintenance of equipment, systems and facilities in accordance with diagrams, sketches, operation manuals, and manufacturers specifications. §  Performs preventative maintenance and repairs on all air & water distribution system equipment including air handlers, ductwork, fans & motors, dampers, variable air volume systems and their components, mechanical cooling/chilled water system, condenser water system, heating & hot water system, pumps, clocks, potable & domestic water system, humidification, life safety systems, ice storage, supplemental heating & cooling equipment, and sanitary systems & equipment.  Including but not limited to belt adjustments, oiling, greasing and cleaning of equipment or replacement of various types of mechanical and electrical equipment. §  Performs preventive maintenance on various electrical and mechanical equipment §  Performs re-lamping both indoor and outdoor. §  Performs daily operation, inspects, maintains, repairs or assists in the repairs the buildings Energy Management System & Building Automation System and the Fire Safety System when required. Must also stay educated on the operation of these systems either through manuals and or service representative training, when provided. §  Conducts daily/weekly tours of mechanical spaces, tenant/public areas, roofs, and building grounds. §  Maintains daily logs, readings and reports for operational efficiency §  Respond to service calls/tenant request for HVAC, plumbing, lighting, escorts, general carpentry & painting duties, key making, picture hanging, safely move furniture and equipment as needed, and provide support or assistants when needed. §  Communicate with the owner, owner’s representative, or supervisor on the work performed and present status of the mechanical/electrical/infrastructure systems. §  Stays abreast of changes (safety and code) in the field through seminars and other educational means. §  Provides information for input to client work order tracking system to initiate work orders for unscheduled jobs, develop materials lists for ordering, and may be required to provide technical support for projects. §  Responds to emergency situations and traces, troubleshoots and repairs problems; may wear a pager and or carry a cell phone for rapid response. §  Conducts general housekeeping to mechanical/electrical rooms including sweeping, mopping and painting. §  Completes work in accordance with EMCOR Business Systems Standard Operating Procedures and Work Instructions. Performs light snow removal when required Qualifications:  To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education and/or Experience                                                                                                                           One-year certificate from college or technical school or one to three months’ related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience We offer our employees a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package and are always looking for individuals with the talent and skills required to contribute to our continued growth and success.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled",Facility Technician II Job in Green Bay/Appleton,Full Time Employee,Location:,Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Facility-Technician-II-Job-Green-Bay-Appleton-WI-US-164945553.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=4,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,413f2b1e2337727dfbbb8f797b54e821
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:17:58:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Due to our continued growth Great Lakes Metal Stamping in Cusseta, AL is currently recruiting a Maintenance Technician.  Great Lakes Metal Stamping provides excellent job security, ongoing training, and excellent benefit package and pay depending upon knowledge and experience. If you are a team player and have the ambition and desire to learn and grow with our manufacturing operation please submit your resume. Job Responsibilites: ·         Manufacturing plant maintenance·         Troubleshooting and problem solving skills·         Perform preventive maintenance on machines, stamping presses, and facilities·         Ability to manage multiple projects with the flexibility of adapting to changing priorities·         Participates in continuous improvement·         Develops and implements maintenance practice/improvements ·         Experience in electrical circuits: 3 phase circuits and motors; switches·         Robots and control troubleshooting; able to read PLC program·         Repair any pneumatic and hydraulic systems·         Print reading ability; basic symbol and circuits for both electrical and pneumatic/hydraulic Requirements:·         Trade school/degree·         1-3 years in metal stamping or manufacturing environment·         Adheres to Plant Safety Rules and Processes·         Ability to maintain a clean and orderly work area·         Ability to read, follow, and interpret work instructions·         Attention to detail·         Good manual dexterity and willingness to work 8 to 10 hours per day·         Excellent communication skills·         Good computer skills",Maintenance Technician Job in Cusseta,Full Time,"Cusseta, AL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Cusseta-AL-US-165183558.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=19,,,ab95fe7a952c23106eb0fe7d8952fd14
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:18:57:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"VILLAGE OF COON VALLEY is accepting applications for a Part-Time Temporary Seasonal Employee - park mowing and trimming at $9.00 per hr, 15 to 20 hrs per week. Applicant must be at least 18 yrs old, have a valid driver's license, and be able to lift 50 lbs. Applications are available at 205 Anderson St., Coon Valley or phone the office at 608-452-3168. Send completed application to Village of Coon Valley, PO Box 129, Coon Valley, WI 54623. Application deadline is 4/7/16. Coon Valley is an EOE.",General Labor - Moving & Trimming Job in Coon Valley,Part Time,"Coon Valley, WI 54623",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/General-Labor-Moving-Trimming-Job-Coon-Valley-WI-US-164927116.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=18,,,e7b6da4aa1c702c15ae310868c62b15b
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:18:59:05,No,jobs.monster.com," Looking for a rewarding, challenging and exciting opportunity – Apply atMartech, one of the world’s leading Medical Device Developer and Contract Manufacturer.  Let’s help save lives together!Martech Open Positions – send resumes and salary requirements to resumes@martechmedical.com·         Quality Assurance Managero   Manages, coordinates, and directs activities required to support the continuous improvement of Quality Systems while adhering to all regulations of the Medical Device industry.o   BA/BS degree in quality, applied science or engineering or related discipline.o   ASQ certification is a plus.o   Six Sigma/Lean Manufacturing experience or Belt holder is preferred.o   Preferred experience with ISO 13485, 21 CFR, and FDA regulations.",Quality Assurance Manager Job in Harleysville,Full Time,"Harleysville, PA 19438",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Manager-Job-Harleysville-PA-US-165364622.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=6,,,240dd55707e34f17b83ab28a4770269f
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:19:05:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Production Planner is responsible for planning, organizing and executing production schedules, raw material inventory, packaging inventory, finished goods inventory, and shipping for the plant. Production Planning Responsibilities include:-         Ensures the production schedules are current and sequenced to optimize inventory, productivity, and to fulfill customer delivery requirements.-         Modify production schedules as a result of production issues, utility outages, and equipment problems.  Communicate all changes with the SOP Coordinator and the Supply Chain Manager.-         Purchase and receive raw materials using SAP.-         Work with suppliers to ensure proper inventory and timely receipt of raw materials. Meet with suppliers when necessary to discuss and resolve delivery/quality issues.-         Manage raw material, finished goods, and inventories to meet targets for working capital.-         Coordinate warehouse activities related to storage and care of packaging materials, raw materials, and finished goods to create a safe, efficient, and clean operation.-       Ensures the production schedules are current and sequenced to optimize inventory, productivity, and to fulfill customer delivery requirements.-         Modify production schedules as a result of production issues, utility outages, and equipment problems.  Communicate all changes with the SOP Coordinator and the Supply Chain Manager.-         Purchase and receive raw materials using SAP.-         Work with suppliers to ensure proper inventory and timely receipt of raw materials. Meet with suppliers when necessary to discuss and resolve delivery/quality issues.-         Manage raw material, finished goods, and inventories to meet targets for working capital.-         Coordinate warehouse activities related to storage and care of packaging materials, raw materials, and finished goods to create a safe, efficient, and clean operation. Production Reporting and Record Keeping Responsibilities include:-         Provides key information for all production process orders that determine production-manufacturing costs.-         Reports each process order explaining any manufacturing cost variances.-         Provides accurate consumption and financial data to MSR.-         Maintain accurate run rates for products.  Decide when run rate adjustments should be made, review with Line Engineer(s), and make the appropriate changes.-         Maintain accurate line events for all process orders.  Work with shift supervisors to correct any issues and ensure data integrity.-         Monitors and updates material BOM's for correct costing of finished product.-         In conjunction with the Quality Engineer, ensure all finished product testing and grading is completed in a timely and accurate manner.  Follow up on any issues to ensure material is available as promised. Required Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:-        Knowledge of manufacturing systems and processes-        Knowledge of quality systems, including ISO 9001:2000-         Knowledge of statistical analysis-         Computer skills: Proficiency with SAP, word-processing and spreadsheet applications required  (MS Word & Excel preferred)-         Strong organizational & problem-solving skills required-        Excellent oral and written communication skills requiredBENEFITSVariable Incentive Compensation plan optional, and eligible for the following benefits: Medical, Dental, Prescription Drug, Vision, Life & ADD, Short and Long Term Disability, Wellness Incentive program and a Retirement Savings 401K plan.EDUCATIONMinimum:  Bachelor’s degree from a 4-year college. (In lieu of degree requirement, may accept additional technical school/manufacturing experience as a trade-off.)Desirable: APICS CPIM certification About the CompanyMexichem, headquartered in Mexico City, MX is the world's largest manufacturer of specialty vinyl resins for formulating plastisols, organosols, powders, and compounds. Mexichem Specialty Resins Inc. {MSRI) is a subsidiary of Mexichem. Our solutions include a variety of dispersion, blending, powder coating and suspension vinyl resins.MSRI offers its current and potential customers a broad product line that can be used to create a wide array of end-products including flooring, carpet tile, automotive sealants, can coating and medical products among others. With our experienced technical team, we provide vinyl-based solutions and consulting for current applications as well as for new product development, manufacturing improvement, and product performance enhancement.",Production Planner Job in Henry,Full Time,"Henry, IL 61537",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Planner-Job-Henry-IL-US-166036930.aspx?mescoid=4300738001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ae9cd17ecd9aa063249291dd75735b3b
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:19:19:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"LaborersFull benefit pkg., dayturn, Send resume to:P.O. Box 2217Warren, OH 44484 provided by The Warren Tribune-Chronicle",Laborers/Welders Job in Warren,Full Time,"Warren, OH 44484",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Laborers-Welders-Job-Warren-OH-US-166005903.aspx?ch=neohio&mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),de5303cbd4922edde67d84cf89da4b7c
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:19:21:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Well established and very busy  shop in extremely busy area looking for a self motivated and highly skilled auto mechanic.Minimum 2 years professional shop experience required.We are seeking to fill immediate full time position FIVE days a week MON-FRI only 7:30 am - 5:30 pm. Shop is not open on the weekends!You must have the ability to properly diagnose & repair multiple makes passenger cars and LT.Must have own tools & Clean Valid Drivers License.Must have minimum 2 years professional shop experience.Looking for dependable. reliable, & skilled person to join our team.Compensation based on level of experience. Salaries range, good techs make great money!LOCAL CANDIDATES ONLY.",Automotive Technician/Mechanic Job in Lutz,Full Time,"Lutz, FL 33549",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Automotive-Technician-Mechanic-Job-Lutz-FL-US-165856817.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=1,"20,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /yearCommissions also",Experienced (Non-Manager),321f243dc13c4334567a120c42d60506
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:19:27:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition Number 38324BR Title Machinist Finishing Business US - SSS - SMS State / Country / Province Indiana City Indianapolis No. of Positions 1 Job Description Job Summary:   This position is responsible for meeting production standards without jeopardizing quality he/she is responsible for reporting problems to the supervisor as they occur, and to assist in solving them.  The individual should fully understand what is expected before pressing the start button.   The Machinist should continuously strive to strengthen abilities while maintaining an overview of quality knowledge in order to produce a first-class product.   This person has considerable influence on outgoing quality because he/she is the one producing the part.   Organizational Relationship:   This position reports directly to the Production Supervisor.  This position will work closely with the managers, supervisors, and plant personnel.   There are no direct reports to this position.   Key Result Area:   Production 30%; Quality 30%; Completion 20%; Safety 10%; Team Support 10%.   Specific Responsibilities :   1.     Ensure proper machine operation by checking the set-up of the machine prior to operating. 2.     Perform simple set-ups of machine according to production orders. 3.     Report any problems to supervisor. 4.     Performs duties and responsibilities as described in the quality system. 5.     Perform other duties as assigned by the manager to support departmental goals.   Knowledge/Skills/Abilities:   ¨       Ability to set up and operate most finishing machines without help.                                                                              ¨       Knowledge of BEST products. ¨       Ability to be self motivated and work independently. ¨       Ability to be a quality conscious individual capable of achieving quantity requirements. ¨       Ability to repetitively manipulate small parts. ¨       Ability to stand all day.   Education/Experience: ¨       High school diploma or equivalent   Key Dimensions:          ¨       Personal: ·         Quality Orientation ·         Work Standards ·         Safety Awareness ·         Contributing to Team Success ·         Continuous Learning       Functional Requirements: ·         Must be able to stand, walk, sit, use hands to finger, handle, and feel. ·         Must be able to reach with hands and arms, climb and balance. ·         Must have the ability to lift up to 40 pounds. ·          Must have good vision with the ability to adjust to focus and use close vision, with or without correction. ·         Must have the ability to maneuver in a manufacturing facility. ·         Must also be able to effectively communicate within a manufacturing environment. EEO Statement All qualified applicants to Stanley Black & Decker will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, veteran's status, age, disability or any other characteristic protected by law",Machinist Finishing Job in Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Machinist-Finishing-Job-Indianapolis-IN-US-165432094.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=18,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,01ed773c8cea6e8f2ac3e9d34994dba1
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:19:46:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Private Family seeks experienced live-in or live-out Domestic couple to maintain their Bedford NY residence as well as assist the family with service and accommodations as needed. Responsibilities include but are not limited to: Working alongside additional domestic staffLiaising with and overseeing vendors and contractorsProvide hands-on housekeeping including all aspects of general and deep cleaning: laundry and ironing, cleaning of kitchen, bath, and living areas, organization of closets, pantries, etc., care for art, antiques, and fine furniture, etc.Maintain home for guest readiness at all timesPlanning fresh and healthy menus, preparing and serving daily meals as well as parties and events.Fine vehicle care; including service scheduling and insurance upkeepDriving family to appointments and engagementsGeneral handyman services and facilities / home maintenance tasksMaintaining household inventories; supply procurement including grocery shoppingMaintaining complete indoor and outdoor appearance of the homeHandling special requests and related duties as neededTravel with the family to additional residences / alternate destinations as needed This is a full-time, live-in or live-out position with a 5-day workweek. Flexibility to work overtime as needed is required. Salary is generous but DOE, this position also includes a full benefits package as well as the potential to earn a discretionary annual bonus. Requirements At least 5 years of related experience each working in a Private EstateStrong English communication skills, both written and verbal; additional language skills are a plusExperience supervising household staff and working with service staff and other outside vendorsAbility to work independently as well as with a team, ""hands on"" as necessaryExperience caring for fine art and antiques, fine garments and linens, and silver and brassExcellent references from both current and previous employersStrong culinary skills; ability to prepare meals and serve events and dinners as neededDemonstrate an understanding of complex physical house systems (lighting, heating and cooling, security), including “smart home” systems (i.e. Kaleidoscape)Working knowledge of all areas of property maintenance; initiative in tackling home projects hands-onGreat with children and pets (no allergies)Flexible scheduling with flexibility to work overtime and weekends as neededValid driver’s license with clean driving recordValid passports and flexibility to travel with the family as needed to summer and winter estatesLegally able to work in the United States SOCIETY STAFFING295 Madison Avenue, 16th FloorNew York NY 10017Tel: (646) 681 4780Agency DCA License #2008231 Due to the volume of employment applications received, Society Staffing is unable to respond to each application individually. Applicants will be contacted directly if selected as a candidate. Please be advised that the first round of our interview process involves a direct meeting at our Manhattan offices for all positions located in the tri-state area. ",Domestic Couple,Full Time,"Bedford, NY",,http://jobview.monster.com/Domestic-Couple-Live-In-or-Live-Out-Bedford-NY-Job-Bedford-NY-US-165263686.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,"$1,000,000.00+ /yearDOE",Student (High School),09a733b3fa6c0eb017ac7d72b4953e8c
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:19:47:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"A person within the parts department assist customer’s in the selection of the proper manufacturer parts. A parts person assists customers in a friendly and professional manner, and keeps inventory well stocked. Position ResponsibilityCommunicate with customers via email, phone and in personAssist customers in selection of various parts for their equipmentRead schematics to ensure proper parts to be orderedFollow up on parts orders to vendorsReceive inventory from warehouse & stocks components in applicable locationsAccept payment via credit cards, cash and checks appropriatelyOrganize parts on shelves in various areasCommunicate with warehouse and purchasing to ensure proper stocking levels are heldReport safety violations to supervisor or Safety DirectorOther duties as assigned by managementEssential Skills and ExperienceMust have a minimum of 2 years’ experience working with parts and schematicsExcellent time management skillsMust be able to communicate technical skills to a non-technical audience both orally and writtenAbility to asses a customer’s needs and recognize sales opportunitiesAbility to work well with customers.Excellent interpersonal and communication skillsMust have strong listening and problem solving skillsBasic computer proficiencyStrong team player with the ability to work independently as neededCommitment to company valuesMust be able to read, write and speak EnglishMust have a High School Diploma or equivalent experienceNon Essential Skills and ExperienceExperience in the construction rental industry particularly in the Parts DepartmentFamiliar with rental industry or large and small construction equipmentAssociates or bachelor’s degreeOrganizational RelationshipsPersons working within the Parts Department will report directly to the Parts Manager. Persons working within the Parts Department consult with Purchasing and the Warehouse to communicate stocking levels. They will also communicate with the Service Department for repairs on equipment and parts needed. This position will have no direct reports. Physical DemandsPersons working in the Parts Department will be spending a majority of their time sitting and must practice appropriate ergonomics. They will be walking and negotiating stairs in parts center retrieving parts for orders. Persons working in parts must be able to lift up to 75 pounds. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Work EnvironmentPersons working in the parts department spend majority of their time inside the retail store and occasionally walking through the warehouse. Parts Personnel will have frequent customer interactions, and they will on occasion be exposed to extreme weather conditions.",Parts Representative Job in King Of Prussia,Full Time,"King Of Prussia, PA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Parts-Representative-Job-King-of-Prussia-PA-US-165910239.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=8,14.00 - 14.00 $ /year,,ee69963ec072e1d7c93ef604ac9089f8
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:20:58:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Door Shop Manufacturer is responsible forWorking with paneling, molding, and doors.Staining, sanding, and packaging door products.Using air operated hand sanders and sanding machines.Como una fabricante de las puertas, se encarga de trabajar con paneles, molduras y puertas, tincion, lijado, y productos de puerta de envasado, y el uso de aire de accionamiento manual lijadoras y pulidoras.Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence and memos; write simple correspondence; effectively present information to others one-on-one.Ability to apply common sense understanding to carry out detailed but uninvolved written or oral instructions; deal with problems involving a few concrete variables and standardized situations.Ability to lift up to 50 lbs with or without reasonable accommodations. Capacidad para leer y comprender instrucciones simples, la correspondenciay notas breves; escribir la correspondencia; presentar informacion de manera eficaz a los demas uno a uno.",Hourly Door Manufacturer ( T ) Job in Bradenton,Full Time Employee,84 Lumber,,http://jobview.monster.com/Hourly-Door-Manufacturer-1335-7T-003-Job-Bradenton-FL-US-165879316.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,c2523b63862102b66f65a38aede17357
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:20:59:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is a second shift position.SUMMARY Loads, unloads, and moves materials within or near center, cross dock, trailers, yard, or work site by performing the following duties. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES included the following. Other duties may be assigned.Reads work order or follows oral instructions to ascertain materials or containers to be moved. Receives items for shipment, inspects visually for identity, quantity, and condition. Checks for obvious damage and segregates items requiring special handling. Opens containers as directed by work instructions or supervisor. Loads and unloads materials onto or from pallets, trays, racks and shelves by hand or with forklift or other handling equipment. Loads materials into carrier vehicles and installs strapping, bracing or logistic bars padding to prevent shifting or damage in transit. Completes receiving and shipping documents accurately and completely per ProTrans specifications with the scan gun. Counts, weights, and records number of units of materials moved or handled in PTI System. Ensures proper identification. Identifies all shipments by proper marking and labeling, including special handling instructions. Coordinates transportation requirements. Coordinates any special handling problems. Gathers data for preparing reports. Warehouses and stores inbound and outbound cargo awaiting processing and/or onward movement. Stacks or assembles materials into bundles and bands bundles together as direct per work instructions. Lifts heavy objects by hand or with power hoist, and cleans work area, machines, and equipment. Conducts safety and equipment checks daily. Operates machinery such as banding, taping, and sealing. Follows all safety procedures. Actively works to improve individual and center safety record. Actively works for continuous quality improvement. Identifies and implements continual improvement initiatives to enhance the performance of the position, team, and company.REQUIREMENTSHigh School diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Must have at least two years of recent experience with sit down forklift and warehouse experience. Must have basic math skills Scanning experience required Able to lift a maximum of 75 pounds Computer literate Must have experience in shipping/receiving materials Bilingual English/Spanish a plus ",Material Handler Job in Greer,Full Time Employee,"Greer, SC 29650","AllTravel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/Material-Handler-Job-Greer-SC-US-165977319.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=8,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,1276730881d87380d96a50579e62d2ee
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:21:08:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview: We are the maker, marketer and distributor of branded food products that have been American favorites for decades. Our employees located in more than 20 offices and plants across North America rally around our mission, Reinvigorating Iconic Brands. We work to transform our brands to be more profitable for our customers and more enjoyable for our consumers.   At Pinnacle Foods, every employee has the opportunity to make an impact—from marketing and research & development, to manufacturing, finance and sales—each function plays a critical role in our success. By living our values of trust, candor and ownership we create great relationships that help us deliver results and drive meaningful change for our brands and business.   SCOPE OF POSITION : Responsible for inspection of potato chips and ensuring adequate flow of product into packaging area. Monitor and document chip waste data, identify actions to bring waste under target. This position will be the back up to the fry room operator positon.   ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Essential duties and responsibilities include the following; other duties may be assigned. Visually inspects and discards unacceptable product and foreign material. Ensures product flow is adequate for rate of production. Communicates frequently with packaging, fryer room and quality assurance teams. Monitors optical sorter performance by grading quality chips. Weighs and documents waste in the factory, inspection tables and floor waste. Trigger correction action when waste > target, identify improvement action plans validated by quality, maintenance and operations department. Follows all established Good Manufacturing Practices (GMP’s). Keeps work station clean and orderly. Immediately notifies Supervisor or Team Lead of any problems.   SKILLS & EXPERIENCE: Experience working in food processing facility preferred. Ability to work in a fast paced environment under constant pressure of production line environment.   Able to track and monitor data, identify corrective and/or improvement actions. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds.         Pinnacle Foods is an Affirmative Action/EEO Employer – qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to protected veteran or disability status, race/color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender expression, gender identity or any other legally protected basis.            ",Waste Mgmt Tech/Inspector rd shift (Tim's Cascade Snacks,Full Time Employee,"Algona, WA",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Waste-Mgmt-Tech-Inspector-3rd-shift-Tim's-Cascade-Snacks-Algona-WA-Job-Algona-WA-US-165389011.aspx?mescoid=5100986001001&jobPosition=14,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,be847be253460373aaa3e05acf2d1ab0
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:21:46:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Essentra Packaging is stable, growing and hiring! Our Health Care Packaging Division is looking for an experienced Prepress Supervisor. You would be responsible for supervising the prepress technicians and department workers ensuring tasks are performed in compliance with handling customer-supplied artwork files for the purpose of producing error-free files, proofs, plates, coating plates. The Prepress Supervisor will interact with customers, making sure images are correct before they go to press.What you gain: We provide you with ... A great team and work environment, full benefits including a choice of plans for medical, dental and vision coverage, a 401K plan WITH company contributions! We also offer paid Vacation Days and a Competitive Salary!Your responsibilities include:Interacts directly with customers to ensure accurate interpreting of customer specifications.Accepts, tracks and prioritizes jobs received and oversees work produced to prepare to run on a press.Develops and implements procedures pertinent to the effective and efficient operation of the department.Monitors programs and procedures to ensure customer satisfaction.Maintains in-depth working knowledge of company systems and processes.Sets performance standards to meet service goals of the company.Designs and reports individual and departmental performance metrics for continuous improvement. Coaches team in order to achieve high performance.Provides problem analysis and problem resolution at a functional level.Provides feedback to the company regarding service failures or customer concerns.Works continually towards self-development to stay current on technology, industry standards, and management procedures and practices.Supports and assists technicians as needed.Ensures the resolution of customer issues promptly and accurately in a manner that will retain and promote customer loyalty.As a member of the management team, works to align department policies and objectives with the company’s objectives.Conducts regular on time performance appraisals for all team members.Develops goals, action plans and time tables for direct reports.Promote and enforce compliance with internal and customer quality, service and delivery requirements to ensure customer satisfaction.Ability to support/assist prepress across sites.Required:High School Diploma, college degree preferred in graphic design5 years of related experience in a manufacturing environment with multiple product lines. Pharmaceutical printing/folding industry experience preferred.Knowledge/Skills Requirements:Electronics Skills :Advanced understanding of the Macintosh Operating SystemBasic understanding of the Windows Operating SystemUnderstanding of interoperability of Macintosh and Windows operating systemsKnowledge of basic graphic file formats, including PDF, EPS, TIFF, DXF, CFF2, AIAdvanced understanding of vector versus bitmap file formats; ability to distinguish and decide on which format is suitable for which purpose.Medium to Advanced knowledge of the following software: Artpro; Adobe Creative Suite (Acrobat; Illustrator; Photoshop; InDesign); QuarkXpressFamiliarity with Microsoft Word; Microsoft Excel; Filemaker Pro; Microsoft PowerpointAdvanced understanding of font usage, including the ability to properly load fonts, identify incorrect font usage and troubleshoot font-handling errors.Familiarity with email and FTP softwareFamiliarity with compression software and its proper use (Stuffit; WinZip)Understanding of the concept and execution of electronic comparator proofreading with working knowledge of either Global Vision or Complete Inspection Systems software.Advanced knowledge of Step and Repeat software such as Artpro or PrepsFamiliarity or working knowledge of integration of CAD file formats in the Step and Repeat workflow of ArtproFamiliarity or working knowledge of Preps software for the creation of imposition templates.Familiarity or working knowledge of integration of Preps templates into Apogee workflowAdvanced knowledge of Barcode Pro for creation of barcodes. Familiarity with the concepts of Raster Image Processing software; experience with AGFA Apogee workflow utilization or creation a plusFamiliarity with Web page development a plus.Ability to learn and use Imaginera and Kronos.Graphic Arts Skills/Knowledge:Advanced understanding of the principles of offset print processes.Advanced understanding of the principles of printed color and color correctionAbility to identify and provide solutions to on-press color problemsUtilizing established workflows to create electronic files for use as hard and soft copy proofs for pharmaceutical inserts and folding cartons.Advanced understanding of densitometry as it relates to the correct production of printing platesAdvanced understanding of the principles of halftone screens and the ability to troubleshoot and provide solutions to on-press screen problems.Advanced understanding of ink-to-ink trapping with the ability to create, verify and troubleshoot on-press traps.Ability to verify content of files and proofs both visually and via the use of electronic comparators.Familiarity with a variety of bar code symbologies, including UPC, Code 128, Interleaved 2 of 5, Data matrix, Reduced Space Symbology codes, Pharmacode.Understanding of the requirements of Braille creation and usage.Understanding of finishing operations such as embossing, foil stamping, UV coating and the electronic requirements associated with those finishing effects.",Prepress Supervisor Job in Moorestown,"Full Time, Employee","Moorestown, NJ 08057",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Prepress-Supervisor-Job-Moorestown-NJ-US-160596881.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=3,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,b29be80eae95935153fca78b38f7e8dc
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:21:47:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manager, Maintenance & Facilities Alcami is a leading provider of services that encompass the entire process of pharmaceutical drug development from discovery through commercialization. We specialize in analytical chemistry, formulation development, clinical packaging, oral drug delivery and contract manufacturing. The company has experienced significant growth and we have continued to attract the most highly skilled professionals in the industry. With nearly 1,000 employees operating out of seven sites in the US and Europe, our combined capabilities include API development and manufacturing are worldly recognized. Come join our team! Location:Located in Germantown, Wisconsin, Alcami is part of the growing southeast Wisconsin biotech/pharma cluster. The area boasts global market leaders in contract pharmaceutical services, and a rapidly growing number of academic incubators. A short drive from Chicago, Madison and Milwaukee, Germantown offers residents a small town quality of life with convenient access to major Midwest cities. Residents enjoy an excellent school district and many local recreation attractions, in addition to national sports teams (Green Bay Packers and Milwaukee Brewers and Bucks), and a vibrant waterfront park community that includes world class art museums and children's museums. Position Summary:Manages and coordinates the activities of personnel in the Facilities and Maintenance departments. Areas of responsibility to oversee may include but are not limited to: janitorial, mechanical, security services; grounds keeping; security and fire systems; in house repairs throughout the facilities. Maintenance trades including carpentry, electrical, plumbing and painting, with routine equipment repair and installation of office fixtures. Develops resource plans that meet operational goals in terms of safety, quality, output and cost. Ensures and conducts proper staff training. Ensures that deliverables are met or expectations are proactively managed towards alternative solutions.Key Job Responsibilities:Manage day to day activities which include all work orders, contracted outside services and facility related emergencies.Inspect, maintain and report electrical, plumbing, mechanical and other related systems in all departments of facility including process equipment, interior and exterior.Supervise and prioritize work of the maintenance technicians. Makes project/work assignments with communication of the expected timeline.Responsible for problem solving process to resolve and/or mitigate those issues that may negatively impact production.Ensure the department meets or exceeds performance requirements in the areas of safety, cost control, quality, flexibility, reliability and customer control.Maintain adequate inventory of parts.Work with other managers/supervisors to identify problem items and develop solutions.Support and motivate associates to achieve facility goals.Ensure training of the department is complete and adherence to personnel and equipment SOPs and other regulatory requirements.Monitor the quality of the group; Participate in the annual evaluation/review of associates.Estimate costs associated with given PM's and projects.Manage outside contractors ensuring safe operation while onsite.Executes plans and prioritize jobs to their importance. Considerations include: Safety, Operations, Impact and then others.Maintain and implement preventative maintenance and calibration programs in accordance with SOPs, cGMPs and industry expectations.On call 24/7 to handle emergency calls: burglar alarms, fire alarms, and facility(s) issues.Provides troubleshooting support as needed.Effectively communicates with clients and internal groups.Other duties as assigned. Education and Experience:BS in engineering with 3+ year's applicable experience, preferably including a minimum of 2 years supervisory experience.We invite all qualified applicants to apply. We offer competitive salary, a comprehensive benefits package and opportunity for advancement.Alcami is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of age, race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.",Manager,Full Time,"Germantown, WI",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Manager-Maintenance-Facilities-Job-Germantown-WI-US-165813148.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=4,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),434efa5e4190d70b13252ec363d91a4d
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:22:09:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview:JN Phillips Is Looking For Talented, Dedicated Individuals Who Share Our Commitment To Providing Outstanding Service.J.N. Phillips Auto Glass is currently seeking qualified candidates for opportunities at many locations in MA, CT and NY.  Whether you have technician experience or you’re seeking an outstanding opportunity as a trainee, if you’re willing to roll up your sleeves to master the trade this may be just what you’re looking for.   A career in auto glass with JN Phillips offers great growth and earning potential and benefits.Responsibilities of Auto Glass Technicians and Technician TraineesAs a Trainee you'll participate in our glass tech training program.  Once you master the required skills to remove and replace auto glass, you'll drive a company van to serve customers as assigned.  Our Glass Technicians use the latest tools to remove and install auto glass, including front and rear windshields and other vehicle windows.  You'll meet our customers, apply your skills and your detail orientation to provide excellent service, and you’ll be there in person to ensure customer satisfaction.  You'll use the latest technology to enter order information and complete transactions.  This is an opportunity to learn a valuable, hands-on trade, to work independently, to be an integral member of our team, part of a company known for our commitment to customers, safety and quality.   We're looking for dependable team players who take pride in their work, show initiative and who care about providing customers with excellent service. Candidates should have the following:High School Diploma or GED A valid driver’s license and reliable personal transportation Ability to lift and carry objects weighing up to 75 lbs. Ability to operate various hand and power tools Strong interpersonal skills Attention to detail   Ability to work the posted schedule and flexibility to work other hours as needed Ability to successfully complete pre-employment requirements including drug screen, driving record check and background check JN Phillips offers competitive benefits including medical, dental, life and long term disability insurance as well as paid vacation, paid sick days, a 401k, and more.JN PHillips is an equal opportunity employer    ",Auto Glass Technician / Technician Trainee Job in Chicopee,Employee,"Chicopee, MA 01020",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Auto-Glass-Technician-Technician-Trainee-Job-Chicopee-MA-US-163985890.aspx?mescoid=4900867001001&jobPosition=14,,,c0c0767b43dcbd5602fc7380695d6aee
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:22:54:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking ambitious and personable candidates to serve as Pest Control Technicians. You will make service calls to residential customers and apply anti-pest treatments as outlined in job orders. In addition, you will identify opportunities to up-sell additional products and services – and receive additional commission income for doing so. This is a fantastic opportunity for you to start a career right out of high school with comprehensive paid training and plenty of room for advancement. We’ll even help you to get your licensure / certification! Come and see why so many of our employees have made Terminix their career home. We’re looking forward to hearing from you! This position is within our Terminix brand. ServiceMaster is a leading provider of essential residential and commercial services, operating through an extensive service network of more than 8,000 company-owned locations and franchise and license agreements. The company’s portfolio of well-recognized brands includes American Home Shield (home warranties), AmeriSpec (home inspections), Furniture Medic (furniture repair), Merry Maids (residential cleaning), ServiceMaster Clean (janitorial), ServiceMaster Restore (disaster restoration) and Terminix (termite and pest control). The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tenn. Go to www.servicemaster.com for more information about ServiceMaster or follow the company at twitter.com/ServiceMaster or Facebook.com/ServiceMaster. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: * Apply pesticides to structures according to schedule, safety procedures and label instructions. * Drive company vehicle to customers’ houses or places of business. * Call customers to confirm scheduled services. * Respond on a timely basis to customers’ requests for telephone and in-person service calls. * Complete required production forms at end of day. * Maintain vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. * Assist in sales to current customers. * Other duties as assigned. SUMMARY: At Terminix®, our people bring tremendous pride and integrity to everything we do. In turn, we provide a working environment where these skilled professionals can achieve true satisfaction in their own lives. We are proud to offer our exceptional associates competitive compensation, comprehensive benefits and outstanding opportunities for professional development. If you're committed to providing the highest level of customer service, we have an ideal opportunity for you. In this position, you will apply company product to customers’ structures according to schedule and as needed based on service requests. QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE: High school diploma or general education degree (GED); One to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. LANGUAGE SKILLS: * Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. * Ability to write simple correspondence. * Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. MATHEMATICAL SKILLS: * Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals. * Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS: * Licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. At Terminix, people come for a job and stay for a career. As a Terminix associate, you’ll enjoy excellent compensation and benefits as well as the opportunity for the professional growth and respect that comes from working for an industry leader. Qualified candidates must have a high school diploma or general education degree (GED). [We] perform criminal background checks, motor vehicle record checks and drug screening. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Pest Control Technician – Field Service Rep (Entry Level) Job in Bothell,"Full Time, Employee","Bothell, WA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Pest-Control-Technician-%E2%80%93-Field-Service-Rep-Entry-Level-Job-Bothell-WA-US-165828866.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=4,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,fb27991fd4d7596ed5770672884d7e0a
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:22:55:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sears Home Improvement Products and Services, a member of the Sears Holdings Corporation (NASDAQ: SHLD) family of companies, is one of America's largest home improvement companies for siding and windows installation with operations in 45 states. Our products include siding, custom manufactured and installed windows, custom home entry doors, kitchen remodeling, custom cabinet refacing and Heating Ventilation and Air Conditioning (HVAC).Join the Sears Home Services team as an HVAC Service Technician!This position has a Sign on Bonus$3000 for HVAC Master License$2000 for HVAC Journeyman LicenseReceive half within 1st 30 days of employment and the other half after 6 months.**MD Journeyman/ MD Master license required**No On Call Work! No Sundays! Join Us Today!  Are you looking for a role that offers you an opportunity to be a part of a dynamic, innovative organization? Then, we have the opportunity for you at Sears. The brand your family has trusted for over 150 years! New culture, New branding, New YOU!  We are seeking an experienced HVAC Service Technician with a great attitude and the ability to help customers with their in-home repairs. This is an exciting opportunity to join the Sears family! Apply today!HVAC Service Technician – Repair Technician – Appliance MaintenanceBenefitsAt Sears, we provide competitive pay and ongoing training in a collaborative, supportive, and team-oriented setting. In the repair technician role, you will enjoy working independently as a representative of a leading retailer and in-home service provider.For the In-Home Service Technician, we provide the following:• Service van• Specialized tools• Uniforms• Laptop computer• Smartphone• Home dispatched (most locations)• Industry training• Various incentive plans• Career opportunitiesPlease take a moment and view our “day in a life of a repair technician video” at this link: Click here to See yourself at sears (Appliance Tech video)  QualificationsJob ResponsibilitiesAs an HVAC Service & Repair Technician, you will have the opportunity to repair ofcustomers' products (Heat Pumps, Heating Ventilation and Air Conditioning, Gasand Oil Furnaces & Boilers) while maintaining the highest level of customerservice. HVAC Service Tech responsibilities include:• Providing timely and quality repairs of customers’ products• Maintaining high-quality customer service and care• Promoting and selling additional products and services• Meeting key performance metrics and/or productivity goals• Providing knowledgeable and courteous repair service• Looking for ways to improve business performance and enhance the customer experience• Communicating benefits of the Value Added Services Process to the customer• Maintaining truck stock inventory within the prescribed company guidelines and standards• Following the truck maintenance schedule and keeping a clean, organized truckHVAC Service Technician – Repair Technician – Appliance MaintenanceJob RequirementsAs an HVAC Service Technician, you must be highly organized and possess excellent communication skills. We are seeking a dedicated team player who is able to ensure fast, flexible, and expert service to every customer via excellent time management skills.Requirements of the Service Technician role include:Ideal candidates will have 2+ years' experience in HVAC service and repair. Strongtroubleshooting and problem solving skills required. • CFC Certification & MD Journeyman License is required (applicants holding a master-level trade/occupational license(s), ie HVAC/Mechanical, Electrical, General Contractor, Plumbing may be used to qualify or given hiring preference and additional compensation based on business needs)• High school diploma or general education degree (GED)• Working mechanical knowledge, including the use of tools and test equipment• Ability to perform accurate repair of customer product• Must complete all technician training elements within required timeframes• Ability to follow directions and specific process steps to ensure quality workmanship• Flexibility to work variable and flexible hours, including overtime• Ability to use a computer for parts inquiries and ordering• Must possess and maintain a valid state driver’s license• Must pass pre-employment drug screen and criminal background checkJoin the Sears Home Service family!Apply today! EOE Minorities / Females / Protected Veterans / Disabled",HVAC Journeyman/ Master Service Tech ( Charles County,Full Time,"La Plata, MD 20646",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Journeyman-Master-Service-Tech-Charles-County-MD-Job-La-Plata-MD-US-164869689.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=9,Commensurate with Experience,Experienced (Non-Manager),1d6bbca6fb4b8fd45ab2ed9cbe663c6e
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:23:50:42,No,jobs.monster.com,LANDSCAPE AND MOWING Marengo based landscape & mowing company seeking applicants for labor positions. F/T or P/T Great opportunity for right person. Starting wage based on exp. (614) 450-0738 This listing brought to you by ThisWeek Community News and www.columbusjobs.com/monster.,Laborers Job in Marengo,Full Time,"Marengo, OH 43334",Personal and Household Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Laborers-Job-Marengo-OH-US-165938396.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=11,,Entry Level,bb25ee35884ebba053b1349843f91e67
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:23:51:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking a talented and dedicated Maintenance Technician! Continental Properties Company, Inc. is looking for the absolute best and brightest to join our team of dedicated professionals as a Maintenance Technician at our beautiful Springs at Essex Farms residential apartment community in Charleston, SC. This position is empowered by the Maintenance Supervisor and Property Manager to deliver the highest quality customer service and provide an unmatched level of personal attention to residents. Our Maintenance Technicians have the opportunity to address and respond to our resident's service needs and are instrumental in maintaining the facility operations at their community. What you'll do:Provide direct support to our Maintenance SupervisorUtilize your troubleshooting skills to respond to a wide variety of residential service requests in a timely and professional mannerPrepare apartment homes for rent by performing various repairs in HVAC, electrical, plumbing, pool, carpentry, dry wall, building exteriors, and appliancesEnsure that any unresolved maintenance issues or concerns are reported to the Maintenance Supervisor What we need:EPA and CPO certifications and substantial knowledge and experience repairing plumbing, pool, carpentry, dry wall, building exteriors, and appliancesDedication to exceeding the needs of all customers with an ability to build and maintain relationshipsAbility to use electronic communication professionally and efficiently, with previous experience in Onesite, Ops Technology, and Compliance Depot preferredDemonstrate thoroughness, accuracy, and organization when accomplishing tasksAbility to work a non-traditional schedule including evenings, weekends and on-call hours Still Undecided?Continental rewards hard work! Our total rewards package is designed to recognize individual and team performance.Exceptional company culture that encourages innovation and empowers leaders by providing the care, training, and tools critical to successCompetitive base salary with a superior resident renewal bonus programIndustry-leading compensation and benefits package including Gold and Platinum Medical Plan options, flexible spending accounts for medical and dependent care, 401(k) with company match and company provided life and disability insuranceA customized online training program and on-the-job mentoring to help you build upon your skillset and excel in the industryWorld-class work environment (Class A luxury communities) with potential for long-term career growth and advancementGenerous rent discount programPaid holidays and generous vacation time; summer hours include four paid half days to use during the summer months Continental Properties Company, Inc. is a proven, dynamic and diverse national real estate development company. Over our 35 year history, we have grown from a small real estate company to a major presence in the development industry, operating in more than 23 different states. Continental is committed to providing the best benefits in the business and fostering a collegial environment where autonomy and teamwork intersect to create the opportunity for you to do what you do best every day. Do you have talent, ambition and drive? Are you ready to work with some of the most talented professionals in the real estate development industry? If so, please submit your resume and cover letter today! Continental has been certified by The Good Jobs.Click the badges below to learn what makes us a great place to work! Continental Properties Company, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. For the benefit of our residents, the communities we serve, and our co-workers, all applicants are required to pass a post-offer drug screen and background check prior to joining the Continental team.",Maintenance Technician - Charleston,Full Time,"Charleston, SC",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Charleston-SC-320-994-Job-Charleston-SC-US-165171919.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=1,,,c37827c9bd5dfcd64b957c4ba8a5670e
United States of America,US,05/Jun/2016:23:59:46,No,jobs.monster.com," In 2014, The Brickman Group and ValleyCrestjoined forces to create BrightView, a landscape services company designed to deliver world-class landscape architecture, construction, maintenance, and everything in between. We’re on the path to blending our organizations onto one powerhouse with a new name and a fresh direction. Brickman and ValleyCrest is committed to develop and reward our diverse workforce with trust, honesty, respect, teamwork, excellence and an overall culture of caring. Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following (other duties may be assigned):Assist in grading and soil preparationPlanting trees, shrubs, groundcover, seeding and sod placementUtilize small power equipment such as rototillers, chainsaws, power augersGeneral landscape equipmentUse hand tools such as shovels, pick, rakes and other manually controlled equipmentImplementation of erosion controlAble to work well with other in a team environment and follow directionsSafety orientated However, union membership is neither required nor preferred in order to be referred by the union for further consideration or in order to be hired. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate based on an individual’s status as a protected class member. If you are interested in applying for this position and require assistance with the application process please let our front office staff know. We offer Medical and Dental benefits and 401(k) plan! Apply now for IMMEDIATE consideration!  ",Landscaper - Union AND Non Union Laborer Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,94588,All,http://jobview.monster.com/Landscaper-Union-Non-Union-Laborer-Job-US-165854665.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=9,,Entry Level,e81854d46f88c69b9afe4529994a1ce8
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:05:52:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"We currently have an opening for a temporary to hire Customer Service Professional located in Cincinnati, OH.  Customer Service Representative:• Process orders received by telephone, e-mail, fax, or other electronic measures.• Respond to inbound calls received for area and overflow for other regions (back up)• Respond to inbound customer e-mails.• Provide product and/or customer cross information to assist in customer selections.• Ensure consistent deliveries through coordination with other departments.• Route special requirements through the appropriate departments for approval.• Process any special paperwork needed to assist in the quote, order, or return process.• CRM data entry/updates• Back-up receptionist/telephone operator for daily breaks, lunch & meetings.  Assist with incoming calls, incoming/outgoing faxes, greeting visitors, and assisting with any projects while covering the board.Skills:  • High School diploma or equivalent. • Two years of experience with order entry in a manufacturing environment experience strongly preferred.  • SAP knowledge preferred, but not required.• Experience on multi-line switchboard strongly preferred.• Ability to effectively communicate with customers and co-employees at all levels, in both verbal and written form.  • Regular interaction with all internal departments.• Courteous telephone etiquette.  • Ability to deal effectively with a variety of personalities and situations requiring tact, judgment, and poise• Strong technical aptitude and ability to become intimately familiar with products• Good organization and follow-up skills required• Possess the ability to manage and prioritize multiple tasks, assignments and projects simultaneously.• Ability to work both independently and as part of a team to support growth• Working knowledge of Excel and Word.• Bi-lingual skills in Spanish or German is always a plus. If you meet the requirements for this position and are interested in this TEMP TO HIRE opportunity, please apply now at www.accountingprincipals.com  ;",Customer Service Representative Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Cincinnati, OH 45216",,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174956748.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=9,,Customer Support/Client Care,bfb908a2d9b8db5aed288c69f9c506a0
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:06:19:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"91D Power-Generation Equipment Repairer Job ID: 778917 Job Views: 279 Location: CINCINNATI, Ohio, United States ZIP Code: 45215 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 10.19.2016 Job DescriptionAdd power to your resume in the Army National Guard's Power-Generation Equipment Repairer specialty.As a Power-Generation Equipment Repairer, you will ensure that the Army National Guard keeps receiving the electricity it needs to continue serving the Nation. This will be accomplished by maintaining and repairing electricity-generating equipment in mobile and stationary power plants.Through training and practice in this specialty, you will develop technical skills that are in demand by today's employers. These skills include: generator and power plant operations; electrical generation and distribution; diesel generator operation, disassembly, inspection, and maintenance; and principles of electrical and electronic circuitry. By joining the Army National Guard, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career as a power plant electrician.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Power-Generation Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and approximately 12 weeks of Advanced Individual Training, including practice in maintaining electrical power systems. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",D Power-Generation Equipment Repairer Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"91D Power-Generation Equipment Repairer Job ID: 778917 Job Views: 279 Location: CINCINNATI, Ohio, United States ZIP Code: 45215 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 10.19.2016 Job DescriptionAdd power to your resume in the Army National Guard's Power-Generation Equipment Repairer specialty.As a Power-Generation Equipment Repairer, you will ensure that the Army National Guard keeps receiving the electricity it needs to continue serving the Nation. This will be accomplished by maintaining and repairing electricity-generating equipment in mobile and stationary power plants.Through training and practice in this specialty, you will develop technical skills that are in demand by today's employers. These skills include: generator and power plant operations; electrical generation and distribution; diesel generator operation, disassembly, inspection, and maintenance; and principles of electrical and electronic circuitry. By joining the Army National Guard, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career as a power plant electrician.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Power-Generation Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and approximately 12 weeks of Advanced Individual Training, including practice in maintaining electrical power systems. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/91d-power-generation-equipment-repairer-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174492526.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=11,,Entry Level,70c3eaf30a3a39266c4a55090a2b8e85
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:06:56:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: With a role in the Macy’s Cosmetics Department, you will have the opportunity to help others look their best every day. You’ll make one-on-one connections with customers to learn their sense of beauty and style, develop your artistic side through customer consultation and make-up and product application, and attain a sense of accomplishment when your skills combine with your passion for beauty to reach personal and team sales goals. Previous cosmetics experience is nice to have, but is not required to begin a career in beauty at Macy’s. Performs other duties as assigned. The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here. In order to present our customers with the best holiday shopping experience, many of our Seasonal Cosmetics Beauty Advisors arrive prior to store opening and remain after closing to ensure we are ready to make Macy's magic. Seasonal associates will have the opportunity to work a flexible schedule on a temporary basis, which may include early mornings, evenings, weekends and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving and the day after Christmas. And don't forget - just in time for holiday shopping, you will receive an employee discount of up to 20% starting your first day! Essential Functions:Assist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment by demonstrating proficient use of proprietary devices and applications; proactively create enhanced shopping experiences through the heightened use of tools, technology and collaborationPartner with Sales Manager and Counter Manager to identify business driving opportunities and stock needs Develop a repeat-business customer base in order to regularly communicate: upcoming events, new merchandise receipts and product replenishment to increase incremental salesParticipate in pre-selling and sales driving events as well as processing of new receipts, damages, testers, and return to vendors (RTVs)Attend product training classes and seminars Regular, dependable attendance & punctuality Qualifications: Education /ExperienceHigh school diploma or equivalent. Previous cosmetic or fragrance sales experience a plus Communication SkillsAbility to read, write, and interpret labels including warnings and ingredient lists on products. Ability to effectively communicate with and present information to customers, vendors, buyers, peers, and all levels of management Mathematical SkillsBasic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to calculate percentages and ratios. Must be able to make change using American Monetary units. Other SkillsSuperior organizational and time management skills. Must be able to build relationships and influence others. Ability to set and achieve goals. Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment. Must possess a strong sense of urgency and a thirst for knowledge. Must be able to lead by example. Work HoursAbility to work a flexible schedule including days, nights, weekends, holidays, and sales events, based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy’s, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.Primary Location:United States-Kentucky-FlorenceJob:Cosmetics Sales.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Seasonal Holiday Retail Cosmetics - Beauty Advisor** Full Time: Macy's Florence Mall Job in Florence,Full Time Employee,"Florence, KY",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-retail-cosmetics-beauty-advisor-full-time-macy's-florence-mall-job-florence-ky-us-175113466.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=16,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,593642d74db4f2b6f2bedea4e1450195
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:06:58:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Visual MerchandiserDepartment: Remote - Store OperationsReports to: Visual ManagerFLSA Classification: Non-ExemptDirect Reports: NoLocation: U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Visual Merchandiser will oversee the styling, processing and placement of merchandise to ensure that all merchandise are aesthetically pleasing and set according to company standards and guidelines. Through the creation of long-term strategies and leading company initiatives, the Visual Merchandiser will ensure maximum productivity, profitability, operational excellence and compliance with company procedures to create the highest quality in-store experience.  Deliverables: Support daily merchandising, styling, floor set planning and execution, replenishment, launches, updates, planning and execution, shipment, zero selling reports, loss prevention, and serviceAssist in generating and analyzing field merchandise reports (Zero Seller, Department Performance) and makes necessary product placement/adjustments based on selling and field merchandise reportsReview and respond to all emails and corporate visual communications dailyFollow company practices by maintaining the standard of the stock room by ensuring a neat, clean and organized roomEnsure floor is replenished per company guidelines which includes following up with staff to ensure accuracyTrain, coach, and direct Associates on merchandise handling, shipment processing, merchandise presentation, and visual techniques as neededVerify stockroom and stockroom activities meet safety requirements which consists of reporting any employee accidentsPartner with the leadership team to make product placement adjustments based on selling, inventory ownership, and merchandising reportsEnsure all delivery information is accurately reported to verify all shipment‐related paperwork meet audit requirementsPerforms Leader on Duty tasks as neededKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must be at least 18 years old with a high school diploma or equivalent. College degree or relevant technical or vocational training preferredMust have at least 2 years of retail experience. Prior supervisory or management experience preferredMust be skilled in strategic planning and customer serviceMust be able to provide feedback, develop others, embrace and lead change, and make clear and defined decisionsMust have excellent interpersonal skills and be able act with integrity and professionalism to ensure that all business is conducted without bias or prejudiceMust be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicalsMust be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shiftsAt Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 22404 Division : Field - Region : Central Location : 0767 - XXI - Polaris Fashion Place, Columbus OH US 43240 Job Type : Full Time",Visual Merchandiser - Polaris Fashion Place # Job in Columbus,"Full Time , Employee","Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Visual MerchandiserDepartment: Remote - Store OperationsReports to: Visual ManagerFLSA Classification: Non-ExemptDirect Reports: NoLocation: U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Visual Merchandiser will oversee the styling, processing and placement of merchandise to ensure that all merchandise are aesthetically pleasing and set according to company standards and guidelines. Through the creation of long-term strategies and leading company initiatives, the Visual Merchandiser will ensure maximum productivity, profitability, operational excellence and compliance with company procedures to create the highest quality in-store experience.  Deliverables: Support daily merchandising, styling, floor set planning and execution, replenishment, launches, updates, planning and execution, shipment, zero selling reports, loss prevention, and serviceAssist in generating and analyzing field merchandise reports (Zero Seller, Department Performance) and makes necessary product placement/adjustments based on selling and field merchandise reportsReview and respond to all emails and corporate visual communications dailyFollow company practices by maintaining the standard of the stock room by ensuring a neat, clean and organized roomEnsure floor is replenished per company guidelines which includes following up with staff to ensure accuracyTrain, coach, and direct Associates on merchandise handling, shipment processing, merchandise presentation, and visual techniques as neededVerify stockroom and stockroom activities meet safety requirements which consists of reporting any employee accidentsPartner with the leadership team to make product placement adjustments based on selling, inventory ownership, and merchandising reportsEnsure all delivery information is accurately reported to verify all shipment‐related paperwork meet audit requirementsPerforms Leader on Duty tasks as neededKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must be at least 18 years old with a high school diploma or equivalent. College degree or relevant technical or vocational training preferredMust have at least 2 years of retail experience. Prior supervisory or management experience preferredMust be skilled in strategic planning and customer serviceMust be able to provide feedback, develop others, embrace and lead change, and make clear and defined decisionsMust have excellent interpersonal skills and be able act with integrity and professionalism to ensure that all business is conducted without bias or prejudiceMust be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicalsMust be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shiftsAt Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 22404 Division : Field - Region : Central Location : 0767 - XXI - Polaris Fashion Place, Columbus OH US 43240 Job Type : Full Time",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/visual-merchandiser-polaris-fashion-place-767-job-columbus-oh-us-175269385.aspx?mescoid=2700412001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2296b5c5394cb91a7bab1f8f918eb6aa
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:07:49:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines   Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in Loveland,Part Time Employee,"Loveland, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-loveland-oh-us-175170331.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=3,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,78e4bcce6a300840c3c3f92ea47f74c9
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:08:00:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: Responsible for assisting the Payroll Manager and directing the processing/auditing/reconciliation of on-cycle payrolls for multiple companies and multiple frequencies, including computing wage and overtime payments, calculating and recording payroll taxes/deductions, and processing requests for off-cycle payments and final pays. Provide daily leadership and guidance to direct reports. Perform other duties as assigned. This position is based out of Springdale, OH. Essential Functions: •Assists in the entry of all payroll adjustments submitted from various sources for both on & off-cycle processing, assists in the closing and balancing of all inbound file feeds prior to calculating payroll, researches and resolves all final issues prior to confirming payroll.•Provides customer service to business partners on payroll related matters that requires research and policy interpretation.•Coordinates and directs the auditing/balancing and reconciliation of weekly, quarterly & annual reports and assists manager with the preparation/production of tax forms.•Coordinates and directs the creation and/or balancing of various outbound files and reports and preforms various reconciliations upon the completion of payroll.•Trains and coaches employees; writes and administers performance appraisals for payroll reps, prioritizes & directs work, resolves issues, and oversees staff in the completion of required functions.•Interprets guidelines for processing/calculating tax withholdings, deductions, adjustments and/or payments for FLSA, AED, garnishments, relocation, arrears, stock & ECU, and other imputed income items.•Create intermediate level queries used in the production of reports for balancing/reconciliation.•Regular, dependable attendance & punctuality. Qualifications: Education/Experience: • Associates degree or 5 years of related experience. Communication Skills: • Ability to read, write and interpret instructional documents such as reports and procedure manuals. • Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Mathematical Skills: • Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Reasoning Ability: • Must be able to work independently with minimal supervision.• Analytical, detail oriented, with the ability to multi-task to meet deadlines. Physical Demands: • This position involves extended periods of sitting and the extensive use of computer and the office equipment. May involve stooping, kneeling, or crouching. • Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment. Other Skills: • Ability to problem-solve, make sound decisions and exercise good judgment. • Ability to handle stress in a high volume production environment.• Ability to interpret and respond to legal documents. • Proficient in MS Word and Excel. Coach and develop staff. • Write annual performance reviews. • Confidentiality of sensitive information. • Knowledge of People Soft, Kronos, TIA and Credit systems. • Fundamental Payroll Certification (FPC) or Certified Payroll Professional (CPP) designation. Work Hours: • Ability to work a flexible schedule based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. Macy’s Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.Primary Location:United States-Ohio-SpringdaleJob:Payroll.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",Payroll Lead II Job in Springdale,Full Time Employee,"Springdale, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-lead-ii-job-springdale-oh-us-175254452.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=12,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,2a74dddc3023d9ee9c30f25499a24caa
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:08:01:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you enjoy helping others? Are you the “go to person” at work or in your community? Would your friends and family describe you as friendly and resourceful?  We really should talk . . .     The Skills You Bring     Caring about the well-being of customers and associates is at our core, and we want to talk to people who share our passion.  Yes, we are in financial services, but not in the competitive and old-fashioned way you might be thinking.  At Fidelity, customer service is our top priority.  We will teach you the industry but your unwavering commitment to customers and colleagues comes naturally.     The Expertise We’re Looking For   Relationship building skills Commitment to customers Experience in service, healthcare, or hospitality in people facing industries are strongly preferred.   This is a full time hourly position that offers the opportunity for overtime based on the business needs and your availability.     The Purpose of Your Role     You bring your passion, we’ll invest in you.  We offer an industry-leading, paid development program that will prepare you to engage with customers while obtaining your Series 7 and 63 licenses where you will learn all about the financial services industry products.   These inbound phone calls, chats, and email interactions can range from something as simple as an account balance inquiry to the complexity of helping inform difficult financial decisions, but your mission remains the same:  help customers feel more confident, make clearer decisions, and achieve their own financial dreams.      The Value You Deliver     At Fidelity, collaboration isn’t just about working together in our small teams (12-15); it’s about improving lives together.  Our success as a firm is due to the personal responsibility and pride our associates take in getting things just right, and the compassion that drives us to go the extra mile for our customers and each other.  We ask for and act on our associates’ input on everything from busting through customer issues to designing our workspaces.      Your Life     We believe that a balanced life is important. Our benefit programs are designed to help you and your loved ones balance the needs of work, life and family.  Sound too good to be true?  See for yourself and learn more about our benefits offerings: Total Benefits Flyer     Click here for a news story about how we are helping our employees payback their student loan debt:        Fidelity Investments was recognized as the Glassdoor Candidates’ Choice Awards for 2015 and CareerBliss 50 Happiest Companies in 2015.       Apply now to learn more! Company Overview   At Fidelity, we are focused on making our financial expertise broadly accessible and effective in helping people live the lives they want. To do this well, as a privately held company, we place a high degree of value in nurturing a work environment that attracts the best talent and reflects our commitment to being an employer of choice. For information about working at Fidelity, visit Fidelitycareers.com   Fidelity Investments is an equal opportunity employer",Customer Relationship Advocate- Video Included,Full Time,"Covington, KY 41011",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-relationship-advocate-video-included-covington-ky-job-covington-ky-us-174408344.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=2,,Entry Level,f90d1236d640df2d38332f10d12e4654
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:08:59:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Splunk EngineerOur ideal candidate will:Document all development activityAssist with training application and infrastructure teams not familiar with SplunkHave in-depth experience, knowledge and skills in their own disciplineAct as a resource for colleagues with less experienceThis position will work closely with Infrastructure, Application, and Business Intelligence teams getting started with SplunkResponsibilities include:Grow and improve the enterprise Splunk environment from early stages to a mature implementationSupport large-scale deployments across multiple AWS regions, with data feeds from multiple on premise data centersMonitor and maintain Splunk performance, availability, and capacitySplunk administration; including version upgrades, permissions, and audit complianceDevelop reliable, efficient queries that will feed custom alerts and dashboardsTrack work effectively via Agile methodsCreate and maintain documentation related to architecture and operational processes for SplunkDefine processes for engagement and RACI modelsEngage application and infrastructure teams to establish best practices for utilizing Splunk data and visualizationsMentor members of the technical staff to support and assist in Splunk-related activitiesMaintain regulatory awareness and compliancePreferred Skills/Experience:4+ years hands-on experience with distributed Splunk administrationExperience with Amazon Web ServicesMust be proficient in Splunk Processing LanguageStrong technical acumen and understanding of multiple operating systems (Windows, Linux, Unix, etc.) and technical platforms (networks, firewalls, storage, virtualization, etc.).Experience Python or PerlExposure to database/big data technologies a plusI.SQL, MySQL, OracleII.No-SQL databases (Cassandra, Mongodb, Redis)III.HadoopExperience with CSS/HTML & Java-script a plusExperience with ServiceNow is a plusExcellent written and oral communication skillsWork Location:Columbus, OH; Chicago, IL, or Remote (Needs to work Eastern Time)Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Monitoring Engineer Job in Columbus,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Job Title: Splunk EngineerOur ideal candidate will:Document all development activityAssist with training application and infrastructure teams not familiar with SplunkHave in-depth experience, knowledge and skills in their own disciplineAct as a resource for colleagues with less experienceThis position will work closely with Infrastructure, Application, and Business Intelligence teams getting started with SplunkResponsibilities include:Grow and improve the enterprise Splunk environment from early stages to a mature implementationSupport large-scale deployments across multiple AWS regions, with data feeds from multiple on premise data centersMonitor and maintain Splunk performance, availability, and capacitySplunk administration; including version upgrades, permissions, and audit complianceDevelop reliable, efficient queries that will feed custom alerts and dashboardsTrack work effectively via Agile methodsCreate and maintain documentation related to architecture and operational processes for SplunkDefine processes for engagement and RACI modelsEngage application and infrastructure teams to establish best practices for utilizing Splunk data and visualizationsMentor members of the technical staff to support and assist in Splunk-related activitiesMaintain regulatory awareness and compliancePreferred Skills/Experience:4+ years hands-on experience with distributed Splunk administrationExperience with Amazon Web ServicesMust be proficient in Splunk Processing LanguageStrong technical acumen and understanding of multiple operating systems (Windows, Linux, Unix, etc.) and technical platforms (networks, firewalls, storage, virtualization, etc.).Experience Python or PerlExposure to database/big data technologies a plusI.SQL, MySQL, OracleII.No-SQL databases (Cassandra, Mongodb, Redis)III.HadoopExperience with CSS/HTML & Java-script a plusExperience with ServiceNow is a plusExcellent written and oral communication skillsWork Location:Columbus, OH; Chicago, IL, or Remote (Needs to work Eastern Time)Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Columbus, OH",http://jobview.monster.com/monitoring-engineer-job-columbus-oh-us-175199067.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=3,,IT/Software Development,610dfec248a62a966851e02b3d734b78
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:09:00:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Position:  Case ManagerSupervisor:  Program Director, Case Coordinator or Director of Clinical ServicesLocation:  Springdale, OH Position Qualifications: 21 Years of Age A Bachelors degree in a human services related field Must hold a valid OH LSW or LPC license Valid Drivers License Minimum of 2 Years experience in the human services field Successful completion of all required criminal background checks Travel/Training willingness Position Requirements: Facilitate and develop each child’s Initial Service Plan and Comprehensive Treatment Plan Facilitate completion of each child’s Diagnostic Assessment of Functioning (DAF) Complete all required documentation for youth files Assist foster parents and the foster child with the implementation, tracking, and monitoring of the Initial Service Plan and Comprehensive Plan Rotation of the Crisis Phone Serve as a communications liaison with referring agencies Provide visits to youth and foster parents according to the Ohio State Regulations and county contractual guidelines Ensure that the following documentation is complete and in each child’s file: Student Information Sheet Diagnostic Assessment of Functioning Medical Documentation Initial Service Plan Comprehensive Treatment Plan Monthly Progress Reports Discharge Summaries and Aftercare Plan Staff Notes, Documentation of Communication Documentation of interaction with the youth Documentation of Critical Incident Reports Documentation of Behavioral Reports Independent Living Assessments (if applicable) Attend and participate in self-directed team meetings and activities Accept additional tasks from self-directed work team as appropriate Provide transportation for youth as needed Maintain and update databases as required Participate in quarterly Quality Assurance file reviews Complete and submit Medicaid documentation as appropriate Responsibilities of Every Corporate Citizen: Understanding and Implementing Hobbs’ Principles Understanding and Practicing Meritocracy Understanding and Practicing Shared Vision Understanding and Practicing Business Intelligence (Egghead) Understanding and Practicing Customer Service Understanding and Practicing Team Learning (Sacrifice and Assist) Understanding and Practicing Transparency Understanding and Practicing Wellness Understanding and Practicing Progressive Leadership Achieving Personal Mastery Report","Necco Job Application for Foster Care Case Manager | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":",Full Time,"Position:  Case ManagerSupervisor:  Program Director, Case Coordinator or Director of Clinical ServicesLocation:  Springdale, OH Position Qualifications: 21 Years of Age A Bachelors degree in a human services related field Must hold a valid OH LSW or LPC license Valid Drivers License Minimum of 2 Years experience in the human services field Successful completion of all required criminal background checks Travel/Training willingness Position Requirements: Facilitate and develop each child’s Initial Service Plan and Comprehensive Treatment Plan Facilitate completion of each child’s Diagnostic Assessment of Functioning (DAF) Complete all required documentation for youth files Assist foster parents and the foster child with the implementation, tracking, and monitoring of the Initial Service Plan and Comprehensive Plan Rotation of the Crisis Phone Serve as a communications liaison with referring agencies Provide visits to youth and foster parents according to the Ohio State Regulations and county contractual guidelines Ensure that the following documentation is complete and in each child’s file: Student Information Sheet Diagnostic Assessment of Functioning Medical Documentation Initial Service Plan Comprehensive Treatment Plan Monthly Progress Reports Discharge Summaries and Aftercare Plan Staff Notes, Documentation of Communication Documentation of interaction with the youth Documentation of Critical Incident Reports Documentation of Behavioral Reports Independent Living Assessments (if applicable) Attend and participate in self-directed team meetings and activities Accept additional tasks from self-directed work team as appropriate Provide transportation for youth as needed Maintain and update databases as required Participate in quarterly Quality Assurance file reviews Complete and submit Medicaid documentation as appropriate Responsibilities of Every Corporate Citizen: Understanding and Implementing Hobbs’ Principles Understanding and Practicing Meritocracy Understanding and Practicing Shared Vision Understanding and Practicing Business Intelligence (Egghead) Understanding and Practicing Customer Service Understanding and Practicing Team Learning (Sacrifice and Assist) Understanding and Practicing Transparency Understanding and Practicing Wellness Understanding and Practicing Progressive Leadership Achieving Personal Mastery",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/foster-care-case-manager-job-springdale-oh-us-174847903.aspx?mescoid=1100053001001&jobPosition=14,,,72ce0b14d3e41c5dfd5eb88e9ffc38ac
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:09:47:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: The Purchasing Catalog Coordinator will analyze catalog usage and vendor compliance to contract terms. Review contracts for pricing to ensure accuracy/consistency of all catalog parts. Conduct audits with suppliers to ensure pricing accuracy. Coordinate set up of program changes to ensure no obsolescence exposure due to existing inventory in old programs. Support and coordinate Customer Service and Sourcing initiatives to ensure program success. Maintain and ensure compliance to all audit standards. Perform other duties as assigned. This position is based out of Springdale, OH. Essential Functions: • Review all Buyer and Supplier requests for catalog changes for accuracy and compliance to Audit and Contract guidelines• Ensure catalog maintenance for existing information in MFA Oracle• Create new part items #s and catalog groups in MFA Oracle item maintenance tables• Review all invoicing issues- exception, open and unvouchered reports to resolve pricing, quantity and unit of measure issues to ensure payment within terms for all vendors.• Recommend and implement continual process and systemic improvement to streamline processes and improve integrity of catalog and timeliness and accuracy of all payments• Provide order input support to Sourcing and Operations teams; run upload files for centrally distributed orders• Regular, dependable attendance & punctuality. Qualifications: Education/Experience: • Bachelors Degree preferred. Macy’s MFA/Oracle experience; knowledge of Macy’s processes’ Communication Skills: • Ability to read, write and interpret instructional documents such as reports and procedure manuals. • Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Mathematical Skills: • Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Reasoning Ability: • Need to prioritize and make independent decisions. • Must be able to work independently with minimal supervision. Physical Demands: • This position involves extended periods of sitting and the extensive use of computer and the office equipment. May involve stooping, kneeling, or crouching. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment. Other Skills: • Ability to collaborate with internal/external partners during Implementation to determine and execute best course of action. Work Hours: • Ability to work a flexible schedule based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. Macy’s Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.Primary Location:United States-Ohio-SpringdaleJob:Purchasing.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",Purchasing Catalog Coordinator Job in Springdale,Full Time Employee,"Springdale, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/purchasing-catalog-coordinator-job-springdale-oh-us-175061703.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=14,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,7c752682cdc25129b259016dd1769748
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:09:47:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Position Information:Sales Support Representative position with a company that gives back and works one-on-one with families in your community. Hands-on training, competitive compensation, performance awards and incentives.We Need:Entry level and senior level applicant or applicant with business-to-business sales experience who wants to help people, gain experience and earn the money they need.You Will Help Your Community By:- Supporting the needs of people in the community- Managing relationships with new and existing customers- Providing customer service and communicationYou Only Need:- A high school diploma or equivalent- Be a people-person that likes interaction among others- Be independent-minded and flexible- Outstanding communication skillsWho Is Liberty National?We are Liberty National Life Insurance Company. We have been helping working-class people fulfill their benefit needs since 1900. That's over 100 years of making a difference in lives of people across the United States.Apply NowApply here and see success testimonials at www.lnlcareers.com Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":"" //media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":"" //media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":"" //media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":"" //media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-4.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","Liberty National Insurance Company Job Application for Interviewing Right Now – Sales Position | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Phone 1-800-405-6514,All,http://jobview.monster.com/interviewing-right-now-%E2%80%93-sales-position-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174730918.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=17,,,e968b7c94e7d96627fc2200ba72125d8
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:10:04:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Peaceful and picturesque, Madonna Manor is located on 28 acres overlooking the Ohio River. Madonna Manor has been a leading Catholic senior living community in Northern Kentucky for more than 40 years. We currently have open positions for full-time, night-shift Licensed Practical Nurses to join our team.  Qualified candidates will be able to demonstrate a daily commitment to Madonna Manor’s values of Reverence, Service, and Stewardship. The candidate will be dependable with outstanding leadership skills. Benefits offered to employees include:•PTO for all full-time and part-time employees•Employer contributions to a 403(b) plan•Medical, dental, vision, life, short-term disability, and long-term disability insurance for all full-time employees Our team of Licensed Practical Nurses completes the following job responsibilities:•Promoting the values and practices of Person-Centered Care throughout daily life in the household.•Encouraging and assisting all residents in achieving spiritual well-being and an optimum quality of life.•Developing and maintaining a good working rapport with inter-departmental personnel, as well as other departments within the facility to ensure that nursing services and activities can be adequately maintained to meet the needs of the residents. Creating and maintaining an atmosphere of warmth, personal interest, and positive emphasis, as well as a calm environment throughout the unit and shift.•Directing the day-to-day functions of the nursing assistants in accordance with current rules, regulations, and guidelines that govern the long-term care facility, written policies, and procedures established by this facility.•Assisting physicians in reviewing resident treatment regime. Ensuring physician orders are appropriately carried out according to policies and procedures governing the facility.•Ordering prescribed medications, supplies, and equipment as necessary, and in accordance with established policies. Ensuring that narcotics are counted each shift and are accurate.•Demonstrating the ability to chart on all residents receiving acute or skilled care.•Using Point Click Care provide thorough documentation of residents’ status on a shift-to-shift basis in an informative and descriptive manner that reflects the care provided as well as the resident’s response to the care.•Making written and oral reports/recommendations concerning the activities of your shift as required. (e.g., 24-hour report sheets)•Requisitioning and arranging for diagnostic and therapeutic services, as ordered by the physician, and in accordance with our established procedures.•Administering professional services, such as catheterization, tube feedings, and suction. Applying and changing dressings/bandages, packs, colostomy and drainage bags. Successful candidates must be: • A graduate of an accredited School of Nursing• Currently licensed in the state in which you practice nursing. If you are interested in completing these goals with our dedicated team, applications can be completed in-person or résumés can be emailed to nancyp@madonnamanor.org and amic@madonnamanor.org.",Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN) Job in Villa Hills,"Full Time, Employee","Villa Hills, KY 41017",,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-practical-nurse-lpn-job-villa-hills-ky-us-174565373.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,56fec8d0ebb1f6a7bf91c24bf6c7479a
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:10:21:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: The Seasonal Asset Protection Security Guard’s primary responsibility is to work as part of a team and maintain a strong focus on customer service to meet department and store objectives for deterring theft and ensuring a safe business environment. This position involves long periods of standing. In most instances the Seasonal Asset Protection Security guard will stand at a customer and/or employee entrance/exit door(s) for long periods of time and/or walk through high shortage departments to deter theft and provide customer service. Essential Functions:Deter theft by offering customer serviceRemained stationed at a fixed post, i.e entrance/exit doors, for long periods of time for extended periods of time to provide a strong visible presenceCommunicate with the Asset Protection DepartmentRespond to customer and associate incidents to facilitate first aid and minimize company liability Assist Detectives with the Recovery of stolen merchandiseSuccessfully complete all Asset Protection training requirements and maintain personal certifications as required by lawWorks on special assignments, investigations, and surveillance as directed by Store Asset Protection ManagerPerform other duties as neededFollows shortage programs and procedures Perform these functions in an efficient manner, as directed by the Supervisor Regular, dependable attendance and punctualityQualifications: Education/Experience: High School Diploma or equivalent. Some college is desirable. Completion of Store Agent Training program required upon assignment to position. Communication Skills: Effective written and verbal skills, ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Excellent written and verbal communication skills.Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculatorReasoning Ability: Self-starter, able to work independently and as part of a team and must have good time management skills.Physical Demands: This position involves long periods of standing and remaining stationary. It also involves regular walking, hearing, and talking. Specific vision abilities include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus. Other skills: Ability to think and act clearly in possible stressful and hostile situations.Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team. Must possess a strong sense of urgency. Collaborate and function as a member of a team. Must possess a strong sense of urgency.Work Hours: Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which will include early morning, day, late evening, weekends, and/or holidays. You must be available to work Thanksgiving Day, the day after Thanksgiving, Saturday after Thanksgiving and the entire week before Christmas and the entire week of Christmas. This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy’s, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Asset Protection.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",Macy's **Seasonal Holiday Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Security Guard** Part Time: Kenwood Tow Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/macy's-seasonal-holiday-asset-protection-loss-prevention-security-guard-part-time-kenwood-tow-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175140694.aspx?mescoid=3300600001001&jobPosition=7,,Security/Protective Services,c05cf7292b0a71785850e73b1ea1a0e1
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:10:54:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary ""Together, we improve people's everyday lives and well-being."" As a Giant Eagle Team Member, you will be part of a team that emphasizes building lifelong relationships with our customers by focusing on understanding and exceeding their needs. As a member of the Bakery team, your primary responsibility will be preparing and decorating the products and cakes in the department to ensure only the freshest are available. Job Responsibilities Provide exemplary customer service by greeting customers in the department and ensuring they are able to locate the products they are looking for. Bakery team members are also expected to have sufficient knowledge to answer questions and make suggestions to our customers. Become familiar with products in the store to answer questions and make suggestions to customers. Smile and greet customers in a friendly manner, whether the encounter takes place in the team member's designated department or elsewhere in the store. Properly handle products and equipment in accordance with food safety and safety guidelines to ensure a safe shopping environment. Prepare and decorate product for the Bakery cases and displays, rotating product and ensuring code dating procedures are followed and only the freshest product is available for sale. Accurately record special orders on bakery products to ensure the customer is delighted with the finished product. Maintain cleanliness of department and work area, including the back room, coolers and freezers. Assist in maintaining bakery backroom, cooler and freezer efficiency by unloading deliveries. Assist in other areas as required. Education and Training Required No High School diploma required Licenses / Certifications Required Must have experience in cake decorating and perform all types of cake decorating Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cold Prep Rooms Cooler Freezer Hot Ovens Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Pulling Pushing Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Twisting Typing Communication (verbal) Unloading Walking Weighing Equipment Used Cardboard Baler Compactor Electric/Manual Jacks Knives Safety Cutter Shrink Wrapper Slicer Sheeter Oven Mixer Dough Divider",Cake Decorator (Part Time) E Broad St Giant Eagle Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/cake-decorator-part-time-e-broad-st-giant-eagle-job-columbus-oh-us-175193764.aspx?mescoid=5100921001001&jobPosition=10,,Food Services/Hospitality,6a2a16b1b0762966f0cb39221cfadd11
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:10:55:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Very prominent Global Automotive manufacturer located just south of Cincinnati is looking for a EH&S Specialist. The EH&S Specialist will ensure compliance with regulations and procedures by carrying out and analyzing regular audits of laboratories and facilities. Provide information and training in emergency response procedures, hazardous material handling, and industrial hygiene policies. Manage the collection, storage, transportation, and shipping of hazardous waste. The EH&S Specialist will have 5 + years experience in manufacturingResponsibilities for the EH&S Manager OHSAS 18001:2007 Health and Safety management system standardConduct health and safety audits; both compliance and program basedMonitor, measure, and report on environmental health and safety performanceReview current policies and procedures to ensure compliance with the Occupational Health and Safety Act/Regulations and other relevant workplace legislationRequirements for the EH&S Manager Bachelors Degree5 + years related experienceBenefitsDirect HireThis Job is located in Covington, KY -> United States",EH&S Manager - Automotive/Manufacturing/OHSAS  Job in Covington,Full Time Employee,"Covington, KY 41019",,http://jobview.monster.com/eh-s-manager-automotive-manufacturing-ohsas-18001-job-covington-ky-us-174858580.aspx?mescoid=2900540001001&jobPosition=15,"70,000.00 - 88,000.00 $ /year",,338aa3f6627c1df21fe958043b20d049
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:11:49:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: Seeking an outstanding attorney for Macy’s legal team to handle sophisticated commercial real estate matters. Perform other duties as assigned. This position is based in Cincinnati. Essential Functions: • Draft and negotiate commercial real estate documents, including reciprocal easement agreements, leases and easements.• Handle acquisitions and dispositions of real estate.• Provide analysis and advice to business departments regarding real estate issues and disputes. • Handle lease renewal options.• Provide analysis and advice on real estate issues in litigation matters.• Other legal issues, as assigned.• Regular, dependable attendance & punctuality. Qualifications: Education/Experience: • Law degree from an ABA-accredited law school required. • 7 years of relevant experience involving commercial real estate legal matters • required. Experience in management of professionals and in management of outside counsel required. • Current active license to practice law. Communication Skills: • Ability to read, write and interpret instructional documents such as reports and procedure manuals. • Excellent written and verbal communication skills. • Strong interpersonal client skills. Mathematical Skills: • Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Reasoning Ability: • Must be able to work independently with minimal supervision. Physical Demands: This position involves extended periods of sitting and the extensive use of computer and the office equipment. May involve stooping, kneeling, or crouching. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment. Other Skills: • Ability to work well in fast-paced, collaborative team environment. • Excellent business judgment and strategic thinking capability. Work Hours: • Ability to work a flexible schedule based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. Macy’s Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Real Estate (Legal).inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",Counsel,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/counsel-real-estate-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175023469.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=9,,Legal,a05736975e4152aef94b71915c7a51e2
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:11:50:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Apply Today. Train Tomorrow. Earn This Week!! Intrepid Payment Processing is a leading provider of electronic payments services to small to medium-sized businesses (SMBs). With a suite of products and services that include EMV functionality (Chip and PIN), NFC capability (Apple Pay, Android Pay, Samsung Pay), check conversion and guarantee, gift card acceptance and loyalty programs, we truly deliver the most cutting-edge and in-demand processing solutions available. We are looking for motivated and friendly outside sales representatives to meet with business owners and introduce them to our family of products and services.  We pay generous sales commissions daily, we offer expert sales support and we provide all of our sales representatives with daily sales leads. If you love meeting new people, communicate well & enjoy the flexibility of not being in an office all day, this position may be for you! Position Highlights: * Unlimited Earning Potential * $800 Good Start Bonus! (Call for Details) * Commissions paid daily * $800 to $1,800+ Weekly earning potential * Lucrative sales bonuses paid monthly (Top producer in November 2015 exceeded $8,000) * Residual income potential * President's Club Members earn additional incentives and have access to a dedicated Customer Care Liaison * Pre-Qualified Leads in your local area * B2B Sales (small to medium sized businesses) * No Nights No Weekends * Additional commissions for self-generated leads and referrals * State-of-the-Art solutions enable you to sell more accounts and earn additional commissions * Enthusiastic sales support to help (if needed) you close more dealsWe are looking for eager and enthusiastic sales representatives. Ideal candidates will have:     Excellent interpersonal and communications skills     Positive attitude and a willingness to learn     Desire to succeed in sales     Self-motivated Keywords: ____________________________________________________________________________ Sales, Outside Sales, Outside Sales Representative, Sales Representative, Business Development, Customer Service, Retail Sales, Sales Rep, Account Rep, Account Representative, Sales Executive, Entry-Level Sales",!! Immediate Hire,Full Time,"Wyoming, OH",Retail Banking Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/!!-immediate-hire-sales-reps!!-800-bonus-pre-set-leads!!!-job-wyoming-oh-us-173779878.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=14,"0.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Customer Support/Client Care,34e0ea0c47da055624489ab6711205f4
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:13:19:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description**Required Shift is Mon-Fri 2AM-10AM**   SUMMARY:  Responsible for direct supervision and development of Transportation team with a primary focus on driving operational performance, service, cost and employee performance outcomes.  The Supervisor exercises independent judgment, strong leadership, and direction to the frontline team that is responsible for the execution of business strategies and superior customer service to both internal and external stakeholders (Global Retail Stores, Brands, Corporate Leadership, Field Leadership, Logistics Business Partners, Linehaul Carriers and Third Party Providers).  Staffing management is critical in the role to support the execution of department-specific functions to ensure Gap Inc. shipments meet service and delivery requirements. The Supervisor sets the standard for the team and is the face for Logistics to the customer; therefore will monitor departmental results and will identify/plan for changes in procedures, resources, and short-term strategies to improve departmental performance and ensure department success.    ESSENTIAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES: 40% of time is spent monitoring employees and front line support. Based on field input, lead the team to accurately communicate service and support improvement opportunities to the Operations Teams management, DCs, Third Party Providers, and Corporate Planning and Communications groups. Build positive professional partnerships (internal & external) to enhance work-flow, decision-making, and collaboration This position will influence Store/Brand perspective of Logistics support and service commitment Brand processes known and followed, exception management will need to occur to deliver service to Stores/Brands, recommendations to exceed customer expectations will set direction for others.  Utilize pro-active communication channels with key customers/stakeholders that produce desired results and ensure communication from department is clear, concise, and targets the appropriate audience Empower Specialists to make recommendations to exceed customer expectations Explore, identify and lead system/process changes that enhance service/support to Stores, Brands, and 3PL Providers. Ensure the team records, addresses, and updates delivery issues reported from the field within 24 hours.  Track and escalate problem trends and training issues to appropriate Logistics Business Partners and Communication groups at Corporate Headquarters. Assist Transportation Support multi language and culture customer base Management on key projects by providing support and analysis as needed or requested. Define clear accountability for operational performance and measure regularly making required adjustments to ensure team meets customer, technical and operational performance standards Provide direction and establish clear priorities to guide operational, reporting, exception management and service performance Function as escalation point for operational/project-related issues Present analysis of operational issues and solutions in a creative and logical manner Champion continuous process improvement, quality and efficiency efforts that contribute to organizational success.  Sets and communicates clear expectations for team members regarding performance results and provides operational leadership through direction, coaching, and recognition Lead the staffing/scheduling, selection, on-boarding, and skills training for direct reports Manage performance and development of direct reports through clear goal-setting/COMPASS process, monthly touchbase meetings (minimum frequency), and on-going informal feedback/recognition with quality and timeliness Manage direct reports payable time and time reports within the Time & Labor management tool Qualifications  REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS: 1) Competencies: Critical Competencies:  Manage Vision & Purpose, Build Effective Teams, Motivate Others, Develop Self & Others, Strategic Agility, Decision Quality, Business Acumen/Technical Skills, Influencing, Drive for Results, Plan, Manage & Measure Work, Priority Setting, Managerial Courage Demonstrated ability to lead and develop self and others Strong Interpersonal and Communication Skills Strong Problem-Solving, Organizational, Planning, Conflict Resolution/Negotiation, and Analytical skills Computer Skills with Microsoft Excel, PowerPoint and Word applications required/ Access preferred Ability to work under pressure with high sense of urgency and manage multiple priorities Ability to drive for results through direct reports and business partners Ability to maintain confidentiality Strong Attention to Detail and Follow-up Ability to make decisions independently and work with minimal supervision Knowledge of Supply Chain, Transportation Management (TMS), and Warehouse Management (WMS) processes and systems preferred Transportation or carrier management experience preferred   2)  Minimum experience: 2 years professional experience in Logistics, Retail, Customer Service or equivalent education 1-2 years professional experience leading others preferred Project leadership experience preferred Budget Management experience preferred Logistics systems user experience (TMS, WMS, Freight Optimization, Load Planning) preferred   3)  Minimum educational level: BA/BS degree or equivalent retail, customer service, and/or logistics experience required   4)  Physical Requirements: Travel Required Flexible to work non-traditional hours (shift, weekend, on-call/off-hours support, and holidays) to support 24x7 operations Flexible to adjust hours/schedule on short-notice (same day/weekend) to support unplanned issue resolution       This position description intends to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. It is not intended to include all duties and responsibilities.  The order in which duties and responsibilities are listed is not significant.",Transportation Operations Lead Job in Erlanger,"Full Time, Employee","Erlanger, KY 41018",,http://jobview.monster.com/transportation-operations-lead-job-erlanger-ky-us-175038613.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,,bde7413b94610e0fbfccadb7edd65f36
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:13:45:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS Freight, a leader in the LTL trucking industry, is currently seeking an Operations Clerk to answer customer inquiries, process paperwork, and follow procedures concerning overages, shortages, damages, claims, and the tracing of freight.An Operations Clerk will also be responsible to:Review invoicesWork with both central and local dispatch offices to assist in managing load schedulesAnswer customer inquiries relating to rate quotes, appointments, etc.Perform data entry functions (i.e. keying bills from manifests)Transportation industry understanding and/or previous data entry experience preferred.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Non-Union Clerk - Part Time - UPS Freight Job in Sharonville,,"Sharonville, OH 45241",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-non-union-clerk-part-time-ups-freight-job-sharonville-oh-us-175279020.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=12,,Logistics/Transportation,72ac322999854e094e66c6acba1b6623
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:13:46:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary EVENT Specialist PART TIME SALES   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our Advantage Solutions winning team as a retail event demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store brand ambassador job influences the buyer’s behavior through customer education, engagement, and enthusiastically promoting and demonstrating the product.      Responsibilities: Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which creates a positive shoppers experience and generates enthusiasm for the product and event Purposefully move around the event area to actively engage shoppers Responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines  Qualifications: High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales _PSS Job in West Chester,Part Time Employee,"West Chester, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-_pss-job-west-chester-oh-us-175110050.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=7,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,77d48546618df9442766e592745be425
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:14:06:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc.,we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! Andthat means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, whileproviding our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever andhowever they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do italone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re anenthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle,godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a funplace to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team –become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kidseverywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hearstraight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves! Job Summary: To operate cashregisters in a store, process Guest payments, bag Guest goods, and do relatedwork as required.Responsibilities:Guest service. Smile andengage every Guest.  Address allquestions and inquiries by Guests. If asked a question that they cannot answer,will locate the appropriate subject expert to further help the Guest.  Obtain Guest’s phone number upon check-out(explaining Guest delight survey, if necessary).  Ask Guest about shopping experience andsuggest add-ons (e.g., batteries). Interacts with Guests of all ages.Operates cash registerand verifies purchase price. Identify and locate UPC codes on items, correctlyscan codes, and obtain assistance for price checks when a price code is notreadable or is missing.Packages Guest goods.Packages a Guest’s goods unassisted and place goods in the Guest’s shoppingcart.Processes Guestpayments. Accurately process all forms of Guest payments accepted by the store,including cash, store credit, checks and credit cards. Payment processingduties include counting cash and making change, use of electronic credit cardreceipts, verification of Guest identification for checks, communication withGuests to obtain identifying information (such as driver’s licenses),recordation of Guest information on checks, and communication with storemanager for authorization on checks over $100.Retention and executionof tasks. Able to learn to perform all essential job functions at an acceptablelevel with minimal supervision within 3 weeks. Qualifications Ability to read pricetag information, ability to read English language sufficient to read Guestchecks, Guest identification and similar written materials.Basic English languagewriting skills for completion of payment processing, Guest checks and voidpaperwork on void transactions.Basic mathematicalskills, including addition and subtraction, necessary to verify cash registerfunctions and make change. **Please note that werecruit for this position on an on-going basis in order to build a talent poolof potential candidates. When a position becomes available, we will reviewapplicants at that time. Due to the volume of resumes that we receive, onlythose candidates selected for interviews will be contacted. Thank you for yourinterest in Toys""R""Us, Inc.! Stay connected with us on Facebook,LinkedIn, Instagram, Twitter & YouTube @ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-KY-FlorenceWork Locations: Florence, KY TRU 7960 Connector Drive  Florence 41042-1433 Schedule: Flexible",Toys R Us Seasonal Cashier Job in Florence,Full Time ,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc.,we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! Andthat means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, whileproviding our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever andhowever they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do italone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re anenthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle,godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a funplace to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team –become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kidseverywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hearstraight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves! Job Summary: To operate cashregisters in a store, process Guest payments, bag Guest goods, and do relatedwork as required.Responsibilities:Guest service. Smile andengage every Guest.  Address allquestions and inquiries by Guests. If asked a question that they cannot answer,will locate the appropriate subject expert to further help the Guest.  Obtain Guest’s phone number upon check-out(explaining Guest delight survey, if necessary).  Ask Guest about shopping experience andsuggest add-ons (e.g., batteries). Interacts with Guests of all ages.Operates cash registerand verifies purchase price. Identify and locate UPC codes on items, correctlyscan codes, and obtain assistance for price checks when a price code is notreadable or is missing.Packages Guest goods.Packages a Guest’s goods unassisted and place goods in the Guest’s shoppingcart.Processes Guestpayments. Accurately process all forms of Guest payments accepted by the store,including cash, store credit, checks and credit cards. Payment processingduties include counting cash and making change, use of electronic credit cardreceipts, verification of Guest identification for checks, communication withGuests to obtain identifying information (such as driver’s licenses),recordation of Guest information on checks, and communication with storemanager for authorization on checks over $100.Retention and executionof tasks. Able to learn to perform all essential job functions at an acceptablelevel with minimal supervision within 3 weeks. Qualifications Ability to read pricetag information, ability to read English language sufficient to read Guestchecks, Guest identification and similar written materials.Basic English languagewriting skills for completion of payment processing, Guest checks and voidpaperwork on void transactions.Basic mathematicalskills, including addition and subtraction, necessary to verify cash registerfunctions and make change. **Please note that werecruit for this position on an on-going basis in order to build a talent poolof potential candidates. When a position becomes available, we will reviewapplicants at that time. Due to the volume of resumes that we receive, onlythose candidates selected for interviews will be contacted. Thank you for yourinterest in Toys""R""Us, Inc.! Stay connected with us on Facebook,LinkedIn, Instagram, Twitter & YouTube @ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-KY-FlorenceWork Locations: Florence, KY TRU 7960 Connector Drive  Florence 41042-1433 Schedule: Flexible",,http://jobview.monster.com/toys-r-us-seasonal-cashier-job-florence-ky-us-173672270.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=2,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,527a717e83f987faba1ed72529cd094e
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:14:58:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are an experienced Global Supply Chain Director, please read on! We are a highly regarded and growing medical device company working in the field of cancer diagnostics. On a daily basis we are striving to impact and improve patients' lives through innovation, research and development of technology. Our systems are used in numerous countries, offering early detection and treatment to thousands of individuals, and we provide support, education and information to both clinicians and patients. We are currently seeking a great Supply Chain Director to help us in our progress!What You Will Be Doing- Third Party Logistics (3PL) management & product distribution- global inventory management - manage global forecasting & inventory targets - ensure effective global warehousing & delivery of products, kitting of products, and import/export compliance- meet on-time delivery metrics- manage global distribution & warehousing processes and procedure development in order to promote & ensure FDA compliance- manage assigned cost centers- safe facilities management- manage US Customer Service TeamWhat You Need for this Position- 10+ years of experience in Global Supply Chain, Sourcing and Operations- BS or BA in Business or Supply Chain; Master's degree PREFERRED- medical device or medical equipment experience- experience managing 3+ direct reports / hands-on leadership skills- global experience, preferably Asia-Pacific region- ability to travel up to 30%, domestically and internationally, including overnight stays- knowledge & experience with Lean and Six Sigma methods- experience with ERP (Enterprise Resource Planning / process development) systems- experience with QMS (Quality Management) systems- Logistics, planning methodology, transportation and warehouse management experience- customer service skills- prior direct responsibility for Operations or P&P in a non-US business unit is STRONGLY PREFERRED- experience with SAP software is a strong PLUS- APICS Certification (CSCP, CLTD, CPIM, CFPIM, etc.) is a PLUSWhat's In It for You- competitive compensation- strong benefits package- great company!- relocation assistance possibleSo, if you are a Director, Global Supply Chain with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Global Supply Chain Director - Medical Device Industry | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Lisa van Horne,Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/global-supply-chain-director-medical-device-industry-job-cincinnati-oh-us-173951514.aspx?mescoid=1100059001001&jobPosition=12,,,e6aa547ff73f5a6a0ab335d55069c651
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:14:59:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location: Cincinnati Regional OfficeAre you looking for a job in a growing industry with new products, new markets and new technology?With locations across the country, Amica Mutual Insurance Company offers opportunities to join this dynamic field with a financially strong and respected insurance provider. Amica, based in Lincoln, RI, is a national writer of auto, home, marine and umbrella insurance. Amica Life Insurance Company, a wholly owned subsidiary, offers a full line of life insurance products.We are recognized as a leader in customer service and credit this success to our 3,500 employees in 44 offices across the country. Our benefits package includes high-quality medical, dental and vision coverage, short-term and long-term disability insurance and more.Our office located in West Chester, OH is seeking an Associate Account Representative. This position involves telephone contact to sell policies and service existing accounts. Candidates should have previous sales and service experience, a professional telephone manner, and the ability to work well with others. Must be able to pass state insurance license exam and meet continuing education requirements.The position requires excellent interpersonal and communication skills and computer keyboard skills (35 wpm) as well as letter writing and computer processing. Previous insurance background is a plus but not a requirement. Comprehensive training is provided.Equal Opportunity Policy: All qualified applicants who are authorized to work in the United States will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, sex, color, national origin, ethnicity, age, genetic information, disability or sexual orientation. The Age Discrimination in Employment Act prohibits discrimination on the basis of age with respect to individuals who are 40 years of age or older. Employees are subject to the provisions of the Workers' Compensation Act.HP15MON16*cb*",Customer Service Representative Job in West Chester,Full Time Employee,"Location: Cincinnati Regional OfficeAre you looking for a job in a growing industry with new products, new markets and new technology?With locations across the country, Amica Mutual Insurance Company offers opportunities to join this dynamic field with a financially strong and respected insurance provider. Amica, based in Lincoln, RI, is a national writer of auto, home, marine and umbrella insurance. Amica Life Insurance Company, a wholly owned subsidiary, offers a full line of life insurance products.We are recognized as a leader in customer service and credit this success to our 3,500 employees in 44 offices across the country. Our benefits package includes high-quality medical, dental and vision coverage, short-term and long-term disability insurance and more.Our office located in West Chester, OH is seeking an Associate Account Representative. This position involves telephone contact to sell policies and service existing accounts. Candidates should have previous sales and service experience, a professional telephone manner, and the ability to work well with others. Must be able to pass state insurance license exam and meet continuing education requirements.The position requires excellent interpersonal and communication skills and computer keyboard skills (35 wpm) as well as letter writing and computer processing. Previous insurance background is a plus but not a requirement. Comprehensive training is provided.Equal Opportunity Policy: All qualified applicants who are authorized to work in the United States will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, sex, color, national origin, ethnicity, age, genetic information, disability or sexual orientation. The Age Discrimination in Employment Act prohibits discrimination on the basis of age with respect to individuals who are 40 years of age or older. Employees are subject to the provisions of the Workers' Compensation Act.HP15MON16*cb*",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-job-west-chester-oh-us-174425022.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=17,,Customer Support/Client Care,f40c113c9798113504533734a270d35b
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:15:59:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Senior .NET Developer with experience, please read on!Founded in 2001, we are an SEC Registered Investment Advisor, and a leading provider of investment, reporting and service solutions. We provide advisors access to independent asset allocation strategies and model trading functionality. We assist advisors in simplifying their business by absorbing back office tasks, such as trade reconciliation, account administration, fee billing and performance reporting.This position is responsible with minimal direction for daily programming, development, maintenance, monitoring, problem resolution, and user assistance required of financial applications and databases. This role participates in Information Technology projects from inception of the project through the daily maintenance phase. The role involves a teamwork approach and close coordination with other departments across all levels of the organization to define and translate requirements into sound technical solutions and execute to deliver high quality development solutions.Top Reasons to Work with Us1. Competitive Compensation ($60K - $100K DOE)2. Comprehensive Benefits Package3. The chance to work for a leading investment company!What You Will Be Doing- Responsible for the creation and maintenance of moderate to highly-complex solutions (including data infrastructure, reporting, and applications) that address the informational and analytical needs of the various groups. - Responsible for all phases of the project life-cycle and include: requirements gathering, solution design, application development, and system testing. - Analyze end user data need and develop user-oriented solutions which interface with existing applications.- Coordinate all aspects of implementation and training to support new programs and systems.- Test operation of completed programs, debug as needed.- Maintain documentation for all work processes and procedures.- Make improvement suggestions and adhere to all approved work changes for the team.- Ensure execution of all industry and company specific compliance matters within the team.- Participate in major upgrades to packaged software. - Participate or lead training on business functionality for system end users. - Lead, manage and mentor a team of Programmers.- Works with minimal supervision and is responsible for making an established range of decisions, escalating to Manager when necessary and updating Manager on a regular basis.What You Need for this PositionAt Least 3 Years of experience or knowledge of:- C#/.NET- Visual Studio- SQL Server- MVC Entity FrameworkSo, if you are a Senior .NET Developer with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for Senior .NET Developer - C#/.NET,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Mike Vandenbergh,Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-net-developer-c-net-visual-studio-sql-server-mvc-job-hebron-ky-us-174299587.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=12,,,1cb702f94d3e8d5aa0905c4e1aa80ce8
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:16:01:12,No,jobs.monster.com," For over 65 years Appliance Warehouse,  a division of CSC ServiceWorks has proven stability and has been the nation’s leading provider of performance-driven laundry equipment and industry-leading service solutions to the commercial and multifamily industries.  At CSC you have an opportunity to grow with us as we continue to expand our services across the United States as well as Canada and Europe.  And…we’re hiring!  At CSC we have one simple goal – to create customers for life!  As a CSC team member, you are the key to achieving our goal.  As a CSC associate you will be encouraged to challenge yourself, share your expertise, and grow both professionally and personally.  You will be part of improving every customer interaction by providing the “CSC Experience” to make sure everyone has a great experience. Our passion for delivering a positive experience doesn’t stop with our customers, it includes you!  Our core beliefs and behaviors result in creating a work environment that fosters teamwork, accountability, recognition…and is just a great place where you will want to come to work each day! Your success is important to us.  We are now accepting applications for a customer oriented, quick learner to join our team as a full-time Driver Installer for our Cincinnati, OH branch. These are some of the things you will do in this job:Build lasting relationships with clients to create customers for life.Plan your route to deliver and install appliances.Efficiently load vehicles. Perform general warehouse work.Complete route paperwork accurately.Efficiently troubleshoot basic mechanical repairs to washers and dryers.Maintain clean machines which are consistent with the company image and a professional appearance.Responsible for understanding and following all company processes and procedures.Effectively use Company provided technology for routing, scheduling, inventory and accurately recording customer visits.Read electrical schematics, maps, GPS, and any other routing systems.Present a professional appearance and handle customers in a positive, professional manner. These are the basic skills and requirements you should have:High School diploma or equivalent required.Valid Driver’s License required.Previous delivery and installation experience needed.Maneuvering of heavy equipment up to 75lbs of lifting requiredExperience in a mechanical service/repair industryPC literate; experience with Blackberry or similar device preferred. Professional appearance and excellent customer service skills a mustDedicated to safety.Need excellent oral and written communications skills as well as organizational and interpersonal skills.Must be flexible, able to work independently, able to prioritize schedule, and work on multiple projects while still meeting deadlines.No CDL required but must be at least 21 years of age per DOT requirements.CSC values and wants to retain its associates by offering you industry leading benefits including:Competitive payMedical, dental and vision insuranceLife insuranceShort-term and long-term disabilityPaid holidaysVacation and sick leave401(k) with generous company matchCompany vehicleCompany fuel card for business useBusiness travel reimbursementAward winning company training At CSC we welcome initiative, seek excellence, and reward your performance. If you are interested in joining a winning team, then apply directly today!  When you click the “apply” button you will be directed to our recruitment team at PEAR Core Solutions. Please submit your resume along with other requested information.  We look forward to hearing from you! Position: Full TimeDrug Free Workplace: Pre-employment screenings performedEOE  ",Driver Installer Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH 45201",,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-installer-job-cincinnati-oh-us-173556953.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=7,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,ce17012174d7ab9e7611be8505df698a
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:16:58:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Warehouse Clerk The Warehouse Clerk is responsible for performing warehousing activities, inventory control, and recordkeeping.Rush Enterprises is a premier provider of quality products and services to commercial equipment users. We are customer-focused, people-oriented, and financially motivated to deliver excellent outcomes for customers, shareholders, vendors and our people. We offer a rewarding career with a leader in the transportation industry. Grow with us as we continue to expand our network of locations and services. Rush Enterprises is always looking for good people to join our team.Responsibilities1. Check in all daily incoming shipments for all vendors.2. Put away all incoming stock in the appropriate bin location and insure that all parts put into stock are properly labeled with a barcode bin label.3. Check in all incoming inter-branch shipments from all branches.4. Update incoming stock and incoming inter-branch shipment packing slips in computer and generate appropriate picking lists and reports as needed.5. Pull all customer orders as indicated on the picking list and place in either will call, package for shipment, or dispatch for delivery. 6. Maintain all parts in ""will call"" by insuring that all parts pulled are placed in the appropriate ""will call"" bin and all paperwork associated with the order is placed with the parts.7. Maintain all junk core inventory.8. Dispatch parts drivers to addresses indicated on the sales invoice or purchase order.9. Process and maintain all returns by properly pulling all parts being returned from stock.10. File freight claims for any shortages or damaged parts received.BenefitsWe offer exceptional compensation and benefits, 401K and stock purchase, incentives for performance, training, and opportunity for advancement - all in a culture that appreciates and rewards excellence, a positive attitude and integrity.",Warehouse clerk Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-clerk-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174888727.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=10,,Logistics/Transportation,ba2351993ce5bed216c5d1f7fb44f118
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:16:59:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you. (NYSE: XPO) Job Overview and Responsibilities:  •    Develop and maintain FTL business throughout North America  •    Prospect for leads to build a pipeline, including heavy cold-calling  •    Manage accounts to retain existing relationships and grow share of business  •    Succeed at heavy price and service negotiation with customers and carriers  •    Develop and maintain a strong carrier portfolio according to the carrier selection criteria  •    Use both traditional and electronic communication tools to make contact with prospective, current and former customers  •    Identify business opportunities for company services  •    Create quotations and sales proposals for company services  •    Independently generate new sales revenue for your team  •    Collaborate with your team on pricing decisions, supplier selection and timing  •    Translate business opportunities into incremental revenues through strong selling  •    Manage multiple projects simultaneously with a sense of urgency  •    Maintain and update accurate information in the company's operating systems  •    Understand and support the goals, policies and procedures of XPO Logistics  •    Maintain confidentiality of company information Qualifications:Driven by the opportunity to make money and the thrill of the winInterested in building a career with a growth-oriented companyMotivated by a sense of urgency, a will to win, and a talent for negotiatingAble to build client relationships quickly, in order to establish and maintain a profitable book of businessHas the mentality of a team player, and the desire to learnPossesses excellent written and verbal communication skillsBusiness-minded, with an ability to multi-task in a fast-paced work environmentOne to five years of experience with freight solution sales, marketing or customer service requiredOne to five years of experience with 3PL transportation or inside brokerage sales preferredDirect sales experience preferredExperience working in a deadline-driven environment preferredA college degree in business, logistics or transportation-related field preferredWe are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Sales Representative - Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Newport, KY 41071",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-cincinnati-oh-job-newport-ky-us-173662543.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,4fa23dd044d3bcc28a2ea3a51ee3fad9
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:17:17:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Kforce is one of the premier leaders in the staffing industry, where Great People = Great ResultsSM. For over 50 years we’ve thrived on building relationships and making a positive impact in the lives of those we touch. We believe in acting with integrity, doing the right thing and giving back to our communities. A professional staffing services firm, Kforce stands for KnowledgeForce®, describing our highly skilled professionals. Our flexible and direct hire staffing specialists engage over 23,000 highly skilled Technology and Finance & Accounting professionals annually, connecting them with more than 4,000 customers. Our national network of 60 offices, two national recruiting centers, and 2,000+ associates support our ability to meet the needs of customers of all sizes, including 70% of the Fortune 100. Join the Kforce family and we will support you with expert training, innovative tools, an amazing culture, and a team of Great People that will cheer you on your road to success! SUMMARY: The Client Relationship Associate F&A is responsible for revenue generation through new business development activities including: daily planning, networking, sourcing, cold calling, client visits and related follow-up activities to customers in designated segments or target lists within the Finance & Accounting industry. The Client Relationship Associate F&A regularly calls on prospective and current clients to build relationships, obtain orders for Kforce services and to ensure customer satisfaction. The Client Relationship Associate F&A builds relationships with clients through the delivery of exceptional service characterized by mutual respect, understanding, and trust. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Engage in new and existing client development activities. Activities include but are not limited to: sourcing, cold calling, qualifying initial clients, identifying potential end users/decision makers, establishing contact relationships, completing company/department profiles and organizational charts, marketing candidates,, identifying national/third party/vendor on premise opportunities, scheduling and conducting new and follow-up client visits. Ensure local market alignment with Finance & Accounting initiatives related to client targeting. Develop value-driven presentations for use during the client visit. Conduct market research and qualify/classify target accounts within local geography. Keep current of market dynamics and trends within specific market and region and forecast client demands. Select and employ appropriate account development strategies/programs. Establish client expectations and effectively communicate to appropriate parties. Advise client on staffing solutions. Facilitate development of professional service agreements (including negotiation of terms when necessary) between Kforce and clients. Coordinate with other field associates once a job order need has been identified and obtained. Leverage Recruitmax to track and maintain current and prospective clients. Determine and implement appropriate marketing techniques for market, industry, and region. Promote Kforce services through participation in professional associations, trade shows, and other public relations opportunities. Develop and execute daily plan. Participate in periodic training to enhance representation of clients in HR management decisions. SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES: None required.KEY SUCCESS INDICATORS/ATTRIBUTES: Demonstrate ability to obtain Career-To-Date Gross Profit of $100K - $249K. Exhibit strong drive for results and success; convey a sense of urgency to achieve outcomes and exceed expectations; persist despite obstacles, setbacks and competing influences. Ability to develop and maintain relationships with key business partners, both internal and external, by building personal credibility and trust. Ability to engage prospective clients confidently; determine interests and motivators of key decision-makers. Demonstrate a strong focus on exceptional service to both clients and candidates. Demonstrate well-developed presentation skills including both verbal and written communication skills. Demonstrate a strong commitment to a team environment. Demonstrate strong problem-solving and negotiation skills. Proficient at handling difficult client negotiations with professionalism and respect. Possess the ability to influence and persuade to achieve desired outcomes. Possess sound judgment and reasoning abilities. Ability to self-motivate and self-direct. Exhibit an entrepreneurial mindset and professional image. Possess strong time management and organizational skills. Maintain courteous, professional, and effective working relationships with employees at all levels of the organization. Commitment and adherence to Firm’s Core Values. EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE: Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent years of staffing/industry experience, or the equivalent combination of education and experience, required. CERTIFICATES AND/OR LICENSES: None required. Kforce is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status.",Account Manager,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45202",,http://jobview.monster.com/account-manager-finance-accounting-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175299457.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),910137b4eb61bbec6d276edc44f0bcf5
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:17:49:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Quality Engineer with DESIGN INPUT STRENGTH and medical device experience, please read on! We are a highly regarded and growing medical device company working in the field of cancer diagnostics. On a daily basis we are striving to impact and improve patients' lives through innovation, research and development of technology. Our systems are used in numerous countries, offering early detection and treatment to thousands of individuals, and we provide support, education and information to both clinicians and patients. We are currently seeking a great Quality Engineer to help us in our progress!What You Will Be Doing- participating in planning, execution & implementation activities for new product development and sustaining engineering projects- responsible for compliance programs related to new and existng productsWhat You Need for this Position- Bachelor's degree in a technical field (Engineering, Physical Sciences, etc.); advanced degree is a PLUS!- 7+ years of experience with Quality Engineering in a regulated industry (preferable medical device, but pharma, auto or aerospace also considered)- risk management, statistics and reliability experience- ability to travel up to 20% (domestic and international, typically 3-5 day trips with overnight stays)- supervisory/leadership experience strongly preferred- expertise in the Advanced Quality Planning process- experience with FDA regulations/med dev regulations, including 21 CFR, ISO 13485- professional certifications (e.g. CQE) a PLUS!- experience with electrical/software driven devices a PLUS- ability to operate without large amounts of training/oversight- risk management / FMEAs- inspections and Design Validation TestingWhat's In It for You- competitive salary- bonus potential- strong benefits package- potential relocation supportSo, if you are a Quality Engineer with DESIGN INPUT STRENGTH and medical device experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Design Quality Engineer - Medical Devices | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Lisa van Horne,Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/design-quality-engineer-medical-devices-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175107716.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=19,,,3744d54842d5141459344dc7546df036
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:17:50:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary Market District Prep Cook's first responsibility is to prepare and season a variety of meats, vegetables, soups and other food items in accordance with prescribed recipes in order to provide unparalleled service in the Market District Kitchens, ensuring that all customer requirements are met. Job Responsibilities Actively support a culture of safety which includes, but is not limited to, food safety, Team Member safety and customer safety. Display a commitment to learn about food and share food knowledge with fellow team members and customers. Demonstrate a willingness to learn, understand, and communicate the Market District Passion for Food philosophy, which includes the willingness to taste and experience new product offerings.Participate in in-store team meetings and/or regional department manager meetings as needed. Maintain awareness of competitive activity and new trends in the business and communicate ideas for improvement to the Seafood Manager. Actively demonstrate appropriate suggestive selling techniques.Provide active sampling opportunities, when appropriate. Conduct business, at all times, with a clear understanding that customer service is a significant point of difference for the Market District banner. Every interaction, whether with an internal or external customer, is to be conducted with the highest degree of integrity and with an understanding that the end result is to deliver service in an unparalleled manner. Actively participate in, and promote, an environment which embraces diversity, inclusion, and respect for Team Members, Customers, Vendors, and the Community. Receive food ingredients and supplies from main kitchen and pantry as required for daily operations. Review production schedule to determine food requirements, including variety and quantity of food for preparation and assemble supplies and equipment needed for daily cooking activities. Slices, grinds and cooks meats and vegetables using a full range of cooking methods; testing of foods being cooked for quality. Carves and displays meats, vegetables, fruits and salads, replenishes service lines as necessary. Prepares food products for cook's production. Completes production sheets and other records as required. Maintains clean work area, utensils and equipment. Accommodate .individual customer requests with regard to special dietary needs.Additional responsibilities as directed by management. Attends to day-to-day problems and needs concerning equipment and food supplies, detects and ensures disposition of spoiled or unattractive food, defective supplies/equipment, and or other unusual conditions. Responsible for controlling some expense within a department. Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Food Safety Awareness prior food prep experience helpful Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cold Prep Rooms Cooler Freezer Fryers/Grease Hot Ovens Dust Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Climbing Data Entry Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Matching Operating Equipment Pulling Pushing Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Sorting Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Unloading Walking Weighing Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Ice Machine Knives Lang Oven Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Shrink Wrap Machine Texlon Ordering Machine Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Chopper Conventional Oven Calculator Copier Auto Wrapper Cardboard Baler Carts Compactor Crisping Sink Dumpster Electric/Manual Jacks Grater Grinder Heat Seal Gun Ice Machine Kiosk Terminal Lobster Pot Manual Wrapper Ordering Machine Periscope Pineapple Corer Plastic Baler Pressure Hose Pressure Washer Price Gun Receiving Gun Safety Cutter Scale Labeler Scale Shop Vacuum Shredder Shrink Wrapper Slicer Stanley Doors Steam Machine Telxon Trash compactor U-Boats WalkieTalkie Wrapper",Prep Cook (Part Time) Kingsdale Market District Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/prep-cook-part-time-kingsdale-market-district-job-columbus-oh-us-175133909.aspx?mescoid=3500609001001&jobPosition=2,,Marketing/Product,4295c7ae920f2c473168750c8fff3c4b
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:18:05:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: The Seasonal Sales Fragrance Specialist is responsible for providing outstanding customer service, meeting personal sales and Star Rewards goals on a personal and departmental basis, demonstrating superior product knowledge to customers, and creating a shopping experience that will make the customer feel welcome and comfortable. Additionally, the Fragrance Specialist is responsible for becoming an expert on fragrances as well as developing and impacting sales through the growth and implementation of the preferred customer list. Performs other duties as assigned. The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here. In order to present our customers with the best holiday shopping experience, many of our Seasonal Sales Fragrance Specialists arrive prior to store opening and remain after closing to ensure we are ready to make Macy's magic. Seasonal associates will have the opportunity to work a flexible schedule on a temporary basis, which may include early mornings, evenings, weekends and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving and the day after Christmas. And don't forget - just in time for holiday shopping, you will receive an employee discount of up to 20% starting your first day! Essential Functions:Assist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment by demonstrating proficient use of proprietary devices and applications; proactively create enhanced shopping experiences through the heightened use of tools, technology and collaborationExplain and demonstrate use of cosmetics through actual application Be knowledgeable of and perform sales support functions related to POS procedures Alert Fragrance Counter Manager or GSM of Cosmetics and Fragrances of inventory and other inaccuracies Regular, dependable attendance and punctualityQualifications: Education/Experience: High School degree or equivalent. Previous selling experience is required, preferably in fragrances.Communication Skills: Ability to read, write, and interpret labels including warnings and ingredient lists on products. Ability to effectively communicate with customers, peers, and management.Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to calculate percentages and ratios. Must be able to make change using American monetary units.Other skills: Superior organizational and time management skills. Must be able to multi-task in a fast-paced environment during constant periods of high volume. Must be able to build relationships and influence others. Must possess a thirst for knowledge. Must be flexible in regards to hours workedWork Hours: Ability to work a flexible schedule, including mornings, evenings, and weekends, and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving, special Big Event days, and the day after Christmas, based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy’s, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Cosmetics Sales.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",Macy's **Seasonal Holiday Retail Sales - Fragrance Specialist** Full Time: Kenwood Towne Centre Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/macy's-seasonal-holiday-retail-sales-fragrance-specialist-full-time-kenwood-towne-centre-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175140758.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=6,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,7ea1ec7ad7fa245942da80b9a103adf9
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:18:11:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Talent Acquisition Specialist (6616) At First Group America, we contribute to your professional growth while at the same time giving you the opportunity to contribute to the success of a dynamic organization. We are searching for a Talent Acquisition Specialist. This position is open due to growth and will be based in our Cincinnati, Ohio Corporate Headquarters supporting over 700 locations across North America. We currently have a strong team in place each with unique talents in the Talent Acquisition industry. If you are hardworking, like challenge, have recruiting background and enjoy taking ideas and making them a reality, we want to talk with you. This is an ideal opportunity to start your career in Talent Acquisition. Some of the key responsibilities of this position are as follows:Design, develop and execute recruitment strategies to identify talent for open job reqs.Manage and execute our ATS system to field locations.Work closely with locations on grass roots recruiting.Work with vendors on contract negotiation and managing expenses to ensure best ROI.Conduct WebEx training for locations on issues pertaining to the ATS and Talent Acquisition.Effectively use recruitment venues such as Social Media, Job Boards, and other forms of media to attract talent.Coach and provide guidance to field recruiters on developing recruitment strategies.Support our ATS content developer. Qualifications:Knowledge in Application Tracking Systems, social media and recruiting process workflows.Bachelor's degree in Human Resources, Organizational Development or related field preferred.Excellent verbal, written and communication skills.Proficiency in Microsoft products. FirstGroup America is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Talent Acquisition Specialist Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH 45202",,http://jobview.monster.com/talent-acquisition-specialist-job-cincinnati-oh-us-173958890.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=9,,,ae785f4f66925b582d4792578b8fdc4c
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:18:32:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"I am currently seeking an Inventory Reconciliation Accountant for a renowned manufacturing company in Northern Kentucky. This company offers a pipeline for growth, excellent training and mentorship, and a progressive and growing culture. If you are someone who would fit in with a company who values environmental responsibility, ethics, diversity, and community involvement, this may be the opportunity for you! My client is seeking a candidate with excellent Excel skills who can reconcile electronic invoices, sometimes 100+ suppliers monthly. If you are an accountant with a personality this position requires frequent interaction with the suppliers and vendors. A few details of the job are:• Day to day reconciliation of production and intercompany accounts• Perform closes for supplier transactions• Perform reconciliations for supplier invoices using supplier statements• Assist with adhoc projects as assigned Requirements• Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting, Finance, or Business• 4+ years industry experience, experience in a manufacturing setting• EDI processing experience If you would like to know more about this opportunity please forward to your resume to William.Kruer@ParkerLynch.com ",Inventory Reconciliation Accountant job in Cincinnati Job in Hebron,Full Time Employee,"Hebron, KY 41048",,http://jobview.monster.com/inventory-reconciliation-accountant-job-in-cincinnati-job-hebron-ky-us-173713191.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=10,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,e0782ee970950c4956ebe94a4b23c926
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:18:57:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Washington National Insurance Company's largest American marketing partner, PMA USA, is currently hiring Insurance Agent Sales Professionals.This is a Business-to-Business sales position helping employers find health care benefit solutions, and improve employee retention by creating or enhancing their employee benefits packages with our products.You will be working with our currently contracted school district, local government, and small business accounts, re-opening dormant accounts as well as developing new accounts.  WE OFFER:NO MANDATORY WEEKENDSFLEXIBLE SCHEDULESADVANCEMENT OPPORTUNITYSTABILITYUNMATCHED PRODUCT PORTFOLIO COMPREHENSIVE TRAINING PROGRAMTREMENDOUS INCOME OPPORTUNITY  Earn what you’re worth, make a difference in people’s lives, and have a great time while you do it!Join a respected career and Apply Now! PMA USA is an Equal Opportunity Company. 170609/16-0825, Expires 5/31/2019",LICENSED AGENTS / GROUP BENEFIT ENROLLERS Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH",InsuranceReal Estate/Property ManagementFinancial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-agents-group-benefit-enrollers-job-columbus-oh-us-175133733.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,"50,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",Account Management (Commissioned)Insurance Agent/BrokerFinancial Products Sales/Brokerage,dc79b09a22f1498fa7703ff13f178402
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:18:58:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc.,we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! Andthat means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, whileproviding our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever andhowever they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do italone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re anenthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle,godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a funplace to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team –become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kidseverywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hearstraight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves! Job Summary: The Off Hour Stock Clerkis responsible for maintaining a well-stocked appearance in the store whichhelps ensure the best customer experience is achieved.  This individualwill work closely with the Store Management team to ensure company standardsare met during the stocking process.  The hours for this shift are commonlyearly morning, however in certain locations or during holiday seasons,overnight shifts may be available. Responsibilities:Replenish a shelf, bin or pegged area with stock and transporting merchandise by hand/pulling. This also includes picking up loose pieces of merchandise from the floor.The physical removal of goods from a truck and putting empty pallets, security cages, and transfers back on the truck. Requires the use of various material-handling equipment.Re-merchandise any selling space, to regroup items, or to make space for new merchandise.To read both written and numerical verbiage, comprehend spatial relationships, and have the ability to set merchandise according to the layout.Take empty cardboard cases from the sales floor to the baling machine.Safe operation of a blade-type instrument designed for opening cased merchandise, as well as returning the blade to its non-operational position when not in use.Returning merchandise to its proper location on the sales floor as designated by aisle layouts. This requires knowledge of sales floor locations and proper merchandising techniques, and can be accomplished either by hand or pushing a sales cart.Manually placing price shelf labels on lip below merchandise or on scanner peg hooks.Moving merchandise to and from the perimeter and gondola overstock areas and requires climbing a ladder up to 12 feet.May also be assigned other duties within the store at the direction of the store management team. Qualifications Knowledge of shipping and receiving process in a Retail environmentAbility to lift up to 25 poundsAbility to climb ladders, up to 12 feetAbility to multi task and prioritize projects **Please note that werecruit for this position on an on-going basis in order to build a talent poolof potential candidates. When a position becomes available, we will reviewapplicants at that time. Dueto the volume of resumes that we receive, only those candidates selected forinterviews will be contacted. Thank you for your interest inToys""R""Us, Inc.! Stay connected with us on Facebook, LinkedIn,Instagram, Twitter & YouTube @ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-OH-CincinnatiWork Locations: Colerain, OH TRU 9959 Colerain Ave  Cincinnati 45251-1430 Schedule: Flexible",Toys R Us Seasonal Stock Crew Team Member Job in Cincinnati,Full Time ,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc.,we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! Andthat means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, whileproviding our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever andhowever they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do italone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re anenthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle,godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a funplace to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team –become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kidseverywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hearstraight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves! Job Summary: The Off Hour Stock Clerkis responsible for maintaining a well-stocked appearance in the store whichhelps ensure the best customer experience is achieved.  This individualwill work closely with the Store Management team to ensure company standardsare met during the stocking process.  The hours for this shift are commonlyearly morning, however in certain locations or during holiday seasons,overnight shifts may be available. Responsibilities:Replenish a shelf, bin or pegged area with stock and transporting merchandise by hand/pulling. This also includes picking up loose pieces of merchandise from the floor.The physical removal of goods from a truck and putting empty pallets, security cages, and transfers back on the truck. Requires the use of various material-handling equipment.Re-merchandise any selling space, to regroup items, or to make space for new merchandise.To read both written and numerical verbiage, comprehend spatial relationships, and have the ability to set merchandise according to the layout.Take empty cardboard cases from the sales floor to the baling machine.Safe operation of a blade-type instrument designed for opening cased merchandise, as well as returning the blade to its non-operational position when not in use.Returning merchandise to its proper location on the sales floor as designated by aisle layouts. This requires knowledge of sales floor locations and proper merchandising techniques, and can be accomplished either by hand or pushing a sales cart.Manually placing price shelf labels on lip below merchandise or on scanner peg hooks.Moving merchandise to and from the perimeter and gondola overstock areas and requires climbing a ladder up to 12 feet.May also be assigned other duties within the store at the direction of the store management team. Qualifications Knowledge of shipping and receiving process in a Retail environmentAbility to lift up to 25 poundsAbility to climb ladders, up to 12 feetAbility to multi task and prioritize projects **Please note that werecruit for this position on an on-going basis in order to build a talent poolof potential candidates. When a position becomes available, we will reviewapplicants at that time. Dueto the volume of resumes that we receive, only those candidates selected forinterviews will be contacted. Thank you for your interest inToys""R""Us, Inc.! Stay connected with us on Facebook, LinkedIn,Instagram, Twitter & YouTube @ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-OH-CincinnatiWork Locations: Colerain, OH TRU 9959 Colerain Ave  Cincinnati 45251-1430 Schedule: Flexible",,http://jobview.monster.com/toys-r-us-seasonal-stock-crew-team-member-job-cincinnati-oh-us-173675435.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=15,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,2766c967e242dd7591d01102fd329560
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:19:47:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJOB OVERVIEW: The Seasonal Merchandise Handler is responsible for all functions related to the flow of new merchandise for the vendor. Performs other duties as assigned. In order to present our customers with the best holiday shopping experience, many of our Seasonal Merchandise Handlers arrive prior to store opening and remain after closing to ensure we are ready to make Macy's magic. Seasonal associates will have the opportunity to work a flexible schedule on a temporary basis, which may include early mornings, evenings, weekends and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving and the day after Christmas. And don't forget - just in time for holiday shopping, you will receive an employee discount of up to 20% starting your first day! ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:Complete general shipment and processing activities in accordance to productivity standards and ensure floor readiness Assist the Merchandise Team in the movement of fixtures and merchandise for new product, season changes, and clearance setsAssist in replenishment, inventory and markdown processesResponsible for customer carryout and special deliveriesMaintain communication with vendors, MTMs, and regional and district offices for support on driving sales, promos, and product knowledgeRegular, dependable attendance and punctualityQUALIFICATIONS: Communication Skills: Effective written and verbal skills, ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Physical Demands: This position involves constant moving and standing. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours. Involves lifting at least 30 lbs. May occasionally involve reaching, stooping, kneeling, crouching, and climbing ladders. May involve reaching above eye level. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment. Other skills: Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team. Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team. Must possess a strong sense of urgency. Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment. Work Hours: Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays.This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy’s, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Receiving and Merchandising.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",Macy's **Seasonal Holiday Retail Merchandise Handler MMG - Sleepwear** Full Time: Kenwood Towne Cent Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/macy's-seasonal-holiday-retail-merchandise-handler-mmg-sleepwear-full-time-kenwood-towne-cent-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175066038.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=20,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,ba7722a14da13da97fb20622371acf58
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:19:48:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: The Seasonal Retail Merchandising Associate is responsible for providing a great shopping experience, and driving sales and profit through customer service, proper merchandising on the sales floor and accurate merchandise movement throughout the building. Duties include placement of new receipts and floor moves, stockroom organization and replenishment, fulfillment, reverse logistics, RFID, POS transactions and other duties as needed. Essential Functions:Provide an exceptional customer shopping experience by ensuring both the in store and online customer are always the #1 priorityService the customer in a helpful and friendly manner including POS transactions, credit and Plenti enrollment, and helping her to find what she is looking for Collaborate with Managers, Leads and Associates throughout the store to deliver a clean, neat and easy-to-shop store environment; maintain sales floor and fitting room recovery standards to include checking fitting room stalls, sorting merchandise and ensuring merchandise is worked back to sales floor immediately as time permits Support Omni Channel initiatives Perform all functions in an efficient manner; flex between tasks as directed by Supervisor Participate in the physical inventory process and ensure that shortage prevention initiatives are executed  Adhere to Asset Protection and inventory control and compliance procedures Regular, dependable attendance and punctuality Collaborate with peers to coordinate merchandise movement needs with other tasks (floor moves, seasonal sets, fixture needs, etc.)Execute merchandising, fulfillment, RFID and reverse logistics tasks timely and accurately to include placement of merchandise to standards (zone-o-gram, directives, fixtures, ADA compliance and visual guidelines), movement of fixtures and merchandise for seasonal sets, stockroom maintenance and organization, replenishment to the sales floor, collection and transport of picked fulfillment orders to appropriate processing areas; preparing and returning BOPS/SDD orders; RFID tag up events, cycle counts, display audits and tagging standards; processing and packing of damages, non-congruent transfers, store initiated transfers, return to vendor and mark out of stock merchandise Assist in other tasks as needed (pricing, signing) Qualifications: Education/Experience: No specific educational accomplishments are necessary. Communication Skills: Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Reasoning Ability: Self-starter, able to work independently and as part of a team and must have good time management skills.Physical Demands: This position involves constant moving and standing. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours. Involves lifting at least 30 lbs. May occasionally involve reaching, stooping, kneeling, crouching, and climbing ladders. May involve reaching above eye level. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.Other Skills: Possess strong merchandising skills. Possess vision and creativity. Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team. Must possess a strong sense of urgency. Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment.Work Hours: Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays, based on department and store/company needs.This job description is not all inclusive. Macy’s Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Receiving and Merchandising.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Seasonal Holiday Retail Merchandising,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-retail-merchandising-mornings-part-time-macy's-tri-county-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175066456.aspx?mescoid=2700412001001&jobPosition=16,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,27846d4a6e7b6960f96bad3f2fcb6993
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:19:54:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Ethicon Inc. is currently recruiting for a Senior Development Engineer to lead Metal Component development and qualification activities for surgical robots/instruments in Cincinnati, Ohio. Ethicon offers a broad range of products, platforms and technologies—including sutures, surgical staplers, energy devices, clip appliers, and trocars - that are used in a wide variety of minimally invasive and open surgical procedures. Specialties include support for treatment of colorectal and thoracic conditions, women’s health conditions, hernias, cancer and obesity.  Our team of engineers, designers and technical experts are in the forefront of technology in the medical device industry. You will be making a vital contribution to the New Product Development (NPD) pipeline and transforming patient care through innovation. Our Development Engineering staff works with NPD teams and Suppliers to develop robust component designs and manufacturing processes that meet or exceed all product requirements at the lowest possible manufacturing cost. This is an opportunity for a key role in bringing exciting new products to market to support the J&J / Google robotics venture, a new business unit within J&J, providing the opportunity for significant professional growth. The Senior Engineer will: Lead component development activities within New Product Development projects, primarily supporting activities within the Ethicon Robotics business unit but may have assignments within Ethicon EndoMechanical or Ethicon Energy. Work with our Supply Base to provide metals components and sub-assemblies that meet established cost, quality, and performance requirements. Provide project planning, design support, process development knowledge, and qualification / validation / stabilization execution. Utilize their prior work experience, Design for Manufacturing & Assembly (DFMA) techniques, Lean Six Sigma process knowledge, and the Failure Mode Effects Analysis (FMEA) tool to drive the product design to its most efficient outcome. Have significant experience with several of the following metal processing technologies utilized by Ethicon’s suppliers: Swiss Screw Machining, Metal Injection Molding, Stamping, Milling, Welding, Powdered Metal Forming, Sintering, Heat Treatment, etc. QualificationsA Bachelor’s degree with an Engineering focus is required. A minimum of (5) years experience working in industry is requiredA minimum of 3 years experience in manufacturing process development or operations is required. Prior experience with Metal component manufacturing processes is requiredApplication of statistical analysis techniques is preferred (Design of Experiments, Process Stability / Control / Capability methods, etc.)Development and Application of gauging techniques and subsequent Measurement Systems Analyses (G&RR) is preferred. Prior experience in New Product Development, Project Management, and Risk Management experience is preferred. Experience within a medical device production environment or other regulated environment is preferred.Previous experience with Design for Manufacturing & Assembly (DFMA) and Failure Mode Effects Analysis (FMEA) is preferred.Experience with tooling design / build of metal injection molding, stamping, and/or machining processes is preferred.Experience with Process Excellence Six Sigma, Green Belt or Black Belt is preferred. Knowledge of GD&T (ASME Y14.5) is preferred.Experience working closely with external suppliers and vendors is preferred.  This position is located in Cincinnati, OH and may require up to 30% travel both domestic or international.  BE VITAL in your career, Be seen for the talent you bring to your work. Explore opportunities within the Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies.Primary LocationUnited States-Ohio-CincinnatiOrganizationEthicon Endo Surgery Inc (6041)Job FunctionR&D Engineering (R&D) Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-1.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-2.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-3.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-4.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-5.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies Job Application for Senior Development Engineer (Metals) | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Ethicon Inc. is currently recruiting for a Senior Development Engineer to lead Metal Component development and qualification activities for surgical robots/instruments in Cincinnati, Ohio. Ethicon offers a broad range of products, platforms and technologies—including sutures, surgical staplers, energy devices, clip appliers, and trocars - that are used in a wide variety of minimally invasive and open surgical procedures. Specialties include support for treatment of colorectal and thoracic conditions, women’s health conditions, hernias, cancer and obesity.  Our team of engineers, designers and technical experts are in the forefront of technology in the medical device industry. You will be making a vital contribution to the New Product Development (NPD) pipeline and transforming patient care through innovation. Our Development Engineering staff works with NPD teams and Suppliers to develop robust component designs and manufacturing processes that meet or exceed all product requirements at the lowest possible manufacturing cost. This is an opportunity for a key role in bringing exciting new products to market to support the J&J / Google robotics venture, a new business unit within J&J, providing the opportunity for significant professional growth. The Senior Engineer will: Lead component development activities within New Product Development projects, primarily supporting activities within the Ethicon Robotics business unit but may have assignments within Ethicon EndoMechanical or Ethicon Energy. Work with our Supply Base to provide metals components and sub-assemblies that meet established cost, quality, and performance requirements. Provide project planning, design support, process development knowledge, and qualification / validation / stabilization execution. Utilize their prior work experience, Design for Manufacturing & Assembly (DFMA) techniques, Lean Six Sigma process knowledge, and the Failure Mode Effects Analysis (FMEA) tool to drive the product design to its most efficient outcome. Have significant experience with several of the following metal processing technologies utilized by Ethicon’s suppliers: Swiss Screw Machining, Metal Injection Molding, Stamping, Milling, Welding, Powdered Metal Forming, Sintering, Heat Treatment, etc. QualificationsA Bachelor’s degree with an Engineering focus is required. A minimum of (5) years experience working in industry is requiredA minimum of 3 years experience in manufacturing process development or operations is required. Prior experience with Metal component manufacturing processes is requiredApplication of statistical analysis techniques is preferred (Design of Experiments, Process Stability / Control / Capability methods, etc.)Development and Application of gauging techniques and subsequent Measurement Systems Analyses (G&RR) is preferred. Prior experience in New Product Development, Project Management, and Risk Management experience is preferred. Experience within a medical device production environment or other regulated environment is preferred.Previous experience with Design for Manufacturing & Assembly (DFMA) and Failure Mode Effects Analysis (FMEA) is preferred.Experience with tooling design / build of metal injection molding, stamping, and/or machining processes is preferred.Experience with Process Excellence Six Sigma, Green Belt or Black Belt is preferred. Knowledge of GD&T (ASME Y14.5) is preferred.Experience working closely with external suppliers and vendors is preferred.  This position is located in Cincinnati, OH and may require up to 30% travel both domestic or international.  BE VITAL in your career, Be seen for the talent you bring to your work. Explore opportunities within the Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies.Primary LocationUnited States-Ohio-CincinnatiOrganizationEthicon Endo Surgery Inc (6041)Job FunctionR&D Engineering (R&D)",Personal and Household Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-development-engineer-metals-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174471318.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=3,,,001335ca0c2cedf919e70f2892e10423
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:20:57:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales Agent While a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings. Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers. Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team. Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1 Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today. About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. 1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015 Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Aflac Insurance Sales Agent Job in Fairfield,Full Time,"Fairfield, OH 45014",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-insurance-sales-agent-job-fairfield-oh-us-174517511.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=6,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,af74e8059e826b2f1b288f0066c5d671
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:20:58:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: The Seasonal Retail Receiving Associate is responsible for providing a great shopping experience, and driving sales and profit through customer service and accurate processing of merchandise entering and leaving the building. Duties include receiving activities, packing and shipping, reverse logistics, sustainability and other duties as needed. Essential Functions:Provide an exceptional customer shopping experience by ensuring both the in store and online customer are always the #1 priorityService the customer in a helpful and friendly manner Collaborate with Managers, Leads and Associates throughout the store to deliver a clean, neat and easy-to-shop store environment; maintain sales floor and fitting room recovery standards to include checking fitting room stalls, sorting merchandise and ensuring merchandise is worked back to sales floor immediately as time permitsSupport Omni Channel initiativesPerform all functions in an efficient manner; flex between tasks as directed by SupervisorParticipate in the physical inventory process and ensure that shortage prevention initiatives are executedAdhere to Asset Protection and inventory control and compliance proceduresRegular, dependable attendance and punctualityCollaborate with peers to coordinate merchandise movement needs with other tasks (floor moves, seasonal sets, fixture needs, etc.) Execute receiving, merchandise processing, packing/shipping and reverse logistics tasks timely and accurately to include processing inbound merchandise to floor ready standards by removing packaging and placing sensors per MMPS standards; delivery of processed merchandise to appropriate sales floor drop zones, first quality packing standards and processing of fulfillment orders and reverse logistics (damages, transfers, RTVs), accurate outbound trailer execution; collection and sorting of hangers, sensor tags, trash and recycling throughout the store; organization, maintenance and replenishment of supply areas including sales floor, building lamping, and customer carryout and special delivery as neededAssist in other tasks as needed (pricing, signing, merchandising, replenishment, fulfillment, RFID, stockroom maintenance) Qualifications: Education/Experience: No specific educational accomplishments are necessary. Communication Skills: Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Reasoning Ability: Self-starter, able to work independently and as part of a team and must have good time management skills.Physical Demands: This position involves constant moving and standing. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours. Involves lifting at least 30 lbs. May occasionally involve reaching, stooping, kneeling, crouching, and climbing ladders. May involve reaching above eye level. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.Other Skills: Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team. Must possess a strong sense of urgency. Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment.Work Hours: Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays, based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. Macy’s Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Receiving and Merchandising.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",Macy's Seasonal Holiday Retail Receiving,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/macy's-seasonal-holiday-retail-receiving-early-mornings-part-time-fountain-place-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175077851.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=5,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,296a2726c3e4803d07cd8054bccfa3db
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:21:47:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a highly regarded and growing MEDICAL DEVICE company working in the field of cancer diagnostics and we are looking for a VALUE ENGINEERING PROJECT MANAGER. We are working on ways to improve the function and reduce the cost of our numerous commercially-released products, so we are looking for a new Project Manager. On a daily basis we are striving to impact and improve patients' lives through innovation, research and development of technology. Our systems are used in numerous countries, offering early detection and treatment to thousands of individuals, and we provide support, education and information to both clinicians and patients. We are currently seeking a great Value Engineering Project Manager to help us in our progress!What You Will Be Doing- project management of Value Engineering / VAVE projects: engineering changes on commercially released products, adding functions and reducing costs- working with cross-functional teams (including marketing, operations, supply chain, quality regulatory, etc.)- working with external suppliers & partners- monitoring all financial aspects of projectWhat You Need for this Position- 5+ years of Engineering Project Management experience - Bachelor's Degree in Engineering- 1+ years in a leadership / ability to mentor engineers- desire to focus on margin improvement on commercially released products- medical device experience- electromechanical device experience- experience in Project Management of product design and/or product development activities in a regulated environment (medical or aerospace)- ability to manage multiple projects at the same time (projects may be 8 to 10 months long)- ability to travel up to 20% (domestic and international, typically 3-5 day trips with overnight stays)- PMP certification is a PLUS!What's In It for You- competitive salary- bonus potential- strong benefits package- potential relocation supportSo, if you are a Value Engineering / VAVE Project Manager with electromechanical experience in the medical device field, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Value Engineering Project Manager - Medical Devices | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Lisa van Horne,Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/value-engineering-project-manager-medical-devices-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174420641.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=4,,,b662a5a6265a8b3f87740ac5ba88747c
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:21:48:17,No,jobs.monster.com," Our client is currently seeking a QA Manual TesterThe contract QA-Manual Tester is responsible for assisting developers in creating detailed application test plans.  Develops, maintains, executes and upgrades manual test scripts, utilities, simulators, data sets and other programmatic test tools required to execute test plans.  Effectively communicates testing activities and findings in oral and written forms.  Controls and manages daily test activities. Agile a + and Retail experience a +  Should have 3 - 5 years of experience.This project will start on January 2, 2017  - 6-months + Candidates local to Columbus, Ohio will be given first preference - please take note of the start dateMust have:·         Manual testing experience·         SQL Database experience·         TFS knowledge (Team Foundation Server)·         Must know Mobile testing.         Cross Browser testing·         Will work on minor enhancements·         Should know Agile Methodology·         Must be an Analytical thinker + self-starter.         ISTQB Certified a BIG plus !•Assists developers in creating detailed application test plans•Develops, maintains, executes and upgrades manual test scripts, utilities, simulators, data sets and other programmatic test tools required to execute test plans•Provides reports to management as required•Effectively communicates testing activities and findings in oral and written forms•Controls and manages daily test activities•Organizes and maintains the test script libraryQualifications: •Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, MIS, Mathematics, related field or equivalent•QA/Testing certification•2-4 years in QA with full life-cycle testing, writing test plans, developing test cases and implementing test strategies; or equivalent combination of education and experience•Work in a highly dynamic, agile organization•Ability to analyze the most complex applications and systems with minimal supervision•Strong problem solving skills to determine the effects on existing and new systems•Excellent business analysis and communications•Strong decision making skills•Expertise with MS Office products required•Office suite of applications",QA Manual Tester Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-manual-tester-job-columbus-oh-us-175209305.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=20,,IT/Software Development,bfbb1f1fbc43609d1afb75a62500b18c
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:22:54:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Watch Our Home Services - Outside Sales Consultant VideoPosition Purpose: Sales Consultants are primarily responsible for selling Home Depot’s do-it-for-me services to clients in their homes. Sales Consultants spend the majority of their time traveling to and engaged in professional sales presentations in customers’ homes. While at customers’ homes, Sales Consultants assess customers’ needs, recommend products that fulfill these needs, develop price quotes, and present warranty information and financing options. They work with customers to complete the necessary sales contracts and paperwork. Sales Consultants are also responsible for generating sales leads inside their assigned stores and during scheduled lead generation events, maintaining relationships with assigned stores in an effort to drive their sales, attending meetings, and participating in and/or facilitating training on HDE products and service offerings. Sales Consultants earn commissions based on their sales and are also eligible for monthly bonuses based on sales performance. Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities: 70%-Conduct professional sales presentation inside customers’ homes. Complete assessment of customers’ needs while at their home. Present warranty and available financing options to customers. Prepare for appointments, commute to/from appointments, process sales-related paperwork. 30%-Generate leads at assigned store. Participate in scheduled lead generation events. Develop/maintain relationships with store management and associates. Attend branch/team meetings. Attend store meetings and facilitate/participate in training on HDE products and service offerings. Nature and Scope: Position reports to Sales Manager This position has no direct reports. Environmental Job Requirements: Environment:  Located in a comfortable indoor area. Any unpleasant conditionsStandard Minimum Qualifications: Must be eighteen years of age or older. Must pass the Drug Test. Must pass Background Check. Must pass pre-employment test if applicable. Additional Minimum Qualifications: Education Required:  The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diplomas and/or GED. Work Experience Required: 1 Minimum Age Override: 0 Certifications & Licenses: Dependent on state/municipality laws. Physical Requirements:  Requires intermittent periods during which continuous physical exertion is required, such as walking, standing, stooping, climbing, lifting material or equipment, some of which may be heavy or awkward. Additional Qualifications: Sales Consultants must have a valid driver's license. Preferred Qualifications: Previous residential, in-home sales experience. Prior experience in the home improvement industry. Proficiency with computer/iPad and related programs. Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Ability to work cooperatively as part of a team. Effective communication skills, both written and verbal. Excellent presentation skills.. Strong focus on meeting the needs of the customer. Strong attention to detail.",SALES CONSULTANT - BEACHMONT Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45201",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-consultant-beachmont-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174402958.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,,,40255dcf14f84b4d7bead50fce6e903a
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:22:56:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview:The Big Ticket Sales Associate is responsible for providing outstanding customer service, meeting hourly sales and Star Rewards goals on a personal and departmental basis, and demonstrating superior product knowledge to customers. To create a shopping experience that will make the customer feel welcome and comfortable. Performs other duties as assigned. The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here. Essential Functions:Assist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment by demonstrating proficient use of proprietary devices and applications; proactively create enhanced shopping experiences through the heightened use of tools, technology and collaborationDetermine customer needs based on personal features and other customer preference related factorsMaintain a professional attitude with sincerity and enthusiasm reflecting Macy’s commitment to our customer-the most important person in our storesBe aware of current promotional events and salesRegular, dependable attendance and punctualityQualifications: Communication Skills: Effective written and verbal skills, ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Physical Demands: This position involves constant moving, talking, hearing, reaching, and standing. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours. Involves lifting at least 30 lbs. May occasionally involve stooping, kneeling, crouching, and climbing ladders. Vision abilities include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment. Other skills: Must be able to function as part of a team. Possess a strong sense of urgency. Must enjoy meeting and interacting with customers. Possess a thirst for learning. Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team. Must possess a strong sense of urgency. Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment. Work Hours: Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays.This job description is not all inclusive. Macy’s Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Commissioned Sales.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",Retail Commission Sales - Furniture/Bedding,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-commission-sales-furniture-bedding-full-time-cincinnati-oh-macy's-kenwood-furniture-sto-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174713674.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=5,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,e78f540ca02ceac81ab08658fce80f11
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:23:52:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"New Job Be a part of the Pharmacy and Finance World - Use your business knowledge to help analyze data and provide financial support. Job Duties! •Sources Patient Assistance program and/or foundation to assist patients in meeting Out Of Pocket responsibility•Inbound and Outbound calls related to Patient Assistant Program, billing inquiries, and insurance verification•Customer service (internal/external)•Documenting case files with complete notes on work •Complete special projects with varied and complex components as needed Role Essentials•High school diploma or GED•1 to 2 years of customer service experience •Comprehensive knowledge of Microsoft Products including Word, Excel and Outlook•Intermediate to High level of Windows Based system navigation •Previous experience working phones on an incoming and outgoing basis ",Patient Financial Services Specialist- Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Cincinnati, OH 45246",,http://jobview.monster.com/patient-financial-services-specialist-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174344160.aspx?mescoid=4100676001001&jobPosition=3,,Customer Support/Client Care,9d694ba04755d056416e827f86995d56
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:23:53:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines   Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in Columbus,Part Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-columbus-oh-us-175242717.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=11,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,84e74d5776e780ebe8823a4b656e0500
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:22:56:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position’s primary role will be an NGEN TRMP Mid-Level Network Technician servicing a large scale Enterprise network. You will be part of a Team of Network Technicians and Engineers focused on the technology refresh of a large scale Enterprise Network. This network includes Cisco, Aruba, Brocade, Juniper, Riverbed and McAfee network devices to include Routers, Switches, Access Points, Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), Virtual Private Networks (VPN) and WAN Accelerators. As a Mid-Level Technician you will be expected to work with the on-site customers, NOC technicians and Managers to execute Network Device replacements within a region. You will be responsible for the entire process including ticket creation using HPE Service Manager, executing the network device replacement and asset management of the new and old network devices. Candidates will be expected to understand, implement, and follow processes in accordance with current policies and procedures. You may also be asked to perform additional field services tasks as directed. The successful candidate will be a detail-oriented technical professional, customer service oriented and knowledgeable in the areas of Ethernet and TCP/IP with 4 plus years’ experience as a Network Technician. Position requires a high level of project coordination skills to manage the execution of maintenance activities and network outages. Fundamental understanding of the OSI Model is required. Experience must include operational support, and configuration of network devices such as servers, routers, switches, associated software tools, and cabling in a large LAN/MAN/BAN/WAN environment. Knowledge of network protocols such as OSPF, BGP, and EIGRP is a plus. Knowledge and experience working with wireless technologies, Virtual Private Networks (VPN), Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), and WAN Accelerators and associated technologies is highly desirable. You will be part of a team of Network Technicians and Engineers. Travel will be required. Ability to obtain a Government Secret Security Clearance is required. The ideal candidate will have a passion for excellence and continual improvement, combined with an entrepreneurial spirit, strong written and oral communication skills, strong interpersonal skills, innovative thinking in a fast-paced, ever-changing environment. Strong customer service and communication is necessary to ensure customer satisfaction and network reliability. Good problem-solving and troubleshooting skills related to servers and network devices are a plus. Ability to lift up to 50lbs is required. A background in the Information Technology field or a related technology field is highly desirable. Other evidence of intellectual, technical, business accomplishments, and related technology leadership experiences will be considered. Cisco CCNA and Security+ required. ITIL foundation V3 certification is highly desirable. Required Clearance: Active DoD Secret",IT Service Delivery Rep Mid (Government) Job in Vienna,,"Vienna, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-service-delivery-rep-mid-government-job-vienna-va-us-169422354.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=11,,,d187e9d60933c10e93c823d6fe5ddea8
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:23:52:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position will support AT&T by maintaining the operational posture of our network communications facilities. The candidate will be part of a small team that supports the readiness, reliability and survivability of our corporate assets on a 24x7x365 basis. The candidate will be responsible for maintaining facility equipment in an effort to support AT&T’s critical network operations. Candidates must maintain proficiency with facility equipment as well as gaining and maintaining certification and proficiency with Hazardous Materials (HAZMAT) apparatus and equipment. Work entails 12 hour rotating shift work as well as call-outs and temporary assignments in response to AT&T operational requirements Experience in hands on facilities maintenance including HVAC, electrical systems, building automation systems and security operations are required. Candidate must possess experience in preventive maintenance practices and a proven ability to troubleshoot facilities maintenance issues. Training is provided for specific duties and equipment. Desired: Candidate must be comfortable working in a team setting, possess good verbal communication and computer word processing skills and display a track record of high quality work. Previous experience using HAZMAT equipment or performing HAZMAT operations is a plus. Candidate must be able to obtain and/or maintain a security clearance. Required Clearance: Ability to obtain a security clearance",WAN Tech (Government) Job in Charlottesville,,"Charlottesville, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/wan-tech-government-job-charlottesville-va-us-169992408.aspx?mescoid=1500135001001&jobPosition=6,,,78b63a2479eac8ab377fe6583a1ab5d4
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:23:53:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T IT Service Delivery Rep is a Field Services mid-level network technician. Working as an IT Service Delivery Rep Mid, you work as part of a Team of Network Technicians and Engineers responsible for servicing large scale Enterprise networks. Network includes Cisco, Aruba, Brocade, Juniper, Riverbed and McAfee networks. Devices to include Routers, Switches, Access Points, Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), Virtual Private Networks (VPN) and WAN Accelerators. Roles and responsibilities include but are not limited to the following: Install and maintain network devices at the site Work with the NOC technicians and Managers to troubleshoot outages and resolve network related issues. Create ticket for maintenances using HPE Service Manager. Understand, implement, and follow processes in accordance with current policies and procedures. Perform escalation and additional tasks as directed. Take direction from the Regional Leader and Site Leaders Ability to travel as needed Qualified applicant has the following skills and experience: 4 or more years experience as a Network Technician Innovative technical professional, customer service oriented, and knowledgeable engineer in the field of Ethernet and IP data engineering High level of project coordination skills to manage the execution of maintenance activities and network outages. Fundamental understanding of the OSI Model A passion for excellence and continual improvement, combined with an entrepreneurial spirit, strong written and oral communication skills, strong interpersonal skills, innovative thinking in a fast-paced, ever-changing environment. Strong customer service and communication is necessary to ensure customer satisfaction and network reliability. Ability to lift up to 50lbs is required. Operational support, and configuration of network devices such as servers, routers, switches, associated software tools, and cabling in a large LAN/MAN/BAN/WAN environment. Fundamental understanding of the OSI Model is required Some Travel will be required. Desired skills and experience: Problem-solving and troubleshooting skills in severs and Cisco devices as needed Knowledge of network protocols such as OSPF, BGP, and EIGRP is a Plus. Knowledge and experience working with wireless technologies, Virtual Private Networks (VPN), Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), and WAN Accelerators and associated technologies is highly desirable. Education: A Background Information Technology field or a related technology field is highly desirable. Other evidence of intellectual, technical, business accomplishments, and related technology leadership experiences will be considered. Certifications: Active Comp TIA Security Plus CE is required Cisco CCNA desired ITIL foundation V3 certification is highly desirable. Must be a US Citizen and have an ACTIVE Secret Clearance or the ability to Obtain a Government Secret Security Clearance with active required certifications APPLICANTS SELECTED WILL BE SUBJECT TO A GOVERNMENT SECURITY INVESTIGATION AND MUST MEET ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR ACCESS TO CLASSIFIED INFORMATION.",IT Service Delivery Rep Mid (Government) Job in Pearl Harbor,,"Pearl Harbor, HI",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-service-delivery-rep-mid-government-job-pearl-harbor-hi-us-169732533.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=7,,,0e93528d2bcfd666a2f25718f5063485
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:00:00:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales Agent While a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings. Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers. Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team. Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1 Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today. About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. 1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015 Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Aflac Insurance Sales Agent Job in Fairfield,Full Time,"Fairfield, OH 45014",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-insurance-sales-agent-job-fairfield-oh-us-174843120.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=13,,Customer Support/Client Care,0456b2c9ed286622b93384f1394cc059
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:00:00:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: This position is responsible for answering the Solutions InSTORE Hotline calls from active and terminated Macy’s Inc. employees and provides guidance as to their next step within the Solutions InSTORE Program. Perform other duties as assigned. This position is based out of Downtown Cincinnati, Ohio. Essential Functions: • Receive phone calls from concerned associates and provide specific guidance on next steps in regards to those concerns and thoroughly document concerns in Salesforce tracking system.• Monitor and respond to department email box, Self- Service queue and calls, as warranted.• Provide Solutions InSTORE program and process guidance, which may include sending appropriate paperwork to involved parties and follow up with Company partners at all levels of the organization. • Maintain Solutions InSTORE case files to include filing, copying, imaging and mailing required materials to involved parties.• Other department projects/duties as assigned.• Regular, dependable attendance and punctuality. Qualifications: Education/Experience: • High School diploma or equivalent. Communication Skills: • Excellent written and verbal communication skills.• Ability to read, write, and interpret instructional documents, such as reports and procedure manuals. Mathematical Skills: • Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Reasoning Ability: • Must be able to work independently with minimal supervision. Physical Demands: • This position involves extended periods of sitting and the extensive use of computers and other office equipment, i.e. telephones and copiers, etc. May involve stooping, kneeling, or crouching. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment. Other Skills: • Attention to detail with exceptional telephone and customer service skills. • Ability to prioritize and coordinate multiple responsibilities;• Ability to work in a fast paced environment and maintain the strictest confidentiality. • Familiarity of Salesforce and PeopleSoft a plus. • Team player. • Ability to speak Spanish a plus. Work Hours: • Ability to work a flexible schedule based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. Macy’s Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Associate and Labor Relations.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",Associate Relations Coordinator Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-relations-coordinator-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175143431.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=3,,Human Resources,696e9d1718192729f617331b6e729875
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:00:59:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary Our Meat Cutter ensures that our guests are receiving the best and most delicious products, presented according to their requirements. In addition to providing unparalleled guest service and supporting the Meat Lead, you'll be the one we look to make sure that our offerings and services promote guest loyalty, and growth and success for the store. This role is for a mover and a shaker in the foodie world!Who You Are:You are a team player at heart. You know that you are only successful when those around you are set up for success. You are eager to support an amazing team, have the drive to grow your career in leadership, and have the ability to inspire those around you. You are creative with cuisine, and love to help others foster their own creativity. An interest in food doesn't quite scratch the surface for you; you're passionate about the business, the trends, and what makes customers tick. You have culinary vision beyond a simple ""What's for dinner?"" and every opportunity to connect with people is an opportunity for you exchange ideas and learn tricks of the trade. Our store leads are the cream of the crop and must ensure that each guest discovers the pleasure of tasting incredible food and our passion for providing it at every turn Job Responsibilities Maintain safety as the top priority in all aspects of our work, for our Team Members, guests, and products. Provide unparalleled guest service, constantly striving to delight and surprise our guests, vendors, and stakeholders. Cultivate a foodie culture by sharing excitement and passion for food with Team Members and guests. Inspire your fellow Team Members and our guests with a passion for food and a willingness to go the Extra Mile to provide the best product. Provide active sampling opportunities, when appropriate. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, tables, utensils, floor (to ensure safety) and sanitation regulations are met. Cut meat to be sold to customers by taking the product out of the cooler and cutting meat into smaller sizes to be packaged for sale. Make ground meat by putting coarse ground into grinder then traying meat. Follow proper procedures to ensure store meets out-of-stock percentage goals. Service guests by answering questions and/or filling special orders. Wrap and maintain meat case. Responsible for controlling some expense within a department. Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Meat cutting certification Education and Training Desired Associates Degree Culinary or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Prior meat cutting experience Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cold Prep Rooms Cooler Freezer Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Climbing Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Matching Operating Equipment Pulling Pushing Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Sorting Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Unloading Walking Weighing Writing Equipment Used Dolly Knives Power Washer Shrink Wrap Machine Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Telephone Auto Wrapper Cardboard Baler Carts Compactor Dock Plates Dumpster Electric/Manual Jacks Grinder Heat Seal Gun Ice Machine Intercom Knives Label Gun Lobster Pot Manual Wrapper Meat Cuber Meat Tumbler Periscope Plastic Baler Power jacks Pressure Hose Pressure Washer Price Gun Receiving Gun Safety Cutter Saw Scale Labeler Scale Shrink Wrapper Slicer Steam Machine Trash compactor U-Boats WalkieTalkie Wrapper",Meat Cutter (Full Time) Kingsdale Market District Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/meat-cutter-full-time-kingsdale-market-district-job-columbus-oh-us-175133474.aspx?mescoid=5100923001001&jobPosition=7,,Marketing/Product,cc61de0dc62d9984cec2e4942297f4a1
United States of America,US,03/Jun/2016:01:00:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"As America""s Un-carrier, T-Mobile US, Inc. (NYSE: TMUS) is redefining the way consumers and businesses buy wireless services through leading product and service innovation. The company""s advanced nationwide 4G and 4G LTE network delivers outstanding wireless experiences for customers who are unwilling to compromise on quality and value. Based in Bellevue, Wash., T-Mobile US operates its flagship brands, T-Mobile and MetroPCS. It currently serves approximately 58 million wireless subscribers and provides products and services through 70,000 points of distribution.Here""s to the leader in you. It""s time to do something you love, work with a purpose, and take on a challenge like never before. Meet T-Mobile, America""s Un-carrier, serving 50 million wireless subscribers and growing. When you join our team, you can make an incredible difference to your customers, and your co-workers. We""re looking for boldness, enthusiasm, and a whole lot of passion. In exchange, we offer real career growth opportunities in a place where awesome work is rewarded.This is the big leagues. You""ve got a lot of responsibility and people looking to you for guidance and leadership. Ready to bring it? Good. Here""s a little more on what we""re looking for: You""ve got prior sales and sales management experience with a customer focused retailer This includes previous consultative sales in consumer technology, coupled with a demonstrated record of high achievement You""ve also got experience in operational, financial and performance management, having previously managed site profit and loss You""ve also got a unique ability to lead and coach people to deliver great results People who know you would say you""re an amazing communicator, both with customers and teammates You""ve got solid computer proficiency A high school degree or GED is essential, while a Bachelor""s degree is preferredYou""re ready for this. So let""s talk about all the generous rewards we can offer for your outstanding work. Our compensation includes: Competitive base pay plus unlimited commissions Benefits for part-time and full-time associates Medical, dental and vision benefits Matching 401(k) Generous paid time-off programs Phone service discounts Education reimbursement Serious growth potential for your careerThis is the opportunity to do something special and be a leader with a company revolutionizing the wireless industry. And we couldn""t do it without someone like you. So what do you say? Isn""t it time you explored what could become the career move of a lifetime? We invite you to apply today!You know retail sales inside and out, and you""re ready to make that next move to a leadership role like no other. In this role, you""ll manage talent, inspire your team, and make sure every customer comes away with a great experience. It""s not easy, but it""s the kind of challenge that can make your career. Take a closer look at what the job entails: When it comes to the customer experience at your store, the buck stops with you, as you ensure that each person gets an unforgettable experience and a custom-fit solution to their wireless needs You""ll help your associates to build strong relationships with their customers, make expert recommendations, and help onboard customers like a pro We""ll look to you to hire, train and develop your team, making staff adjustments as needed You""ll also ensure that your store meets or exceeds sales goals, and that means overseeing all store functions, from sales and inventory to the implementation of new store programs and initiatives Along the way, you""ll stay current on all our technology so that you can be an expert for your team, and your customers Finally, you""ll make sure your store always looks its bestWe Take Equal Opportunity Seriously - By Choice T-Mobile USA, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All decisions concerning the employment relationship will be made without regard to age, race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, marital status, veteran status, the presence of any physical or mental disability, or any other status or characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. Discrimination or harassment based upon any of these factors is wholly inconsistent with our Company values and will not be tolerated. Furthermore, such discrimination or harassment may violate federal, state, or local law. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Retail Store Manager Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH 45211",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-store-manager-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175128905.aspx?mescoid=1101116002005&jobPosition=16,,,0046a010884771ecbfcaa5eb6343b265
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:22:55:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Work Location: Bangor, WAThis position’s primary role will be a Field Services Junior Level Network Technician servicing a large scale Enterprise network. You will be part of a Team of Network Technicians and Engineers servicing the NGEN Navy sites. This network includes Cisco, Aruba, Brocade, Juniper, Riverbed and McAfee network devices to include Routers, Switches, Access Points, Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), Virtual Private Networks (VPN) and WAN Accelerators. Responsibilities: As a Junior Network Technician you will be expected to install and maintain network devices at the site and work with the NOC technicians and managers to troubleshoot outages and resolve network related issues. You will be responsible to create ticket for maintenances using HPE Service Manager. Candidates will be expected to understand, implement, and follow processes in accordance with current policies and procedures. Perform escalation and additional tasks as directed. Take Direction from the Regional Leader and Site Leaders The successful candidate will have basic working knowledge in the Networking and Information Technology field with 0 to 4 plus years’ experience in the Information Technology Field with basic Networking knowledge. Position requires the basic skills to manage the execution of maintenance activities and network outages. Fundamental understanding of the OSI Model is required. Candidate needs a basic understanding of network devices such as servers, routers, switches, associated software tools, and cabling in a large LAN/MAN/BAN/WAN environment. Knowledge of network protocols such as OSPF, BGP, and EIGRP is a Plus. Knowledge and experience working with wireless technologies, Virtual Private Networks (VPN), Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), and WAN Accelerators and associated technologies is highly desirable. Some travel maybe required. Some Travel will be Required. Ability to Obtain a Government Secret Security Clearance is required.Skills: The ideal candidate will have a passion for excellence and continual improvement, combined with an entrepreneurial spirit, good written and oral communication skills, strong interpersonal skills, innovative thinking in a fast-paced, ever-changing environment. Good customer service and communication is necessary to ensure customer satisfaction and network reliability. A good problem-solving and troubleshooting skills with severs and Cisco devices are a Plus. Candidate needs to have the ability to lift up to 50 lbs. Education: A Background Information Technology field or a related technology field is highly desirable. Other evidence of intellectual, technical, business accomplishments, and related technology leadership experiences will be considered. Cisco Network + and Security+ CE required. ITIL foundation V3 certification is highly desirable. Must be a US Citizen and possess or be able to obtain Secret Clearance",IT Service Delivery Rep Jr Bangor (Government ) Job in Atlanta,,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-service-delivery-rep-jr-bangor-government-job-atlanta-ga-us-169992444.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=5,,,e74d99d5b846d845bf67840223297472
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:22:22:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a Software Engineer you will be required to have prior expertise in supporting development, maintenance, and enhancement of complex and diverse software systems based upon documented requirements. Experience with JAVA and a deep understanding of Linux (RedHat and CentOS) is important, as well as experience with ElasticSearch, Apache Solr, Ansible or similar technology (Salt or Chef). We expect you to have a solid background in writing and implementing code to interact with object-relational as well as NoSQL distributed databases and experience with Maven Open-source configuration management tools (Puppet). Experience working in Agile engineering environment and familiarity with shell scripting languages such as Ruby, BASH execution and analysis is also desired. A strong candidate will also be familiar with Spring or Spring Boot and provide system administration services for Linux infrastructure and development systems (scripting and loading machines using KickStart system configuration). Also have skills in developing and maintaining scripts for loading machines using KickStart and Puppet manifests (or Ansible) and perform/verify system configurations. Experience with OPENSTACK is preferred as well as experience with Apache NiFiSecurity. Candidates must have active TS/SCI clearance with polygraph Desired: Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related discipline from an accredited college or university is required. Four (4) years of additional software engineering experience on projects with similar software processes may be substituted for a bachelor's degree.AT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V",Software Engineer (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/software-engineer-government-job-columbia-md-us-170368346.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=7,,,a59ddd424b8f98a844c2ffb9d7630423
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:21:47:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position supports the Department of State (DOS) Telecommunications, Wireless and Data Services Division (TWD) Division, which provides managed voice and data network services to domestic DOS customers. Converged Network Engineers support event management, incident management, service management, and problem management activities, as well as support the implementation of new technology and cost-effective enhancements to the existing voice and data networks. Converged Network Engineers are responsible for using Cisco and Avaya products, as well as a working knowledge of encryption solutions, private branch exchanges (PBXs), and local and wide-area networks (LAN/WAN). Responsibilities include; planning, developing, installing, configuring, maintaining, supporting and optimizing all network hardware, software, and communication links. Description of Duties: • Constructs, tests and implements integrated network, hardware and software solutions, distributed computing solutions, and/or physical and logical communications networks for the customer. • Participates in day-to-day orders, Special Projects, and trouble tickets to include Move, Add, and Change requests for the data and/or voice network. • Writes and executes detailed engineering implementations, generates bills of materials (BOMs), and basis of estimates (BOEs) unassisted. • Provides network performance statistics and reports and recommends technical enhancements to the network. • Interfaces with others on system infrastructure problems and advises management on technical problems, priorities, and methods. • Ensures customer satisfaction with the resolution or circumvention of hardware, software, and/or circuit problems including the assessment of bandwidth requirements based upon empirical data. • Provides technical consulting on high level network designs, platform sizing, infrastructure system design and the application of new technologies. • Applies extensive industry and enterprise knowledge to identify and recommend integrated solutions, products and services to support the enterprise's accomplishments of business goals or technical needs. • Researches, evaluates and stays current on emerging tools, techniques and technologies. • Contributes to systems infrastructure plans based on an understanding of the customer's organizational direction, technical context and business needs. • Contributes to the creation of new policies and procedures for Maintenance Plan and Continuity of Operations Plan. • Extensive client interaction with primary focus of achieving and surpassing client project goals. Required Education/Experience: • B.S. degree is required, but could be offset with 7 to 10+ years of progressive, hands-on, engineering experience. • Minimum 4 years of hands-on Voice and Data experience at a junior level. • Avaya product experience is a must. • LAN/WAN/MAN design and migration experience with a focus on WAN services (ISDN, Frame-Relay, Point-to-Point, and MPLS). • Experience conducting site surveys and organizing the documentation into an Engineering Plan. Required Experience/Skills/Attributes: • Works extensively with Cisco Enterprise solution products. • Strong understanding and ability to implement Cisco router, switch, and ASA products. • Expert skills troubleshooting access-lists, IPv4 and IPv6 issues across varying protocols such as OSPF, BGP, and Static Routing. • Hands-on skills to include: Aura Communication Manager, ACD call center, CMS, unified messaging, modular messaging, SIP/H.323 trunking, SIP services, G430/450, S8800, and Intuity Audix. • Intermediate to expert level skills required in networking to support converged applications (voice & video) • Detailed understanding and capability of implementing various routing protocols to include OSPF, BGP and Static Routes. • Strong interpersonal, written and oral skills. From time to time, candidate may be asked to present project outline to customer. • Ability to conduct research on products with various vendors to accommodate changing customer requirements. • Ability to work in a team-oriented collaborative environment while being highly motivated to take the lead on projects. Desired Experience/Skills/Attributes: • Experience with Microsoft products including Windows 2000 Server, Active Directory, and Exchange Unified Messaging would be a plus. • Hands-on administration experience with Linux/Solaris • Project management experience a plus • Desired Avaya Certifications: o Avaya Certified Expert (ACE) in IP Telephony o Avaya Professional Design Specialist (APDS), Avaya Certified Implementation Specialist (ACIS) o Avaya Certified Support Specialist (ACSS) o Avaya Certified Solutions Architect (ACSA) • Desired Cisco Certifications: o CCNP Voice - Cisco Certified Network Professional o CCNA Voice - Cisco Certified Network Professional o CCNP - Cisco Certified Network Professional o CCIE Clearance Requirement: SECRET (Active) with the ability to be granted a TOP SECRET clearance",Converged Networks Engineer (Government) Job in Washington,,"Washington, DC",,http://jobview.monster.com/converged-networks-engineer-government-job-washington-dc-us-169945750.aspx?mescoid=1500132001001&jobPosition=20,,,b9530f2f117b5f501f378033bf44a709
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:21:47:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"A member of the Network Assurance (NA) Team (DISA GSM-O program) that lead/support NA Activities within DISA Global. Responsible for maintaining the integrity and security of enterprise-wide cyber systems and networks. Supports cybersecurity initiatives through both predictive and reactive analysis, articulating emerging trends to leadership and staff. Coordinates resources during enterprise incident response efforts, driving incidents to timely and complete resolution. Performs network traffic analysis utilizing raw packet data, net flow, IDS, and custom sensor output as it pertains to the cybersecurity of communications networks. Reviews threat data from various sources and develops custom signatures for Open Source IDS or other custom detection capabilities. Correlates actionable security events from various sources including Security Information Management System (SIMS) data and develops unique correlation techniques. Utilizes understanding of attack signatures, tactics, techniques and procedures associated with advanced threats. Develops analytical products fusing enterprise and all- source intelligence. Be able to conduct malware analysis of attacker tools providing indicators for enterprise defensive measures, and reverse engineer attacker encoding protocols. Interfaces with external entities including law enforcement organizations, intelligence community organizations and other government agencies such as the Department of Defense. Basic Qualifications - Candidate must possess a CompTIA Security+ with Continuing Education (CE) certification - Must be willing to obtain Certified Ethical Hacker (CEH) certification within six months of hire - Candidate must have experience supporting CND or related teams. - Candidate must have experience working CND duties (e.g., Protect, Defend, Respond, and Sustain). - Candidate must have experience working with DoD / Government Leaders at all levels. - Candidate must have strong communication skills (both written and verbal). - Candidate must have an in-depth understanding of TCP/IP protocols, ports, and servicesDesired skills not required:- Candidate should have at least one other IA certification completed, i.e., SSCP, CSIH, GCIA, GCIH, or CEH - Candidate should have UNIX Administrative skills. - Knowledge of hacker tactics, techniques, and procedures (TTP). - Be able to conduct malware analysis. - Demonstrated hands on experience with various static and dynamic malware analysis tools - Knowledge of advanced threat actor tactics, techniques and procedures (TTP) - Understanding of software exploits. - Ability to analyze packed and obfuscated code. - Comprehensive understanding of common Windows APIs and ability to analyze shellcode.Education Bachelor’s degrees from an accredited college in a related discipline, or equivalent experience/combined education, with 2 years of professional experience; or 3 years of professional experience with a related AA degree. Required Clearance: Top Secret or above.",Cybersecurity Analyst (Government) Job in Collinsville,,"Collinsville, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/cybersecurity-analyst-government-job-collinsville-il-us-170368461.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=3,,,6d8bf3eac5e1a032996635ecd1ad3daa
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:20:58:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking a Linux system administrator with network engineering experience to support a cyber security development effort. The candidate will join an agile software development team that is productizing and virtualizating a cyber security platform. Duties will include configuring and documenting platforms for development, test and deployment, providing general lab support, and contributing to the design of the virtualization effort. Required Skills, Experience, and Education: The ideal candidate will be a system administrator with at least 5 years of experience administering Linux servers as well as SAN and virtualization technologies. In addition the candidate requires network engineering skills including the ability to configure switches, routers and firewalls. Strong scripting (Bash, Python, PERL) skills are also required. The candidate must be a US citizen, have good oral and written communication skills and a BS/BA in Math, Computer Science or Engineering. Required Clearance: Clearable to TS/SCI Desired: Experience with OpenStack and/or deployment automation tools such as Puppet, Chef or Ansible.",Programmer (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/programmer-government-job-columbia-md-us-170252348.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=5,,,706a2bafe28334a3084a353ec16d09df
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:20:57:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T/GSI is currently seeking a software developer with expertise developing web applications to support The National Air and Space Intelligence Center (NASIC) at Wright-Patterson AFB, Dayton, OH. The software developer will design, develop, test, field, and maintain web-based applications in support of NASIC requirements.Bachelors degree in computer science, engineering, or other related technical field. Expertise in developing Java programs and web-based applications, preferrably for a classified environment. PHP, Javascript, SQL, XML, HTML required. Boostrap front-end framework, JQuery, JQuery-UI, and Highcharts expertise desired. The developer will also develop and maintain.Required Clearance: TOP SECRET/SCI security clearance",Software Developer\Web (Government) Job in Fairborn,,"Fairborn, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/software-developer-web-government-job-fairborn-oh-us-169992873.aspx?mescoid=1500129001001&jobPosition=17,,,7db0ff9707f7e0b7c712ee76e16d7efa
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:19:59:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"In order to succeed in this position, you must have strong communication skills to work with developers to integrate software components into a system to meet requirements and work with developers, system engineers and data characterization teams to produce the various tests. This position requires you to perform end to end functional tests in order to validate that a functionality has been successfully integrated. You will be responsible for running a suite of tests to validate builds for delivery, including operational tests that reflect the operational use of the TU system and performance tests that benchmark the systems stability and performance. Another key component of this position will be diagnosing and troubleshooting systems to resolve problems uncovered by the testing, and providing detailed documentation of the test and results to develop scripts and incorporate/replace test harness to automate test execution/analysis. We are looking for someone with a strong scripting background in RedHat Linux; Perl, a plus skills needed for development of test harness, experience developing/setting up test beds/drivers and some familiarity with C++ and Java development (i.e. comfortable looking at C++ code or Java source code or xml, etc. to be able to begin diagnosis of problems uncovered during tests. A general understanding of network protocols, SIGINT, (DNI/DNR) processing as well as familiarity with Linux/Unix system administration and experience working with system engineers to develop operational tests based on operational scenarios would also be a plus. Required Clearance: TS//SCI clearance with polygraph is REQUIRED. Desired: Test Engineer with Bachelor's degree in Math, Science, Engineering, Statistics, Engineering Management, or related discipline from an accredited college or university is required. Four (4) years of experience may be substituted for a bachelor's degree. AT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V",Test Engineer (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/test-engineer-government-job-columbia-md-us-170368358.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=6,,,a9d595bc65aa05ff1e5b8b3c0a60ae1c
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:19:58:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"High school Diploma or General Equivalency Diploma (GED) Under immediate supervision, monitor the infrastructure and network, responding appropriately to alerts and events. Respond to incidents from triage through resolution, including escalations, where appropriate. Respond to infrastructure repairs, including directing remote activities to maintain operational effectiveness for services. Provide root cause analysis documentation in accordance with Government procedures. Provide data center support where appropriate. Document daily shift activities in appropriate reporting and ticketing tools and ensure proper pass down of any outstanding issues. Provide incident notification to Government representatives. Work is performed in 24/7 environment and must be able to work second/third shifts, weekends, and holidays. 2-4 years of experience required. Possess at least two or more of the following: Computing Technology Industry Association (CompTIA) A+, Network+, Microsoft Technology Associate (MTA) certification. Certified in accordance with DODD 8570.1 Information Assurance Technician I, II or III, as required by the environment. Required Clearance: Must be a US Citizen and possess Secret clearanceIAT 1: A+ Network+ SSCP IAT 2: GSEC Security+ SSCP (TXS) IAT 3: CISA GCIH GCED CISSP (or Associate) CASP",NetOps Specialist Jr (Government) Job in Arlington,,"Arlington, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/netops-specialist-jr-government-job-arlington-va-us-169732525.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=8,,,612ec9de446d6433b1f7e254d87ae30e
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:19:28:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"A-Line Staffing is proud to assist a global pharmaceutical services client with offices in Orlando, FL with recruitment efforts on an Accounts Receivable position. This position involves contacting existing customers to soft inquire about the status of payment on invoices. Our client wishes to retain these valued customers; hence these are courtesy calls as opposed to aggressive collections calls. We are seeking candidates with strong customer service skills and experience, and above average ability with Microsoft Excel.  Our client prefers candidates with a stable job history and those that are serious about their career path.  Applicants must have experience with business to business (B2B) collections, preferably at the National or Government account level. This is a contract to hire position and interviews will be conducted as if it were for a permanent position.Job Requirements3-5 years Experience in Business to Business Customer Service and/or Collectionssoft collections experience preferredwholesale or supply chain experience preferredcontract pricing experience preferredSAP ExperienceGovernment or National Account experience REQUIREDAbove average ability with Microsoft ExcelExcellent written and verbal communication skillsTyping speed at or above 35 WPMTeam player attitudeOur client will be interviewing quickly for 6 open positions.  For consideration, please send your resume to Michael Nichols, Staffing Manager at mnichols@alinestaffing.com Questions, please call Michael at 972-633-2300",Commerical Accounts Receivable / Experience with Government Accounts / Soft Collector Job in Orlando,Full Time Employee,"Orlando, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/commerical-accounts-receivable-experience-with-government-accounts-soft-collector-job-orlando-fl-us-169914216.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=5,0.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,e61697848bba3ebf98c781af24a26bb2
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:18:58:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, MIS, Business, or related fieldFive to nine (5-9) years of related experience. Under minimal direction, coordinates operational designs, develops support plans, coordinates implementations, and provides second level support for local area network (LAN), campus area network (CAN), and wide area network (WAN) solutions encompassing heterogeneous platforms. Develops system support requirements by reviewing and analyzing customer business processes and evaluating available ES and/or supplier capabilities. Leads project teams in implementing new or upgraded designs and coordinates project efforts with support groups. Creates plans that support implementation of changes. Participates in system support design and performance evaluation reviews. Advises on distributed network computing issues. Establishes and maintains security and integrity standards and controls. Ensures support plans and services meet customer needs and expectations. Assists in the evaluation, testing and recommendation of hardware, software, and network configurations based on customer need. Coaches others in the application of new operational support technologies. Analyzes user requirements and statistics to identify trends and resolve performance issues. Coordinates and approves updates of the site administration documentation. Keeps abreast of emerging operational support technologies and industry trends. Recommends appropriate price/performance improvement opportunities. IAT 2: GSEC Security+ SSCPRequired Clearance: Secret",System Administrator Mid (Government) Job in New Orleans,,"New Orleans, LA",,http://jobview.monster.com/system-administrator-mid-government-job-new-orleans-la-us-170136417.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=10,,,dfdba7ee739a7235fc35df7ec3da50f5
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:18:57:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T/GSI is currently seeking a software developer with expertise developing web applications to support The National Air and Space Intelligence Center (NASIC) at Wright-Patterson AFB, Dayton, OH. The software developer will design, develop, test, field, and maintain web-based applications in support of NASIC requirements.Bachelors degree in computer science, engineering, or other related technical field. Expertise in developing Java programs and web-based applications, preferrably for a classified environment. PHP, Javascript, SQL, XML, HTML required. Boostrap front-end framework, JQuery, JQuery-UI, and Highcharts expertise desired. The developer will also develop and maintain.Required Clearance: TOP SECRET/SCI security clearance",Software Developer\Web (Government) Job in Fairborn,,"Fairborn, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/software-developer-web-government-job-fairborn-oh-us-169826351.aspx?mescoid=1500129001001&jobPosition=6,,,40e21ace2f823f8938c65bfc2a133768
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:18:37:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"This opening is for a software design engineer (junior developer) working in an agile development and engineering environment. The selected candidate will use an agile Scrum based framework to collaborate with peer software engineers, systems engineers, customers, and lifecycle tier support personnel. The technology domain is cyber security and information assurance. The work focuses on building and supporting applications and tools used to protect networked computing infrastructures from security threats. A sizeable portion of the work involves evaluating and integrating commercial and custom developed software products into application software solutions.A working understanding of information assurance and network communications security is required with up to 2 years of experience in software design and development; Experience writing software using C, C++ or Java on Linux-based platforms, a working understanding of Linux, some scripting experience (shell, perl, tcl/tk, ruby, and python), and a working knowledge of the IP protocol suite (TCP, UDP, ICMP, etc); Working knowledge of Splunk, nanocubes or like big-data analysis and visualization tools; Familiarity with modern software development methods and a working understanding of how unit and integration test fit into the development lifecycle; Hands-on experience with configuration and change management tools and practices; An ability to work independently, take on commitments, communicate and cooperate to resolve issues, and work collaboratively in a fast paced environment demanding the ability to quickly respond to rapidly changing requirements driven by world events. A BS degree, in Computer Science/Math or related discipline is preferred. Required: US Citizenship; Candidates currently holding a TS/SCI clearance is desired. Desired: Knowledge and experience performing unit and integration test and an understanding of how to build testability into the product from early in its lifecycle; Experience in rapid or agile development; Familiarity with intrusion detection systems, forensics and data mining and analysis techniques; UI language skills using Java and knowledge of databases to include MySQL and Hadoop.",Junior Programmer (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-programmer-government-job-columbia-md-us-170252327.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=6,,,32938a61b48727cece5de29a9aa37e50
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:18:37:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"These positions will support the MILSATCOM Systems Engineering and Integration Contract.This Information Assurance/Cybersecurity role supports Protected MILSATCOM programs such as the Advanced EHF (AEHF) and Enhanced Polar System (EPS) programs for the Space and Missile Systems Center (SMC), MILSATCOM Systems Directorate (MC) in Los Angeles, CA.Provide systems engineering for ground and space system specifically in Cybersecurity, Cryptography, Information Assurance (IA), and Risk Management Framework•Interpret interface control documents and system requirements and provide subject matter expertise to customer •Perform security evaluation of contractor developed hardware, software, documentation, testing, and document evaluation findings in reports and briefings •Evaluate and apply government cybersecurity (DoD, NIST, FIPS, and NSA) policies and instructions •Ensure system and interface requirements support cybersecurity needs. •Coordinate with system stakeholders to define IA related system integration needs and schedules, such as certification events and test and operational key needs. •Provide testing support of cryptographic technologies and equipment in government and development contractor laboratories •Prepare test cases, test scripts, test plans and procedures, data collection, lab infrastructure for cybersecurity functions and encryption key management technologies •Develop and review test plans for cybersecurity key management adequacy. •Participate in the system and segment level test and verification reviews and working groups. Required Skills, Experience, and Education: Bachelor’s Degree in engineering or a related scientific or technical discipline •Familiarity with component and network cybersecurity systems, system engineering and requirements decompositionRequired Clearance: DoD SecretDesired: Master's Degree in engineering or a related scientific or technical discipline •5 years’ experience with cybersecurity requirements •Expertise in communications systems and network engineering, Next Generation Encryption System, for applications id DoD, Coalition, Federal and Civil agencies, Cryptographic Modernization RDT&E support to provide technical engineering and logistics support, during all phases of the system development cycle, testing, production, fielding, and sustainment •Previous experience supporting MILSATCOM satellite programs such as CCS-C, Milstar, AEHF, UFO/E/EE, GBS, EPS, AFCPT, NMT, SMART-T, or other satellite programs •Trained and certified in accordance with DoD 8570.01-M, DoDI 8570.01 •Possess a security certification such as CISSP, CISA, CIMS, CAP, Security+, CEH",Cyber Systems Engineer (Government) Job in El Segundo,,"El Segundo, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/cyber-systems-engineer-government-job-el-segundo-ca-us-170176300.aspx?mescoid=1500129001001&jobPosition=19,,,f46c7750a16f347acee0d3f3a37a4c46
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:18:21:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Systems Engineer’s role is to ensure the stability, integrity, and efficient operation of the in-house information systems that support core organizational functions. This is achieved by monitoring, maintaining, supporting, and optimizing all networked software and associated operating systems. The Systems Engineer will apply proven communication, analytical, and problem-solving skills to help identify, communicate, and resolve issues in order to maximize the benefit of IT systems investments.Coordinate system development tasks to include design, integration and formal testingOversees all transitions into production Develop and complete actions in system specifications, technical and logistical requirements and other disciplines Create and maintain programmatic and technical documentation to insure efficient planning and execution Manage and document system configurations Collaborate with network staff to ensure smooth and reliable operation of software and systems for fulfilling business objectives and processes. Work with executive team members, decision makers, and stakeholders to define business requirements and systems goals, and to identify and resolve business systems issues. Design and deploy new applications and enhancements to existing applications, software, and operating systems. Perform cost-benefit and return on investment analyses for proposed systems to aid management in making implementation decisions. Analyze user’s requirements, concept of operations documents, and high level system architectures to develop system requirements specifications leading design and development activities. Incorporates new plans, designs and systems into ongoing operations. Develops technical documentation. Guides system development and implementation planning through assessment or preparation of system engineering management plans and system integration and test plans. Reviews engineering practices, standards, and processes. Supports rapid prototyping and provides engineering support to demonstrate, assess, and implement new systems and technologies. A Bachelor’s degree in System Engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering Science, Engineering Management, or related discipline from an accredited college or university is required. Three years experience in programs and contracts of similar scope, type and complexity within the Federal Government is required. Experience with planning, analysis, design, development, testing, integration, and installation within large-scale router-based networks, providing support to network control, Enterprise router network, Multicast, LAN extensions and communications center operations Skilled in the use of Computer Aided Design and network topological design tools for development and maintenance of system architecture models and documentation.Experience performing network capacity planning Skilled in using network management tools to debug and analyze hardware, protocols, software interoperability across hybrid networks (IPv4/IPv6), VoIP/IP telephony and IP video internet-based networksThe candidate must be willing to work on customer site in Northern Virginia (west of Tysons Corner up to and including Dulles Airport Vicinity). Required Clearance: TS/SCI with Poly AT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V",Systems Engineer (Government) Job in Oakton,,"Oakton, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/systems-engineer-government-job-oakton-va-us-170252385.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=12,,,f5f395da196245d2f7a34ef54e8a4391
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:17:50:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Network Engineer is considered a Senior Level Analyst support second tier escalation. The Senior Level Analyst must have the ability to support detailed discovery and analysis of intrusion detection security events that traverses the Judiciary Network, and assures that quality work is performed. The Senior Level Analyst acts as the second tier escalation supporting Information Assurance Engineers and the Shift Team Lead.The Senior Level Analyst will ensure that all incidents are correct in review, and the Senior Level Analyst will construct all email notification messaging. Responsibilities include aggressively monitoring and responding to alerts triggered in the SEIM tool or requests for assistance from customers. The Senior will use a variety of tools to investigate incidents and take immediate action or recommend a course of action to safeguard the U.S. Courts systems. The Senior will document all incidents and create a clear narrative that supports their conclusions. General Experience: Six years of security intrusion detection examination experience involving a range of security technologies that product logging data; to include wide area networks host and Network IPS/IDS/HIPs traffic event review, server web log analysis, raw data logs; the ability to communicate clearly both orally and in writing. Contractor will have at least three years of experience working at a senior level, performing analytics examination of logs and console events in the following working experience areas of; creating advance queries methods in Splunk or advance Grep skills, firewall ACL review, examining Snort based IDS events, Pcaps, web server log review, and working in a SIEM environment.Required Clearance: Public Trust type background check with finger-printing and drug screening",Senior Analyst (Government) Job in Wa,,"Wa, DC",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-analyst-government-job-wa-dc-us-168905688.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,,,b8bae2ee46937891c4791441ea0a0dab
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:17:49:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"The System Administrator is responsible for provisioning, installation/configuration, operation, and maintenance of Linux and Windows systems hardware and software and related infrastructure.The System Administrator configures and manages operating systems and installs/loads operating system software, troubleshoots, maintains integrity and configures network components along with implementing operating systems enhancements to improve reliability and performance in accordance with standards and project/operational requirementsResponsibilities include the tasks for building servers such as: • Providing technical configuration, setup, installation services, hardware and coordination for application projects, • Providing remote access to servers, • Establishing and documenting server baseline configurations, • Assisting in server maintenance and special projects, occasionally during extended work hours, • Communicating outage/degradation of server to management, • Understanding and implementing established technical and workflow procedures.The Systems Administrator is responsible for responding to change requests; performing technical evaluations, analysis, and troubleshooting for all supported servers; building servers by providing technical configuration, setup, installation services, IP addressing and provisioning, and operating and maintaining servers. The System Administrator performs operations and support, maintenance and research and development to ensure continual innovation. They develop and maintain installation and configuration procedures and contribute to and maintain system standards. They research and recommend innovative, and where possible automated approaches for system administration tasks and identify approaches that leverage our resources and provide economies of scale. Education requirements are flexible depending on experience. Typically a Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, or other related discipline, is required with three years’ experience applying fundamental skills and concepts using established procedures and standard practices to work problems. The candidate should have appropriate certifications that justify skills in the job disciplines. The candidate must be willing to work on customer site in Northern Virginia (west of Tysons Corner up to and including Dulles Airport Vicinity).Required Clearance: TS/SCI with Poly",Systems Administrator (Government) Job in Oakton,,"Oakton, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/systems-administrator-government-job-oakton-va-us-170074665.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=11,,,96b084798b2499418d03b3f76d139caa
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:17:26:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Employs engineering techniques and processes to analyze software to identify vulnerabilities • Re-creates programs to rebuild something similar to it, exploits its weaknesses, or strengthens its defenses • Develops design specifications by inspection and analysis to offset various malware and to protect and defend USCYBERCOM infrastructure • Develops, researches, and maintains proficiency in tools, techniques, countermeasures, and trends in computer and network vulnerabilities, data hiding, and encryption • Conducts vulnerability assessments/penetration tests of information systems • Ensures software standards are met; designs, develops, documents, tests, and debugs applications software and systems that contain logical and mathematical solutions • Performs in-depth detailed research of software and methodologies to build defensive and offensive technical capabilities for USCYBERCOM Possesses senior-level experience as a Malware Analyst with a background in cutting-edge cyberspace technologies • Minimum 10 years of experience as a Malware Analyst • Minimum of Bachelor’s Degree from an accredited college or university in Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Cybersecurity, Computer Engineering, or related discipline • Possesses comprehensive knowledge of programming skills especially including C/C++ and Assembly language, Windows internal C/C++ and either UNIX/Linux or mobile (Android) platform, malware and things related to malware research and analysis, reverse engineering, vulnerability analysis, exploit development, and related disciplines • Minimum of DOD 8140/DOD 8570 IASAE Level II or Computer Network Defense (CND) Certification, DOD 8140/8570 CNDSP Analyst/Infrastructure Support/Incident Responder certified. (CISSP, CASP CE or CSSLP) • Strong attention to detail and organizational skills. Excellent communications skills. • Often and without source code or documentation, performs system analysis, reverse engineering, and static, dynamic, and best-practice malware analytics methodologies and analysis on Windows, Android, or UNIX-based platforms • Coordinates effort to develop and analyze cyberspace operations, DCO, Computer Network Exploitation (CNE), and OCO solutions • Creates malware detection topologies Required Clearance: Must have and maintain an active Top Secret/ SCI clearance and in scope successful Polygraph",Malware Analyst III (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/malware-analyst-iii-government-job-columbia-md-us-170033337.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=13,,,60a83bb3b50026f3c05d173263fa11e6
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:16:58:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"The candidate will provide support in security control assessment and continuous monitoring of the organization(s) information systems following NIST based standards and best practices. The candidate will provide various levels of Cyber Security Engineering by developing test plans and assessing or auditing information system security controls by applying best practices of NIST 800-37, 800-53, 800-53A, and Judiciary guidance. The individual will ensure compliance and identify security weaknesses and vulnerabilities using approved tools (e.g. Cyber Security Assessment and Management (CSAM)). The individual will review and analyze scanning results and provide recommendations concerning vulnerability mitigation efforts.Analyze and advise tool(s) role(s) focusing on security in the early stages of the SDLC which will also include working with security teams to ensure that projects are deployed and launched securely and effectively. Review system security plan body of evidence documentation for accuracy and completeness. Support development of Plan of Action and Milestones (POA&M) containing corrective actions required for unacceptable system and enterprise level risks. Provide support to configuration management and control processes to integrate security and risk management. Work with application project teams for all development of systems including web and database management systems (beginning in the early stages of the SDLC) to ensure that security policies, standards, best practices and guidelines are adhered to for all the projects Recommend security impact analyses of security controls based on proposed system changes. Support the preparation of security test plans, execute and assess the security control effectiveness using security control test procedures, and create Security Assessment Reports (SAR) based on assessment findings. Understand and demonstrate security application architecture design assessment and gap analysis producing a security assessment report that is socialized with the project teams and the business. Utilize tools and methodologies for tracking and reporting on identified information system vulnerabilities. Understand and demonstrate technical background, security and risk assessments, CSAM, and applications development and deployment. Understand and demonstrate excellent communication skills both written and verbal. Public Trust type background check with finger-printing and drug screening AT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V",Cyber Security Engineer (Government) Job in Washington,,"Washington, DC",,http://jobview.monster.com/cyber-security-engineer-government-job-washington-dc-us-170368527.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=20,,,85616cd541b3613f7179140bb3f7a9ef
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:16:57:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T is more than a job, it’s an adventure of innovation. That’s why we want to talk to you about your next rewarding career. We are looking for people who bring their very best talent to work every day. We offer great pay, matching 401k, health, dental and vision insurance along with special mobile and product benefits. If you would like to help make critical information more secure, AT&T is the career choice for you. We need someone who can provide support to the Information System Security Manager (ISSM) for a program, organization, system, or enclave’s information assurance requirements. This includes proposing, coordinating, implementing, and enforcing information systems security policies, standards, and methodologies; maintaining high levels of operational security posture to ensure information systems security policies, standards, and procedures are established and followed. You will also assist with the management of security aspects and perform day-to-day security operations of the system including the administration of user identification and authentication mechanisms. May be required to evaluate security solutions to ensure they meet security requirements for processing classified information and support security authorization activities in compliance with NSA/CSS Information System Certification and Accreditation Process (NISCAP), DoD Information Assurance Certification and Accreditation Process (DIACAP), ODNI and DoD Policies.Lastly the ability to write well will be necessary in preparing documentation to include System Security Plans (SSPs), Risk Assessment Reports, Certification and Accreditation (C&A) packages, and System Requirements Traceability Matrices (SRTMs). All of these support activities are critical to our success as we strive to provide a secure environment for our customer. Required Skills, Experience, and Education: Ten (10) years’ experience as an ISSO on programs and contracts of similar scope, type, and complexity is required. Experience is to include at least two (2) of the following areas: knowledge of current security tools, hardware/software security implementation; communication protocols; and encryption techniques/tools. Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related discipline from an accredited college or university is required. DoD 8570 compliance with Information Assurance Management (IAM) Level I or higher is required. Four (4) years of additional experience as an ISSO may be substituted for a bachelor’s degree.Required Clearance: Candidate must have a TS/SCI polygraph clearance. Desired: Identity Management (ISSE L0) with DoD 8570.01-M appropriate certification AT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V",ISSO (C&A) (Government) Job in Columbia,,"Columbia, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/isso-c-a-government-job-columbia-md-us-170252314.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=7,,,f5b252968b6f849f26d435b455dd7d2b
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:16:02:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T is seeking hard-working and dependable candidates to support of the GSM-O contract at Defense Information Systems Agency (DISA) located at Scott AFB, ILDISA acts as the provider of GIG/Defense Information System Network (DISN) services to its customers the Department of Defense (DoD) and national security organizations. This position directly supports the DISA-provided GIG capabilities and services in our 24x7 Global Network Support Center (GNSC). We work in a performance-based environment where our performance is based on pre-determined Acceptable Levels of Performance (ALP's). Candidate will be ""mission essential"" and able to support rotating 12, 10, or 8hrs shifts based upon the requirement and resources available. Candidate is required to support the development, documentation and tracking of measurements and metrics relevant to the ALP's. Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information Basic Qualifications Network Operations and Maintenance: Experience with one or more of the following: alarm surveillance, fault management, configuration management, LAN maintenance, performance management. Expertise in one or more of the following: Routers; Crypto devices; Routing, Network appliances (CSU, DSU, etc), DSN/DRSN, DVSG, GVS, ATM General understanding of network topologies, both transport and IP. Ability to work in a team focused, dynamic environment. Requires expertise in one or more of the following devices/vendors: CISCO, Juniper, SONET, SONUS, Nortel, Avaya or Marconi. Ability to perform troubleshooting, configuration, and restoration of services across multiple platforms. Requires experience in one or more of the following Crypto devices: KG-340, KG-175A/D, KIV-7, KIV-19. GTMS/ITSM Remedy: Understands the customer relationship tool which can be used to log/monitor the issues or problems faced by customers by the means of incident management tickets. Understand the functions multiple RFO, and charging the correct Fault Durations Hours to each Fault Category. Supports team members in taking ownership of tickets and updates the Action/Work log (troubleshooting steps performed during the selected course of action). - Hold DoD-8570 IAT Level 2 baseline certification (Security+ CE, CISSP or equivalent) prior to start date. Desired skills: CCNA, ITIL v3 Foundation certifiedRequired Skills, Experience, and Education: • 1-3 years of experience specific experience in telecommunications network management, operations, installation or development. • CCNA is preferable but not required. • General experience includes increasing technical responsibilities in network management.Clearance: Active Secret clearance",Network Controller\Operator Associate (Government) Job in Collinsville,,"Collinsville, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/network-controller-operator-associate-government-job-collinsville-il-us-169068556.aspx?mescoid=1500135001001&jobPosition=16,,,e36329ee74011700fe855ba2eeeb70e6
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:16:02:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"A member of the Network Assurance (NA) Team (DISA GSM-O program) that lead/support NA Activities within DISA Global. Responsible for maintaining the integrity and security of enterprise-wide cyber systems and networks. Supports cyber security initiatives through both predictive and reactive analysis, articulating emerging trends to leadership and staff. Coordinates resources during enterprise incident response efforts, driving incidents to timely and complete resolution. Performs network traffic analysis utilizing raw packet data, net flow, IDS, and custom sensor output as it pertains to the cyber security of communications networks. Reviews threat data from various sources and develops custom signatures for Open Source IDS or other custom detection capabilities. Correlates actionable security events from various sources including Security Information Management System (SIMS) data and develops unique correlation techniques. Utilizes understanding of attack signatures, tactics, techniques and procedures associated with advanced threats. Develops analytical products fusing enterprise and all- source intelligence. Be able to conduct malware analysis of attacker tools providing indicators for enterprise defensive measures, and reverse engineer attacker encoding protocols. Interfaces with external entities including law enforcement organizations, intelligence community organizations and other government agencies such as the Department of Defense. Candidate will provide CND reports, trends, responses, mitigations, analysis, and information dissemination. - Candidate will provide C2 support, situational awareness support, and provide leadership & support for all CND applicable activities within Protect, Detect, Respond, and Sustain. - Candidate will support teams within a performance-based environment with pre-determined Acceptable Levels of Performance (ALP’s). - Candidate will support the development, documentation and tracking of measurements & metrics relevant to the ALP’s. - Candidate interfaces with Government counterparts, both CONUS & OCONUS, along with contract team members. - Candidate is responsible for maintaining the integrity & security of enterprise-wide systems & networks. - Candidate supports security initiatives through predictive & reactive analysis, and by articulating emerging trends to leadership & staff. Candidate must possess a CompTIA Security+ with Continuing Education (CE) certification - Candidate must have experience supporting CND or related teams. - Candidate must have experience working CND duties (e.g., Protect, Defend, Respond, and Sustain). - Candidate must have experience working with DoD / Government Leaders at all levels. - Candidate must have strong communication skills (both written and verbal). - Candidate must have an in-depth understanding of TCP/IP protocols, ports, and servicesDesired skills - Candidate should have at least one other IA certification completed, i.e., SSCP, CSIH, GCIA, GCIH or CEH. - Candidate should have UNIX Administrative skills. - Candidate should have Command Line Scripting skills (PERL, python, shell scripting) to automate analysis task. - Knowledge of hacker tactics, techniques, and procedures (TTP). - Be able to conduct malware analysis. - Demonstrated hands on experience with various static and dynamic malware analysis tools - Knowledge of advanced threat actor tactics, techniques and procedures (TTP) - Understanding of software exploits. - Ability to analyze packed and obfuscated code. - Comprehensive understanding of common Windows APIs and ability to analyze shellcode.Bachelor’s degrees from an accredited college in a related discipline, or equivalent experience/combined education, with 5 years of professional experience; or 3 years of professional experience with a related Master’s degree.Required Clearance: Top Secret or above.",Cyber Security Analyst (Government) Job in Collinsville,,"Collinsville, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/cyber-security-analyst-government-job-collinsville-il-us-170176113.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=10,,,856915a988da4cb8badef0435df19e11
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:15:48:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Monitors, troubleshoots, configures and manages government customer's voice, data and satellite network. Coordinates with customer personnel to provide Tier 2 ""expert"" assistance in all aspects of operating and managing the customer's Enterprise Network. Required experience with voice and data systems (e.g., Cisco Voice Over IP, Avaya Aura Audio Conference Bridge, Avaya Definity G3, Prologics, Merlin Legend, Nortel PBX’s, Cisco Call Manager, multiplexers, CSU/DSU, ATM, Cisco switches and routers, Unix, TCP/IP and Windows 7) to include planning, evaluation and configuration of routers, bridges and other devices. Also operating and managing systems associated with satellite trackingproviding digital data service to mobile satellite trucks and portable flyaway dishes and providing uplink/downlink of analog full motion video services. Work with customer NOC Steward (CBP) to ensure that WAN OneNet services at customer fixed and disaster sites are operational Assists customer engineering to resolve WAN interface issues through the NOC. Candidate will support new hardware/ software acquisition and installation of aforementioned products. Work is performed at the Mount Weather Emergency Operations Center (MWEOC) Network Operations Center, backup location may be Winchester Virginia and may include a requirement to telework from personal residence on occasion. Overtime, shift work and weekend tours will be required. Occasional travel may be required or other duties as assigned. Employee must be a US Citizen and willing and able to obtain a government issued Top Secret Security clearance. Holding a current TS is a plus.AT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V",NOC Specialist (Government) Job in Bluemont,,"Bluemont, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/noc-specialist-government-job-bluemont-va-us-170252305.aspx?mescoid=1500135001001&jobPosition=9,,,306c2722a37960bcff9afcefffca6f6f
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:15:48:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARY: The successful candidate will execute the company’s political and legislative strategy in designated states within the company geography, including specified municipalities in that geography important to the company’s business strategy.  Heavy focus will be on developing and maintaining key relationships with state and local policymakers and forging strong community partners, and lobbying in city and state legislative bodies. Additionally, the role will provide regional strategic political, public affairs, and advocacy analysis to the Vice President, Government Relations,  and assist with public affairs and advocacy efforts in the region to favorably impact the policy environment in which the company operates.  In all activities, the role will be representing the Company and adhering to its Purpose with the highest possible integrity acting as the Public Affairs, Communications and Communities local presence for that department’s strategic initiatives. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING (OTHER DUTIES MAY BE ASSIGNED): Manage and execute comprehensive state and local lobbying programs in Maryland, Delaware, Virginia and the District of Columbia. Plan and host site visits, tours, and other events with policymakers and influencers.  Represent the Company at appropriate dinners, legislative days, hearings and other gatherings with key policymakers and influencers. Develop and maintain relationships with key influencers and policy makers in municipalities of strategic importance to the company with heavy focus on Richmond, VA, Washington, DC and Baltimore, Maryland. Work with state beverage associations to support industry lobbying efforts in the geography. Provide regular briefings on legislation and issues of importance to the company. Understand and communicate issue  trends  important to the industry and recommend strategies  to VP Governmental Relations so that company’s public policy strategies and messaging have the highest possible impact. Coordinate closely with relevant contacts throughout the company to identify potential issues in advance and leverage resources in policy engagements to maximize the impact of state lobbying efforts.  Advocate before governments at all levels on behalf of the company. Develop and maintain strategic community partnerships.  Act in coordination with the department’s community engagement team to activate strategic community initiatives. Coordinate any necessary company media outreach and/or response with VP of Communications.   CORE COMPETENCIES:  Proactive individual with excellent, strategic, political and relationship skills.  Must have ability to execute strategic political and lobbying programs and to navigate nuanced political issues and personalities and establish and maintain strong and strategic relationships with key influencers.  The successful candidate should have the ability to absorb complex legislation in order to understand its possible impact on the beverage industry.  An in-depth understanding of the legislative process is preferred.  The candidate should be a highly motivated self-starter who enjoys a fast-paced environment. Other competencies include: Project Management – Coordinates numerous projects at once; works well independently; manages heavy workload; can respond rapidly to changing circumstances and demands; meets all deadlines. Customer Service – As a key representative of the Company with political players, responds to requests for service and assistance both internally and externally quickly and congenially; meets commitments consistently and thoroughly, strong and timely follow-through. Interpersonal Skills - Maintains integrity, confidentiality, congenial, tactful and trustworthy.  Is a problem solver and strong collaborator with exceptional interpersonal skills and track record of successfully working with community leaders and influencers. Communication - Writes in an excellent professional, politically-savvy manner, informatively and compellingly; thoroughly accurate.  Has strong advocacy skills; both written and verbal with the ability to translate complex issues and break down jargon into plain language that is easily comprehended by the others.                                               Teamwork – Team contributor who is willing to pitch in to perform any variety of tasks. Ability to work across functions with both internal and external stakeholders and partners.  Ability to be highly collaborative with local sales and operational team. Judgment - Exhibits sound political insights and consistently accurate judgment; anticipates challenges and opportunities; applies appropriate resources/strategies to meet objectives. Planning/Organizing - Prioritizes and plans numerous activities; extremely efficient and organized; uses time productively; meets all deadlines.    Professionalism - Approaches others in an amicable manner; reacts well under pressure; treats others with respect and consideration regardless of status or situation.  Displays an excellent professional presence and demeanor. Quality - Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness; exhibits creative thinking and problem solving. Dependability - Take initiatives and operates proactively; ability to develop projects and meet goals with minimal supervision. Knowledge - Thorough understanding of political and legislative process preferred; knowledge of beverage industry preferred. Ability to understand and summarize complex legislation preferred. Computer Skills - Proficiency with word processing, and knowledge of spreadsheets and database management. Education And/Or Experience - College degree required, 5-7  years experience in Politics and/or Governmental Relations preferred. Physical Demands - The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit; and use of motor skills. Work Environment - The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet. This position may require overtime. Candidate must be flexible to work overtime if needed. CCBCC is an equal employment opportunity employer. See Job Description",Director,Full Time,"Baltimore, MD 21201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/director-governmental-relations-job-baltimore-md-us-170037814.aspx?mescoid=1100009001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),527010ba7f77a470b1478a3ef8cb5034
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:15:00:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position’s primary role will be an NGEN TRMP Mid-Level Network Technician servicing a large scale Enterprise network. You will be part of a Team of Network Technicians and Engineers focused on the technology refresh of a large scale Enterprise Network. This network includes Cisco, Aruba, Brocade, Juniper, Riverbed and McAfee network devices to include Routers, Switches, Access Points, Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), Virtual Private Networks (VPN) and WAN Accelerators. As a Mid-Level Technician you will be expected to work with the on-site customers, NOC technicians and Managers to execute Network Device replacements within a region. You will be responsible for the entire process including ticket creation using HPE Service Manager, executing the network device replacement and asset management of the new and old network devices. Candidates will be expected to understand, implement, and follow processes in accordance with current policies and procedures. You may also be asked to perform additional field services tasks as directed. The successful candidate will be a detail-oriented technical professional, customer service oriented and knowledgeable in the areas of Ethernet and TCP/IP with 4 plus years’ experience as a Network Technician. Position requires a high level of project coordination skills to manage the execution of maintenance activities and network outages. Fundamental understanding of the OSI Model is required. Experience must include operational support, and configuration of network devices such as servers, routers, switches, associated software tools, and cabling in a large LAN/MAN/BAN/WAN environment. Knowledge of network protocols such as OSPF, BGP, and EIGRP is a plus. Knowledge and experience working with wireless technologies, Virtual Private Networks (VPN), Intrusion Prevention Systems (IPS), and WAN Accelerators and associated technologies is highly desirable. You will be part of a team of Network Technicians and Engineers. Travel will be required. Ability to obtain a Government Secret Security Clearance is required. The ideal candidate will have a passion for excellence and continual improvement, combined with an entrepreneurial spirit, strong written and oral communication skills, strong interpersonal skills, innovative thinking in a fast-paced, ever-changing environment. Strong customer service and communication is necessary to ensure customer satisfaction and network reliability. Good problem-solving and troubleshooting skills related to servers and network devices are a plus. Ability to lift up to 50lbs is required. A background in the Information Technology field or a related technology field is highly desirable. Other evidence of intellectual, technical, business accomplishments, and related technology leadership experiences will be considered. Cisco CCNA and Security+ required. ITIL foundation V3 certification is highly desirable. Required Clearance: Active DoD Secret",IT Service Delivery Rep Mid (Government) Job in Washington,,"Washington, DC",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-service-delivery-rep-mid-government-job-washington-dc-us-169422369.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=10,,,86e9a211a589cfb0db9b3b734e0e123b
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:14:58:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"REQUEST FOR INTEREST (RFI) #605 Contra Costa County In Home Supportive Services (IHSS) Public Authority The Public Authority seeks a home care agency for IHSS consumers, who are without their regular providers, on short term basis and who have immediate & urgent care needs. For information & response process, see: www.ehsd.org (Contracting Opportunities) or call (925) 313-169. CCT #5781220; Jul. 29, 30; Aug. 1, 2016",GOVERNMENT Job in Walnut Creek,Full Time,"Walnut Creek, CA 94598",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/government-job-walnut-creek-ca-us-170279693.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,,ed2953e37d9d191b457b69e85f3650b7
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:14:17:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"NOW HIRING Hancock County Government Auditors Office The Hancock County Auditors Office is hiring a full time employee. Applicant must have proficient computer skills: Microsoft Word, Excel, and Outlook. Applicant must be detail- oriented, have organizational & multi- tasking skills. Real Estate experience preferred. Heavy volume of customer service counter work involved. Resumes may be mailed or delivered to the Hancock County Auditors office at 111 American Legion Place, Room 217, Greenfield IN 46140. Deadline to submit resume is August 16, 2016. Hancock County is an equal opportunity employer.",NOW HIRING Hancock County Government Auditors... Job in  function wrap(EL,,46140,All,http://jobview.monster.com/now-hiring-hancock-county-government-auditors-job-greenfield-in-us-170228329.aspx?mescoid=1300102001001&jobPosition=6,,,0138264bf778d92c8e29df4795d0ca58
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:13:47:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Financial Analyst II (Gov't Billing Contracts)Description: Interpret financial terms and conditions of Federal Govt. Contracts. Set up rates in accounting/billing systems. Ensure accuracy of rates and timeliness of invoice submission. Frequent interaction with internal Sales, Contracts, and Accounts Receivable organization in support of Federal Customer Base. Assist in trouble shooting billing and receivable issues. Demonstrate strict adherence to internal/external compliance and SOX guidelines.Desired Skills/Experience:Experience with Federal Govt billing.Knowledge of and ability to interpret Federal Govt Contracts.Strong attention to detailKnowledge of Federal electronic invoicing portals (i.e. WAWF, IPP, OB10)Knowledge of the FARStrong written and verbal communication skillsAbility to work well in a collaborative work environment.Strong Excel skills and accounting experience a plusFind Us on Facebook!!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Company Profile: Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com. We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Financial Analyst II (Government Billing Contracts) Job in Reston,Full Time Employee,RestonVA,Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-analyst-ii-government-billing-contracts-job-reston-va-us-170326797.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=8,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,669ba8e9dfccfe80c9f8b2d613f3bf51
United States of America,US,04/Jun/2016:13:46:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"There's No Place Like The Neighborhood!It's a whole new Neighborhood and a new career for you at Applebee's.  Put your passion for service, commitment to excellence and unrelenting drive for success to work for one of the most successful restaurant chains in the industry. An exciting opportunity currently exists to join our team as a Restaurant Manager.  Nobody Brings Neighbors Together Like Applebee's!At Applebee's, our heart and soul belongs to the Neighbors we serve.  It is our mission to make a difference in each of the neighborhoods in which we do business.  Our managers and team members play a vital role in their communities.  Whether it is sponsoring a charity event, volunteering, teaching children about the restaurant business or any of the other countless ways our teams are involved, the Applebee's team makes significant impact on the lives and well-being of our neighbors. Applebee's managers have a wide range of responsibilities managing a multi-million dollar business. ·Driving sales and profitability ·Operational excellence ·Local restaurant marketing ·Selecting and training top talent to build high performing teams ·Leading a team to achieve goals and objectives Qualifications·At least 2-3 years restaurant management experience ·A degree in Hospitality or Hotel/Restaurant Management is a preferred ·Bi-lingual is a plus ·Serve Safe Food and Serve Safe Alcohol Certifications also a plusBenefits  Along with an inclusive environment and great advancement opportunities, we offer a banquet of benefits that will protect your health, ensure your future and provide the tools you need to succeed at work and in life. ·Competitive Pay ·Quarterly Bonus Opportunity ·Medical, Dental and Life Insurance for you and your family ·Domestic Partner Benefits ·Flexible Dependent and Health Spending Accounts ·401(k) Savings Plan with company matching ·Paid Time Off ·Dining Privileges and a whole lot more!",Restaurant Manager-Applebee's Waycross,"Full Time, Employee","Waycross, GA 31501",Restaurant/Food ServicesFood and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/restaurant-manager-applebee's-waycross-ga-job-waycross-ga-us-165868159.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=13,,Food Services/Hospitality,bfb2d57a42af989424ac69305e29f7e6
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:23:51:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description NORTH CENTRAL SURGICAL CENTER HOSPITAL Certified Sterile Processing Tech    We are looking for an energetic, caring Certified Sterile Processing Tech.  North Central Surgical Center is an elite, award winning, surgically-focused hospital that partners with the best staff and physicians.  Our Hospital performs over 11,000 procedures a year.You will work directly with the most elite physicians and play a key role in providing quality care for all of our patients and doctors.   North Central Surgical Center Information: Joint Commission Accredited & Top Performer Quality Award Winner Texas Medical Foundation Quality Award Winner Press Ganey Patient Experience Award Winner Healthgrades Multi-Award Winner Located in the prestigious NorthPark area of Dallas at Park Lane and Central Expressway (I-75).  BaylorScott & White hospital affiliate and managed by USPI. Competitive Benefits Package & Employee Perks     JOB SUMMARY   Under the direction of the SPD Supervisor, you will be responsible for daily operations of all aspects of the Sterile Processing department including ensuring high levels of customer service, sterilization, decontamination, monitoring efficient workflow to ensure fast turnaround times in the Operating Rooms, reviewing departmental supply needs from outside vendors and communicating effectively with all parties involved.  Successful candidate will possess outstanding work ethic, communication and customer service skills as well as the ability to organize and improve processes with our staff and customers. We are looking for a Certified SPD Tech for mid day to later shift. Qualifications and Experience:  High school graduate or equivalent. Mus be able to work independently. Must be certified and have experience Previous clerical experience in a medical setting desired. Knowledgeable in instrument tracking, purchasing, decontamination, sterilization systems Possess the ability to perform routine clerical tasks. Vision for near, mid-range, and far accommodation. Hearing for low, medium and high pitch. Requires some pushing, pulling, reaching, kneeling, stooping and finger dexterity. There is potential for exposure to blood and body fluids (high) and exposure to infectious diseases.  Knowledgeable in instrument tracking, purchasing, decontamination, sterilization systems     North Central is committed to providing clinical excellence in a safe, attractive environment for our community.  We are proud that many of the physicians here have chosen to have ownership in this hospital.  Their ownership enables them to have a voice in the administration and policies of our hospital.  This involvement helps to ensure the highest quality of care for the community.    SPD TECH DALLAS,TX STERILE PROCESSING TECHRequired Skills Must be a Certified Sterile Processing and Distribution Technician High School Diploma or Equivalent 2-3 years experience as Instrument Room Technician. Experience with all types of sterilizers. Knows operating room instrumentation. Organized in setting up operating room instrument tray. Understands operation of steam/ gravity sterilizer. Understands Sterrad sterilizers. Ability to prepare reports and keep records. Familiarity with medical terminology and departmental supply items is required.",Certified Sterile Processing Tech - FT Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/certified-sterile-processing-tech-ft-job-dallas-tx-us-168768363.aspx?mescoid=3100557001001&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,c13cb954ddd61c839b14a7fd8c7d01ff
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:23:50:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY:The Service Manager is accountable to the GM for: overseeing the day-to-day operation of the service organization; ensure all service staff provide the highest quality of service to internal and external customers; achievement of the four KPMs; identify opportunities for G&K to further penetrate the marketplace; develop and maintain strong relationships with key accountants; develop and maintain strong relationships with other department heads; conduct periodic coaching/training rides with subordinates; create a supporting working environment where the business and employees can flourish.ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:- Achieve all P&L goals (profit, growth, CSI and employees satisfaction)- Manage the department safety process- Build and maintain a sold working relationship with a select number of key accountants- Manage the fleet maintenance process- Identify and analyze business/service opportunities as they relate to profit, growth, quits, account penetration and direct purchase- Identify and analyze business/service opportunities as they relate to your market (repair service, pricing, strategy, recovery time, competitive strengths/weakness, new products)- Shift service team from a reactive customer retention stance to a proactive business direction- Assist National/Major account sales representatives in selling and installation of new accounts- Develop short-term business plans that support long-term goals- Assist GM in developing a strategic business planEDUCATION REQUIREMENTS:WORK EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS:- Previous service management experience- Thorough knowledge of the uniform business and Service StandardsSKILLS AND COMPETENCIES:- Implement a strong personnel process guided by quality recruiting, hiring, training, and coaching; implement and provide feedback on corporate/regional programs- Ability to: identify customer needs (both internal and external); analyze data, identify trends and develop action plans- Be a proponent of best practices. Develop a network of serivce managers that create and share effective processes that drive the performance of the service department- Model a World Class service organization by identifying and solving customer concerns immediately. Make the service memorable- Reinforce culture, mission, values, and ethical standards and provide leadership to Account Managers (sales) and Route Managers (service)SPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE, LICENSES etc.:",Service Manager Job in Denver,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO 80123",Rental ServicesBusiness Services - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/service-manager-job-denver-co-us-168867456.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=16,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,6cc33322053cfcd6198e7018c5247c17
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:23:23:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Schedule: Full-time, ContractLocation: Chantilly, VATravel Required: Less than 10%Clearance: Government issued Secret level Security Clearance based on an SSBIWe are seeking talented individuals committed to excellence, honesty, and integrity to join our team. Our client, OMNIPLEX, is a trusted provider of high quality background investigations programs to Department of Homeland Security (DHS) and the intelligence community at locations throughout the United States.Case Reviewer Job Duties: Provide advice and guidance to investigators on investigative and formatting requirements; Monitor pending cases to ensure compliance with delivery due dates and track submission of investigative leads; prioritize cases where noteworthy or derogatory information is developed; Monitor pending cases, review and revise reports of investigation; Check for quality and take necessary actions to complete case; notate Investigator Quality Performance remarks; Schedule additional leads as discovered in investigation. Other duties as assigned.Case Scoper Job Duties: Review submitted SF86 for completeness, content, and release forms; review security form and break out investigation elements into geographic area according to scoping guidelines; create Letter of Assignment (LOA) in database by inputting tasks on LOA; forward completed packages to Assignments Section; provide statistics referencing outstanding cases to coordinator; fill out necessary administrative paperwork to send to other operational units as necessary. Other duties as assigned.Case Reviewer Basic Qualifications:- Bachelorʹs Degree from four‐year college or university; experience in background investigations and knowledge of the background investigation process to include thorough understanding of Intelligence Community Directive (ICD)704 requirements; or equivalent combination of education and experience;- Ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, technical procedures, orgovernmental regulations. Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals. Ability topresent information in an effective manner to senior management;Case Scoper Basic Qualifications:- No experience in the investigations field needed;- Excellent organizational skills- Good knowledge of U.S. geography and ability to read street maps and understand time/distance concepts;- Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence. Ability to speak effectively to customers or employees;Other Requirements for both positions:- U.S. Citizenship;- Minimum 18 years of age;- High school diploma or equivalent;- Bachelor's Degree from four-year college or university preferred;- Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists. Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in oral, written, diagram, or schedule form;- Proficiency with Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint), Internet and E-mail;- Must have a current (within the last two (2) years) Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI) or active Secret Level Security Clearance based on an SSBI.- Successfully pass criminal record and credit checks, and a security screening interviewClient Disclaimer:- OMNIPLEX is committed to a drug‐free workplace. As such, the Company conducts pre‐employment, reasonablecause, random and contract‐mandated testing in accordance with federal and state law.- EOE Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran",Monster,,"Schedule: Full-time, ContractLocation: Chantilly, VATravel Required: Less than 10%Clearance: Government issued Secret level Security Clearance based on an SSBIWe are seeking talented individuals committed to excellence, honesty, and integrity to join our team. Our client, OMNIPLEX, is a trusted provider of high quality background investigations programs to Department of Homeland Security (DHS) and the intelligence community at locations throughout the United States.Case Reviewer Job Duties: Provide advice and guidance to investigators on investigative and formatting requirements; Monitor pending cases to ensure compliance with delivery due dates and track submission of investigative leads; prioritize cases where noteworthy or derogatory information is developed; Monitor pending cases, review and revise reports of investigation; Check for quality and take necessary actions to complete case; notate Investigator Quality Performance remarks; Schedule additional leads as discovered in investigation. Other duties as assigned.Case Scoper Job Duties: Review submitted SF86 for completeness, content, and release forms; review security form and break out investigation elements into geographic area according to scoping guidelines; create Letter of Assignment (LOA) in database by inputting tasks on LOA; forward completed packages to Assignments Section; provide statistics referencing outstanding cases to coordinator; fill out necessary administrative paperwork to send to other operational units as necessary. Other duties as assigned.Case Reviewer Basic Qualifications:- Bachelorʹs Degree from four‐year college or university; experience in background investigations and knowledge of the background investigation process to include thorough understanding of Intelligence Community Directive (ICD)704 requirements; or equivalent combination of education and experience;- Ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, technical procedures, orgovernmental regulations. Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals. Ability topresent information in an effective manner to senior management;Case Scoper Basic Qualifications:- No experience in the investigations field needed;- Excellent organizational skills- Good knowledge of U.S. geography and ability to read street maps and understand time/distance concepts;- Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence. Ability to speak effectively to customers or employees;Other Requirements for both positions:- U.S. Citizenship;- Minimum 18 years of age;- High school diploma or equivalent;- Bachelor's Degree from four-year college or university preferred;- Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists. Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in oral, written, diagram, or schedule form;- Proficiency with Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint), Internet and E-mail;- Must have a current (within the last two (2) years) Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI) or active Secret Level Security Clearance based on an SSBI.- Successfully pass criminal record and credit checks, and a security screening interviewClient Disclaimer:- OMNIPLEX is committed to a drug‐free workplace. As such, the Company conducts pre‐employment, reasonablecause, random and contract‐mandated testing in accordance with federal and state law.- EOE Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran",,http://jobview.monster.com/case-reviewer-case-scoper-job-chantilly-va-us-168908274.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,,,02020fe13ed01d855e6024bebeb670fd
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:22:54:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Job Window is a recruiting company that is looking to fill an Entry Level Sales Account Manager position for one of the leading Marketing and Sales firms in the Columbus region. This position would be involved in inside sales, sales management, and sales strategy in the telecommunications industry for the region. All sales positions would be working with an innovative company that is transforming the marketing & advertising industry. These progressive sales management teams were founded by dedicated people looking to push the envelope by using cost-effective marketing campaigns and advertising strategies. The goal is to provide the same advertising as the standard firm, but at a fraction of the price. The success and rapid growth in recent years has set new industry standards. The Sales Account Manager will be focused on developing sales opportunities for telecommunications clients in an assigned geographic region. The SAM will report directly to the Regional Sales Manager and work closely with the Marketing Managers to meet lead generation demands for the target market. Key responsibilities include developing competitive marketing solutions and providing unmatched customer service for our clients and consumers. The SAM position requires strong presentation skills and may require some direct client and agency interactions on as needed basis. This position will also be focused in generating market competitive sales strategies, providing strong customer support, and will play a crucial role in the sales team overall. Responsibilities: Develop and execute marketing and sales strategies for clients in target region’s eventsCustomer relationship buildingNew customer acquisition and consumer reportsClient branding, marketing and complianceAttend regular sales and marketing team meetings to stay abreast of client demands and product knowledgeRequirements**NO SALES EXPERIENCE NECESSARY**  A FULL TRAINING PROGRAM IS PROVIDED TO ALL MEMBERS OF OUR SALES TEAMS Our management team search is focused on individuals who are dedicated to consistently driving high standards and achieving excellence in the industry. Those who enjoy a small-company-feel, are adept at building relationships, and have a single-minded focus on delivering quality should apply.Qualifications: 1-2 years experience in marketing, sales or communications OR internship in related fieldExcellent written and verbal communication skillsAbility to work in a fast-paced environment and deliver results while managing multiple projectsLevel headed problem solver with a professional service oriented attitudeSuperb organizational and tracking skills with great attention to detailTeam player who also excels as an individual contributorAdaptable, dependable and responsibleBasic understanding of marketing concepts and sales strategyProficient in Microsoft OfficePosition will be considered for senior campaign management roles",Entry Level Sales Account Manager - Telecommunications Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH 43215",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-sales-account-manager-telecommunications-job-columbus-oh-us-168873716.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=6,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,1b8e16d14ef66e28574ba1feed82e3b5
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:22:53:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"CITY OF WEST LIBERTY POLICE CHIEF The City of West Liberty, IA (pop. 3,736), a diverse, progressive and growing community located 15 minutes east of Iowa City, is seeking energetic candidates for Chief of Police. Please visit our website, at www.cityofwestlibertyia.org, for more information. Any questions please contact City Hall 319-627-2418 or submit cover letter, resume & salary expectations by July 15, 2016 to: City of West Liberty, Attn: HR Department, 409 N. Calhoun St., West Liberty, IA 52776",Police Chief Job in West Liberty,Full Time,"West Liberty, IA 52776",All,http://jobview.monster.com/police-chief-job-west-liberty-ia-us-169026272.aspx?mescoid=1101113002005&jobPosition=8,,,7f6f11871a2afca354907134949d83c2
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:22:49:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for a combination AP Coordinator/Staff Accountant. Bachelors and 2-3 years experience. Primary responsibility will be AP. Responsible for managing invoice approvals, complex coding (determination whether cost of sales coding should be to prepaid asset or expense), data entry, selection for payment based on cash position, check printing, invoice matching and mailing. Additionally, do entry level staff accountant work. This will include but not be limited to cash and prepaid asset reconciliations, monthly journal entries and other duties as assigned. Have a very complex chart of accounts, over 100 publication codes, 9 department codes and over 100 account codes. We use Intacct for general ledger accounting. It is a cloud based product that is very user friendly and intuitive. Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",AP Coordinator/Staff Accountant Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,AP Coordinator/Staff Accountant,"Dallas, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/ap-coordinator-staff-accountant-job-dallas-tx-us-168811988.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=20,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,dff051b6f31f9240ea12912dedf47cdf
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:21:55:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Personal Banker 1Job ID Number: 5248548-8Location: Dallas,TXJob Description: Job DescriptionAt Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. As a Personal Banker, you will devote much of your day to building long term relationships with our customers, in person and by phone. You will deepen the understanding of our customers' financial needs and provide suggestions. While most of the job is performed in the stores, Bankers reach out into the community by placing outbound phone calls to existing clients, visiting businesses, conducting educational seminars, and being active in the community. Our Expectation of our Personal Bankers: Personal Bankers are expected to exceed challenging sales and referral goals by proactively selling products and services to customers and referring customers to other areas of the bank. Personal Bankers sell retail banking products and services to customers and prospects. Manages customer portfolio, services relationships and cross-sells all products and services. Provides broad base of financial and credit services with the goals of acquiring 100% of the customers' business. Develops and maintains relationships with Wells Fargo partners to maximize sales opportunities and achieve minimum sales standards. Uses profiling analysis tools to identify cross sell opportunities and makes outbound sales calls typically by phone to increase product per customer ratio. May handle cash transactions. May spend up to 30% of time completing service-related tasks. Every banker has their own scorecard with daily sales and referral goals. You will be rewarded for your success with bonus incentives beyond base salary. Our best Bankers constantly go the extra mile, finding ways to be helpful while still working quickly and efficiently. Bankers have the ability to resolve difficult customer situations effectively while delivering friendly customer service and ensuring the highest level of customer satisfaction. At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others enhance their ability to educate our customers. We'll provide outstanding training, but it's up to you to learn our products and services. Personal Bankers will develop and improve their skills through regular feedback discussions with supervisors and learn skills which will help further their professional experience and improve their chance for even greater roles in the future. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Normal work schedules typically fall between 7AM - 6PM. The schedule for this position is 40 hours and may change based on business need. Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience selling products and services1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsExperience interacting positively with unsatisfied customersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience in retail sales or the financial services industryExperience achieving individual and team goalsAbility to adhere to established attendance policies Other Desired Qualifications• Multilingual speakers are encouraged to apply Job Expectations Ability to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduledThis position requires SAFE registration at the time of employment. Wells Fargo will initiate the SAFE registration process immediately after your employment start date. The Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System (NMLS) web site (http://fedregistry.nationwidelicensingsystem.org ) provides the MU4R questions and registration required for employment in this position.Individuals in Loan Originator (LO) positions must meet the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau qualification requirements and comply with related Wells Fargo policies. The LO qualification requirements include meeting applicable financial responsibility, character, general financial fitness and criminal background standards. A current credit report will be used to assess your financial responsibility and credit fitness, however, a credit score is not included as part of the evaluation. Successful candidates must also meet ongoing regulatory requirements including additional screening, if necessary. Disclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Personal Banker  Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/personal-banker-1-job-dallas-tx-us-168847726.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ae96ad73e6b268ec5f58be695f9aae82
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:21:54:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Fort Madison, Iowa (pop. 10,764) is seeking a forward thinking Police Chief with demonstrated leadership capabilities and the ability to convey a sense of integrity, inspire confidence, respect, trust and a sense of mission The successful candidate will have a strong law enforcement background and substantial track record of sustainable community-oriented initiatives. Candidates must be experienced, well qualified and possess exceptional skills to be a leader, not just an administrator. The Police Chief oversees 18 FT officers, 2 civilian staff members. Salary for position is DOQ. The City of Fort Madison is an Equal Opportunity Employer. For additional information and a downloadable job application, go to: www.fortmadison-ia.com/jobs.aspx Applications are due no later than 4:30 p.m. on Monday, June 27, 2016.",Police Chief Job in Ford Madison,Full Time,"Ford Madison, IA 52627",All,http://jobview.monster.com/police-chief-job-ford-madison-ia-us-168533468.aspx?mescoid=1101113002005&jobPosition=18,,,7543f6d8490d5ad322b40343fa172ba1
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:21:17:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Jr financial architect neededCandidate can work remotely, but must be ear a major airportClient DetailsDigital Service companyDescriptionThis position would handle small to mid-size deals ($1M - $40M TCV) with the opportunity to expand their experience and customer interface skills with the potential to grow into a Sr. Financial Architect role -Manage costing, pricing, and financial analysis for all deals assigned-Preparation of pro-forma financial statements and/or business cases-Cash flow analysis-Ensuring compliance of bids to Rainbow, Key Contracting Principles, and Reserved Matters-Negotiation support - price, scope and terms/conditions with customers or their agents/advisors-Serving as a resource on matrixed engagement teams on Matters of transactional tax issues (Sales tax, VAT, withholding taxes), transfer pricing, revenue recognition, and proper cost accounting-Reading, drafting and editing contracts, statements of work and other required deal documentation-Preparing presentations for management or customers regarding assigned deals-Training others on Rainbow and financial Architect domain knowledge ProfileBS/BA in accounting or finance-Excel, PowerPoint, and Word skills. Intermediate+ level-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles/IFRS Knowledge-Sourcing industry experience helpful: Common sourcing processes, RFI, RFP, contracts, service levels, pricing, ARCs/RRCs, termination charges, terms and conditions-Transactional tax experience helpful: Sales tax, VAT, withholding taxes-Strong financial analysis skills, including P&L and cash flow modeling-Specific experience pricing services contractsTo be trained on --Rainbow expertise-Knowledge of GSSE Financial Architect skill set and mastery of GSSE Financial architect training/knowledge repository-Mastery of applicable financial rules: GRD, accounting rules, revenue recognition, investment process, transfer pricing-Mastery of Key Contracting Principles and Reserved MattersJob Offergrowth competitive salary and bonus",Financial Manager Job in Dallas,"Full Time , Employee","Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-manager-job-dallas-tx-us-168661127.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=13,,,b4fe78b921155aaad53226acd1006871
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:21:09:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounting Specialist needed for growing companyClient DetailsDigital Service companyDescriptionResponsible for a variety of functions with a primary focus on monthly close and balance sheet reporting.May also participate in financial analysis, trend reporting, profit and loss analysis, CAPEX reporting, and variance analysis. Performs financial forecasting, variance analysis of actual vs. forecast and reconciliation of internal accounts.May assists with the preparation of budget and forecastsMay perform one or more of the following duties: Assists with monthly close reporting (revenue, operating margin, sales, headcount, etc.)Projects as assigned.Frequently interacts with functional peer groups.Interaction normally requires the ability to gain cooperation of others.Take over responsibility for Intercompany reconciliations and supervise offshored P2P function.ProfileProficient in the use of Microsoft Excel and Hyperion Essbase. Familiar with JD Edwards and/ or SAP.1 plus years accounting experienceJob Offergrowth and competitive salary",Accounting Specialist Job in Dallas,"Full Time , Employee","Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-specialist-job-dallas-tx-us-168660468.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=15,,,c8e4fb333b22df5b33552368498317c0
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:21:01:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Bilingual (Spanish) IT Help Desk Technician job in Coppell, TX Are you looking to work for a Global Leader in IT solutions in a postion with career development and room for growth??? Then look no further!!! I am looking to fill a Bilingual (Spanish) IT Help Desk Technician job in Coppell, TX with my Fortune 200 client. We have exclusive interview slots that we need to fill ASAP! Take a look a the description and APPLY TODAY! NOTE: Must be bilingual/Spanish speaking to be considered for this opportunity! LOCATION: Coppell, TX 75019LENGTH: 6 Month Contract to Hire DESCRIPTION: This company offers an opportunity to convert full time with an excellent benefits package. Once converted full time there is room for career growth and the opportunity to change verticals and take your career to the next level!  This will be a Help Desk environment for multiple end clients so candidates must have a diverse skill set. Education:High School Diploma  Technical Skills:• Active Directory and VPN are a must• Troubleshooting skills-Need to know what questions to ask to get to the root of the problem quickly• Windows/Outlook software support• Desktop Support• Remedy ticketing system preferred, but other ticketing systems will be considered• A+ certification is preferred*          Must be fluent in Spanish Soft Skills:• Flexibility since the processes may change on a day-to-day basis depending on the client they are working with and what the client’s needs are• Moldable• Able to take direction• Multitasking• Good attendance (there is a point system)• Ability to thrive in an up-tempo high stress environment.  Main Responsibilities: • Provides technical support to users for basic computer related technical problems.  • Enters tickets into the call tracking tool; ensures information is accurate, prioritized and assigned to a queue. • Answers help desk telephones and responds to basic customer inquiries to ensure customer needs are met. • Assists customers in resolving basic technical problems by providing scripted guidance regarding software and hardware problems.  • Resolves and/or refers more complex technical problems through a defined escalation process. • Logs and tracks inquiries using a problem management database and maintains history records and related problem documentation. • Identifies, evaluates, and prioritizes customer problems and complaints to ensure that inquiries are resolved appropriately. • Experience with solving computer related problems.  • Experience with company products, operation systems and escalation policy.  • Good communication, interpersonal and organizational skills.   If you are interested in the Bilingual (Spanish) IT Help Desk Technician job in Coppell, TX then APPLY TODAY!",Bilingual (Spanish) IT Help Desk Technician job in Coppell,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Coppell, TX 75019",,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-spanish-it-help-desk-technician-job-in-coppell-tx-job-coppell-tx-us-169017112.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,bb4f22bcf00d749aab3f5e83b2dff519
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:20:59:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Temporary Security Officer ($11.50/HR) - Keokuk, IA 3729BR Iowa (800) 832-8828 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Obtain Iowa State Security License Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Keokuk area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately.  For more information, you can also call us at (800) 823-8828. Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Keokuk, IA 52632",Temporary Security Officer ($./HR) - Keokuk,Full Time Employee,IA,,http://jobview.monster.com/temporary-security-officer-11-50-hr-keokuk-ia-job-ia-us-168941745.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=6,,Security/Protective Services,fa8732ca62ec82381264c0afec473d28
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:20:57:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Construction Superintendent - LEED Certified Multi-Fam Co Job in Littleton 80120, Colorado US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Senior Construction Superintendent Apply Littleton, CO Full-Time $70,000 - $100,000 Job Details If you are a Senior Construction Superintendent with Multi-Family experience, please read on!Salary Range: $70-100,000Location: Littleton, COWhat You Will Be Doing•Assist Project Manager in the supervision and responsibility of the total construction effort in accordance with design, budget, quality, and schedule•Provide technical assistance (interpretation of drawings, recommendation of construction methods and equipment, etc.) as required, including mechanical, electrical, plumbing and fire protection •Direct day-to-day on-site supervision of field labor force including assistants, foremen, subcontractors and other construction related personnel•Review and approve Trade Contractor Payment Applications with Project Manager•Develop and maintain site logistics plan, in coordination with Project Manager•Development of Quality Assurance & Controls; Conduct quality inspections•Coordinate site testing and inspection efforts•Monitor costs, including labor time and material•Communicate and enforce Safety and Health Management Program•Demonstrate commitment to an Injury-Free Environment through own actions and mentoring others•Inspection of Subcontractor operations to ensure compliance with Contract Documents•Maintain good relationships with internal and external clients, including representatives of Owner, Architect/Engineer, Partners, Neighbors and Local Authorities.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- residential construction- Multi-family experience- LEED Building Techniques- Wood frame projectsSo, if you are a Senior Construction Superintendent with experience, please apply today!Or send your resume to Taylor@CyberCoders.com Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Taylor Burns is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: TB3-1294676 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Taylor.Burns@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: TB3-1294676 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Taylor Burns | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",Senior Construction Superintendent,,"Senior Construction Superintendent - LEED Certified Multi-Fam Co Job in Littleton 80120, Colorado US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Senior Construction Superintendent Apply Littleton, CO Full-Time $70,000 - $100,000 Job Details If you are a Senior Construction Superintendent with Multi-Family experience, please read on!Salary Range: $70-100,000Location: Littleton, COWhat You Will Be Doing•Assist Project Manager in the supervision and responsibility of the total construction effort in accordance with design, budget, quality, and schedule•Provide technical assistance (interpretation of drawings, recommendation of construction methods and equipment, etc.) as required, including mechanical, electrical, plumbing and fire protection •Direct day-to-day on-site supervision of field labor force including assistants, foremen, subcontractors and other construction related personnel•Review and approve Trade Contractor Payment Applications with Project Manager•Develop and maintain site logistics plan, in coordination with Project Manager•Development of Quality Assurance & Controls; Conduct quality inspections•Coordinate site testing and inspection efforts•Monitor costs, including labor time and material•Communicate and enforce Safety and Health Management Program•Demonstrate commitment to an Injury-Free Environment through own actions and mentoring others•Inspection of Subcontractor operations to ensure compliance with Contract Documents•Maintain good relationships with internal and external clients, including representatives of Owner, Architect/Engineer, Partners, Neighbors and Local Authorities.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- residential construction- Multi-family experience- LEED Building Techniques- Wood frame projectsSo, if you are a Senior Construction Superintendent with experience, please apply today!Or send your resume to Taylor@CyberCoders.com Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Taylor Burns is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: TB3-1294676 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Taylor.Burns@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: TB3-1294676 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Taylor Burns | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-construction-superintendent-leed-certified-multi-fam-co-job-littleton-co-us-168735373.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=14,,,ab46917d87d58f7ad05213feb11ffbe1
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:20:23:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Supervisor- Columbus, OH 3848BR Ohio 850-957-1775 Job Description Whelan Security is searching for bright and talented professionals who wish to share in the unique culture of our family business – one where people feel inspired, encouraged, and rewarded. Now is your opportunity to join our world-class team as one of the fastest growing contract security companies in the country!  Whelan Security is a performance-based company that cares deeply about maintaining our conservative business culture.  The Site Supervisor is the operational employee responsible for the personnel in an account, typically reporting into an MSS or CSM.  The Site Supervisor is an hourly position that includes manning a security post while also providing operational support for the account to include scheduling, payroll, compliance, post order development, performance metrics tracking, training, employee recognition and inspections during working hours.  The Site Supervisor role is 100% tactical and operational.  The Site Supervisor is expected to build upon a culture of employee engagement and set the example for all employees in the assigned account of servant leadership and personal commitment to the Whelan Values. Qualifications Performance Metrics:  The Site Supervisor is expected to achieve the following metrics within Whelan’s performance-based business environment: Manage to 2.5% unbilled overtime or less on assigned account Retention of the account Period over period improvement (usually quarterly) of performance metrics specific to the account Personnel inspections and training of assigned personnel each month 100% compliance to the Whelan Mandatory Requirements Lead by example of living up to the Whelan Values Personal Characteristics:  Company-Wide Culture - High Integrity (Character Beyond Reproach), Servant Leader (Never Asking Anyone to Do What You Aren’t Willing to Do), Hands-On Leader, Financially Prudent, Detail-Oriented, Thick-Skinned, Fun. Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Why Whelan? Be Supported:  Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more! Be Challenged:  Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded: We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program. Be Valued: We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry.  Apply Now!If you are looking for a great opportunity to work in New Albany for a leader in the contract security industry – APPLY NOW!Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately. For more information, you can also call us at 859-957-1775.Still not convinced? Listen to what our team members have to say! New Albany, OH 43054",Security Supervisor- Columbus,Full Time Employee,OH,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-supervisor-columbus-oh-job-oh-us-168941214.aspx?mescoid=3300570001001&jobPosition=3,,Security/Protective Services,5186baf7ab168e5c98c383ba8ec4d9b6
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:20:23:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Personal Banker 1Job ID Number: 5248554-3Location: Dallas,TXJob Description: Job DescriptionAt Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. As a Personal Banker, you will devote much of your day to building long term relationships with our customers, in person and by phone. You will deepen the understanding of our customers' financial needs and provide suggestions. While most of the job is performed in the stores, Bankers reach out into the community by placing outbound phone calls to existing clients, visiting businesses, conducting educational seminars, and being active in the community. Our Expectation of our Personal Bankers: Personal Bankers are expected to exceed challenging sales and referral goals by proactively selling products and services to customers and referring customers to other areas of the bank. Personal Bankers sell retail banking products and services to customers and prospects. Manages customer portfolio, services relationships and cross-sells all products and services. Provides broad base of financial and credit services with the goals of acquiring 100% of the customers' business. Develops and maintains relationships with Wells Fargo partners to maximize sales opportunities and achieve minimum sales standards. Uses profiling analysis tools to identify cross sell opportunities and makes outbound sales calls typically by phone to increase product per customer ratio. May handle cash transactions. May spend up to 30% of time completing service-related tasks. Every banker has their own scorecard with daily sales and referral goals. You will be rewarded for your success with bonus incentives beyond base salary. Our best Bankers constantly go the extra mile, finding ways to be helpful while still working quickly and efficiently. Bankers have the ability to resolve difficult customer situations effectively while delivering friendly customer service and ensuring the highest level of customer satisfaction. At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others enhance their ability to educate our customers. We'll provide outstanding training, but it's up to you to learn our products and services. Personal Bankers will develop and improve their skills through regular feedback discussions with supervisors and learn skills which will help further their professional experience and improve their chance for even greater roles in the future. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Normal work schedules typically fall between 7AM - 6PM. The schedule(s) for this position is 40 hours and may change based on business need. Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience selling products and services1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsExperience interacting positively with unsatisfied customersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience in retail sales or the financial services industryExperience achieving individual and team goalsAbility to adhere to established attendance policies Other Desired Qualifications• Multilingual speakers are encouraged to apply Job Expectations Ability to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduledThis position requires SAFE registration at the time of employment. Wells Fargo will initiate the SAFE registration process immediately after your employment start date. The Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System (NMLS) web site (http://fedregistry.nationwidelicensingsystem.org ) provides the MU4R questions and registration required for employment in this position.Individuals in Loan Originator (LO) positions must meet the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau qualification requirements and comply with related Wells Fargo policies. The LO qualification requirements include meeting applicable financial responsibility, character, general financial fitness and criminal background standards. A current credit report will be used to assess your financial responsibility and credit fitness, however, a credit score is not included as part of the evaluation. Successful candidates must also meet ongoing regulatory requirements including additional screening, if necessary. Disclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Personal Banker  Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/personal-banker-1-job-dallas-tx-us-168799438.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fefa58b7a55c99c2481318fa5c91444f
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:19:45:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Personal Banker 1Job ID Number: 5248554-2Location: Dallas,TXJob Description: Job DescriptionAt Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. As a Personal Banker, you will devote much of your day to building long term relationships with our customers, in person and by phone. You will deepen the understanding of our customers' financial needs and provide suggestions. While most of the job is performed in the stores, Bankers reach out into the community by placing outbound phone calls to existing clients, visiting businesses, conducting educational seminars, and being active in the community. Our Expectation of our Personal Bankers: Personal Bankers are expected to exceed challenging sales and referral goals by proactively selling products and services to customers and referring customers to other areas of the bank. Personal Bankers sell retail banking products and services to customers and prospects. Manages customer portfolio, services relationships and cross-sells all products and services. Provides broad base of financial and credit services with the goals of acquiring 100% of the customers' business. Develops and maintains relationships with Wells Fargo partners to maximize sales opportunities and achieve minimum sales standards. Uses profiling analysis tools to identify cross sell opportunities and makes outbound sales calls typically by phone to increase product per customer ratio. May handle cash transactions. May spend up to 30% of time completing service-related tasks. Every banker has their own scorecard with daily sales and referral goals. You will be rewarded for your success with bonus incentives beyond base salary. Our best Bankers constantly go the extra mile, finding ways to be helpful while still working quickly and efficiently. Bankers have the ability to resolve difficult customer situations effectively while delivering friendly customer service and ensuring the highest level of customer satisfaction. At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others enhance their ability to educate our customers. We'll provide outstanding training, but it's up to you to learn our products and services. Personal Bankers will develop and improve their skills through regular feedback discussions with supervisors and learn skills which will help further their professional experience and improve their chance for even greater roles in the future. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Normal work schedules typically fall between 7AM - 6PM. The schedule(s) for this position is 40 hours and may change based on business need. Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience selling products and services1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsExperience interacting positively with unsatisfied customersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience in retail sales or the financial services industryExperience achieving individual and team goalsAbility to adhere to established attendance policies Other Desired Qualifications• Multilingual speakers are encouraged to apply Job Expectations Ability to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduledThis position requires SAFE registration at the time of employment. Wells Fargo will initiate the SAFE registration process immediately after your employment start date. The Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System (NMLS) web site (http://fedregistry.nationwidelicensingsystem.org ) provides the MU4R questions and registration required for employment in this position.Individuals in Loan Originator (LO) positions must meet the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau qualification requirements and comply with related Wells Fargo policies. The LO qualification requirements include meeting applicable financial responsibility, character, general financial fitness and criminal background standards. A current credit report will be used to assess your financial responsibility and credit fitness, however, a credit score is not included as part of the evaluation. Successful candidates must also meet ongoing regulatory requirements including additional screening, if necessary. Disclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Personal Banker  Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/personal-banker-1-job-dallas-tx-us-168799519.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3dbf6c8b91ac80cf893cbbfaa16ff715
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:19:45:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition/Vacancy No. 135791BR Position Title Telecommunications Subject Matter Expert II Job Category Program and Project Management Business Line Government Country United States of America State/Province/Region USA - Maryland City Fort Meade Why Choose AECOM? AECOM is a premier, fully integrated professional and technical services firm positioned to design, build, finance and operate infrastructure assets around the world for public- and private-sector clients. With nearly 100,000 employees — including architects, engineers, designers, planners, scientists and management and construction services professionals — serving clients in over 150 countries around the world, AECOM is ranked as the #1 engineering design firm by revenue in Engineering News-Record magazine’s annual industry rankings, and has been recognized by Fortune magazine as a World’s Most Admired Company. The firm is a leader in all of the key markets that it serves, including transportation, facilities, environmental, energy, oil and gas, water, high-rise buildings and government. AECOM provides a blend of global reach, local knowledge, innovation and technical excellence in delivering customized and creative solutions that meet the needs of clients’ projects. A Fortune 500 firm, AECOM companies, including URS Corporation and Hunt Construction Group, have annual revenue of approximately $19 billion. More information on AECOM and its services can be found at www.aecom.com About the Business Line Government AECOM’s Global Support Services (GSS) organization resides within AECOM’s Government business line and is comprised of three divisions — International Development, Operations and Mission Support, and Global Programs. GSS has the international presence, personnel networks and procurement infrastructure to deliver support for any mission, anywhere. We optimize the reliability, availability and sustainability of equipment, logistics systems and facilities for clients around the world. GSS supports the U.S. Government, non-U.S. Governments and industry clients with worldwide program management, planning, design, operations and maintenance, logistics, aviation services, security, international development, environmental and civil engineering and mission and intelligence support. Job Summary Senior Telecommunications Subject Matter Expert ( SME ) provides engineering support to DISA. Expertise provided includes: Applies subject matter knowledge to high-level analysis, collection, assessment, design, development, modeling, simulation, integration, installation, documentation, and implementation Resolves problems, which necessitates an intimate knowledge of the related technical subject matter Provides strategic planning of large projects or a significant segment of a strategic planning portion of a large complex project Provides the overall approach to clarify mission statements so they can be used as springboards in envisioning their desired future Assists in developing mission and vision statements, subsequent goal delineation, provides guidance for building operational plans and specifying measurable outcomes to include capital outlay planning efforts in a consolidated strategic planning process and prioritizes those initiatives Develop engineering design packages, presentations, white papers and other engineering documentation in support of their tasks Organizing, hosting, and taking action from engineering review boards SEIS Minimum Requirements Active Top Secret/SCI Security Clearance A minimum of 16 years of progressively responsible systems engineering experience Bachelors Degree, Masters Degree preferred, in Electrical/Electronic Engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems, Physics, Mathematics, Business Administration, or a related field and eight (8) years of telecommunications related work experience. Strong DOD acquisition and program management experience Preferred Qualifications Master's Degree What We Offer AECOM is a place where you can put your innovative thinking and business skills into high gear and work alongside other highly intelligent and motivated people. It's a place where you can apply your skills to some of the world's most challenging, interesting, and meaningful projects worldwide. It's a place that values the diversity of our areas of practice and our people. It's what makes AECOM a great place to work and grow. AECOM is an equal opportunity employer and Minorities, Females, Veterans, and Disabled persons are encouraged to apply. For further information, please click here at http://www.aecom.com/content/wp-content/uploads/2016/01/EEO-is-the-Law-poster-supplement.pdf to view the EEO Is The Law poster.",Telecommunications Subject Matter Expert II Job in Fort Meade,"Full Time, Employee","Fort Meade, MD",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/telecommunications-subject-matter-expert-ii-job-fort-meade-md-us-168572508.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),857ec9bbea2f4ddddcded5645a7c621d
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:18:58:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer 3045BR Florida 404-673-1792 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Melbourne, Florida area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately.  Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one?   Florida License: B1300212 Albany, FL 32901",Security Officer Job in Florida US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,FL,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-fl-us-168942062.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=8,,Security/Protective Services,8cb7341db85f1de19aaff033ca4aa486
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:18:57:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer 3796BR Indiana (859)957-1774 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Fort Wayne area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately.  For more information, you can also call us at (859) 957-1774. Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Fort Wayne, IN 46825",Security Officer Job in Indiana US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,IN,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-in-us-168941158.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=20,,Security/Protective Services,2dab73ee11ea69cd366ae2d50565b194
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:18:47:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-cdl-not-required-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-dallas-tx-us-159971967.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=10,,Logistics/Transportation,2098e6580945ea189f72ee4032099679
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:18:47:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Protecting the Magic is the main goal of the Walt Disney World® Resort Security team. Cast members may work in various locations throughout our Theme Park and Resort Hotel areas, both on-stage and backstage, maintaining an environment that enables our guests and cast members to experience the magic of Disney.Security Cast Members receive a starting rate of $11.05 /hour and receive a premium of $.80/hour when scheduled between 10:00 pm and 4:00 am.Please review the entire job summary to ensure you are minimally qualified for consideration. ResponsibilitiesSecurity roles include walking patrol, motor patrol, kiosk support and relief support, which is responsible for providing breaks to the other three positions. In all of these roles, you will be working outside for extended periods of time writing/documenting/inputting reports (without the use of spell/grammar check) into our computer systems.Security cast members observe, react and respond to occurrences throughout the Walt Disney World® Resort, including visual inspections of buildings, bags and/or packages along with interacting and promoting the safety of cast members and guests. In addition, our Security cast members are responsible for providing directions and/or information to our cast members and guests along with answering and monitoring radio traffic to include call in and responding to safety concerns.Security cast members are considered first responders and will be trained on Infant, Child and Adult Cardiopulmonary Resuscitation (CPR) and Automated External Defibrillator (AED) procedures to respond to guest and cast emergencies as needed. Basic QualificationsA Florida Driver license is not required to apply, but will be required prior to the start of initial shift. Florida Class D license must be obtained at the culmination of training - must meet eligibility requirements. Willingness to work outdoors and at various heights is required.All candidates must be at least 18 years of age for consideration AND be working towards or successfully completed an Associate's Degree or higher in Criminal Justice, Private Investigations, Homeland Security, Emergency Management, Emergency Medical Services and/or any other Security related field OR at least one of the following:  Successfully completed Basic Training in the Military Law Enforcement, Special Deputy and/or Police Cadet experience Loss Prevention and/or Plain Clothes Operatives experience Security Guard/Officer experience responsible for foot/bicycle/motor patrol, monitoring cameras, and/or aviation screening High pressure situational experience such as an Emergency Medical Technician, Firefighter, Flight Attendant and/or a 911 OperatorPreferred Qualifications Bilingual (Spanish, Portuguese, French and/or Japanese) Florida Class D Security license Associate's Degree or higher in Criminal Justice, Private Investigations, Homeland Security, Emergency Management, Emergency Medical Services and/or any other Security related fieldAdditional InformationSCHEDULE AVAILABILITYOur Theme Parks and Resort Hotels operate 24 hours a day, 365 days a year. Please note that the principles of seniority are used to schedule all roles. Security shifts may be a minimum of four (4) or more hours. This role is Part Time and requires full availability for any shift, two (2) days per week, including nights and holidays. Additionally, two (2) full weeks of availability required for training purposes.SUBMITTING YOUR APPLICATIONAfter clicking Apply for this job below, the employment application will open in a new window. Please complete ALL pages of the application by clicking Next on each page, then Submit on the final page.IMPORTANT:You may only apply once in a six month period. If you have applied within the last six months, please log in to your account to view your current application status.KEYWORD: DisneySecurity WDWCASTING WDW Casting Security",Security Host/Hostess - Part Time,Part Time,"Lake Buena Vista, FL 32830",Entertainment Venues and Theaters,http://jobview.monster.com/security-host-hostess-part-time-walt-disney-world-job-lake-buena-vista-fl-us-168924912.aspx?mescoid=3500618001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),566ffe535fe6cd566865dac787ca98da
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:17:48:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is currently seeking a Senior Accounting Associate to maintain the General Ledger for Customs Brokerage as well as exception processing for International freight transactions. The ideal candidate must be a subject matter expert in all areas of financial analysis and accounting procedures.This position is responsible for preparing, auditing and entering journal entries, as well as reconciling balance sheet accounts on a monthly basis.  He/She will also be responsible for preparing and receiving electronic charge memos (Centras), as well as internal customer support, including research of account balances and variance analysis.  The Senior Accounting Associate conducts shipment level research to determine the correct settlement for UPS International freight transactions for revenue recognition and/or accounts receivable adjustments, and ensures compliance with Enterprise Wide Accounting Policies and Procedures (EWAPPM). Preferred Skills Some training/experience in accounting, finance or business Knowledge of accounting, including use of concepts and principles Good working knowledge of computerized spreadsheets and databasesGood communicative, organizational, planning, analytic and problem-solving skills are preferredAccuracy and attention to detailProficiency with various software packages including Outlook, Excel, Access, Word, PowerPoint, and WindowsMINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:Four year undergraduate business degree obtained or working toward a four-year business degree in the area of Finance,Accounting or related field is preferredExcellent analytical, organizational and problem solving skills preferredGood working knowledge of accounting processes and principles preferredIntermediate knowledge level of Access, Excel, Word and PowerPoint preferredUPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Senior Accounting Associate Job in Coppell,,"Coppell, TX 75019",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-senior-accounting-associate-job-coppell-tx-us-168625987.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=14,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,f5decf41c2c61958f497a4e2b27f5445
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:17:47:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Special Response Officer 3869BR Arkansas 501-224-1214 Job Description Whelan Security is searching for bright and talented professionals who wish to share in the unique culture of our family business – one where people feel inspired, encouraged, and rewarded.  We are excited to announce immediate openings in the Ashdown area! Now is your opportunity to join our world-class team as one of the fastest growing contract security companies in the country! The Special Response Officer (SRO) is a highly trained and skilled professional who is comfortable working in difficult operating conditions. Special Response Officers include current and former law enforcement officers and prior military personnel who are qualified to serve as tactical leaders of an emergency response operation. The senior member of an SRO team may act as an Incident Commander, with other members typically acting as supervisory personnel. The members of this group have to be able to operate in adverse conditions with no access to emergency services (911) for time periods ranging from days to weeks – potentially months within a widespread catastrophic event. Qualifications All applicants must meet the following minimum requirements:​ 21 years of age or older Legally authorized to work in the United States Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screen which includes but is not limited to: criminal background checks (local, state and Federal), personal reference checks, work history and education verification Successfully pass a pre-employment drug test and any subsequent post employment random drug tests Complete all assigned pre-employment aptitude and skill assessments Successfully complete personality profile (behavioral assessment) Successful applicants will possess one (or more) of the following: A minimum of four years law enforcement experience Four years active duty military police service with honorable discharge Eight years military experience with a minimum of two years documented military connected security experience. Twelve years of progressive security experience including a minimum of two years security supervisory experience A degree in Criminal Justice (associates or higher) may be taken into consideration as meeting one half of the experience requirement Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Why Whelan?   Be Supported:  Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more! Be Challenged:  Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded:  We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program. Be Valued:  We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry.  Apply Now!If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at some of our outstanding client locations in the Ashdown area - APPLY NOW!Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately. For more information, you can also call us at 501-224-1214.Not convinced?  Listen to what our team members have to say! Ashdown, AR 71822",Special Response Officer Job in Arkansas US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,AR,,http://jobview.monster.com/special-response-officer-job-ar-us-168941164.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,Security/Protective Services,0431c62e7bb284ab63538564ac8ae723
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:16:48:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"BUSINESS ANALYST – CONTRACT – ARLINGTON, TXServes as a liaison between the business community and the IT organization in order to provide technical solutions to meet user needs. Assists in the business process redesign and documentation as needed for new technology.Business Analyst & Requirements:• Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or Information Technology preferred (Typically has 7 to 10 years of relevant technical or business work experience.)• Minimum of 5 years of experience in Information Technology Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities: • Must have strong communication skills, written and verbal • Experience interviewing end users to gather requirements • Knowledge of the SDLC • Experience building reports • Expert-level proficiency in the following: o Network concepts including LAN/WAN architectures o Microsoft Visio o Systems Development/Integration Fundamentals o Microsoft Office Suite (Outlook, Word, PowerPoint, Access, Excel) • Ability to learn and understand various systems and databases • Ability to demonstrate professionalism in all internal and external interactions • Ability to analyze situations and challenges in a systematic, logical approach • Ability to analyze data points extracted by automated and manual discovery processes • Intermediate-level proficiency in the following: o Microsoft Project o Multiple Relational Databases including Oracle, SQL Server and MySQLo Java Development o CRM System Fundamentals o Internet and Client Server ArchitecturesFollow us on our BLOG to see more jobs like this: http://dallas.vereduscorp.com / Why Veredus?Candidates work with a professional Recruiter whose average experience is eight years in the industry. That means they have intimate knowledge of the Information Technology industry and market trends - who is in demand now and who will be next. Your Veredus Recruiter will lead you through a thorough screening process in order to understand your skills, experience, needs, and desires. They also counsel their candidates in resume writing, interviewing, and career planning so when there’s a position you really want, you’re fully prepared to get it. . Additionally, if the position is a consulting opportunity Veredus provides full benefits starting Day 1, and at virtually no cost to you. • Medical • Dental • Vision • 401K • Life Insurance ($20,000 benefit)• ATOP - Accrued Time Off Program• Consultant Lunches and Outings • Consultant Web-Site• Name Plates• Care packages/Survival packs• Dedicated Consulting Services RepresentativeVeredus has been recognized as one of the “Best Staffing Firms to Work For” by Staffing Industry Analysts the last 3 years in a row. Nervous about an upcoming interview? Want to be as prepared as possible?Click on the link below and you will have access to the Veredus Interview Prep Video - culled from hundreds of years of collective experience in preparing candidates for that all important job interview: http://vereduscorp.com/career-center / Veredus Corporation is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer M/F/D/V.Drug testing may be required; please contact Recruiter for more information.",Business Analyst,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-analyst-job-dallas-tx-us-168963441.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=12,,IT/Software Development,60463786809d7bb8a886def7a569a1b7
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:16:47:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer - Southern Ohio 3811BR Ohio (859) 957-1774 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING  We are searching for dependable and experienced security professionals who want to work for a world-class organization that recognizes and rewards hard work. We have immediate openings at one of our major accounts in Trenton. These positions offer you the opportunity to work at one of the oldest and most recognized companies in the country, further develop your security skills, and pave the way for your advancement both professionally and financially. This is the perfect opportunity for a law enforcement student or recent graduate who is looking to gain valuable skills such as professional communication, dispatch, vehicle patrol, and foot patrol. Develop important skills that law enforcement agencies look for while still pursing your degree and certification.Our security positions are ideal for:Former, transitioning and military reserve personnelFormer and future law enforcement officersHospitality and customer service professionalsCollege studentsRetirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in Southern Ohio (Trenton & Cincinnati) – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 541 Buttermilk Pike, Suite 203, Crescent Springs, Kentucky 41017 to apply in person. For more information, you can also call us at 859-957-1774. Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Trenton, OH 45067",Security Officer - Southern Ohio Job in Ohio US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,OH,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-southern-ohio-job-oh-us-168941454.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=19,,Security/Protective Services,a74b83fd8b82d0875a064b6e6fdd323c
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:16:09:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Universal Protection Service seeks enthusiastic, passionate Security Professionals to join us in this Prestigious Account! If selected for this post, you will be providing security and customer service at a site considered one of Indiana's top properties.  Interviews are being conducted now, so take action immediately and APPLY TODAY! We have positions in Carmel, Zionsville, Brownsburg, the greater Indianapolis Area. Primary job duties:Greet visitors while providing excellent Customer Service!Oversee access control and facilitate badge processControl interior and exterior of the propertyReport suspicious activities and persons Write detailed narrative reports and maintain daily activity reports (DARs)Respond to emergency situations requiring security assistanceBenefits: Universal Protection Service recognizes and rewards your commitment to excellence. Our Security Professionals enjoy advancement opportunities, generous salary and benefits including 401(k), a variety of medical, dental and vision options, holiday pay, training and development, and on-the-spot recognition programs. Requirements: ·         We need someone with top notch professionalism!·         Must possess a high school diploma or GED  and be 21+ years of age·         Must possess excellent  communication and customer service skills·         All applicants must successfully complete a background investigation and a post-offer/pre-employment drug/alcohol test.   EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disability Universal Protection Service is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to hiring a diverse workforce",Security Officer Job in Indianapolis,Full Time,"Indianapolis, IN 46225",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-indianapolis-in-us-168824138.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=5,9.50 - 11.00 $ /hourBenefits + Annual Bonus,Entry Level,6836505807f8e30174fde3857939464a
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:16:00:24,No,jobs.monster.com," Financial Service Specialist- Colorado Service Center-247959  We are a specialty retailer offering the very best of what’s next in fashion for men, women and children since 1901.THE REWARDS ARE ENDLESS.With locations in Colorado, California and Arizona, our credit team helps make shopping at Nordstrom a more rewarding experience. This essential behind-the-scenes group supports our Nordstrom Rewards™ program as well as our Nordstrom debit and credit cards. A day in the life… You will be hired as a Financial Service Specialist, which is our most senior role - part problem solver, part decision maker.  Your compensation will start at $16.00 - $17.00 per hour, with an increase upon successful completion of training plus incentive potential based on performance.Enter, review, and decision new account applications from multiple channels: stores, online, and/or customers responding to promotional invitations.Process, review, and decision register referrals, Nordstrom Direct transactions, and credit line increase requests.  Answer complex inbound account inquiries by applying advanced knowledge of Visa, Retail, Corporate Card, Debit, and Gift Card products.Answer and resolve escalated customer, store, and helpline calls.Locate account numbers for Visa, Retail, and Debit cardholders shopping in Nordstrom stores.Support store sales and growth of Nordstrom tender and Rewards programs.Answer basic inbound account inquiries and apply knowledge of Visa, Retail, Corporate Card, Debit and Gift Card products.Assist customers responding to store event invitations and other marketing related activities.Troubleshoot customer inquiries regarding online enrollment, password, sign-on issues and other online related questions.Review and process requests for account maintenance, status updates, payments, errors and letter requests.Educate customers on Nordstrom Rewards and other available reward benefits.Perform other duties as assigned.  You own this if you have…High school, GED or vocational school diploma.Experience in financial services, lending, insurance, banking and call center customer service strongly preferred.Working knowledge of Microsoft Office in a Windows environment with a beginning level of proficiency is preferred.Comprehend and apply a broad knowledge of credit card policies, procedures, and systems.Ability to apply independent judgment to credit granting decisions and service customers, via phone, in a friendly and efficient manner.Ability to apply analytical, problem solving, and decision making skills.Ability to apply excellent verbal and written communication skills; use good judgment and discretion in dealing with confidential and sensitive data.Ability to work both independently and on a team in a dynamic and fast-paced work environment.Ability and willingness to work flexible hours, changing shifts, and weekends.Able to establish and maintain cooperative and positive working relationships.Ability to balance multiple tasks in accordance with changing deadlines and priorities in a fast-paced environment to ensure Nordstrom fsb is meeting the needs and demands of internal and external customers.Ability to work sensitively and effectively with individuals of diverse ethnic and cultural backgrounds and treat all customers and employees in a fair and equitable manner.Ensures adherence to all Bank policies, procedures, and practices.Ensures a clean, safe and accident-free work environment and comply with Bank safety rules.  We’ve got you covered… We offer a comprehensive benefits package that includes medical, vision and dental coverage, a fabulous merchandise discount, an employer-matched 401(k) plan and much more. We are an equal opportunity employer committed to providing a diverse environment. This job description is intended to describe the general nature of the work employees can expect within this particular job classification. It is certainly not a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities and qualifications required for this job. ",Financial Service Specialist (Call Center) Job in Centennial,Full Time Employee,"Centennial, CO 80111",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-service-specialist-call-center-job-centennial-co-us-168831672.aspx?mescoid=4100676001001&jobPosition=2,16.00 - 18.00 $ /hour,Customer Support/Client Care,5679941362c9ae9a63f7ccd98dda237a
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:15:58:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Recruiting Specialist 3822BR Dallas/Fort Worth Branch 214-630-1001 Job Description Recruiting Specialist Whelan Security is looking for bright and talented professionals who wish to share in the unique culture of our family business – one where our people feel inspired, encouraged, and rewarded. Now is your opportunity to join our world-class team as one of the fastest growing contract security companies in the country! Whelan Security is a performance-based company that cares deeply about maintaining our conservative business culture.  The Recruiter/Recruiting Specialist is responsible for executing a consistent, effective, and efficient recruiting strategy for the branch.  This would include identifying recruiting sources, attending local recruiting events, and shepherding applicants through the ATS.  The Recruiter/Recruiting Specialist role is 100% tactical.  The Recruiter/Recruiting Specialist is expected to build upon a culture of employee engagement and set the example for all employees in the branch of servant leadership and personal commitment to the Whelan Values. Qualifications Performance Metrics: The Recruiter/Recruiting Specialist is expected to achieve the following metrics within Whelan’s performance-based business environment: Ongoing recruiting to ensure branch/region has employee candidates to staff to 110% level of branch and account staffing needs Identify at least 2 new recruiting sources per month Attend at least 1 off site recruiting activity per month Personally communicate with at least 10 recruiting sources each week Have 0 employees “in the red” in ATS Personally recruit a minimum of one new manager/staff in your branch annually 100% compliance to the Whelan Mandatory Requirements Lead by example of living up to the Whelan Values Personal Characteristics: Company-Wide Culture - High Integrity (Character Beyond Reproach), Servant Leader (Never Asking Anyone to Do What You Aren’t Willing to Do), Hands-On Leader, Financially Prudent, Detail-Oriented, Thick-Skinned, Fun.  Position-Specific - Fiercely Competitive (Hates to Lose), Creative Education Why Whelan?  Be Supported:  Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits, (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more! Be Challenged:  Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded:  We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program.Be Valued: We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry. Apply Now!At Whelan, we are passionate about our employees. If you have a passion for people and wish to join a family-owned, industry leading organization – APPLY NOW!Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately.  For more information, you can also call our branch office at 214-630-1001. Not convinced?  Listen to what our team members have to say!P123SMSDallas, TX 75230",Recruiting Specialist Job in Texas US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,TX,,http://jobview.monster.com/recruiting-specialist-job-tx-us-168941388.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=6,,Security/Protective Services,0e9bec2bb44cb58cb238f9cca783da66
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:15:57:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"POLICEEXAMINATIONSCHILLICOTHE, ILLINOISThe Board of Police Commissioners for the City of Chillicothe, Illinois is accepting applications for testing from both certified and non-certified candidates in order to establish a hiring list.Applications must be received by the Chief of Police on or before June 24, 2016. Applications may be obtained from the Chillicothe Police Department located at 832 N. Second St., Chillicothe, Ilinois.Appointments will be governed by the Rules and Regulations of the Board of Police Commissioners. Examinations will be held Saturday, June 25, 2016.",Police Examinations Job in Chillicothe,Full Time,"Chillicothe, IL 61523",All,http://jobview.monster.com/police-examinations-job-chillicothe-il-us-167795829.aspx?mescoid=3300588001001&jobPosition=8,,,908accd20cbe10361ac1c3537b0ef5d3
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:15:48:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer 2922BR Houston 713-977-0030 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now!   If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at some of our outstanding client locations in the Victoria  area – APPLY NOW!Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately. For more information, you can also call us at 713-977-0030. Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say!  At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one?Victoria, Texas 77905",Security Officer Job in Texas US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,TX,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-tx-us-168942032.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=18,,Security/Protective Services,a88012e3a5c935c4bd7641df89c16b51
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:15:47:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Human Resource Manager  Salary $55,000 - $75,000 PLUSExcellent Benefits & Paid Relocation****NOTE - Position is in EAST TEXAS **** Nationwide organization is seeking a strategic Human Resources Manager. This is your chance to make an impact on a facility that needs a strong presence in Human Resources.  They have made progress, but there is more to come.  They are looking for a proactive leader to take on new challenges now and in the future.  The responsibilities for thisHuman Resources Manager will be all the generalist activities in a typical non-union HR Manager’s role.  Will handle strategic planning & team development.  Will maintain current programs and develop & implement the new needed Human Resource programs.  Employee relations, safety, training, and development are huge concentration areas.  Location – The Great State of Texas!  ****NOTE - Position is in EAST TEXAS **** Requirements for this Human Resources Manager position:Bachelors degree mandatory Five years in Human Resources in a manufacturing operationExcellent leadership skills with a proactive thought processKeen abilities to develop teams, strategic planning,and organizational development TO APPLY:Email resume to scott@austinallen.comOR scottATaustinallenDOTcomin MS Word or PDF(please remove the capital letters and replace with proper symbols).**Resumes sent with a link to an Online resume or a video resume will not be considered.**  All Interview, relocation, & fee expenses paid by companies.  Excellent compensation packages, benefits, perks, and generous relocation packages.Some Facts You Should Know About Austin-Allen Company...*Successfully recruiting professionals since 1973.*One of the most successful firms in the U.S.  We consistently rank in the top percentile of a large national network of Technical Recruiters.*Many of our staff are national award winning consultants with years’ experience and are C.P.C.’s (Certified Personnel Consultants). Areas of Specialization...* Engineering (All Disciplines) * Six Sigma Black Belts* Manufacturing Management * Human Resources* Materials / Purchasing * Accounting* Quality Engineers & Managers * Distribution Visit our website at www.austinallen.com",Human Resources Manager Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resources-manager-job-dallas-tx-us-168508138.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=18,"55,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Human Resources,bd2e77c8a413477cbe9d86d1227ba9fa
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:15:46:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client local to Dallas, TX is currently hiring Sr. COBOL Developers. If qualified, please send an updated copy of your CV to Sean: sconnelly@judge.com Sr. COBOL Developer: Must have excellent analysis, testing and documentation skills.Provide on-site production support and on-call on support several complex mainframe credit financial systems. Able to work independently to find system problem causes and to implement resolutionsPrimary Skills Preferred: COBOLJCLIMSSecondary Skills Preferred: EndevorFile ManagerTELONDB2EasytrieveProgramming Languages & Tools: COBOLJCLIMSENDEVORTSOTELONDB2FILE MANAGEREASYTRIEVEYears of Experience:Production Support (10 years)On-call Production Support (10 years)COBOL (10 years)JCL (10 years) IMS (4 years)DB2 (1 years)ENDEVOR (2 years)FILE MANAGER ( 2 years) TELON (1 year)TSO (2 years)EASYTRIEVE (1 year)Additional Skills/Experience: Excellent documentation skills in writing program specifications, test plans and after action on-call reports.Excellent analysis and troubleshooting skills. Able to analyze complex systems. Systems do have some processes documented on the portal.Able to rotate every three weeks on call support. Expected to answer and resolve on-call problems (systems start running after midnight and runs daily). Some program abend resolutions are documented.Able to monitor Endevor package implementations at 9:00 pm whenever updating source code.",Sr. COBOL Developer Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-cobol-developer-job-dallas-tx-us-168963964.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,724eab71dc128650fe7c5b620d2afbdf
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:15:16:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sales RepresentativeAre you a motivated individual in search of a fulfilling long-term career opportunity? Bisco Industries is a company excited to invest in your professional development and reward your performance.At Bisco Industries, our most valued asset is people! Bisco Industries is ranked in the Top 15 Global Distributors of electronic components and hardware. We are looking to add a sales position to our local facility.Can you answer “YES” to these questions:•Do you always find yourself leading others?•Can you easily persuade people to your way of thinking?•Do you build relationships easily with a purpose?•Are you naturally excited, driving to get things done?•When you hear “NO” do you think they really just don’t “KNOW” enough?•Can you articulate a message in a professional manner verbally or written?•Are you competitive by setting goals and achieving success?•Are you self-motivated, have an enthusiastic personality with a persistent work ethic?•Do you have a philosophy where ""The Customer Is King""?Primary Functions and Responsibilities: •Develop, build and maintain strong B2B relationships with current and potential customers through inside and outside sales efforts.•Ensure excellent customer service.•Maintain accurate records and an organized work environment.•Establish new sales opportunities in an exciting work environment.Bisco Industries offers a competitive salary and benefits package including:•Monthly bonus program •Competitive vacation package •Wellness incentive•Annual merit increase•Comprehensive medical, dental and vision insurance packages•401(k) •Paid holidays•Voluntary Aflac and Mutual of Omaha benefits•Company provided life and long-term disability insurance•Tuition reimbursement programWho is Bisco Industries?Since our inception in 1973, Bisco Industries has proven to be an invaluable component in our customer's supply chain - providing unmatched customer service, extensive access to a wide array of components and manufacturers and a destination for the industry’s most dedicated and capable sales representatives.  Bisco Industries is a premiere distributor of Electronic Components and Fasteners used in the production of products and equipment in the Aerospace, Communication, Computers, Fabrication, Industrial Equipment, Instrumentation, Marine and Military Industries.  We offer a wide range of value added services that help us to become our customer's most relied upon supplier - and to achieve our goal of becoming a ""One Stop Shop"" for all of our customer's component and fastener needs.  We are passionate about promotion from within. ",Sales Representative Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Bisco Industries,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-job-dallas-tx-us-168859655.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=19,Competitive Base Salary + Commission,,e7f6aaab1fabccf553405876af4d7a5d
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:14:58:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"A Leading Insurance and Real Estate Company is looking for a Post Closing Specialist in Coppell, TX! Schedule is Monday - Friday, normal business hours (40 hour work week)Pay is $14.75/hour Duties: Review closed loan packages in accordance with the most recent Post-Closing ChecklistAudit files for compliance with TILA-RESPA Integrated Disclosures (TRID)Review Notes. Mortgages and Title Policies for accurate dates, signatures, initials and complete notary acknowledgment/juratPerform other duties as requested or assigned  Requirements: High school diploma, Bachelor's degree preferred but not requiredMost have recent mortgage experience processing, closing or post-closing experienceStrong computer skills  If you feel like you would be a good fit for this position, please apply with your current resume today! ",Post Closing Specialist in Coppell,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Coppell, TX 75019",,http://jobview.monster.com/post-closing-specialist-in-coppell-tx-job-coppell-tx-us-169017727.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=7,,Customer Support/Client Care,04a397267f6f841e3425d4a76e54baf5
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:14:56:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer 3390BR Southern California (310) 426-2610 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Starting wage for qualified candidates is $16/hour. Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Candidates must be able to perform the following duties: Conduct security patrols of Client facilities Identify and report security breaches, safety concerns, or unusual circumstances. Perform access control and check in visitors and/or driver partners Generate written reports on daily duties, incidents, and security recordkeeping. Escort and monitor contractors/vendors as needed Provide security presence during company events Respond to emergencies and stressful situations Perform additional security duties as requested Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Candidates must also meet the additional requirements: High school diploma and 1-2 years of security/safety experience First Aid Certified Meet all Legal and vendor requirements to hold a position in the Security field, including passing all certifications and background checks Ability to communicate effectively both orally and in written formats Deliver excellent customer service in a friendly and professional manner Proficient iOS and PC operating system and software Ability to lift over 20 pounds and stand for extended periods of time Education Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one of our nationally recognized client site in the San Diego area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately.  For more information, you can also call us at (310) 426-2610 . Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one?   CA PPO # 16344 El Segundo, CA 92121",Security Officer Job in California US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,CA,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-ca-us-168941760.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=2,,Security/Protective Services,4903295279cd435c7395f1528bf2dbc1
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:14:41:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are a local Event / Promotions and Planning firm in the Denver area looking for 3-5 Entry Level Event Planning Assistants' to join our event marketing and promotions team. We are looking for innovative, team-oriented individuals who enjoy working with others in a fast paced environment and maintaining relationships with our prestigious clientele. Purpose of Event Planning Assistant: The main focus of this position is to promote our clients brand names by developing and supporting retail marketing programs. You will work closely with other Event Marketing Specialists, and corporate marketing and sales organizations to support sales activities (shows, events, campaigns, etc) and utilize your marketing expertise to help develop and execute marketing programs that will increase demand and drive revenue. Primary Duties of Event Planning Assistant: Impacts sales results by developing, supporting and executing field marketing and segment activities. Executes Marketing campaigns and Plans Events depending on expertise. Works with various corporate/field marketing managers to determine appropriate customized programs and strategies for various market segments. Provides coordination and project management to ensure event success. Publicizes event and works with Account Development to raise awareness and drive high levels of attendance and participation by targeted audience.Requirements 1-2 years experience or training in marketing or sales preferred, but willing to make exceptions for the right candidate Experience in customer service or other people-oriented fields desired Exceptional organizational and project management skills Exceptional communication skills Ability to work independently and contribute in a team environment Desire to succeed **PLEASE NOTE: This is not a graphic design or telemarketing or creative position. This position is ENTRY LEVEL. We DO NOT participate in the following:NO DOOR-TO-DOOR SALESNO COLD-CALLING / TELEMARKETINGNO BUSINESS-TO-BUSINESS SALES ",Event Planning Assistant Job in Aurora,Full Time Employee,"Aurora, CO 80011",Advertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/event-planning-assistant-job-aurora-co-us-168873157.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=6,,Marketing/Product,9c96f8f55e265d803e6e469d30932ab3
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:14:22:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer- Columbus, NE 3496BR Nebraska (800) 823-8828 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Columbus area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately. For more information, you can also call us at (800) 823-8828. Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Columbus, NE 68601",Security Officer- Columbus,Full Time Employee,NE,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-columbus-ne-job-ne-us-168941551.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=6,,Security/Protective Services,e313a338e1da5aba10e95d5a2f58dbc9
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:13:47:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer 3195BR Mid-Atlantic 301-459-2355 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Montvale area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately .  For more information, you can also call us at 301-459-2355. Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Montvale,NJ 07645",Security Officer Job in Georgia US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,GA,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-ga-us-168942014.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=3,,Security/Protective Services,b21aa6bb05466123e5d83a8d7f88822d
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:13:46:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Premier Security Specialist 3655BR Northern California 408-326-0210 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Possess a valid California Guard Card Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the San Francisco area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 4 North 2nd Street, Suite 598, San Jose, CA 95113 to apply in person.  For more information, you can also call us at (408-326-0210) . Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! California Private Patrol Operator License Number 16344 San Francisco, CA 94112  HP123SOS",Premier Security Specialist Job in California US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,CA,,http://jobview.monster.com/premier-security-specialist-job-ca-us-168941301.aspx?mescoid=1300095001001&jobPosition=2,,Security/Protective Services,f8d4ae8db70e2e5fee4013b238c82986
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:12:59:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is Your Opportunity to Join One of the Fastest Growing Healthcare Staffing Companies in the Industry! Get the career growth opportunities and independence you deserve with Parallon. As one of the nation's first and largest providers of healthcare services we work with you to reach your goals both personally and professionally. We are committed to the care and improvement of human lives and strive daily to deliver top talent so as to uphold that very high level of commitment. The Program Manager develops and maintains relationships with new and existing client base. A main focus is overseeing the overall management of the requisition process for the assigned client (s). This includes the day-to-day relationship between the client and supplier representatives to fulfill clients staffing needs. May from time to time provide direction to program professionals and assistant program professionals. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS INCLUDE BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO: Job Requisition Fulfillment - Support the day to day requisition fulfillment process for assigned clients in a consultative manner with Hiring Managers on business needs and strategies. Prioritize job requisitions, supplier responsiveness and quality, timely job requisition fulfillment, and SLA compliance. Provides status updated to Hiring Managers. This may include: Validating incoming orders with the client to insure complete understanding of order requirements Distribute orders to the appropriate suppliers in accordance with the account contract terms and conditions, and program business rules Review candidates resumes to insure all client requirements are met Shortlist candidates for client hiring managers Order fulfillment for new contingent workers Provide guidance and be a process/technology resource for client, suppliers, and internal departments Supplier Management - Day to day issue resolution which may include contractor performance, payment / timesheets, or contractor rates. Reporting and Analytics (Client Reports, QSR, Supplier Performance) - Assist program team with reporting and analytics. Supports creation of reporting packages for the client to include monthly reporting packages, quality service reviews, and supplier performance reviews. Participate in reporting and analytics and quarterly performance reviews with client and suppliers Provide excellent customer service and act as the liaison between the client and suppliers to successfully manage order fulfillment. Interaction with client managers is also required to ensure satisfaction. Knowledgeable of and understands the contracted terms and conditions between PWS and the client, including pricing as well as client rules of engagement and processes; Assist in facilitation of assignment management. Responsible for ensuring resolution to the day-to-day issues within their respective program. Follows internal escalation plan as necessary. Meets and manages expectations from client, suppliers, and internal resources. Acts as a resource for the Program Professionals. Assists in the supervision, training and evaluation of Program Professionals. Maintains confidentiality and appropriate access of all employee information.Perform other duties as assigned. Practice and adhere to the ""Code of Conduct"" philosophy and ""Mission and Value Statement"". EDUCATION - High School Diploma and/or GED required, Bachelors preferred EXPERIENCE - Minimum 2-4 years working in a Recruitment/Customer Service type position, preferably within the Healthcare staffing field. Experience with the MSP market highly desirable. Excellent reporting skills and data interpretation highly desirable Why Parallon? Parallon is one of the nation's leading providers of healthcare business, operational and staffing services. Parallon provides comprehensive and customized solutions to improve business performance and meet the real needs of hospital and healthcare systems. We offer a complete range of business services in the areas of revenue cycle, group purchasing (via HealthTrust), supply chain, technology, workforce management and consulting. The Parallon name represents the commitment to working side-by-side, or in parallel, with healthcare providers to enhance their performance. As a strategic, operational advisor and knowledge source, we employ more than 22,000 professionals who approach every assignment as operating partners, not vendors.",Program Manager Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/program-manager-job-dallas-tx-us-168334345.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=4,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,049d9c2459830b1d4eb257f0a40e7747
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:12:57:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for a Senior Accountant for an amazing Dallas client! Trust us – you definitely want to work there!! They are seeking an Accountant with a minimum of 5 years of experience to hire on a temporary to permanent basis. Sound interesting?  If so, we would love to talk with you!Responsibilities:§      Month-end close duties§       Reconciliation of various general ledger accounts on a monthly basis for 7 operating companies§     Assist with monthly reporting package§     Fixed AssetsRequirements:§         Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting§         Advanced Excel skillsPreferred Skills:§      CPA Certification or Candidate§      Intercompany experienceHow to Apply:Apply today by emailing your resume to  FACadDAL@addisongroup.comWhy Choose Addison Group?A leading provider of professional staffing and search services, Addison Group distinguishes itself through exceptional delivery, specialized knowledge and strong relationships. Addison enables ideal connections between talented professionals and dynamic businesses. National practice areas include Administrative & HR; Engineering; Finance & Accounting Contract; Finance & Accounting Executive Search; Financial Services; Healthcare and Information Technology. Addison is an Inavero’s 2012 Best of Staffing winner for both Client and Candidate service. www.addisongroup.com Contractor Benefits Available for Purchase:§         Medical§         Dental§         401(k)§         Long Term Disability",Senior Accountant Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-dallas-tx-us-168816865.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=14,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,e3b83c66f0f9378855cc8cd2b2512b6e
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:12:30:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Energy Focus Inc. Client Development Executive National Accounts - Central U.S., based in Texas Overview: The Client Development Executive defines and executes the company’s strategies within the National Accounts and multi-location businesses market space.  Individual will lead the company’s efforts to develop, foster, maintain, and expand relationships with companies across the Southeast.  The CDE strategically sells the company’s LED lighting solutions in support of the overall goals and objectives of the organization.  The focus of this position is to dominate the market space in the retro-fit of all commercial buildings throughout the U.S. with our superior LED replacement products. Responsibilities: Execute the sales strategy/plan that identifies areas of growth potential including identification, qualification, proposal development, proposal delivery, negotiation, and sustainabilityAchieve and exceed profitable sales revenue objectiveInterface with all levels of client and customer management for purposes of consultation, negotiation, advancement, and facilitation of strategic sales experiencesCollaborate in customer facing activities that include interaction with existing customers, new business development, and othersMaintain awareness of industry, competition, and market conditions and leverage current client relationships to develop new business opportunitiesLead solutions development and collaborate in the presentation of credible solutions to key decision makers who are typically at the C suite levelMaintain a contact database of all customer’s contacts and decision-makers who would specify and procure EFOI product lines in Salesforce    Exhibit knowledge of all Energy Focus Inc. products and communicate relevant product, pricing, cost savings and other pertinent product details Develop proposals that speak to the client’s needs, concerns, and objectives and adjusting those proposals as neededCollaborate and assist in the development of marketing materials geared towards targeted professionals Close profitable sales opportunities that ensure success and meet the needs of our clients and the company Requirements: 5+ years solution/technical sales experience in the LED/lighting industryExperience selling to decision-makers and C level executivesExperience selling value and long term benefits, not price Proven sales track record and understanding/experience of longer sales cycleStrong sense of urgency; ability and track record of closing dealsStrong business acumen and mathematical aptitudeTechnical proficiency; experience using SalesForce.com; Microsoft Office Suite, PowerPoint, Outlook, and Word; ability to make technical presentations to C-level executives and sophisticated audienceBA in Engineering or related fieldPlease send resumes to ta@energyfocusinc.com.                   ",Client Development Executive National Accounts - Central U.S. Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/client-development-executive-national-accounts-central-u-s-job-dallas-tx-us-168971028.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=5,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,3640a6375a263ce204731f3507510e67
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:11:48:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security OfficerJOIN THE SECURITY INDUSTRY LEADER!Securitas Critical Infrastructure Services, Inc. (SCIS) Security GuardsAdvancement OpportunitiesMust apply online at http://www.scisjobs.com (choose Security Operations Positions: Use Hiring Location: Hudson)SCIS (formerly Pinkerton Government Services), the nation's only specialty services company dedicated solely to providing security services to government agencies and contractors that require regulated services, is currently searching for FT and PT Security Guards for Burlington, MA to protect our nation's defense systems.Guard Card preferred (if applicable), High School Diploma/GED required. Must have effective communication skills, be 18 years of age with the ability to pass thorough background check/drug test and ability to obtain and maintain clearance required. Must be a US citizen, with a driver's license, reliable transportation, no bankruptcy in past 7 years and the ability to meet State Guard Licensing requirements.We offer: Medical/dental/vision/life insurance Direct DepositPaid vacation and 401KOutstanding career opportunities in one of the fastest-growing industries!! EOE/Minorities/Females/Vets/DisabilitiesDescription: 1.                     Controls access to client site or facility through the admittance process; assists visitors with a legitimate need to gain entry to the facility; screens visitors and client employees in an efficient manner in order to expedite their admittance to the site or facility.2.                     Protects site personnel and client property, its prime and subcontractors, licensees, invitees, and personnel and property of the U.S. Government form injury, damage or loss through theft, fire, trespass, espionage, sabotage, riot, insurrection, and of acts of God.3.                     Protects U.S. Government classified and client propriety material from compromise, unauthorized access, and loss or theft while on client site or in client custody.4.                     Communicates in a manner that is open, honest, and responsive in all situations; provides information to the extent authorized regarding the site and surrounding area as requested by visitors.5.                     Monitors entrances and exits; acts to prevent unapproved or unlawful entry; controls entrances, the movement of people and vehicles, and parking; operates a gate and examines vehicle contents; monitors remote entrances using closed circuit television; operates remote access devices; calmly directs persons who cause a disturbance to leave the property.6.                     Operates electronic communication consoles, monitors, recording and reporting systems. These may include telephone switchboards, two-way radios, closed circuit and standard TV monitors, video systems, alarm and access control systems, and emergency communications systems.7.                     Patrols assigned site on foot or in vehicle; checks for unsafe conditions, hazards, unlocked doors, security violations, blocked ingress and egress, mechanical problems, and unauthorized persons; inspects buildings and grounds using appropriate equipment and protective gear. 8.                     Protects evidence or scene of incident in the event of accidents, emergencies, or security investigations; sets up barriers and signage; and provides direction or information to others.9.                     Prepares logs or reports as required for site; writes or types reports or enters information in a computer using standard grammar; inspects security control logs and takes action as required.10.              Observes and reports incidents or suspicious activity to client representatives, company management, life/safety personnel, or public safety authorities as appropriate for the circumstances and/or as required by the site.11.              Responds to incidents of fire, medical emergency, bomb threat, flooding, water discharge, elevator emergency, hazardous materials, inclement weather, and other incidents or conditions following procedures established for the site, by the company, and/or through training or certification.12.           Carries out specific tasks and duties of a similar nature and scope as required for the assigned site.  ",Security Officer Job in Burlington,Full Time Employee,"Burlington, MA 01803",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-burlington-ma-us-165310408.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=7,$13.50+ /hour,Security/Protective Services,7358410c1d7fc0ac978fc1ae782bcb02
United States of America,US,01/Jun/2016:11:47:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Job Window has an immediate need for an entry level Public Relations Assistant to join a rapidly growing team. This rapidly-growing promotional marketing company, applies a customer-friendly, direct, results-driven approach to marketing research and sales. As a result of proven success and expertise, new clientele is continuously added as we dramatically increase clients' product exposure, sales and brand recognition.There is a HIGH DEMAND for customer service oriented, and cost-effective services. This leading event marketing firm provides advertising, marketing, and public relations campaigns for burgeoning companies and break out products. The Entry Level Public Relations Assistant will work closely on performance driven campaigns with high profile clients who consistently look for innovative strategic to drive their company and respective brands forward and increase their bottom line. Public Relations Teams Include:Advertising & Brand ExposureMarketing & Account SatisfactionPublic and Media Based StrategiesProject Management & Team Leadership An Entry Level Public Relations Assistant receives complete and individualized hands-on training in each division of our company. A proven mentorship program with senior management takes the time to develop and train the individual to handle any task and take initiative on any campaign.Trained, highly motivated, proactive representatives are invaluable. The right Entry Level Public Relations Assistant can expect to have opportunities for growth within the first few months that reflect their unmatched work ethic and dedication.Responsibilities:Managing and executing projects as assigned by the Marketing ManagerWorking with the Marketing Manager and key accounts to integrate PR campaigns with customer promotionsBuilding relationships with customers and communicating promotional servicesWorking with the Marketing Manager to develop and refine measurement strategies for PR campaignsDevelopment of promotional marketing materials and visual merchandizingDeveloping and maintaining relationships with suppliers and corporate partnersIdentifying new opportunities and efficiency innovationsPosition will be considered for senior campaign management roles based on performanceRequirementsPositions Requirements:1-2 years experience in marketing, sales or communications OR internship in related field an assetExcellent written and verbal communication skillsAbility to work in a fast-paced environment and deliver results while managing multiple projectsLevel headed problem solver with a professional service oriented attitudeSuperb organizational and tracking skills with great attention to detailTeam player who also excels as an individual contributorAdaptable, dependable and responsibleBasic understanding of marketing concepts and sales strategyProficient in Microsoft OfficePosition will be considered for senior campaign management roles",Entry Level Public Relations Assistant - Telecommunications Job in Huntington,"Full Time, Employee","Huntington, NY 11743",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-public-relations-assistant-telecommunications-job-huntington-ny-us-168876706.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=20,,Marketing/Product,cd7f3b15f6ef2818f6b464f4f4c1883c
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:21:48:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Property management professionals, why just settle for another job when you can be growing your career with a group that doesn't have opportunity knocking but has it pounding at your door and giving you a key to real success.Applicants MUST apply through the below link for consideration: https://app.jobvite.com/j?aj=oEx03fwY&s=MONSTER Monarch Investment is seeking an Assistant Property Manager to join our team at Brookwood Apartments in Indianapolis, IN. Please do not contact the community directly. We believe that each team member contributes directly to the growth and success of our company and believe that our teams are what set us apart from our competition. We strive to be above industry standards in everything we do.  Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities: -Assists the Property Manager (PM) with all on-site property operations -Ensure tenant renewals are being captured at the highest rate possible (Commissions paid) -Responsible for building and maintaining a resident relations program -Generates renewal, leasing and other reporting to the Property Manager -Ensures property is leased at or above market occupancy at proper rent levels by showing and leasing apartments when leasing agent is unavailable (Commissions Paid) -Assists PM in ensuring all property marketing is current, accurate and at its greatest effect -Other duties and special projects as assigned Knowledge, Skills and Experience required: · High school diploma or equivalent · 1+ years' experience in multifamily housing  · Must have excellent computer skills and be able to navigate industry  software, YARDI preferred · Have excellent verbal and written communication · Demonstrate problem solving and conflict resolution skills. Compensation & Benefits: - Paid education/training programs so you can advance your career - Paid Time Off - Holiday Paid Time Off - Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance - Life and Disability Insurance - Housing Discounts Applicants MUST apply through the below link for consideration:https://app.jobvite.com/j?aj=oEx03fwY&s=MONSTEREqual Opportunity Employer",Assistant Apartment Property Manager Job in Indianapolis,"Full Time, Employee","Indianapolis, IN 46227",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-apartment-property-manager-job-indianapolis-in-us-172649341.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=6,,Administrative/Clerical,ea17820e9185460bc78c09ac318ac228
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:22:54:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Excellent opportunity for an Administrative Assistant! As an Admin Assistant you will responsible for coordination of everyday office activities. The ideal candidate will create a smooth work flow within the office environment.  This position requires excellent communication, and organizational skills, the ability to take fast notes and meeting minutes, and exceptional computer skills.LOCATION - LA, CA 90010Job QualificationsWord Excel Power Point Access For additional information please send your resume in WORD format, via e-mail to lia@topjobsusa.net today.  ",Administrative Assistant Job in Los Angeles,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Los Angeles, CA 90010",All,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172749435.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),51d8e91adfbd24f40a405448b921b5b9
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:22:55:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary Greet customers in a professional friendly manner to ensure the customer's needs are met while maintaining safety /sanitation standards at all times. Abiding by the Company's Statement of Values and objectives while generating sales growth. Job Responsibilities Provide excellent customer service by being pleasant, greeting customers, attending to their requests and thanking them in a professional, friendly, courteous manner. Meet quality control standards of food service orders through proper food portioning, using fresh ingredients, product presentation and merchandising established by the company. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, etc. Follow daily checklist to ensure safety and sanitation standards/regulations are met. Perform housekeeping duties and maintenance functions as needed to remain compliant with company standards. Check accuracy of prices/ signage of products and services according to the weekly advertisements and other merchandising standards. Adhere to Food Safety/sanitation policies and procedures established by the company. Follow recipes to ensure food consistency. Use suggestive selling techniques, sampling food products daily to customers. Support all company policies as presented in GetGo Handbook regarding safety and security procedures and all other company policies. Follow and complete daily food safety review checklist as required to maintain compliance with periodic Food Service Audit and Steritech inspections. Follow Par Level policies and procedures. Assist customers with using food-ordering kiosks. Meet time requirements for completing customers food orders. Keep work and dining areas clean, stocked and organized. Fill and maintain Grab-n-Go case. Check dates/times for freshness. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Education and Training Desired High school diploma or equivalent plus up to 18 months of additional training Licenses / Certifications Required Food Safety - Experience Required 1 to 3 years Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift 1st Shift 2nd Shift Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Business and Financial Acumen Strategic Thinking & Planning Work Environment Cold Prep Rooms Cooler Freezer Fryers/Grease Hot Ovens Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Pushing Grasping Repetitive Motion Unloading Climbing Data Entry Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Matching Operating Equipment Pulling Pushing Reading Reaching Sight or Peripheral Vision Sorting Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Weighing Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Floor Blower Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Shrink Wrap Machine Cap Machine Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Texlon Ordering Machine Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Chopper Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Knives Microwave Register",Convnenience Sub Shop Clerk (Part Time) Austintown GetGo Job in Austintown,Full Time Employee,"Austintown, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/convnenience-sub-shop-clerk-part-time-austintown-getgo-job-austintown-oh-us-173007252.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=4,,Administrative/Clerical,236e505c80e3e237d943f2d5fd63b39e
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:22:55:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary:  The Administrative/NPO Assistant provides support in all administrative tasks.  This includes but is not limited to: answering phones, filing, communicating with client and customers, and scheduling of staff.  The ideal candidate will possess the ability to communicate, willing to be hands on with staff and operations, and willing to work event-based hours that may include evenings and weekends   Essential Tasks and Responsibilities:   Recruit Non-Profit Groups to operate concession stands Vett new/existing NPO groups to ensure we are following Aramark SOP’s. Compile commission statement and accrual bonus structure at the completion of home stand. Manage the onboarding process of new/existing NPO Groups Develop a staffing matrix and work with the concessions team to ensure correct staffing levels. Oversee staff schedules,  Must fill in for absent employees at location as necessary. Maintain a safe and hazard-free working environment. Maintain communication with staff (including the central office staff, e-mail, phone calls, inter-office mail, etc). May perform cashier duties as required. Promote good public relations. Wiling to direct daily activities. Other duties as assigned. Maintains guest accounts. Communicates closely with all departments to ensure a seamless guest experience. Qualifications Minimum Education: High School Diploma or GED Minimum Experience: Minimum of two years experience in a similar position. Must have previous customer service experience. Food and beverage experience is required. Must be knowledgeable in operating an efficient cost effective program. Minimum Skills/Abilities: Must have the availability to work flexible hours.  Strong computer skills required i.e. Excel, Word, PowerPoint. Must have strong professional etiquette. Proficiency in multi-tasking. Strong organizational skills. Ability to perform basic arithmetic. Ability to perform under stress. Ability to resolve interpersonal situations.  Preferred Experience:  Experience in supervising concessions or clubs. Food service, hotel or hospitality experience in operations is strongly preferred.  Supervisory or leadership experience preferred.",NPO Assistant - Administrative Associate - Premium Catering Services and Athletic Dining - Universit Job in Lexington,"Full Time, Employee","Lexington, KY 40508",,http://jobview.monster.com/npo-assistant-administrative-associate-premium-catering-services-athletic-dining-universit-job-lexington-ky-us-172831550.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=9,,Administrative/Clerical,d0b96dd0d9a314179cc5031bbb65ff1c
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:23:50:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company Description:   Crown Equipment Corporation is a leading innovator in world-class forklift and material handling equipment and technology. As one of the world’s largest lift truck manufacturers, we are committed to providing the customer with the safest, most efficient and ergonomic lift truck possible to lower their total cost of ownership.   Job Responsibilities:   The Asset Administrator Co-Op will participate in a team overseeing diverse but related responsibilities that span multiple disciplines. Those disciplines include developing and maintaining configuration management tools and supporting configuration identification, control, reporting, release and delivery of products and systems. This position reports directly to the IT Asset Manager and will focus on the following tasks: Monitor internal IT asset purchase requests Process and assists with Purchase Order creation for all IT related purchases Manage receiving of all IT purchases as well as end-user receiving process Monitor approved purchase orders and inform customer of delivery time Ensure purchase orders are received accordingly Review and maintain IT bench stock inventory levels Communicate professionally and courteously with suppliers regarding order processing to resolve any issues and receive order acknowledgements Develop departmental communications; maintain and update asset files and databases Contribute to and support departmental initiatives Other projects as assigned by the IT Asset Manager   Job Qualifications: Candidates should be pursuing an MIS or Business Administration degree or equivalent Candidates must have strong organizational skills, attention to detail, and possess strong written and verbal communication skills.   EO/AA Employer Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled",IT Asset Administrator Spring  Co-Op () Job in New Bremen,"Full Time, Employee","New Bremen, OH",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/it-asset-administrator-spring-2017-co-op-18782-job-new-bremen-oh-us-172694828.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=3,,Administrative/Clerical,bf3f90bc686adf58ddc9b123a7c77dc8
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:23:51:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Wiss, Janney, Elstner Associates, Inc. (WJE) is a national engineering and architectural firm which employs extraordinary people at all organizational levels—highly skilled people with outstanding character and a strong desire to excel as members of the WJE team. WJE encourages people to be innovative, supports participation in professional activities, and provides a competitive compensation and benefits package.We have an opportunity for an administrative associate to join our administrative team supporting the staff in our Structures II group in Northbrook, Illinois. This group currently has a staff of eighteen billable professionals who are involved in all aspects of WJE’s work. RequirementsCollege degree (English, Communication, Marketing, Business, or similar a plus) or relevant work experienceUnflagging attention to detail throughout repetitive tasksCapacity to multi-task and prioritize under stress due to changing project deadlines and staff needsHigh capacity for learning, retaining, and independently executing processesComputer savvy in all Microsoft Office applications with emphasis on Excel, PowerPoint and WordFamiliarity with PDF editors (Bluebeam preferred) and digital photo programsOutstanding poise and professionalismExcellent communication, editing, and proofreading skillsProactive problem solver who takes action above and beyond normal responsibilitiesResponsive self-starter willing to interact as a team player and take independent initiativeAbility to maintain confidentiality of sensitive informationAbility to work well with diverse professionals at all seniority levelsResponsibilitiesProviding administrative support to our diverse group of structural engineers and technical staffPerforming office administrative duties as required including filing, emailing, scanning, processing incoming and outgoing mail and packages, and answering incoming phone callsProofing, editing, and formatting documentsAssisting with the preparation of and finalizing professional reports and presentationsProcessing basic accounting, marketing, and project reports using Deltek VisionDistributing monthly invoices to project managers and, as needed, working directly with Accounting Department on necessary changesOrganizing internal meetings, webinars, and conference callsCoordinating outside activities and eventsParticipating in special projects as neededPhysical Requirements:The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.This position requires visual acuity and listening abilityIndividuals must have finger dexterity to be able to operate office equipment such as computer, printer, fax, copier, telephone, voice mail system, and other office equipmentPosition requires the ability to remain for extended periods at a workstation, as well as the ability to lift 25 pounds WJE is a firm of professionals dedicated to providing practical, technically sound solutions to engineering, architecture, and materials problems in new and existing structures. WJE is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We invite all qualified applicants to apply including individuals with disabilities and protected veterans (VEVRAA federal contractor).Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with DisabilitiesThe contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information.",Administrative Associate Job in Northbrook,Full Time Employee,"Northbrook, IL 60062",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-associate-job-northbrook-il-us-172838862.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=15,,Administrative/Clerical,581e8e67a86922c7ec8decb1e4a21bd6
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:00:06:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Learns how to conduct inspections to identify infestations or conditions conducive to infestations of wood destroying organisms and/or insects, birds, or other vertebrate pests for the purpose of making proposals and presentations to obtain sales contracts. Responsibilities • Attends company training programs and accompany other associates or managers during ride-alongs in order to learn job skills such as: • Recording accurate measurements and writing correct descriptions of property and/or other areas inspected • Preparing appropriate specs and treating instructions in accordance with existing laws, regulations, and company policy • Calculating job treating costs from company pricing instructions • Executing contracts on behalf of the company, observing company policy pertaining to credit terms of sale • Maintaining equipment, vehicle, and personal safety equipment in clean, working order • Learning sales techniques and product knowledge in order to sell termite control protection and renewals and/or monthly pest control protection to owners or agents of homes, stores, or industry • Gaining experience in dealing courteously with customers, leaving customers' premises and furnishings clean and as found • Passes all state licensing and/or company requirements • Attends call sessions to learn how to effectively collect on delinquent accounts of personal sales contracts • Contacts customers after service is performed to ensure satisfaction and develop additional prospects • Develops termite and/or pest control sales leads for each respective office lead furnished Education and Experience Requirements • High school education or general education degree (GED) required • Six to twelve months related experience and/or training in sales and dealing with the public or equivalent combination of education and experience is strongly preferred • Valid driver’s license from current state of residence required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals • Ability to calculate rate, ratio, and percent, and to draw and interpret bar graphs Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability 100713",Sales Rep / Outside Sales / Territory Sales Job in Mount Laurel,"Full Time, Employee","Mount Laurel, NJ",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-outside-sales-territory-sales-job-mount-laurel-nj-us-171864984.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=16,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,a05aeda371001a0a20e11c7821c20e37
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:00:25:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"WHAT ARE THE RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE POSITION? The Bodily Injury Claim Representative will provide outstanding claim service to our Policyholders according to The Hartford's standards. The successful ABI Representative will provide prompt policy holder contact, timely investigation of coverage, liability issues, determination of damages, and disposition of claims. Essential Job Functions: Policy Interpretation-Coverage analysis. Investigation of ABI claims to determine liability exposures and subrogation. Accurate reserve analysis for loss, to include excess exposure recognition. Handling of Injury exposures with attorneys as well as unrepresented parties. Effective handling for first and third party claims according to The Hartford claim standards. Proficient in a claim software platform and Word, Excel, Outlook. Successful handling of Property Damages to included:  estimates, rental and total losses of vehicles. Subrogation recognition. Strong customer service and teamwork, answering claim calls in a prompt and professional manner, while backing up other team member calls. Taking ownership of all calls to resolution. Participation in phone Queue to drive Customer Satisfaction Desire to work as a member of a High Performing Team!  Other Skills/Abilities: Good organizational and time management skills and practices Strong attention to detail Strong computer skills Analytical Thinking Capability Strong written and verbal communication  The Hartford's Claims Centers are fast paced organizations that will offer you the opportunity to join a team of dedicated Claims Professionals.  We value exceptional customer service and superior claim handling, while providing our employees with the opportunity for growth and advancement.   WHAT ARE WE LOOKING FOR?   Qualified candidates will meet the following requirements:   Bachelor degree or equivalent claims experience preferred. Minimum of 2 year?s experience adjusting personal lines. Excellent telephone and interpersonal skills with a focus on the customer. Strong time management, organization and attention to detail. Strong computer skills and accurate keyboarding. Excellent oral and written communication. License(s) if required by state/jurisdiction. Ability to breakdown explanations of complex process and rules into manageable information. IIA, AIC, CPCU, SCLA preferred.   Behaviors at The Hartford  Deliver Outcomes ? Demonstrate a bias for speed and execution that serves our shareholders and customers. Operate as a Team Player ? Work together to drive solutions for the good of The Hartford. Build Strong Partnerships ? Demonstrate integrity and build trust with others. Strive for Excellence ? Motivate yourself and others to achieve high standards and continuously improveWHAT ELSE CAN YOU TELL ME?  The position is open to internal and external applicants. Applicant must be willing to work 8:00 AM - 5:00 PM EST and must reside in Eastern or Central Time Zone. The position may be located in one of the following Auto and Property Claims Office:  Indianapolis, IN or Aurora, IL.  Pre-Employment Assessment: Once you?ve applied, a pre-employment assessment will be sent to you via email, assuming you haven?t previously taken one in the past 6 months.  Be sure to check your e-mail regularly for any status updates.  To avoid emails from The Hartford being directed into spam, add Careers@TheHartford.com to your contacts.  Equal Opportunity Employer/Females/Minorities/Veterans/Disability/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity or Expression",Claim Representative ? Auto Bodily Injury Job in Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN 46201",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/claim-representative-auto-bodily-injury-job-indianapolis-in-us-170659922.aspx?mescoid=4300755001001&jobPosition=15,,Entry Level,4f93fe453edb102fd3aea7e490cb9da4
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:00:28:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking a Property Accountant at our corporate headquarters in Newton, MA. The Property Accountant will be responsible for 10 to 12 properties for a designated region.  This position will review, analyze and post journal entries to the general ledger, perform account reconciliations, monitor escrow balances, prepare lender reporting and assist with annual budgets and forecasts for their portfolio.  Accounting functions include reviewing and preparing monthly financial statements with variance analysis and reporting for a portfolio of multifamily properties.  Excellent interpersonal skills and a customer service attitude will be essential for success, and in order to communicate effectively with site managers. The qualified candidate will have a Bachelor’s degree, preferably in Accounting or Finance.  Minimum of 2-3 years accounting experience, in multi-site accounting, real estate preferred.  A thorough understanding of full-cycle accounting transactions. Northland Investment Corporation is a fully integrated property management company focused on the operation and long-term ownership of multifamily real estate. Northland is a fast-paced, highly principled, entrepreneurial company headquartered in Newton, MA with interests nationwide.  http://www.northland.com                                                               We are an Equal Opportunity Employer",Property Accountant - Real Estate Job in Newton,Full Time Employee,"Newton, MA 02462",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/property-accountant-real-estate-job-newton-ma-us-171611521.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=16,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,ae137f65b672f69dabb125565564badd
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:00:58:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Description:Senior Financial Utility Consultant Leidos fuses technological excellence with decades of operational and management consulting expertise, providing utilities with engineering and advisory services that deliver tangible and meaningful business results. Our expertise in each facet of utility operations is strengthened not only by the skill and experience of our staff, but also by the breadth of our collective capabilities. This perspective allows our experts to frame technological solutions within the business context and incorporate and leverage advanced technologies to meet utilities' challenges and unlock opportunity. Leidos is currently seeking a senior-level energy industry consultant to provide Utility Planning and Consulting services as part of our Energy Solutions Operation.  Location can be flexible depending on the individual candidates identified. Preferred geographic areas of location include: Denver, CO; Nashville, TN; Orlando, FL, and; Sacramento, CA.  Successful candidates will be part of a team that provides a variety of high-end consulting services to leading energy-related organizations (including utilities, energy development companies, government organizations, financial organizations, and equipment suppliers) across the full spectrum of their activities, from defining and deploying strategy to regulatory analysis and support to operational review and implementation. A successful candidate will have experience in the industry that can lead to development of business opportunities and will provide and lead a variety of detail oriented, high-value-added analysis and consulting services to a variety of utility organizations, particularly pertaining to the financial operation and management of those utilities. Representative services and activities that successful candidates may be engaged in include: ·         Financial analysis and modeling for utilities including rate studies, cost-of-service analyses, impact fee analyses, retail rate design, depreciation studies, utility appraisal and valuation studies, asset management evaluations, and a variety of economic analyses ·         Detailed spreadsheet modeling analysis of utility finances ·         Debt and equity financing support ·         RTO and FERC tariff analyses and support ·         Development and statistical and mathematical modeling of business cases and future-state scenarios ·         Organizational, financial and operational assessments of client operations ·         Assessment of industry leading practices as they relate to specific client needs ·         Assessment of regulatory and legislative issues relevant to the electric energy industry and development of consulting engagements to assist clients in managing risk and opportunity around those issues ·         Analysis, development, and delivery of expert testimony and/or regulatory support services ·         Sales of consulting services to current and potential clients utilizing deep industry understanding, knowledge of existing clients, and personal contacts and relationships in the industry ·         Direct interaction with clients at a high management level, including interpersonal interaction and presentation of information ·         Project management, including development of scope, schedule and budget Qualifications:Required Qualifications: ·         Baccalaureate in engineering, finance, economics or a related field at an accredited university, advanced degree preferred ·         12+ years of experience in financial analyses related to utility planning, operations, financing, valuation, and regulation ·         Ability to work both independently and in a team atmosphere ·         Ability to manage project teams in the prosecution of client assignments and drive results to develop high-value-added products of the highest level of quality under tight time constraints ·         Ability to manage multiple time-sensitive priorities without diminished effectiveness ·         Understanding of industry issues and trends and demonstrated ability to explain and assess how those issues impact industry participants ·         Outstanding analytical and technical writing skills ·         Ability to effectively communicate verbally and in writing to varied audiences ·         Ability to travel and work overtime hours as needed Demonstrated proficiency with spreadsheets, databases, word processing, and slide presentation softwareLeidos Overview:Leidos is a global science and technology solutions leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company�s 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported pro forma annual revenues of approximately $10 billion for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2016 after giving effect to the recently completed combination of Leidos with Lockheed Martin's Information Systems & Global Solutions business (IS&GS). For more information, visit www.Leidos.com The company�s diverse employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Qualified women, minorities, individuals with disabilities and protected veterans are encouraged to apply. Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Description:Senior Financial Utility Consultant Leidos fuses technological excellence with decades of operational and management consulting expertise, providing utilities with engineering and advisory services that deliver tangible and meaningful business results. Our expertise in each facet of utility operations is strengthened not only by the skill and experience of our staff, but also by the breadth of our collective capabilities. This perspective allows our experts to frame technological solutions within the business context and incorporate and leverage advanced technologies to meet utilities' challenges and unlock opportunity. Leidos is currently seeking a senior-level energy industry consultant to provide Utility Planning and Consulting services as part of our Energy Solutions Operation.  Location can be flexible depending on the individual candidates identified. Preferred geographic areas of location include: Denver, CO; Nashville, TN; Orlando, FL, and; Sacramento, CA.  Successful candidates will be part of a team that provides a variety of high-end consulting services to leading energy-related organizations (including utilities, energy development companies, government organizations, financial organizations, and equipment suppliers) across the full spectrum of their activities, from defining and deploying strategy to regulatory analysis and support to operational review and implementation. A successful candidate will have experience in the industry that can lead to development of business opportunities and will provide and lead a variety of detail oriented, high-value-added analysis and consulting services to a variety of utility organizations, particularly pertaining to the financial operation and management of those utilities. Representative services and activities that successful candidates may be engaged in include: ·         Financial analysis and modeling for utilities including rate studies, cost-of-service analyses, impact fee analyses, retail rate design, depreciation studies, utility appraisal and valuation studies, asset management evaluations, and a variety of economic analyses ·         Detailed spreadsheet modeling analysis of utility finances ·         Debt and equity financing support ·         RTO and FERC tariff analyses and support ·         Development and statistical and mathematical modeling of business cases and future-state scenarios ·         Organizational, financial and operational assessments of client operations ·         Assessment of industry leading practices as they relate to specific client needs ·         Assessment of regulatory and legislative issues relevant to the electric energy industry and development of consulting engagements to assist clients in managing risk and opportunity around those issues ·         Analysis, development, and delivery of expert testimony and/or regulatory support services ·         Sales of consulting services to current and potential clients utilizing deep industry understanding, knowledge of existing clients, and personal contacts and relationships in the industry ·         Direct interaction with clients at a high management level, including interpersonal interaction and presentation of information ·         Project management, including development of scope, schedule and budget Qualifications:Required Qualifications: ·         Baccalaureate in engineering, finance, economics or a related field at an accredited university, advanced degree preferred ·         12+ years of experience in financial analyses related to utility planning, operations, financing, valuation, and regulation ·         Ability to work both independently and in a team atmosphere ·         Ability to manage project teams in the prosecution of client assignments and drive results to develop high-value-added products of the highest level of quality under tight time constraints ·         Ability to manage multiple time-sensitive priorities without diminished effectiveness ·         Understanding of industry issues and trends and demonstrated ability to explain and assess how those issues impact industry participants ·         Outstanding analytical and technical writing skills ·         Ability to effectively communicate verbally and in writing to varied audiences ·         Ability to travel and work overtime hours as needed Demonstrated proficiency with spreadsheets, databases, word processing, and slide presentation softwareLeidos Overview:Leidos is a global science and technology solutions leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company�s 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported pro forma annual revenues of approximately $10 billion for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2016 after giving effect to the recently completed combination of Leidos with Lockheed Martin's Information Systems & Global Solutions business (IS&GS). For more information, visit www.Leidos.com The company�s diverse employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Qualified women, minorities, individuals with disabilities and protected veterans are encouraged to apply.",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-financial-utility-consultant-job-sacramento-ca-us-171860522.aspx?mescoid=1300117001001&jobPosition=7,,,162a6e0eb69e4b0173d697fc1983af99
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:00:59:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Multiple Data Processing Clerks needed ? Paying up to $30K/year We are currently seeking multiple Data Processing Clerks to work for a local Fortune 500 Financial Institution with a proven reputation and accelerated career growth! ?Opportunity for growth is abundant and cross training is available for those who show interest.?-Prepare, compile and sort documents for data entry -Check source documents for data entry, combine and rearrange data-Enter data from source documents into prescribed computer database-Maintain log books/records of tasks If you are looking to join a team of hardworking individuals and are quick with your hands, don?t miss out! Apply today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Data Entry Clerk - Job in Minneapolis,Full Time Employee,"Minneapolis, MN 55402",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/data-entry-clerk-job-minneapolis-mn-us-171922429.aspx?mescoid=4300751001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),574084fab2a30b45dd24ec5268560f2f
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:01:16:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our growing client in Fort Worth, TX is looking for a Financial Analyst on a long term contract basis with the possibility of being hired. Company Profile:Founded in 1955Company provides support to the US government, its partners and international organizationsCompany portfolio includes aviation, building and stabilization, infrastructure, logistics, information management solutions, security solutions, and enterprise-level technology products/softwareFeatures and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseFeatures and Benefits of Client:Medical/Dental/Vision – company pays 60%-70%Life Insurance401K with company match2 weeks PTO5 sick days7 paid holidays and 3 floating holidaysEasy going, relaxed team environmentPositive and busy work environmentFinancial Analyst Role:The Financial Analyst will be responsible for contract management, sales, EBIT, cash goals, financial analysis, billing, assistance in proposal development and pricing, cost control processes, government funds management, program financial reporting, and month-end closingConducts accounting operations, budgeting, cost statement preparation, project code management, contract preparation and negotiation, and preparation of bids and bid processesReview project costs and expenditures and report variances, executes cost tracking and reconciliations and prepares reports and analysis as neededWill be the primary reviewer of all billing detail to ensure invoices are accurate and completeCompletes supporting schedule for applicable CLINsHandles all billing and Project AnalysisMaintains and develops CDRLs in accordance with the contract for review and submissionHelps organize data for proposals, contract status reports, and budgetsAP/AR, General Ledgers, Compliance and Business LawFinancial Analyst Profile:Must have a Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting from an accredited universityMust have at least 3 years or more strong accounting experienceOne year business analyst and/or financial analyst experience preferredHigh degree of ingenuity, creativity, and innovationAbility to be self-initiated and motivated and work virtually self-supervisedStrong understanding of MS Office Suite – emphasis on Excel and PowerPointStrong attention to detail and ability to execute on multiple priorities in a fast-paced environmentUnderstanding and/or familiarity with Government CR, T&M, FFP, IDIQ contracts, FAR a plusDeltek, Docs4Deltek, Costpoint, Cognos, and knowledge in other ERP systems a plus Please visit us at www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/ft.-worth.html www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/accounting-finance.html   Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Financial Analyst Job in Fort Worth,"Full Time, Employee","Fort Worth, TX",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-analyst-job-fort-worth-tx-us-171788712.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=1,"45,000.00 - 60,000.00 /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,9dfbe8ec84f95f71fcaef042d4a31ada
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:01:17:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Senior Manager, Technical Accounting and SEC Reporting in Waltham, MA.Essential Functions: Provide guidance on SEC disclosure requirements Review financial statements and footnotes Complete GAAP and SEC reporting checklist Research accounting literature and apply standards to issues and transactions Ensure financial statements are consistent with GAAP and SEC rules Prepare accounting position papersREQUIREMENTS: CPA required 10+ years of accounting industry and private industry experience Experience with Tier 1 ERP System Pharmaceutical/life science industry experience preferred Good communication skills",Sr. Manager,Full Time Employee,"Waltham, MA 02451",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-manager-technical-accounting-sec-reporting-job-waltham-ma-us-171747128.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=12,"105,000.00 - 120,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),2bee43cd3dac4bb07f0869f877502f68
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:01:44:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Senior Accounting Manager in Providence, RI. Essential Functions: Provide technical accounting guidance Prepare technical accounting position papers Provide guidance and training on revenue recognition Monitor and review the actual recording of revenue Assist with analysis and migration for compliance with revenue recognition standards Perform control activities Support month end close process Assist in the coordination of audit and review activitiesREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Accounting 6-10 years of combined public and private industry accounting CPA certified Excellent communication skills",Senior Accounting Manager Job in Providence,Full Time Employee,"Providence, RI 02903",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accounting-manager-job-providence-ri-us-171915658.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=19,"90,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),93da69bc9ce8905dbbec93d1516951c6
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:01:46:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounts Receivable/Collections/Returns Analyst Job in Ramsey, NJ. Are you a detailed and well spoke Accounts Receivable professional?  We are searching for you!  Accounting Principals is working with several growing organizations to fill both permanent and temp to perm Accounts Receivable/Credit and Collections positions! If you are looking to join an organization with a close-knit team this position is a great fit! Your job responsibilities for the Accounts Receivable/Credit Analyst role would include:-Processing all returns and researching and resolving any inquiries regarding the returns-Research charge backs and determine action required-Monthly review of the aging report of past due invoices-Some collections and processing payments on credit requests Your qualifications for the Accounts Receivable/Credit Analyst job should include:-3+ years' related experience-Strong organizational and multi-tasking abilities-Must be able to work independently and as part of a team-Strong Microsoft Excel skills needed and SAP or Great Plains a plus! If you are interested in this Accounts Receivable Specialist job opportunity, please submit your resume to www.accountingprincipals.com  ",Accounts Receivable/Collections/Returns Analyst Job in Ramsey,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Ramsey, NJ 07446",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-receivable-collections-returns-analyst-job-ramsey-nj-us-171920446.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=18,18.00 - 21.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,b123e6a8d64dd504462aab229c7b072c
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:01:47:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Senior Staff Accountant Our client is a very well known global business advisory firm located in the Tyson's Corner, VA area. They are looking for (4) full-time Senior Staff Accountants to join the team that have 5+ years of experience. ABOUT THE OPPORTUNITY: This role will be a part of a team of accounting professionals who will perform Service Level Agreement (SLA) backed core accounting operations in support of multiple business areas. The person we are looking for should have experience with month end close process, preparation and review of account reconciliations and management reporting processes and systems. PRIMARY DUTIES:Participate in month end close process, including preparation and posting of journal entriesResponsible for assigned accounts, including analyzing and preparing account reconciliations, including managing the prepaid accounts, accruals, variable compensation accruals, reserve analyses, and intercompany balances.Analyze overhead expenses to ensure proper coding and classification.Assist with the Capital Budget and spend tracking including the maintenance renewals.Assist with proper coding of invoices and expenses.Assist with maintenance of chart of accounts.Assist with monthly analysis of department budgets/forecast and specific accounts as assigned.Assist with variance analysis for actual results compared with prior periods.Assist in preparation of annual budgets and forecasts for assigned departments.Interface with internal and external auditors and segment leaders.BASIC QUALIFICATIONS: Bachelor's degree in Accounting or related field preferredMinimum 4-5 years Accounting experience and one year of financial analysisCPA candidate or certificate preferred",Senior Staff Accountant Job in Mclean,"Full Time, Employee","Mclean, VA 22102",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-staff-accountant-job-mclean-va-us-171793238.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=8,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,40d148ab13f463896a5b579ecb3aac78
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:02:57:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:              Senior Claims/QC Auditor  Department:         Claims Reports to:           Claims Supervisor, Office Manager or Assistant Office Manager Classification:      ExemptPurpose:         Assist in supervising and coordinating the work activities of the claims department and to handle special projects as well as complex and difficult claims. Job Duties and Responsibilities: Handles claims and quality control functions that are complex or difficult. Reviews claims to ensure that all supporting documentation is included. Enters loss information on computer system. Is a resource person for claims and quality control questions and problems for the claims department. Updates department supervisor and department staff members on procedure and system changes as directed. Reviews new software and upgrades, which pertain to the claims processing and quality control functions and tests for accuracy. Trains employees about claim processing and quality control procedures. Monitors work performance of staff to ensure that company claims auditing and processing procedures are followed. Assists Department Supervisor to analyze and resolve work problems and assists staff in solving work problems. Assists Department Supervisor to organize the workflow through the department. Informs supervisor and management personnel of status and concerns of department staff members. Monitors processing deadlines and work output of the department to ensure that processing deadlines are met. Generates quality control documents and reports.  Enters completed quality control reviews on computer system. Assist in the management of and provide direction in handling internal claims via the EC claim process and notice of damage type claims. Assists Claims Manager or Claims Supervisor in the preparation and presentation of training materials as assigned. Maintains records of Adjuster training hours as needed. Answers questions from agents, adjusters, insured’s, and field staff about claims/quality control status and procedures. Assists with other duties as necessary.Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities Ability to apply detailed information about the Company’s products, services, processes and systems, including claims processing procedures. In depth knowledge of internal claim processing and quality control procedures applicable to crop insurance products offered by the Company. Ability to positively direct the work of others, including the ability to make and communicate work assignments, resolves issues affecting assigned staff members when necessary. Ability to train employees regarding procedures and job responsibilities when necessary. Ability to organize and prioritize multiple tasks. Ability to work in a team oriented environment. Ability to effectively communicate and maintain business relationships with company personnel, outside resources and customers. Ability to comprehend agents’ questions and concerns with regard to claims and to provide correct, courteous answers. Ability to use the Company’s terminology, procedures, and systems. Ability to use department equipment. Ability to perform basic and complex mathematical calculations. Ability to remain calm and professional during peak periods of activity. Ability to work from oral and written communication. Ability to maintain confidentiality. Ability to assist in other work-related areas as required. Physical and Mental DemandsThe physical and mental demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Work EnvironmentThe work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Job QualificationsHigh School or GED required, baccalaureate preferred and at least three to five years of a combination of MP Underwriting and Claims or only Claims experience.  Previous supervisory experience preferred.  Note: This is not necessarily an exhaustive list of the job duties and requirements associated with this job, but is intended to represent an accurate reflection of the current job.",Senior Claims/QC Auditor Job in Omaha,,"Omaha, NE 68101",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-claims-qc-auditor-job-omaha-ne-us-170470858.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3b8ed733cae1251a3a4afd525daee806
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:02:58:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in the Brookline, MA area that is seeking an AR/Payroll candidate on a temporary to permanent basis.Responsibilities Include: Preparing invoices Entering cash receipts Report cash balance Process payroll for 500 employeesREQUIREMENTS: Experience utilizing Great Plains a plus Any relevant education and/or training will be considered a plusKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Accounts Receivable / Payroll Job in Brookline,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Brookline, MA 02446",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-receivable-payroll-job-brookline-ma-us-171917305.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f7e341f4abd6849f4ab6df61f4d05110
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:03:09:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are seeking an Accounting Manager to oversee accounting programs and special projects for our corporate location. This role will have the opportunity to provide meaningful insight and recommendations on integration strategies. This is a high-visibility role within our organization providing the opportunity to accelerate career growth within the largest privately-held rigid plastics manufacturer in North America.- Manage program to review customer contracts, pricing, and costs to identify areas of margin leakage as well as cost recovery for errors- Manage consolidation of global monthly budgets- Review SG&A budgets- Perform due diligence on potential acquisitions- Provide meaningful insight and recommendations on integration strategies- Assist in developing, documenting and implementing efficient, controlled and sustainable financial reporting processes- Maintain and track integration plans- Assist with other departmental needs which may include the monthly close process- Prepare both standard and more complex, non-standard journal entries- Prepare balance sheet account reconciliations and general ledger account analysis- Bachelors Degree in Accounting- 5+ years work of audit and accounting experience- Public accounting experience preferred- CPA preferred- Strong Project Management skills- Strong understanding of GAAP guidelines and ability to research accounting treatments- Understanding of IFRS and US GAAP- Excellent communication, interpersonal, and organizational skills- Ability to construct meaningful and orderly work papers in a timely manner- Flexible and productive working in a multi-tasking environment- Excel and MS Office proficient- General Ledger balance sheet reconciliation preparation and analysis- Audit / Regulatory experiencehttps://loopapply.com/apply/62/E65EFCC330356BF18E2B005056984D64 ""> $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Accounting Manager - Special Projects Job in Plymouth,Full Time,"Plymouth, MI 48170",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-manager-special-projects-job-plymouth-mi-us-171112819.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=17,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,2b10be15817c53169d34956bcc182ba6
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:03:48:02,No,jobs.monster.com,Our Mortgage client in Bala Cynwyd is seeking an experienced Loan Closing Specialist. They will be responsible for verifying data in Encompass and generating closing documents for settlement of home purchases. They will be working off daily queues and close 5-6 loans per day. The perfect candidate at least 1 recent year in a Loan Closing role and have high attention to detail! 5 years experience with mortgage closing General knowledge of retail and wholesale loans Good communication,Mortgage Loan Closer Job in Bala Cynwyd,Full Time,Location:,Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/mortgage-loan-closer-job-bala-cynwyd-pa-us-171830823.aspx?mescoid=4300722001001&jobPosition=14,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,f0ddaca62d6b3811921903797106b433
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:03:48:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:A great start up organization located in Santa Barbara is looking for an Accounts Payable Coordinator to join their team. In this role, the A/P Clerk will provide financial and clerical support to the team by ensuring payments are completed and expenses are controlled by receiving payments, processing, verifying and reconciling invoices. Some additional responsibilities include: -Data Entry all vendor invoices on a timely basis-Obtain management approvals for all vendor payments-Cut weekly A/P checks-Manage Concur transactions and processes-Calculate and pay monthly Sales Broker Commissions-Maintain strict confidentiality of all vendor related matters, correspondence and documentation.-Maintain accuracy and up-to-date current vendor information-Maintain and organize accurate vendor A/P records-Maintain accurate data and process year end 1099 forms and reportingRequirements:-2+ years of Accounts Payable experience (in a high volume setting) -Associates degree or equivalent from a two year college or technical school or equivalent experience -Knowledge of general accounting principles -Must possess strong organizational and time management skills -Ability to multitask in a diverse fast paced environment If this position seems like a role that you are interested and qualified for, please respond by sending your most updated version of your resume displaying your work experience. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1069960 Job Experience:,,Years of Experience Required:",Accounts Payable Coordinator - Great Opportunity! Job in Santa Barbara,Full Time Employee,"Santa Barbara, CA 93108",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-coordinator-great-opportunity!-job-santa-barbara-ca-us-171826354.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),09c51c9582b50c3eaabac130421e211b
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:04:30:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"HealthNow New York Inc. is one of New York’s leading health care companies that provide access to quality health care and innovative solutions for individuals and employers. HealthNow offers a full range of insured, self-insured, and government programs and services, as well as life and disability coverage, dental and vision plans and stop-loss coverage. Headquartered in Buffalo, NY, the company operates BlueCross BlueShield of Western New York (Buffalo), BlueShield of Northeastern New York (Albany), Health Now Brokerage Concepts (Blue Bell, PA) and Health Now Administrative Services (across the Northeast US and California). In 2013 the company had revenues of $2.46B and reserves of $592 million. This position provides professional assistance to all attorneys and management within the Legal Department. Paraprofessional duties are performed under the general supervision of legal counsel to support internal and external customers of HealthNow. Duties include the preparation of discovery responses and other litigation documents including drafting/redlining contracts/agreements for attorney review. It also includes performing factual and legal investigation of Insurance Law, State Regulatory Statutes, and local/state/federal laws.- Preparation and drafting of redlines relative to client submitted contracts/agreements for legal counsel review (45%)- Analysis, review, and compilation of document production required during litigation discovery process; summarizing deposition transcripts. Collect, organize, track, and maintain form files and checklists on litigated matters (25%)- Perform appropriate legal research and submit summary findings outlining appropriate case law relative to State/Federal/Regulatory requirements as needed for attorney review (i.e. Lexis/Nexis) (10%)- Update, track, and monitor multiple Legal Department databases (Time Matters, PowerDocs, Contract Database) to ensure accurate record keeping, execution, and follow-up/closure of all matters (10%)- Review and analyze all court documents received to determine appropriate action or responses required under supervision of attorney (10%)Ability to read and comprehend various legal documents, correspondence, law material, and reports. Computer literacy required; experience with MS Word, MS Excel and E-Mail. Microsoft Project and Access a plus. Ability to perform legal research using reference materials generally available within a law library and/or electronic resource tools such as Lexis/Nexis and the Internet. Able to concentrate on detailed and complicated legal matters on a frequent basis with occasional interruptions. Attention to detail is constant in this position. Able to proofread typed material for contextual, grammatical, typographical or spelling errors. Able to cope with and work in a fast-paced highly demanding work environment. Able to analyze and interpret moderate to complex information and/or data on a frequent basis. Knowledge of litigation concepts and procedures. Must possess excellent organizational, multi-tasking, and time management skills. Excellent verbal and written communication skills. High degree of business maturity and demonstrated confidentiality.- 3-6 years experience in contract and transactional work required- 2+ years of corporate experience including but not limited to: knowledge of corporate governance, entity types, corporations, and various corporate transactions, assisting with due diligence matters in mergers, acquisitions and dissolutions, preparing and filing incorporation and formation documents and statutory filings, including amendments strongly preferredA certificate of completion or a degree from an approved paralegal program or post-secondary institution.All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Paralegal Job in Buffalo,,"Buffalo, NY",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/paralegal-job-buffalo-ny-us-171916208.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6ff13f51c4e3a9e548398c1b28abc880
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:04:33:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you an Auditor with experience with Operational Audits looking for better work-life balance? Then continue your career as an Auditor with a great company in Boca Raton, Florida. In this position you will be working in a large, dynamic company focusing on internal operational audits, testing corporate processes and procedures. As our ideal candidate, you will have a Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting or Finance and will have a minimum of 1-2 years of experience in operational audits. What you need to succeed:• Bachelor’s degree in Accounting or Finance • A minimum of 1-2 years of operational audit experience• Public Accounting experience preferred• Strong GAAP experience • Strong Excel skills/communication skills If you have a passion to continuously learn and grow your finance skills, we would love for you to apply to be part of our  client’s team in Boca Raton, Florida or perhaps other available opportunities with Parker & Lynch. Please click “apply now” below and/or email your resume in .doc format to garret.lemon@parkerlynch.com and visit our website at www.parkerlynch.com.  ;",Auditor (operations) Job in Boca Raton,Full Time Employee,"Boca Raton, FL 33486",,http://jobview.monster.com/auditor-operations-job-boca-raton-fl-us-171462158.aspx?mescoid=1300102001001&jobPosition=15,"50,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,72cf452cb2426bd361460e8dd0e0f768
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:04:41:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Learns how to conduct inspections to identify infestations or conditions conducive to infestations of wood destroying organisms and/or insects, birds, or other vertebrate pests for the purpose of making proposals and presentations to obtain sales contracts. Responsibilities • Attends company training programs and accompany other associates or managers during ride-alongs in order to learn job skills such as: • Recording accurate measurements and writing correct descriptions of property and/or other areas inspected • Preparing appropriate specs and treating instructions in accordance with existing laws, regulations, and company policy • Calculating job treating costs from company pricing instructions • Executing contracts on behalf of the company, observing company policy pertaining to credit terms of sale • Maintaining equipment, vehicle, and personal safety equipment in clean, working order • Learning sales techniques and product knowledge in order to sell termite control protection and renewals and/or monthly pest control protection to owners or agents of homes, stores, or industry • Gaining experience in dealing courteously with customers, leaving customers' premises and furnishings clean and as found • Passes all state licensing and/or company requirements • Attends call sessions to learn how to effectively collect on delinquent accounts of personal sales contracts • Contacts customers after service is performed to ensure satisfaction and develop additional prospects • Develops termite and/or pest control sales leads for each respective office lead furnished Education and Experience Requirements • High school education or general education degree (GED) required • Six to twelve months related experience and/or training in sales and dealing with the public or equivalent combination of education and experience is strongly preferred • Valid driver’s license from current state of residence required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals • Ability to calculate rate, ratio, and percent, and to draw and interpret bar graphs Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability 100713",Sales Rep / Outside Sales / Territory Sales Job in Aurora,"Full Time, Employee","Aurora, IL",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-outside-sales-territory-sales-job-aurora-il-us-171864992.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,88fa39f19de95c103a0bdc93dc7b1692
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:04:43:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Administrative Assistant. This position is for someone who is skilled working in a fast paced environment with strong organizational and communication skills, and requires a high level of attention to detail, a wide range of skills and professionalism.This job will have the following responsibilities:Minimum of 5 years’ of general administrative support experience Experience working for a construction firm or in a construction related industry strongly preferred An Associates’ Degree or Bachelor’s Degree in Business Administration is a plus Strong Microsoft Office skills including advanced knowledge of Excel, Word, Outlook, Publisher and PowerPoint Must demonstrate a confident, proactive, positive approach when interacting with all team members and clients Ability to work with urgent deadlines, flexible priorities and manage multiple high-priority assignments Excellent written and oral communication skills, able to communicate effectively at all levels of the organization Results driven, energetic, resourceful and hands-on individual with a strong service orientationPlease send qualified resumes to jblackwell@judge.com",Administrative Assistant Job in Moorestown,"Full Time, Employee","Moorestown, NJ",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-moorestown-nj-us-171867843.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=15,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,07df524e5113b124c2b03f861e9ea130
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:04:55:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We have partnered with one of the largest local public accounting firms in Nashville to identify an Accounts Payable Coordinator to IMMEDIATELY join their accounting department. The ideal Accounts Payable Coordinator will be able to work both independently and within a team, have the ability to learn new tasks, have strong organizational skills, and be deadline driven.Primary Responsibilities:Perform Accounts Payable processingCode invoices with appropriate GL account; Enter invoices and route for approvalResolve vendor discrepanciesPrepare check runsProcess expense reportsReconcile various general ledger accounts such as cash, A/R, accounts payable, etc.Maintain vendor relationships, including W-9 Forms and contractsQualifications:Excellent verbal and written communication skillsEffective use of time managementAble to handle multiple projects/tasks concurrentlyRequirements:3-5 years of experience in Accounts Payable and accounting related workProficient in Microsoft Dynamics GP (Great Plains)Proficient in QuickBooks and Microsoft ExcelContractor Benefits Available for Purchase:MedicalDental401(k)Long Term DisabilityWhy choose Addison Group Finance & Accounting?Pay : We negotiate high salaries using US Bureau of Labor StatisticsBenefits & Bonuses : You are eligible for medical, dental, vision insurance benefits, 401K, and monetary bonusesPermanent Employment : Many of Addison’s Finance & Accounting job openings lead to potential permanent employmentConnections : You connect directly with hiring managers from renowned organizationsOptions : You are presented multiple employment options near your homeProfessional Development : You are provided hiring process advice, resume revision, and employment term negotiation Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Address 9005 Overlook BlvdBrentwood, TN 37027",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/ap-specialist-job-nashville-tn-us-171901746.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=14,,,ddc19af6ebc28d16f079a10b1e7c2267
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:04:56:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Liability Claims Team LeadCLAIM YOUR FUTURE AS A GREAT PERFORMER!Providing both satisfying and challenging work along with a highly professional and friendly work atmosphere, Sedgwick has a strong commitment to its colleagues and its clients. If you are seeking a place where you can do great things for those whose lives you touch while maximizing your own career possibilities, Sedgwick is the place for you. As the largest and most innovative Third Party Administrator in the claims industry and the first and only TPA to receive both recognition as the Best TPA in America and the coveted Employer of Choice designation, we invite you to come be a part of our team and, ""Claim Your Future.""PRIMARY PURPOSE: To supervise the operation of multiple teams of examiners and technical staff for single or multiple product lines which administer general liability for clients; to monitor colleagues' workloads, provide training, and monitor individual claim activities; to provide technical/jurisdictional direction to examiner reports on claims adjudication; and to maintain a diary on claims in the teams including frequent diaries on complex or high exposure claims.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIESSupervises multiple teams of examiners, multiple product line examiners and/or several (minimum seven) technical operations colleagues for a wide span of control; may delegate some duties to others within the unit.Identifies and advises management of trends, problems, and issues as well as recommended course of action; informs management of new procedures and ideas for continuous process improvement; and coordinates with management projects for the office.Provides technical/jurisdictional direction to examiner reports on claims adjudication.Compiles, reviews and analyzes management reports and takes appropriate action.Performs quality review on claims in compliance with audit requirements, service contract requirements, and quality standards.Acts as second level of appeal for client and claimant issues regarding claim specific, procedural or special requests; implements final disposition of the appeal.Reviews reserve amounts on high cost claims and claims over the authority of the individual examiner.Monitors third party claims; maintains periodical review of litigated claims, serious vocational rehabilitation claims, questionable claims and sensitive claims as determined by client.Maintains contact with the client on claims and promotes a professional client relationship; makes recommendations to client as suggested by the claim status; and provides written resumes of specific claims as requested by client.Assures that direct reports are properly licensed in the jurisdictions serviced.Ensures claims files are coded correctly and adequate documentation is made by claims examiners.ADDITIONAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIESPerforms other duties as assigned.Supports the organization's quality program(s).SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIESAdministers company personnel policies in all areas and follows company staffing standards and training recommendations.Interviews, hires and establishes colleague performance development plans; conducts colleague performance discussions.Provides support, guidance, leadership and motivation to promote maximum performance.QUALIFICATIONSEducation & LicensingBachelor's degree from an accredited college or university preferred. Licenses as required. Professional certifications as applicable to line of business preferred.ExperienceSix (6) years of claims experience or equivalent combination of education and experience to include two (2) years claims supervisor experience.Skills & KnowledgeThorough knowledge of claims management processes and procedures for multiple product linesExcellent oral and written communication, including presentation skillsPC literate, including Microsoft Office productsLeadership/management/motivational skillsAnalytical and interpretive skillsStrong organizational skillsExcellent interpersonal skillsExcellent negotiation skillsAbility to work in a team environmentAbility to meet or exceed Performance CompetenciesWORK ENVIRONMENTWhen applicable and appropriate, consideration will be given to reasonable accommodations.Mental: Clear and conceptual thinking ability; excellent judgment, troubleshooting, problem solving, analysis, and discretion; ability to handle work-related stress; ability to handle multiple priorities simultaneously; and ability to meet deadlinesPhysical: Computer keyboarding, travel as requiredAuditory/Visual: Hearing, vision and talkingNOTE: Credit security clearance, confirmed via a background credit check, is required for this position.The statements contained in this document are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by a colleague assigned to this description. They are not intended to constitute a comprehensive list of functions, duties, or local variances. Management retains the discretion to add or to change the duties of the position at any time.Sedgwick is an Equal Opportunity Employerand aDrug-Free Workplace",Claims Team Lead - Liability Job in Charlotte,,"Charlotte, NC",,http://jobview.monster.com/claims-team-lead-liability-job-charlotte-nc-us-171142920.aspx?mescoid=4300755001001&jobPosition=4,,,ae3a0b129b23ec6b4461f68c513a7495
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:05:10:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-Time Tax Agent The City of Huber Heights is seeking qualified applicants for the position of part-time Tax Agent. Under immediate direction of the Tax Administrator, this position performs a broad range of clerical duties, city tax return preparation, data entry and scanning documents into filing system. Responsibilities include communicating with taxpayers, tax preparers and accountants; answering telephone calls and responding to inquiries; opening and sorting mail; preparing bank deposits; and receiving and reviewing city income tax returns. This position requires a High School Diploma or GED, and three years of accounting and computer experience, or equivalent combination of education and experience. Prior experience within a municipal tax office preferred. Must be bondable and possess and maintain a valid Ohio Driver License. Successful candidate will submit to an extensive pre-employment background investigation, drug screening, and physical. Pay range is $14.09 to $21.01 per hour, depending on qualifications. Qualified individuals interested in this position should submit an application, cover letter and resume to the City of Huber Heights, Human Resources Department, 6131 Taylorsville Road, Huber Heights, OH 45424, by 5:00 p.m. September 19, 2016. The City of Huber Heights is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Tax Agent Job in Huber Heights,Part Time,"Huber Heights, OH 45424",All,http://jobview.monster.com/tax-agent-job-huber-heights-oh-us-171830252.aspx?mescoid=1300116001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7e95fd786b92f6defa5d0c9f8db402a4
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:05:48:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you an experienced Accountant looking for a change?  A large not-for-profit employer in Columbus, OH is hiring a direct hire Accountant to handle a number of diverse tasks, including those within Financial & Operations Management.  You would be analyzing financial accounting transactions & improving accounting and operations processes, while adhering to company standards and values.  This position will allow you to gain the knowledge and experience you need to further your career!   Accountant Job Details:  Prepare & record Financial Accounting transactions in order to provide and prepare monthly Financial statements & reportsAssist in development, preparation, and recording of annual budgetSupport Accounting department in design, implementation & conversion of processes & proceduresProvide comprehensive support to & with supervisor in communication, training & monitoring departmental staff Perform additional Accounting tasks as assigned  Experience & Other Requirements for the Accountant job include:  Bachelor’s degree in Accounting or related fieldAt least 5 years of Accounting or Finance experienceAdvanced Excel skillsIncluding formulas, pivot tables, & v-lookupsAbility to work individually but also add value and support to a teamDependable & able to meet deadlinesAbility to analyze and make improvements for efficiency  If you are an experienced Accountant with strong analytical and Excel skills in the Columbus, Ohio area and are looking to add value to one of Ohio’s largest non-for-profit organizations, apply below or visit our website to apply online at www.AccountingPrincipals.com ! ",Accountant Job in Columbus OH Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH 43085",,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-job-in-columbus-oh-job-columbus-oh-us-171786587.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=1,"39,000.00 - 46,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,fd93aa3d1676a4da3ea008b510236d47
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:05:49:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Accountant www.myrecruiting.biz, the premier source for specialized finance & accounting recruitment in Texas, Louisiana and the Gulf South, is currently seeking an Accountant professional for a direct hire opportunity for  an international energy company located Houston. Our client company has a long term growth plans for this well positioned energy division and is seeking only the most talented and driven professional to join their team. POSITIONSUMMARY Thispositionisresponsibleforpreparingandanalyzingourfinancialreportsincluding balancesheets,profitandlossstatementsandtaxreturnsandreportssuchoutputs to theChiefFinancialOfficer(CFO).Sinceour client investsinaJV,inordertomakefinancial reports,thispositionwillhavetointerfacewiththeJVandbeabletotakeintheequity earningsandalsoanalyzeandunderstandfuturebudgettrendsof theJV. Incollaborationwithinternalandparentcompanystaff,thispositionwillalsomake forecastsof thecompanycashpositionandborrownecessarycashfrom In-House Bankingand/orrequestforcapitalinjectionfromparentcompany.  POSITIONRESPONSIBILITIES ·         Utilizesaccountingsystem(QuickBooksEnterprise)andpreparesmonthly financialstatementformanagementpurpose.·         Communicateswithinternaltaxdepartmentandexternaltaxadvisertoprepare fortaxfilingandtaxcalculation.·         Worksonbank reconciliationperiodicallytoseeifincomingandoutgoingcash matcheswithcompany’sbook.·         Forecastscashpositionandarrangetoborrownecessarycashfrom In-house Bankingand/orrequestparentcompanyforcapitalinjection,collaboratingwith internalandparentcompanystaff.·         Instructsandfollowsupwithstaff topreparepaymentinstructionsthroughinternet bankingbasedoninvoicesreceivedsuchasconsultingfees,subscriptions,travel expensesandgeneralbillsandfollowsnecessaryinternalproceduresfor paymentssuchasrequestapprovalsfrommanagement.Tracksstatusofall pendingvouchersandfollows-uponoverduepayments.·         Instructsstaff topreparebookingentriesfordailytransactionsandrequests managementforapprovalforpostingtotheaccountingsystem.·         Communicateswithconcernedpersonnelwithinthecompany,parentcompany, externalauditor/taxadvisor/accountingadvisor,projectpartner/vendorto completetasks.  DESIRABLEKNOWLEDGE,SKILLS,TRAININGANDEXPERIENCE ·         Accountingknowledge withatleast5yearsworkingexperience (USGAAPandIFRS).·         Abilitytomakebookingentries(currently,mainlyexpensesandnosales)ontheirown.·         AbilitytouseQuickBooksEnterprise.·         BasicknowledgeofUSTax(taxcalculationandfilingdatawillbepreparedbyexternaltax advisorbutnecessarytocommunicatewithsuchadvisors).·         Auditingknowledge(preferable).·         Basicbusiness skills& knowledge (understanding normal business flowand abilityto understand business documentssuch as contracts,invoicesand official letters)·         Musthavegoodcommunication,arithmetic,organizationalandwritingskills.·         Shouldpossesstheabilitytoadapttoacross-culturalenvironment.  If you are in search of a challenging position like this Accountant or know someone who would be interested in this direct hire opportunity please contact Monica Ray at (832) 242-9409         Or e-mail your resume to monica.ray@myrecruiting.biz for confidential consideration. Go online for more details on the Accountant or visit our website http://www.myrecruiting.biz for more job offerings. http://public.bullhornstaffing.com/JobBoard/Standard/BHContent_JobDetail.cfm?jobPostingID=1305&privateLabelID=1330  Join us on our Social Media groups for up to date job openings, discussions and more! Join us on MYRecruiting-LinkedIn Like us on MYRecruiting-Facebook Follow us @MYRecruiting Join our circle +MYRecruitingMcIntyre Youngblood Recruiting, LLC, www.myrecruiting.biz is an equal opportunity employer specializing in direct hire employment and temporary staffing of accounting, finance, legal, administrative and information technology (IT) professionals in Houston, Dallas and New Orleans. With 30 plus years of experience we are able to provide experienced candidates at all levels including management consulting. MYRecruiting is a certified Woman Owned Business Enterprise (WBE) and HUB qualified. McIntyre Youngblood Recruiting, LLC was named to Louisiana’s Top Business List for 2008 and 2011 by www.DiversityBusiness.com as a top emerging business. ·MYRecruiting is pleased to share our most recent honor of being named to the “Fastest Growing Woman Owned Business” for 2012 in both the Houston Business Journal (ranked #9) and The CityBusiness in New Orleans, LA.·MYRecruiting ranked#23 of the Houston Business Journal’s (HBJ) Fastest Private Companies in 2013·MYRecruiting is pleased to share for the second year in a row MYRecruiting was named to the “Fastest Growing Woman Owned Business” for 2013 by the Houston Business Journal (HBJ).-MYRecruiting is honored to be recognized as of one of the 101 “Houston’s Best and Brightest Companies to Work For” in 2014 and 2015.Please visit our web-site for career resource articles MYRecruiting-CandidatesResources  Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee",Phone 832-242-9409,,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-job-houston-tx-us-170262242.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=9,,,bb08d9731c9a5932ac3fe0d8c2fecb0d
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:06:56:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Financial Services firm based in San Francisco is seeking a Sr. Analyst of Financial Reporting.  The preferred candidate will be an integrated member of the team responsible for accurately compiling and analyzing financial information that will be distributed to internal and external users. The individual will also support the company’s SOX compliance efforts by performing several tasks in that area and helping to evaluate and implement process improvements. Primary responsibilities include: • The preferred candidate will be responsible for assisting in the preparation of earnings release including but not limited to the 10-Q, 10-K and internal management reports. • Assist with financial year-end audits and quarterly reviews, internal control audit, tax audit, including the preparation of the PBC list.• Assist and provide support and analysis of information utilized for MD&A disclosures for accuracy and completeness.• Perform financial accounting analyses as necessary.• Research technical guidance and communicate conclusions to various functional groups as needed• Maintain strong internal controls over financial reporting and ensure clean audit trails and adequate documentation for all financial reports.• Perform duties & responsibilities specific to department functions & activities. Requirements:  • BA/BS in Accounting or Finance.• 3-4 years of experience with SEC reporting/financial reporting experience.• Understanding of GAAP and SEC reporting requirements.• Excellent analytical and organizational skill• Effective interpersonal skills.  If you are interested in learning more about this position, please contact Eugene Young at eugene.young@parkerlynch.com with resume for more details.  ",Sr. Financial Reporting Analyst Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94104",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-financial-reporting-analyst-job-san-francisco-ca-us-171861843.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=10,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,99f9353eded3fa872de866edc30f737b
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:06:57:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"SummaryProcesses invoices and prepares audits. Essential Duties and ResponsibilitiesPrepares and audits invoices and corrects invoices as needed.Prepares additional documentation as required by customer.Mail invoices.Train new invoice specialists as needed.Scan tracks as needed.Track Service Authorization forms.Identifies and implements continual improvement initiatives to enhance the performance of the position, your team and the company.Other duties may be assigned. Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education and/or ExperienceThis position requires an associates degree or equivalent from two-year college or technical school; or three to six months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.",Accounts Receivable Clerk Job in Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN 46241",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-receivable-clerk-job-indianapolis-in-us-171905302.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=5,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,6adfb02f494671d7fb6e96609f97b55f
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:07:19:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"AUTOMOTIVE CONTROLLERAggressive Pay Plan + Great Benefits!7 years' Automotive Experience Required Accounting Degree Preferred Apply Online & Attach Your Resume Today! A multi-line dealership group with over 10 locations, and growing, in the Southeast Region is seeking the right candidate for an Automotive Controller. The ideal candidate will be enthusiastic with strong dealership knowledge and a proven ability to lead. As an Automotive Controller you will help lead a team responsible for financial reporting, analysis, implementation of internal controls, and support of department members.If you are an enthusiastic, hands-on controller, with at least 7 years', or have accounting experience with a proven track record, please apply to join our team. Make sure to attach your resume to be considered immediately! Controller - Requirements: Must have a minimum of seven years of relevant experience as an auto dealership controller/accountant at the management levelAccounting Degree preferredProficiency in ADP Dealer Management System a plusMust have strong communication skills, written and oral Job Benefits: Aggressive Pay Plan Advancement OpportunitiesHealth, Dental, and Vision Insurance401k Retirement PlanPaid VacationShort Term Disability We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. All applicants must be able to demonstrate the ability to pass pre-employment testing to include background checks, MVR, and drug screen. Automotive Dealership controller; Dealership accountant; controller; auto controller; comptroller; Savannah, GA; South East Region; GA automotive jobs",CONTROLLER,Full Time,"Jacksonville, FL 32099",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/controller-auto-dealer-exp-required-aggressive-pay-plan!-great-benefits-multi-franchise-dealer-job-jacksonville-fl-us-171858255.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=11,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),d0b6b0cb4ba09e146b5224bf3213b5d3
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:07:34:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Patient Registrar in Saint Louis, MO.Essential Functions: Create an environment that leads to a positive patient care experience by demonstrating an ability to work and communicate effectively and accurately with people of all ages Assure accuracy for all business office functions related to demographics, insurance verification, financial counseling and account collections for all patient encounters Exercise good judgment and serve as a liaison between patients, physicians and all other participants of the health care teamREQUIREMENTS: 1 - 3 years in a Healthcare field Customer service background Ability to work in a stressful and emotional environment Intermediate Word and Excel skills Demonstrates effective communication/interpersonal skills, both written and oralKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Patient Registrar Job in Saint Louis,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Saint Louis, MO 63108",,http://jobview.monster.com/patient-registrar-job-saint-louis-mo-us-171920733.aspx?mescoid=2900531001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6e884e8419de85506d2e539cd0a6d39e
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:07:48:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Foreclosure Specialist. Manage the foreclosure process on mortgage loans in order to achieve preset goals and objectives. Moving aged accounts to foreclosure sale, PRIMARY OBJECTIVES OF POSITION Monitor foreclosure loans from referral to sale to ensure investors and insurers timeframes are met.The specialist will be responsible for accurate and timely completion of all Loansphere processes as well as foreclosure maintenance of the MSP system.The foreclosure specialist is responsible for communicating with the foreclosure attorneys as well as internal customers, ensuring appropriate responsiveness has been met, including all escalated matters. MAJOR ACCOUNTABILITES Timely completion of processes, reprojections, holds, and issues through the Loansphere system. Respond to issues and questions raised by the attorneys and internal departments to ensure the foreclosure timelines are kept in compliance to minimize delays and losses. Timely completion of audit reviews at 30 day, 15 day, HAMP and 1 day before the foreclosure sale. Ensure high risk items are handled timely and appropriately. This is including but not limited to priority liens, delinquent taxes, QWR, RESPA issues, Payment disputes, etc… SELECTION CRITERIA •Knowledge of Insurer and Investor guidelines •of foreclosure guidelines in various states •Analytical and attention to detail •Time management skills •Knowledge of Microsoft Outlook, Excel and, Word. •Good verbal and written communication skills •Knowledge of MSP and Loansphere",Foreclosure Specialist Job in Jacksonville,"Full Time, Employee","Jacksonville, FL",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/foreclosure-specialist-job-jacksonville-fl-us-171614655.aspx?mescoid=1300114001001&jobPosition=18,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,22427fb064f6d0ad2a73d553220d5ed9
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:07:48:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Chubb is the world’s largest publicly traded property and casualty insurer. With operations in 54 countries, Chubb provides commercial and personal property and casualty insurance, personal accident and supplemental health insurance, reinsurance and life insurance to a diverse group of clients. The company is distinguished by its extensive product and service offerings, broad distribution capabilities, exceptional financial strength, underwriting excellence, superior claims handling expertise and local operations globally.  KEY OBJECTIVE:                                                                                                                                                             Supervises and directs the activities of Claims Representatives in the investigation and settlement of claims to assure prompt, efficient and fair claims services.  MAJOR DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:                                                                                                                            Reviews initial notice of claim, determines extent and validity of coverage, and screens for qualification for flow process.  Determines measures to be taken in absence of coverage or questionable cases.  Assigns work to subordinate Claims Representatives. Determines and delegates settlement authority to Claims Reps, in conjunction with Unit Manager.  Retains higher settlement authority beyond scope of subordinates; may directly settle such cases.  Refers cases beyond scope of authority to Unit Managers. Supervises investigations, and oversees settlement or disposition of claims by assuring prompt contact of insureds and claimants, timely investigation, and equitable settlement. Establishes loss reserves to reflect probable Company obligation; and reviews and modifies reserves as necessary. May directly settle claims, depending on office size, territory, and workload.  Evaluates work of subordinate Claims Reps on open cases, or at periodic intervals.  Provides direction and counsel by identifying areas of improvement needed. Initiates proceedings for subrogation or recovery.  On cases in suit, contacts and directs the activities of Claims Attorney.  Negotiates and authorizes settlement. Participates in human resources processes affecting subordinates in assigned unit, conducts Performance Evaluations, implements training and development, and is cognizant of EEO/Affirmative Action Plans.  Participates in salary administration process. Responsible for recruitment and staffing of unit as vacancies occur.MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:High level of technical claims knowledge and competence as evidenced by a minimum of 7 years claims handling experience in specific line of business (i.e. auto/general liability).  College degree preferred. Ability to plan, organize and implement general business and personnel management practices as evidenced by successful completion of management and technical programs, completion of college level curriculum or equivalent related practical work experience. Knowledge of Auto/General Liability cost containment programs and proven account management skills a must.  Ability to lead change by addressing points of resistance at the team and/or individual level.  The ability to independently evaluate and implement claims management Best practices. Demonstrates an understanding of team building theory and the techniques of continuous quality improvement and how they apply to ongoing activities. Strong leadership skills including the ability to coach, develop and lead team members towards successful attainment of goals and objectives Excellent communication, negotiation and interpersonal skills to effectively interact with all levels of an organization both internal and external. Strong analytical and problem solving ability. Demonstrated ability to provide consistent superior service to customers. Act as a role model for the unit or office, taking on the work that others avoid and holding self and others accountable for high personal standards.Chubb offers a competitive compensation package and comprehensive benefits package including life, health and dental, vision, a generous retirement savings plan, disability coverage, stock purchase plan, flexible spending accounts, tuition reimbursement, and business casual dress. At Chubb, we are committed to equal employment opportunity and compliance with all laws and regulations pertaining to it. Our policy is to provide employment, training, compensation, promotion, and other conditions or opportunities of employment, without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, transgender, national origin, disability, genetic information, veteran or marital status, or any other characteristic protected by law.  Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 25%",ESIS - Claims Team Leader Job in Overland Park,,"Overland Park, KS 66202",,http://jobview.monster.com/esis-claims-team-leader-job-overland-park-ks-us-170364075.aspx?mescoid=4300755001001&jobPosition=8,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),809e2a1c60a7f2d0266d08f1f7cf906e
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:08:59:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job LAMPCO FEDERAL CREDIT UNION BookkeeperEducation:Accounting, Payroll, Tax Accounting & Business Law requiredExperience:General ledger accounts balancingReconciliation of statementsPayroll, Fixed Assets, InventoryFinancial statement preparationExcel knowledgeExcellent Salary and Benefits; health, vision, dental, retirement & 401-K plans.If interested please submit your resume to:Willie Hendricks,Lampco Federal Credit Union, 5411 Dr. MLK Jr. Blvd, Anderson, IN 46013 or email your resume to:apply@lampco.com.September 10,2016 DeadlineThis job listing brought to you by The Herald Bulletin Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee",Address 46013,Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/bookkeeper-job-anderson-in-us-171820993.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=6,,,864954f2058242d5b36fca62e75830a6
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:09:00:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounts Payable CoordinatorResponsible for coordination of Accounts Payable activities along with other members of the Accounts Payable team.  Responsible for timely and accurate recording and processing of Accounts Payable invoices and payments. RESPONSIBILITIES-Process incoming invoices and other requests for payment-Secure necessary documentation, payment approvals, and coding on all payments-Verify or accrue applicable sales tax on invoices processed -For purchase order related invoices, complete three way match between invoice, receiving, and purchase order prior to approving invoice for payment-Assist with tasks related to month-end closing-Respond to vendor inquiries-Review and reconcile vendor statements-Ensure vendor master is maintained, including W-9 status-Research outstanding A/P checks-Other similar duties as assigned QUALIFICATIONSEducation:  High School Diploma Required; some college a plus Experience:  Minimum of 3-5 years in a corporate Accounts Payable ERP environment; Viewpoint experience a plusProficient in Microsoft Office Word and Excel - Intermediate level Construction experience a plusKnowledge of principles, practices, and regulations as they relate to accounts payableCustomer service orientedExcellent written and verbal communication skillsAttention to detailKnowledge of accounting procedures and terminologyDetermination and InitiativeAdditional Information: Pay: $35-40KWork Schedule: Monday - Thursday7:00a-4:30p with 30 minute lunch.  Friday 7:30-11:30aDirect Hire!Location:  East Baton Rouge",Accounts Payable Job in Baton Rouge,Full Time Employee,"Accounts Payable CoordinatorResponsible for coordination of Accounts Payable activities along with other members of the Accounts Payable team.  Responsible for timely and accurate recording and processing of Accounts Payable invoices and payments. RESPONSIBILITIES-Process incoming invoices and other requests for payment-Secure necessary documentation, payment approvals, and coding on all payments-Verify or accrue applicable sales tax on invoices processed -For purchase order related invoices, complete three way match between invoice, receiving, and purchase order prior to approving invoice for payment-Assist with tasks related to month-end closing-Respond to vendor inquiries-Review and reconcile vendor statements-Ensure vendor master is maintained, including W-9 status-Research outstanding A/P checks-Other similar duties as assigned QUALIFICATIONSEducation:  High School Diploma Required; some college a plus Experience:  Minimum of 3-5 years in a corporate Accounts Payable ERP environment; Viewpoint experience a plusProficient in Microsoft Office Word and Excel - Intermediate level Construction experience a plusKnowledge of principles, practices, and regulations as they relate to accounts payableCustomer service orientedExcellent written and verbal communication skillsAttention to detailKnowledge of accounting procedures and terminologyDetermination and InitiativeAdditional Information: Pay: $35-40KWork Schedule: Monday - Thursday7:00a-4:30p with 30 minute lunch.  Friday 7:30-11:30aDirect Hire!Location:  East Baton Rouge",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-job-baton-rouge-la-us-171690127.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=10,"35,000.00 - 40,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),d675f13a07bda2833f94521bb2dd0cf6
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:09:00:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Perform general financial reporting functions and assist in external reporting needs.   Primary Responsibilities Assist in the preparation of all SEC filings (10K, 10Q, etc.) Preparation of standalone GAAP financial statements for our hospitals and health plans Assist in the preparation of all external reporting needs Assist in internal and external audit requests Assist in the preparation of monthly financial reports Responsible for gathering financial data from our hospitals on a quarterly basis Completion of financial and operational analysis Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Requirements: Bachelor degree in accounting CPA designation or currently pursing CPA designation 2 to 3 years experience at a public accounting firm or relevant experience in the healthcare industry General knowledge of GAAP and SEC requirements General knowledge of financial statement preparation General knowledge of accounting systems and Microsoft Excel",Senior Accountant,Full Time Employee,"Nashville, TN 37201",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-financial-reporting-job-nashville-tn-us-170674696.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=2,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,83fc48f4fc45453cba86134b84a30ae5
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:09:37:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Financial Additions has partnered with a large and growing company in the downtown area in their search for a Hyperion Senior Financial Systems Analyst.  We have placed numerous people with this company and they offer a great environment, outs.tanding benefits and growth potentialMajor Areas of Responsibility:To assist end users with installing and development of Hyperion Smartview spreadsheets for Excel.Reconcile source to target system financial data and perform monthly system maintenance.Research and gather documentation to support account and entity hierarchy changes on a monthly basis.Develop and maintain financial reports using Hyperion Reporting Studio.Provide various system and financial reports for SOX requirements.Support accounting close cycle by preparing journals, schedules and analysis on a limited basis.Qualifications:Bachelor's degree in Accounting or Finance or Business. 3 years advanced Hyperion Financial Management(HFM) and Smartview experience requiredAccounting experience preferredSoftware knowledge including Excel and WordExcellent PC SkillsStrong analytical Skills Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 972-383-8285 Address 14881 Quorum Dr.Suite 330Dallas, TX 75240",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/hyperion-senior-financial-systems-analyst-job-dallas-tx-us-171743557.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=20,,,3bb7a77a037cfcce9dedf5ca3f5d0302
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:09:45:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Evangelist, Amazon Video Amazon Corporate LLC - Seattle, WA 98109 Posted: 9/4/2016 - Expires: 11/3/2016 Job ID: 171834430",Evangelist,Job Type Full Time Employee,"Seattle, WA 98109",,http://jobview.monster.com/evangelist-amazon-video-job-seattle-wa-us-171834430.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=12,,,ca660b0268f2d85c3b7da54026729dbb
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:09:46:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Terrific Opportunity to join a Fortune 100 company in Miami. This is a growing and prestigous organization who is looking for an Accounts Payable professional to join their team. This company is offering 100% paid Benefits, Matching 401k, Tuition Reimbursement and much more!Ideal candidate will have 3- plus years Accounts Payable experience,with the ability to work independently in fast a paced environment. Must have processed high Volume AP. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1069586 Job Experience:Bilingual English and Spanish preferredYears of Experience Required:",Accounts Payable Specialist-Fortune  Publically traded Co. Job in Miami,Full Time Employee,"Miami, FL 33178",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-specialist-fortune-100-publically-traded-co-job-miami-fl-us-171810188.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f7c6cd7dbc979c0d91ca3bcbed1a8d30
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:09:50:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is currently seeking a Data Analyst for a client in the Wayzata, MN area!!!.   The purposes of this role is to offer a new way to showcase travel data and drive change in the way travel is booked (both on domestic and international fronts) to ensure best value across the Client's and its various businesses. This job will have the following responsibilities:Work with sets of travel data (big data) Pull data from database into Power BI to create visualizationsUtilize critical thinking and analytical skills to recognize patterns, discrepancies, etc. Use creative thought and analytical skills to make recommendations regarding factors such as best times to book travel, how to obtain best value, etc. Participate in presentations to Client's leaders alongside managers Ad hoc requests including market research and pulling of specific reports/data sets for various businesses Some of these items will be time-sensitive Qualifications & Requirements:Bachelor’s degree (economics or something related to analytics preferred) Data analytical skills Interpretive ability Great Communication and influential skills (comfortable sitting in presentations to Client's leaders and being able to back up and explain data) Strong Excel Skills Tableau or Power BI experience ALL QUALIFIED CANDIDATES CALL ROMAN ESCOBAR AT 610-617-1478 AND SEND AN UP TO DATE RESUME TO ROMAN AT rescobar@judge.com Thanks,Roman",Data Analyst Job in Wayzata,"Full Time, Employee","Wayzata, MN",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/data-analyst-job-wayzata-mn-us-171867831.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=16,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,45f9e2c12e58f32dbcbddd1e37c308c6
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:23:54:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Well known company looking to hire a The Junior Administrative Assistant/Receptionist. Position is focused mainly on answering phones and greeting guests in the front lobby. With a multi-line system; the phones are imperative to the overall functionality of the company. The position is also responsible for organizing and inventory of office and kitchen supplies, coordination of catering, and assisting the managers and with administrative tasks and responsibilities. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESAnswers and transfers all incoming calls. Greets, announces and verifies all guests. Performs reception duties in an efficient, professional and courteous manner. Maintains regular consistent and professional attendance, punctuality, and personal appearance. Manages, organizes, and updates relevant employee data and contact lists. Coordinates company wide daily catering under the general supervision of the Executive Assistant. Orders and maintains coffee and office supplies. Picks up, sorts and distributes mail and deliveries on a daily basis. Responsible for designing fliers and invitations for company wide events such as holiday party and other events created by the Activities Committee. Responsible for company wide communications board that includes items such as anniversaries, employee birthdays, job postings, catering, company event information and discount program information for off site entertainment and events. Successfully operates a variety of standard office machines, including a personal computer and a variety of computer applications, phone, fax, shredding and photocopy machines. Communicates and liaise verbally and in writing between visitors and staff. Performs other related duties as required or assigned EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE High school diploma or general education degree (GED) required. Associates degree or higher preferred. Must be Proficient with MAC/PC, Typing, Microsoft Word-Excel-PowerPoint-Outlook and Adobde programs. EXPERIENCE 1 ? 4 years related experience. Apply for this great position as a Jr. Administrative Assistant today! Email resume as a Microsoft word attachment to Azuri Ross for immediate consideration. Call the Downtown Los Angeles Act-1 office and ask for Azuri Ross. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1074535 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Junior Administrative Assistant/Receptionist Needed Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA 90071",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-administrative-assistant-receptionist-needed-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172601540.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d5322c609f3b72e42058901d0f061f90
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:23:54:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Regus is the world’s leading provider of professional workplaces on demand. Vision To lead the flexible workplace revolution. Purpose The Customer Service Representative (CSR) in conjunction with the rest of the centre team plays a key role in delivering an exceptional professional and friendly service to all business centre customer, visitors and prospective clients. The CSR is an extension of our clients business ensuring that they are able to concentrate on their work, while we manage their office needs Key Areas of Responsibility  - First point of contact for new and existing customers and visitors therefore providing an exceptional impression and service  - Responsible for the day to day running of the centre and providing services including:  - Managing switchboards; handling calls of various internal /external clients as well as various Regus areas of business  - Managing meeting room booking system  - Preparing offices for move-in/ move-outs  - Responsible for maintaining and troubleshooting basic IT and telecom technical issues, set up and queries  - Resetting Meeting Rooms to accommodate bookings  - Administrative tasks- delivering their mail, answering their phones, sending their packages, ordering their office supplies,  - Procurement  - Demonstrate ownership of the centre to ensure the centre is ‘show ready’ at all times-  - Ensure continual upkeep and standards of business centre to include offices, meeting rooms and communal areas  - Contributes to the overall revenue of the centre by identifying opportunities to promote Regus products and services  - Duties may vary depending on centre needsKey Skills and Experience & Competencies Key Skills  - Exceptional Customer Service skills, including the ability to remain flexible and calm in high pressure or continually changing situations  - Effective and professional communication skills in both local language and English (written and oral)  - Solid organisational skills, including the ability to prioritise and multi task in a demanding environment  - Working knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite, including Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook and the ability to understand further programmes to assist in the day to day centre operations  - Ability to operate basic office equipmentCompetencies  - Ability to build and maintain strong working relationships  - Embraces Change  - Takes Ownership and uses initiative  - Good Communicator  - Team Player  - ResilientKey Relationships  - New and existing customers (In-house clients, Meeting Room Clients, Virtual Office Clients)  - Centre team  - Line manager",Customer Service Representative - PT - US Job in Milwaukee,Full Time,"Milwaukee, WI 53202",All,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-pt-us-job-milwaukee-wi-us-172905655.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3cb6f6cfef5103abf60b012cdb8921a8
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:22:21:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location: Columbia, SCDuration: FulltimeMust be able to work without authorization Description:- Performs independent, objective information systems (IS) audits and consulting services. - Supplies management at all levels with objective evaluations, appraisals and recommendations concerning the areas   reviewed.- Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Computer Science, Information Technology, Business, Computer Engineering or a related field.- Six years of information systems auditing experience. - Two years of experience as a lead auditor or project leader for information systems (may be concurrent). - One year of programming and/or system analysis may substitute for one year of information system auditing experience. Preferred: - Public accounting IT audit experience.- Knowledge of I/S auditing standards and Generally Accepted Accounting Principles. - Ability to identify risks, evaluate internal controls within information systems environment. - Knowledge of data security concepts and disaster recovery. - Strong interpersonal skills. - Excellent oral and written communication skills. - Knowledge of word processing, spreadsheet software.- Ability to use standard office equipment. - Knowledge of Microsoft Word, Excel, or other word processing/spreadsheet software. - Working knowledge of programming languages (i.e.,JCL, SAS, etc.). Preferred:- CISA Required Skills:Skill                                                                                                                                                                                         Required / Desired                                                                                                                                                                                         Amount                                                                                                                                                                                         of ExperienceBachelor's degree in Accounting, Computer Science, Information Technology, Business, Computer Engineering or a related field                                                                                                                                                                             Required                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                      Information systems auditing experience. Required6YearsExperience as a lead auditor or project leader for information systems (may be concurrent). Required2Years Programming and/or system analysis may substitute for one year of information system auditing experience.Required1YearsPublic accounting IT audit experience.Highly desired   Knowledge of I/S auditing standards and Generally Accepted Accounting Principles. Required  Ability to identify risks, evaluate internal controls within information systems environment. Required   Knowledge of data security concepts and disaster recovery. Required  Working knowledge of programming languages (i.e.,JCL, SAS, etc.).Required Christopher Morga, RecruiterMobile: (732) 354-7832cmorga@iconma.com",Auditor Job in Columbia,Full Time Employee,"Columbia, SC",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/auditor-job-columbia-sc-us-171920849.aspx?mescoid=1300102001001&jobPosition=11,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,c0d3f28820de38eaeeabf0f08e592b2d
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:22:21:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Connexion Systems & Engineering, a Boston based IT and Engineering Solutions Company immediately seeks individuals with the following skills:  Job# bh6076 Staff AccountantJob Description:The Staff Accountant II, under the direction of the SVP/Director of Accounting Operations, performs a variety of accounting and operational duties in support of the Finance department and other business lines.Position Requirements:Candidate should have BS degree in accounting/finance and 3+ years accounting experience in a banking environment. Good problem solver with strong accounting/financial fundamentals. A working knowledge of Excel and Word, good communication and people skills and must be a team player.Specific Job Functions:Performs daily, weekly, and monthly operational functionsInteracts with a variety of personnel in resolving various balancing and related issuesDevelops full understanding of our financial systems and operationsPerforms the reconciliation of correspondent bank statements and general ledger accountsSupports routine accounting processes as directed, including all calculations, record keeping, proof and reconciliation functionsAssists with the administration and execution of wire transfersAssists with department record retention requirementsManages the accounts payable, fixed assets, and prepaid items functionsPerforms a variety of daily processing and reconciling activitiesDevelops analytical methods to review income and expense activityPrepares internal reporting for monthly Board packagePrepares budget variance analysis at department levelAssists Director in support of oversight of Vendor Management programProvides operational support to other business lines Works well in a team environment. When responding to this job posting you MUST include the Job# and Job Title in your subject line.                  Duration:    Permanent Rate            50-57K Locations:  Belmont, MA Contact Info:                                                                                                                                       ConneXion Systems & Engineering490 Boston Post RoadSudbury, MA 01776jobpostings@csetalent.com Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Connexion Systems & Engineering, a Boston based IT and Engineering Solutions Company immediately seeks individuals with the following skills:  Job# bh6076 Staff AccountantJob Description:The Staff Accountant II, under the direction of the SVP/Director of Accounting Operations, performs a variety of accounting and operational duties in support of the Finance department and other business lines.Position Requirements:Candidate should have BS degree in accounting/finance and 3+ years accounting experience in a banking environment. Good problem solver with strong accounting/financial fundamentals. A working knowledge of Excel and Word, good communication and people skills and must be a team player.Specific Job Functions:Performs daily, weekly, and monthly operational functionsInteracts with a variety of personnel in resolving various balancing and related issuesDevelops full understanding of our financial systems and operationsPerforms the reconciliation of correspondent bank statements and general ledger accountsSupports routine accounting processes as directed, including all calculations, record keeping, proof and reconciliation functionsAssists with the administration and execution of wire transfersAssists with department record retention requirementsManages the accounts payable, fixed assets, and prepaid items functionsPerforms a variety of daily processing and reconciling activitiesDevelops analytical methods to review income and expense activityPrepares internal reporting for monthly Board packagePrepares budget variance analysis at department levelAssists Director in support of oversight of Vendor Management programProvides operational support to other business lines Works well in a team environment. When responding to this job posting you MUST include the Job# and Job Title in your subject line.                  Duration:    Permanent Rate            50-57K Locations:  Belmont, MA Contact Info:                                                                                                                                       ConneXion Systems & Engineering490 Boston Post RoadSudbury, MA 01776jobpostings@csetalent.com",,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-job-belmont-ma-us-171789225.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=20,,,ab4758ce570307722322934f468b2676
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:22:21:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Xilin Association in Naperville, IL seeks an Accountant - to establish financial accounts, analyze financial info, prepare financial reports, conduct cost analyses, assist program budget preparation, coordinate audits & filing of tax returns. Requires Bachelor's degree in accounting; minimum 1-year working experience as an accountant. Please email resume to jobs@xilin.org",Accountant Job in Naperville,Full Time,"Naperville, IL 60563",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-job-naperville-il-us-171832588.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),65fe00c834509d0f930efa5b2158d9f1
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:22:21:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales AgentWhile a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings.Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers.Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team.Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today.About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Aflac Insurance Sales Agent Job in Flushing,Full Time,"Flushing, NY 11354",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-insurance-sales-agent-job-flushing-ny-us-171595134.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=1,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,d606bdc02efccddb11312e014bc1759f
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:16:48:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, an eCommerce Company, is seeking an Entry-level Coordinator for their office located in Hoboken, NJ. This is a great job for a recent graduate looking to join a company with the chance to be a part of their growing success. Job Responsibilities:·         Proactively identify and implement processes to improve workflow·         Manage project timelines to ensure timely resolutions·         Provide high level of customer service and communication·         Prepare, compile and sort documents for prioritized data entryJob Requirements: ·         Degree in Business, HR or Accounting ·         Entrepreneurial spirit·         Interest in eCommerce·         Great internship experience·         Strong Excel skills·         Available to interview immediately",Entry-level Coordinator Job in Hoboken,Full Time Employee,"Hoboken, NJ",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-coordinator-job-hoboken-nj-us-167640925.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=3,,Human Resources,caec674fb24a844a7ab7bf385d2addf9
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:16:57:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Office Manager Position Features:? Great Benefits? Variety Of Duties? Business Casual Environment? Great Pay to $70KMassive South San Francisco based Biotechnology firm offering a rewarding position as an Office Manager. This company offers great benefits, the opportunity to growth within, and a fun working environment. Successful candidates will have experience in organizing and supervising all administrative activities that facilitate the smooth running of an office, be proficient in all of the MS Office Suites, and promote staff development. Qualified candidates, apply for this great position as a office manager today! Contact Siliani We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1040556 Job Experience:,, Great communication (written and oral), strong multi-task and detail orientation are great skills for this position. College degree preferred.Years of Experience Required:",Office Manager - Great Benefits Job in South San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"South San Francisco, CA 94080",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/office-manager-great-benefits-job-south-san-francisco-ca-us-168084287.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6fd5159602e55066b9992226aa59ac06
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:16:58:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a Healthcare client who is looking for an EPIC PB Resolute Report Writer in Tukwila, Washington (WA). Having someone 100% onsite for the project is very important to this manager. Job Description: This is a brand new project creating radar dashboards. The PB Resolute team has 7 people with a range of experience level. This is a new skill set to the team. This is not writing Clarity reports. This Report Writer will take business and design specs already written from the business and create the dashboards. Participates on project teams with business users and other analysts/programmers. Reports will newly be coming out of EPIC. Requirements come from the business side. Whoever they bring in will need to partner with existing team as they have some legacy programs still running.REQUIREMENTS: Current Epic Resolute PB certification Experience developing Epic Hyperspace Reporting Workbench and Dashboard reports",EPIC PB Resolute Analyst Job in Tukwila,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Tukwila, WA 98168",,http://jobview.monster.com/epic-pb-resolute-analyst-job-tukwila-wa-us-168141824.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6e9dcdd380281302dfd9ebbb58aedd96
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:17:03:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PURPOSE-The District Human Resources Manager(DHRM)plays a key role in establishing a customer service culture by driving the effective execution of HR processes. The DHRM is responsible for the planning and delivery of processes for talent management, performance management, and associate engagement for a district of 6-12 stores, with the goal of developing a workforce that achieves excellence in driving business results, customer service, and Company Values. DHRMs provide coaching and advisement to district/regional leaders, store leaders, and Associate Support Department Supervisors (ASDS). The DHRM also works as a contributing and flexible member of the district team by assisting other team members in meeting workload demands.MAJOR TASKS, RESPONSIBILITIES AND KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES – Ensuring effective HR Review, succession planning, and development of the leadership pipeline for the district –Ensuring consistent quality in selection, assimilation and training of salaried managers within the district –Providing coaching and consulting on development planning for district and store leaders –Improving workforce diversity – Coordinating hourly job fairs, facilitating RMA forums, and maintaining local hiring partnerships –Partnering with store managers on the selection and ongoing training of Associate Supports Department Supervisors –Monitoring the effectiveness of planning and executing for salaried and hourly training plans – Facilitating, monitoring, and supporting the performance management process in a timely and effective manner, including code calibration –Providing partnership and counsel on all terminations and demotions –Partnering with store leadership to engage and coach associates on the floor to facilitate a customer service culture –Ensuring effective use of Company recognition and communication processes –Conducting store HR Town Hall meetings and following up to ensure effective execution on issues –Supporting leaders in Employer of Choice survey administration, feedback, and action planning –Partnering with the HR Service Center on staffing, associate relations, and other transactional processes –Taking a leadership role in the execution of organizational change initiatives impacting the district or stores – Serving as a first responder for labor, workplace violence, and other similar events and partnering with the Regional Associate Relations team to determine next steps and ensure final resolution –Partnering with district leaders on strategic plans to drive business results, customer service, and alignment with Company Values – Supporting all aspects of HR during new store openings, closings, or relocations –Actively participating in store walks, district staff meetings and other operations activities with DM NATURE AND SCOPE DHRM position reports to a Regional HR Director. 6-12 ASDSs have a dotted-line reporting relationship to the DHRM. ENVIRONMENTAL JOB REQUIREMENTSTypically located in a comfortable indoor area. There may be regular exposure to mild physical discomfort from factors such as dust, fumes or odors, temperature extremes, loud noise, strong drafts, or bright lights.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONSMust be eighteen years of age or olderMust pass the Drug TestMust pass MVRMust pass pre-employment tests if applicableEDUCATION REQUIRED The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diplomas and/or GED. YEARS OF RELEVANT WORK EXPERIENCE - 03CERTIFICATES/LICENSESPHYSICAL JOB REQUIREMENTS Frequent periods are spent standing or sitting in the same location with some opportunity to move about; occasionally there may be a need to stoop or lift light objects (typically less than 8 pounds). ADDITIONAL QUALIFICATIONS Ability to work a flexible schedule PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS– Bachelors degree in human resources or related field – Analytical, with knowledge and experience in operational, sales and management. – Bilingual.KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, ABILITIES AND COMPETENCIES -Demonstrate Business AcumenDevelop TalentDrive Customer ServiceCommunicate EffectivelyManage ChangeInfluencing OthersHuman Resources ExpertiseStaffingTraining & DevelopmentPerformance Management",DISTRICT HR MGR- Buffalo,Full Time Employee,"Buffalo, NY 14201",,http://jobview.monster.com/district-hr-mgr-buffalo-ny-job-buffalo-ny-us-168137858.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=8,,,bb66fb632c2b32d8010220f78204b19c
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:17:49:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsibilties: Assist with the facilitation and delivery of New Hire Orientation at headquarters. Manage the pre- and post-Orientation information and questions in the New Hire Success Chatter Communities to ensure timely and accurate responses to our New Hires questions to keep them moving forward fast. Work with New Hire Lead to drive Manager Accountability to ensure all new hires feel well equipped and welcomed. Manage New Hire Orientation communication through journeybuilder. Design and update Topic Presentation Guidelines for presenters and manage master calendar of presenters/campground participants per program. Includes updating New Hire Orientation site. Support start to finish event logistics of New Hire Orientation. Serve as a mentor/lead to interns supporting the New Hire Experience program Requirements: 3-5 years of experience managing events, programs and resources. Experience in managing content contributors and presenters. Strong knowledge of corporate culture building and employee engagement. Ability to think strategically and demonstrate attention to detail, while being agile and flexible enough to move tactics forward instantaneously. Proven ability to work independently and manage the day-to-day program, as well as effectively manage and influence othersExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",New Hire Experience Specialist! Perfect Job for a New Grad! Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,New Hire Experience Specialist! Perfect Job for a New Grad!,"San Francisco, CA 94105",http://jobview.monster.com/new-hire-experience-specialist!-perfect-job-for-a-new-grad!-job-san-francisco-ca-us-168095456.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=10,,Human Resources,25388d3a3313abee347621df21ea79bf
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:17:50:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview External: Chevron is one of the world's leading energy companies, with approximately 60,000 employees working in countries around the world. We explore, produce and transport crude oil and natural gas; refine, market and distribute fuels and other energy products; manufacture and sell petrochemical products; generate power; and develop future energy resources, including biofuels and geothermal energy.Chevron is accepting online applications for the position of Fixed Equipment Coatings Inspector located in Richmond, CA through June 10, 2016 at 11:59 p.m. (Eastern Standard Time). Position Details: Overview: The successful candidate will be NACE certified and responsible creating and implementing a comprehensive coatings inspection program as a member of the Fixed Equipment Integrity Team. Participation and successful completion of Chevron New Inspector Training, Continuing certifications may include (API 510, API 653, NBIC, and/or California Certificate of Competency), and Successful completion of Chevron sponsored Inspector Analyst Training, Chevron procedures, policies and guidelines.Responsibilities for this position may include but are not limited to:Evaluation and selection of coating contractors and coating selection.Monitor coating application to ensure quality and reliability, issuing recommendations for repair as needed and documenting results in an electronic database.Organize and execute turnaround coating surveillance plans.Maintain compliance with company policies as well as applicable industry codes and standards to assure safe and reliable operation.Identify and solve worst actors.Participate in failure analysis to determine root cause and help develop long-term solutions to prevent repeat failures.Heavy communication with Operations, Maintenance and Engineering are required.Periodically requires working beyond the 40 hour work week.Computer skills (word, excel, access, Meridium, etc.) needed to maintain the Refinery electronic historical database.Safe working habits with no more than 1 OSHA recordable injury.Candidate is expected to possess or obtain Company ASNT TC 1A NDE Certification in UT, MT. PT and RT film interpretation within one year of hiring date.Required Qualifications:High School Diploma.At least 3 years of refinery experience.Current NACE Level 2 Certification.Preferred Qualifications:Knowledge of industry recognized coating programs.Current API-570/510 or 653 Certification.Current CWI.Relocation Options:Relocation may be considered within Chevron parameters.International Considerations:Expatriate assignments will not be considered.Chevron regrets that it is unable to sponsor employment Visas or consider individuals on time-limited Visa status for this position.",Fixed Equipment Coatings Inspector Job in Richmond,Full Time Employee,"Richmond, CA",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/fixed-equipment-coatings-inspector-job-richmond-ca-us-168175617.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3bbb841439f24e5e29db4244880cd634
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:18:45:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"About UsHayward Pipe & Supply Co. is a 35 year old industrial piping products distributor with an outstanding reputation for providing quality products and superior professional service.We would like to add an outside sales rep to our team for Santa Clara and San Mateo Counties. If you want to be a part of a team that truly cares about their customers, fellow employees, vendors and the community, send us your resume today.Responsibilities• Travel to businesses or other organizations• Find and attract new customers• Maintain and build existing customer relationships• Gather Market Data• Assist in preparing bids• Product DemonstrationsEducation• Associate's Degree• Bachelor's Degree• College Diploma• High School Diploma (or equivalent)Qualifications• Minimum of 3 yrs B2B sales experience• Valid CA driver's license• Reliable transportation• Existing relationships with industrial and commercial acountsSkills• Excellent computer skills• Excellent verbal communication skills• Good negotiation skills • Self motivated• Works well in a team• Works well independently• Excellent written communication skills• Mechanical AptitudePosition TypeFull-TimeBenefitsCompensation package is flexible, dependent on candidate and may include; salary, commission, expenses, medical, dental and vision and an employer matching Simple IRA.",Sales Representative Job in Hayward,Full Time,"Hayward, CA 94545",All,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-job-hayward-ca-us-167309286.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f0031e24eb5387e68c0d015630658acc
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:18:46:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Supervisor - EPAPosition Summary:The position is responsible for supervising thirty plus food production employees in a unionized environment to ensure security, safety, food specifications, quality assurance of products, sanitation, HACCP, USDA and FDA regulations are followed and are responsible for labor and Material cost controls.Essential Duties and Responsibilities:Ensures quality production standards are followed and maintained.Ensures employees adhere to HACCP, FDA, USDA and safety regulations and compliance with company policies and procedures.Prepares management reports (ex. attendance, HAACCP and labor)  reports as required.Responsible for safety, quality and compliance with customer specifications and regulatory requirements and company policies and procedures.Ensures specifications, airline diagrams, and other standards are accurate according to the airline specifications.Ensures that all products are coded according to Gate Gourmet procedures.Conducts inventory of Gate Gourmet products and customer materials to ensure proper usage and minimization of waste.Completes required requisitions for the Storeroom to ensure adequate supply is maintained.Responsible for maintaining daily temperature logs and other logs and reports as required.Works with maintenance staff to ensure preventive maintenance of machinery according to schedules, reports maintenance and repair issues in timely manner.Controls material cost and other controllable costs.Maintains all financial goals related to productivity, overtime, labor goals and hours per flight.Works with management staff to improve performance of the unit.Prepares management reports (ex. Attendance, HAACCP and labor) as required.Trains and monitors employees on proper work procedures to ensure maximum productivity with  minimum labor and food costsResponsible for performance evaluation, coaching, counseling and preparing corrective action for employees and liaises appropriately with HR and other support functions.Manages work flow balancing - - the division of responsibilities amongst employees on each shiftManages daily manpower planning including assignment of responsibilities and workstations.Determines when and whether to call employees in to cover staffing needs (ex. sick calls, vacation relief, medical leaves, volume changes, etc.)In conjunction with department leaders determines number of employees needed by shiftResponsible for employee retention and monitors employee turnover.Education:High School Diploma or GED required.Associates degree preferred.Work Experience:2+ years supervisory experience working in a high volume, manufacturing, food production, and restaurant or catering environment or equivalent experience in the related field preferredJob Skills:Must have strong and effective leadership skills, and the ability to successfully manage a staff of 30+ hourly employees.Current or previous labor relations experience is a plus, but not required.Candidate must be comfortable with all levels of employees and have the ability to drive positive program change.Ability to train others required.Must have the ability to give negative and positive feedback to employees on a daily basis.Excellent time management skills required.  Ability to handle multiple tasks without losing focus on priorities.Strong organizational, analytical, communication and leadership skills required.Must be innovative and have the ability to make changes to the operation as needed to further improve the work environment and unit performance.Basic computer skills with working knowledge of Microsoft Office products required.Communication Skills:Expresses oneself clearly and effectively when speaking and writing to individuals and groups; listening attentively and insuring communication is understood by all parties involvedBi-lingual in English and Spanish/Chinese Mandarin/ Vietnamese/Hindi/Polish a plus.Certificates, Licenses and Registrations:Ability to obtain ServSafe Certification required.ServSafe Certified preferred.Travel:N/AEnvironmental Requirements:Regularly, stands, bends, lifts, and moves intermittently during shifts of 10+ hours.In a normal production kitchen facility there may be physical discomfort due to temperature and noise.Must be able to lift, push, pull and move product, equipment, supplies, etc., in excess of twenty-five (25) pounds.A rotating schedule of over 55 hours per week is typical.Demonstrated Competencies to be Successful in the Position:Thinking - Information search and analysis, problem resolution skillsEngaging - understanding others, team leadership, developing peopleInspiring - influencing and building relationships, motivating and inspiring, communicating effectivelyAchieving - delivering business results under pressure, championing performance improvement, customer focusThe above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by the individual(s) assigned to this position.  They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required.  Management reserves the right to modify, add, or remove duties and to assign other duties as necessary.  In addition, reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position.Candidates will be required to go through Pre-employment drug screen, criminal background check, and/or airport fingerprinting.Gategroup is an equal opportunity employer committed to workforce diversity.  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran status, disability status or other category under applicable law.For further information regarding Equal Employment Opportunity, copy and paste the following URL into your web browser:http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf.#ggi##jobcopy p {margin: 5px 0 0;}",Supervisor - Operations Job in San Francisco,"Full Time, Employee","San Francisco, CA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/supervisor-operations-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167955944.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e871ade4fec313b2c1b88cc050bde47b
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:18:53:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are hiring for Human Resources Generalist jobs in Las Vegas. This position is with a large multi-state firm expanding in Las Vegas. In this position, you will be challenged; you will learn; and you will never be bored. You will be joining a strong team who works hard, and has a lot of fun. In order to be considered, you will need to have: At least 5 years of human resources experience in the construction, distribution, or manufacturing industries. Your experience should include basic employee relations experience, new hire/onboarding experience, processing Worker's Comp claims, leave balance maintenance, employee records maintenance, etc.At least 2 years of payroll processing experience and good working knowledge of ADP Workforce. At least 2 years of benefits administration experience.Very good user-skills on MS Office (i.e. Word, Excel, Outlook)  The ability speak to Spanish is highly desirable, but not required. You must be able to pass a criminal background check, and drug test. This position offers excellent benefits and room for advancement. Interested? Then please apply at www.ajilon.com Please contact us at 702-932-6118 if you cannot complete the online application.  ",Human Resources Generalist Job in North Las Vegas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"North Las Vegas, NV 89031",,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resources-generalist-job-north-las-vegas-nv-us-167679088.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=14,,Human Resources,ef8744bbb102d825f4619ab5b902997c
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:19:35:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"• Implement code to automate build, test and release of a desktop application on Windows, Mac and Linux • Script environments as part of the DevOps automation processes/operations • Collaborate with rest of the team to research, develop, design and implement new components and the systems to support them • Provide troubleshooting and support to developers, customers, and technical support Requirements: • 5+ years of progressive, professional experience in software engineering • Highly experience with writing scripts for Windows, Linux and Mac • Proficient in at least one high-level scripting language like Python • Familiar with C/C++ language and related tooling (e.g. cmake, compilers, cross platform, etc) • Experience building a cross-compilation toolchain • Good grasp of build/release automation and Continuous Delivery • Passion and drive for automation and sound engineering practice • Ability to learn large new technology, software systems quickly • Self-directed and require minimal supervision BS/MS in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or a related field, or equivalent work experience",Build/Release engineer Job in San Rafael,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Rafael, CA 94903",,http://jobview.monster.com/build-release-engineer-job-san-rafael-ca-us-168180907.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=12,,IT/Software Development,65fce712b09bbc2d0ba2a045aff2e16d
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:19:45:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Human Resource Consulting Group, LLC (HRCG) is a full service HR outsourcing firm, payroll processor, and benefits administrator. The company was founded in 1988 and has clients and employees throughout the US. HRCG has been successful in developing strong partnerships through a high-touch service model and reputation for outstanding performance.We are currently looking for a full-time HR Assistant.  This highly organized individual will provide HR support in the following areas:  Benefit Administration, on boarding employees, payroll preparation, and assisting employees with HR related questions.  Qualified individuals will have 3 - 5 years experience with solid computer skills, ability to prioritize and manage time while handling multiple tasks.  This individual will also possess strong interpersonal skills.  Resumes including salary requirements should be directed to vivian@hr-consulting-group.com. ",HR Assistant Job in Seymour,Full Time,"Seymour, CT 06483",,http://jobview.monster.com/hr-assistant-job-seymour-ct-us-117962438.aspx?mescoid=4300725001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7497e4233b5400e7693cc88514b207fc
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:19:46:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"This role is responsible for working directly with the Billing Partners to provide Audit Letter Compliance with the Billing Partners clients.Working closely with the Billing partners, this role is an integral part of the Client Relationship, understanding the unique aspects of the billing, AR and WIP and compliance requirements set by the clients auditors.This role will require a complete understanding of the Partner needs, and act and be accountable for all Audit Letter Compliance aspects; along with directing and managing the actions of others to meet these objectives.Other duties will involve assisting the Practice Group with analysis, spreadsheet review and development and tracking.In this role, the ideal candidate will be expected to, but not limited to:• Effectively manage and take ownership of the Audit Letter Process and Client Board of Directors/Compensation Committee Independence Questionnaires, take direction from the Responsible Billing Partner.• Analysis of billing trends, and assist where needed.• Corporate Maintenance Client administration.• Liaise with multiple departments and various levels of internal and external stakeholders.• Proven ability to readily comprehend business objectives and develop and execute appropriate business strategies.• MS Office proficiency. including Access and advanced Excel• Excellent communication, organization, multi tasking and presentation skills.• Familiarity with Internet and web-based platforms.• Proven Project Management Skills• Strong judgment and ability to make well-reasoned independent decisions.• Excellent written and verbal communications skills; strong reporting skills.• Self-motivated and independent, able to work with a minimum of supervision.• Comfortable working across multiple cultures and time zones in a matrix organization. Strong interpersonal skills, including pleasant nature and ability to influence others.• Organized, detailed oriented individual with good project management skills.• Strong client service orientation.• Must be able to travel between San Francisco and Palo Alto offices.Education and Experience• Requires a Bachelor's degree in Finance or Business Administration or in a related area with 2-6 years of experience in a law firm or professional services organization or in a related area.• Familiar with a variety of the field's concepts, practices, and procedures. Relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals. Performs a variety of tasks. Project administration and management experience beneficial. Previous experience in a partnership and professional services environment preferred.",Audit Letter Analyst Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA 94111",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/audit-letter-analyst-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167725858.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,"50,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,0c44bf514844eac349cafa6a3800d133
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:20:09:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have an entrepreneurial spirit and thrive on finding the best, the brightest, and the hardest working candidates?  Are you driven to find top-tier talent at competitions, career fairs, university information sessions, military recruiting programs, and more?  If so, we are looking for someone like you to join our talented team and work hard to make it better.  We are well-established leader in Concrete Construction industry and are searching for a Regional Recruiter in the Washington, DC area. Job Duties: Assist Operations in defining and identifying recruitment needs and strategy. Assist in the development and implementation of high school, college, and military recruiting programs. Serve as liaison for recruits during hiring process. Support company compliance efforts   Job Requirements:Bachelor's degree OR PHR/SPHR certification OR four (4) years prior experience in recruitment, preferably in construction. Excellent active listening and critical thinking skills. Outgoing, engaging personality and ability to put people at ease. Ability to network and build relationships with industry/college professionals. Excellent oral communication skills. Passion for sourcing and recruiting. Strong work ethic and high personal drive. Ability to travel for recruiting purposes. Successful candidate will be subject to E-Verification process. We offer an excellent salary & benefits package as well as the chance to join a dynamic and growing organization. EOE/Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Regional Recruiter Job in Washington,Full Time,"Washington, DC 20005",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-recruiter-job-washington-dc-us-168134467.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),561d6d3ff0b4dd9085a5050410f8593a
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:20:53:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Helpdesk Support Job #:  650329Help Desk Technician Job Type: Long term contractLocation: San Antonio, TXPay: $18-22/hr; based on experience  If you fit the below qualifications, please send your resume in Word format to kespinoza@apexsystemsinc.com   ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS 1. Provides support for users requiring assistance with information technology issues and problems.2. Respond to requests by phone, email and/or using a help desk management system3. Track issues to resolution updating the internal knowledgebase and/or communicating updates with relevant business units4. Escalate more involved problems to the appropriate Tier 2 and Tier 3 support teams.5. Act as a liaison between customers and technical escalation teams.6. Assists the Trainers in the creation of Technical procedures for new enhancements or new application implementations.7. Assists in the performance of System Test for any and all enhancements or new application implementations.8. Provide a single view to the organization for information technology related problems. JOB SPECIFICATIONS 1. Requires high school diploma or equivalent and 2 years college in a technology or financial related field or comparable work experience.2. Preferred 3 years of experience in the use or support of branch automation applications.3. Preferred 3 years minimum experience in Service Center, Member Contact Center, or La Cantera Corporate offices.4. Requires excellent understanding of financial products and services.5. Ability to lift up to 40 pounds with or without assistance from either lifting equipment or other personnel.6. Requires the ability to reach above head, stoop and bend for majority of day7. Ability to provide seven day a week twenty-four hour a day on call support. Learn More",Helpdesk Support Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More Helpdesk Support Job #:  650329Help Desk Technician Job Type: Long term contractLocation: San Antonio, TXPay: $18-22/hr; based on experience  If you fit the below qualifications, please send your resume in Word format to kespinoza@apexsystemsinc.com   ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS 1. Provides support for users requiring assistance with information technology issues and problems.2. Respond to requests by phone, email and/or using a help desk management system3. Track issues to resolution updating the internal knowledgebase and/or communicating updates with relevant business units4. Escalate more involved problems to the appropriate Tier 2 and Tier 3 support teams.5. Act as a liaison between customers and technical escalation teams.6. Assists the Trainers in the creation of Technical procedures for new enhancements or new application implementations.7. Assists in the performance of System Test for any and all enhancements or new application implementations.8. Provide a single view to the organization for information technology related problems. JOB SPECIFICATIONS 1. Requires high school diploma or equivalent and 2 years college in a technology or financial related field or comparable work experience.2. Preferred 3 years of experience in the use or support of branch automation applications.3. Preferred 3 years minimum experience in Service Center, Member Contact Center, or La Cantera Corporate offices.4. Requires excellent understanding of financial products and services.5. Ability to lift up to 40 pounds with or without assistance from either lifting equipment or other personnel.6. Requires the ability to reach above head, stoop and bend for majority of day7. Ability to provide seven day a week twenty-four hour a day on call support. Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/helpdesk-support-job-san-antonio-tx-us-168120117.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3e146166cbb01ba4e2175df36c049b38
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:20:54:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: Havel is a division of Shambaugh & Son and is a wholly-owned subsidiary of EMCOR Group, Inc. EMCOR is the world's leading provider of mechanical and electrical construction and facilities services, including planning, consulting, and operations and maintenance. Havel provides single source solutions that meet a wide range of facility design, installation, operation and maintenance requirements. For more than 50 years, we have learned to anticipate operational needs, identify new technology trends, and provide construction services for the mechanical (PHVAC) electrical, building automation systems and energy services industries. Job Title:  Control Specialist – South Bend, IN      Essential Duties and Responsibilities: Programming Graphics building Check out of HVAC control systems and wiring Commission systems Document processes for the Building Management Control Direct Digital Control   Systems Qualifications: Need to have computer skills as a minimum Preferred minimum 2 year technical degree Self-starter Ability to accept and learn continual new building control technologies Strong customer and communication skills Must work in a team environment Schneider Electric Continuum or SmartStruxture experience a plus We offer our employees a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package and are always looking for individuals with the talent and skills required to contribute to our continued growth and success.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled",Controls Specialist Job in  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Location:,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/controls-specialist-job-lydick-in-us-168126258.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=5,,IT/Software Development,546f6c2a7f0356d7556f85c635faf688
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:20:58:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hertz Equipment Rental Corporation (HERC) is an industry leader specializing in construction and industrial equipment rental. Since 1965, we have provided rental equipment and services for projects and applications including but not limited to commercial and residential construction, industrial and manufacturing plants, and entertainment services. In addition to providing equipment and tools from brand names our customers trust, we employ knowledgeable and dedicated employees at our 260 branches throughout the US and Canada. We are committed to providing the highest quality of service to our customers. The Sales & Operations Trainee position is designed to develop the candidate's knowledge and ability to identify and resolve our customers' needs, coordinate the activities of all personnel within the branch, maintain competitive data, maintain inventory control and provide the reporting and tracking of all daily business activities. This is an excellent Entry Level opportunity for motivated self-starters who want to enhance their skills with a company whose reputation speaks for itself. Key responsibilities:Answer customer inquiries and resolve their issues/concernsSchedule delivery and pick up of equipmentMaximize/generate additional sales revenue through superior customer service on all existing ordersFinalize sales from all inbound inquiries and successful outbound telemarketingProvide customers with expert advice on the selection, operation and maintenance of all the various types of equipmentGenerate, process, analyze and review the daily business reportsSupport all team members Requirements:Must have a valid driver's license and excellent driving record Educational Background:Bachelors Degree preferred Professional Experience:1 to 2 years of previous inside or business-to-business sales experience within the industrial, equipment rental or construction sectorsRetail sales background within the home improvement, light industrial or telecommunications markets are preferred Skills:Ability to drive/operate multiple types of vehicles and equipmentAbility to engage in natural verbal interaction with customersAble to walk into unfamiliar environments and adjust rapidly to the settingMulti-task on multiple assignments within a fast-paced environmentAttention to detailCustomer service focusedSolid and proven computer skill set (knowledge of MS Office is preferred) If you are looking for an exciting and rewarding career with a growth-oriented company, HERC is the right place for you! As an industry leader, HERC offers the opportunity for training, development, and advancement. In addition, we offer highly competitive compensation and benefits package, including a generous vacation program. Apply today to be part of a team built for success! Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening. EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Sales & Operations Trainee Job in Corte Madera,Full Time / Employee,"Corte Madera, CA 94925",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-operations-trainee-job-corte-madera-ca-us-167252135.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=7,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,64ec1ac9533c0227e3b310f2a2003ead
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:20:59:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Field Engineer Job #:  659621IT Field EngineerRequirements:Three years technical support experience.Working knowledge of networks including subnetting, DHCP and DNS.Demonstrated strong written and verbal communications.Ability to bend, stoop and carry.Insurable driving record and current driver's license.Willingness to visit multiple sites per day for tech support requests.Willingness to ACTIVELY participate in new training to improve your skills and success on the job.Advanced knowledge of Microsoft and Apple workstation operating systems.Working knowledge of Microsoft Server operating systems.Experience deploying workstations and migrating user profiles.Ability to work with little supervision.Experience supporting creative users including Adobe Creative Suite.Certifications:At least one Windows and one Mac certification.Essential Duties:Provides support at clients' sites.Provides application and hardware support to end users.Responsible for tracking issues in ticketing system.Responsible for managing and maintaining end user workstations.Works closely with Customer Service Coordinator to address client issues.Escalates issues to senior staff when technical complexity or client urgency dictate.Actively participates in Open Book Management.Installs workstations, servers and network equipment.Migrates end users to new workstations.Participates in after-hours upgrades, troubleshooting, and/or on-call availability as needed.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Field Engineer Job in St. Louis,Full Time Employee,"St. Louis, MO",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/field-engineer-job-st.-louis-mo-us-168119414.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),685952ecf171c6bba395807b338b479c
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:21:46:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Payroll Supervisor Job in Oconomowoc Healthcare organization headquartered in Oconomowoc, WI  has a Payroll Supervisor job available. Supervising the payroll staff, you will be responsible for processing a high volume bi-weekly payroll. This is an exceptional opportunity for you to provide leadership in a high-paced, multi-faceted work environment. Job Responsibilities of the Payroll Supervisor Job include:• Payroll processing using Kronos/HR Payroll system• Audit timekeeping records and review payrolls for accuracy• Payroll tax activities Qualifications:• Bachelor’s degree in Accounting or Finance or equivalent experience • CPP preferred• Minimum of 5 years experience in payroll processing• Supervisory experience• Strong Excel skills  For immediate confidential consideration for this Payroll Supervisor Job in Oconomowoc, Wisconsin, please email a Word document of your resume to susan.quinn@parkerlynch.com  I can also be reached at 414-771-1900 if you have any questions prior to an email. With over 15 years of recruiting experience, I am confident that I will be an excellent resource to assist in taking your career to the next level! ",Payroll Supervisor Job in Oconomowoc,Full Time Employee,"Oconomowoc, WI 53066",,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-supervisor-job-oconomowoc-wi-us-167705559.aspx?mescoid=1100027001001&jobPosition=11,"65,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",Human Resources,822c46ee9a97401bee408f0ae3a394dd
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:21:46:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Recruiter Position Features:? Paid Vacation, Sick Time & Holidays? Excellent Benefits (Medical, Dental, Vision, Life, 401k)? Salary: $40 - $50K (based on experience) Great opportunity for an experienced Staffing Associate / Recruiter in our Government division to provide full-cycle staffing assistance in a high volume, centralized national recruiting role.All candidates must have at least 3+ years of proven work experience as a seasoned full-cycle Recruiter with excellent written, verbal and computer skills. Must be able to work with little supervision while handling a very high volume of continuous varying orders for multiple clients nationwide with constant and ever-changing unexpected issues as they arise in a highly professional, composed, informed and dignified manner.Selected candidate will need to actively, aggressively and continuously search for qualified candidates throughout the United States in various and always changing positions using a multitude of recruiting tactics and resources without training. Will review qualified resumes, interview applicants, check references, process background checks and bring and use a variety of techniques to identify and recruit the best candidates for open positions and/or proposals for bids of future contracts with government and government contractor staffing needs.At least 1 of the 3+ years of proven recruiting experience should be with or for the Federal Government and/or Federal Government Contractor / Subcontractor.Apply for this great position as a Recruiter / Staffing Associate today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1043060 Years of Experience Required:",Recruiter / Staffing Associate - Great Opportunity!!! Job in Huntington Beach,Full Time Employee,"Huntington Beach, CA 92647",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/recruiter-staffing-associate-great-opportunity!!!-job-huntington-beach-ca-us-168142639.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),55049cb8fea41e10ef724aec48a8ce05
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:22:55:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a small HR consulting firm, is looking for a contract to permanent Benefits Administrator. This person will be the front line Human Resources contact to their clients and will be responsible for:Employee benefits' enrollment (medical, dental, vision, short & long term disability, life, commuter, flexible spending)Administration of benefits Advise employees on eligibility, coverage, and other benefits mattersThere will be some payroll interaction with regards to setting up benefits This person will get tremendous support from the company founders and will get exposure and have the opportunity to learn other facets oh Human Resources Client base will be smaller companies (50 and under)Qualifications2-4 years of relevant experience, including benefit administration Great customer service skills Technically savvy Attention to detail Knowledge of benefit/fmla terms Knowledge of COBRATime management skills and the ability to work with competing prioritiesBachelor Degree preferred",Benefits Administrator Job in Boston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Boston, MA 02110",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/benefits-administrator-job-boston-ma-us-168163526.aspx?mescoid=1100027001001&jobPosition=10,,Human Resources,bb8ce671af534e8775b901bcefde1fcd
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:22:56:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Houston, Texas (TX) that is seeking a Senior Security Analyst. Responsibilities: Works on complex problems where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of various factors Exercises judgment within broadly defined practices and policies in selecting methods, techniques, and evaluation criteria for obtaining results Plans and carries out work independently and uses own initiative and judgment to handle non-routine matters and ambiguous issues Relies on extensive experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals and performs a variety of tasks Protects against unauthorized access, modification, or destruction of company information Provide guidance, review of policies, procedures, and tracks IT Security compliance through the organization Performs a variety of complicated tasks and may provide guidance to others Typically reports to a manager or head of security Help to maintain standards and provide various functions such as vulnerability assessments, penetration testing, and security log review reporting results to management Normally receives only general instructions on new or more complex assignments Decisions are made independently and are acted upon by self and others Establishing operating guidelines or methods for others and provides leadership and direction to team membersREQUIREMENTS: Professional certifications are highly preferred (CISSP, CISA, ETC) Familiar with regulatory standards PCI and ISO 27001 - 2013 Familiar with PCI - log reviews analysis type of work / firewall vulnerabilities Familiar with Splunk or comparable SIEM Exposure to Ethical Hacking is highly preferred",Security Analyst Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX 77072",,http://jobview.monster.com/security-analyst-job-houston-tx-us-168132843.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=10,"85,000.00 - 105,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),719ac17f956b4b50e1930728da56bb0f
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:23:50:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description : Position: Assistant Store Manager, Service and OperationsDepartment: Remote – Store OperationsReports to: Store ManagerDirect Reports: YesFLSA Status: Non-ExemptLocation: U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose:The Assistant Store Manager of Service and Operations provides leadership and direction to the store service and operations team. Through creating long-term strategies and leading company initiatives, the Assistant Store Manager, Service and Operations ensures maximum productivity, profitability, operational excellence, and compliance with company procedures.Deliverables: Oversees markdowns, activity and execution of service, loss prevention, event marketing, hiring, administrative work, cash handling, and managing return to vendor and supplies.Actively participates in store walkthroughs with Store Manager and District Manager to ensure the consistency and quality of service and operational execution.Educates and provides feedback to Associates on driving sales through service standards, product knowledge, store presentation, promotion, and suggestive selling skills in the fitting rooms and at the cash wrap.Leads overall store earnings by driving top line sales while managing controllable contribution.Trains and monitors Associates on company policies and expectations, cashier training, loss prevention policies and procedures, and product standards information.Drives results through creating short-term plans and long-term strategies, processes, and events that create a positive in-store experience for both our store team and our customers.Generates and analyzes the customer survey and serves as a partner in the execution of any action plans to enhance the customer’s in-store experience.Manages and measures progress and results against key targets.Ensures service, merchandising, and operational standards are met through company-defined practices and processes.Spends at least 60% of the shift performing Manager On Duty tasks.Knowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must have at least 2 to 4 years of retail management experience.  Prior retail store leadership experience preferred.College degree or relevant technical or vocational training preferred.Must be skilled in leadership, coaching, and training, sales generation, strategic planning, authentic customer service, communication, conflict resolution, business acumen, time management, and POS and other retail software proficiency.Must be able to provide feedback, develop others, embrace and lead change, and make decisions under ambiguity.Must have excellent interpersonal skills and be able act with integrity and professionalism to ensure that all business is conducted without bias or prejudice.Must be able to maneuver around sales floor and stock rooms, work with cleaning chemicals, and lift and carry up to 50 lbs.Must be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, including 2 closing shifts per week and 2 full weekends per month. At Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless. Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 21542 Division : Field - Region : Northwest Location : 0722 - XXI - Serramonte Center, Daly City CA US 94015 Job Type : Full Time",ASM,"Full Time , Employee","Job Description : Position: Assistant Store Manager, Service and OperationsDepartment: Remote – Store OperationsReports to: Store ManagerDirect Reports: YesFLSA Status: Non-ExemptLocation: U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose:The Assistant Store Manager of Service and Operations provides leadership and direction to the store service and operations team. Through creating long-term strategies and leading company initiatives, the Assistant Store Manager, Service and Operations ensures maximum productivity, profitability, operational excellence, and compliance with company procedures.Deliverables: Oversees markdowns, activity and execution of service, loss prevention, event marketing, hiring, administrative work, cash handling, and managing return to vendor and supplies.Actively participates in store walkthroughs with Store Manager and District Manager to ensure the consistency and quality of service and operational execution.Educates and provides feedback to Associates on driving sales through service standards, product knowledge, store presentation, promotion, and suggestive selling skills in the fitting rooms and at the cash wrap.Leads overall store earnings by driving top line sales while managing controllable contribution.Trains and monitors Associates on company policies and expectations, cashier training, loss prevention policies and procedures, and product standards information.Drives results through creating short-term plans and long-term strategies, processes, and events that create a positive in-store experience for both our store team and our customers.Generates and analyzes the customer survey and serves as a partner in the execution of any action plans to enhance the customer’s in-store experience.Manages and measures progress and results against key targets.Ensures service, merchandising, and operational standards are met through company-defined practices and processes.Spends at least 60% of the shift performing Manager On Duty tasks.Knowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must have at least 2 to 4 years of retail management experience.  Prior retail store leadership experience preferred.College degree or relevant technical or vocational training preferred.Must be skilled in leadership, coaching, and training, sales generation, strategic planning, authentic customer service, communication, conflict resolution, business acumen, time management, and POS and other retail software proficiency.Must be able to provide feedback, develop others, embrace and lead change, and make decisions under ambiguity.Must have excellent interpersonal skills and be able act with integrity and professionalism to ensure that all business is conducted without bias or prejudice.Must be able to maneuver around sales floor and stock rooms, work with cleaning chemicals, and lift and carry up to 50 lbs.Must be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, including 2 closing shifts per week and 2 full weekends per month. At Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless. Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 21542 Division : Field - Region : Northwest Location : 0722 - XXI - Serramonte Center, Daly City CA US 94015 Job Type : Full Time",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/asm-service-operations-serramonte-center-722-job-daly-city-ca-us-167349071.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5dcf6671552c1b0ccf12399276e3aba2
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:23:51:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Business Manager/Contracts Logistics Coordinator needed for a contract opportunity with Yoh's client located in South San Francisco, CA. The Big Picture - Top Skills You Should Possess: - Ability to effectively negotiate business terms and financial costs - Creates contracts, master agreements, work orders, change orders, budgets, payment schedules, etc. What You'll Be Doing: - Leads the sourcing and contract management process, between the functions and potential vendors - Serves as primary contact to the functions for their sourcing and contracting activities. - Provide outsourcing services in support of functional groups, to include the Request for Proposal (RFP) process, service provider identification, selection, bid presentation, bid analysis, contract development, change orders and issue management. - Leads and conducts negotiations with vendors - Implements the procurement strategy and policies within teams and functions - Ensures appropriate risk evaluation and mitigation while meeting business needs - Facilitates sourcing and contracting issue escalation and resolution - Guide project teams in identification and resolution of outsourcing issues - Identify training needs related to service provider management and outsourcing process, including how to work most effectively with outsourcing service providers - Delivers trainings to teams or functions on sourcing and contracting processes What You Need to Bring to the Table: - High degree of customer focus for both internal and external customers and proven ability to build and maintain effective internal and external relationships - Considerable and demonstrated business acumen - Thorough understanding of; Clinical Development, Contract management, and Functional outsourcing management - Outstanding communication skills, written and verbal. - Ability to successfully function in a fast-paced environment What's In It For You? - We welcome you to be a part of the largest and legendary global staffing companies to meet your career aspirations. Yoh's network of client companies has been employing professionals like you for over 65 years in the U.S., UK and Canada. Join Yoh's extensive talent community that will provide you with access to Yoh's vast network of opportunities and gain access to this exclusive opportunity available to you. - Medical, Dental & Vision Benefits - 401K Retirement Saving Plan - Life & Disability Insurance - Direct Deposit & weekly epayroll - Employee Discount Program's - Referral Bonus Program's What are you waiting for? Apply Now! Recruiter: Mary Nguyen Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here! Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process. J2W: CLINICAL; J2W: SCIENTIFIC; MONJOB TAX TERM: CON_W2 J2WPACNW Ref: 1073459 SFSF: LS Nearest Major Market: San FranciscoNearest Secondary Market: Oakland Job Segment: Logistics, Medical, Purchasing, Procurement, Operations, Finance, Healthcare, Research #TrackingJobBody ul{padding:0px;}",Business Manager/Contracts Logistics Coordinator Job Job in South San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"South San Francisco, CA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/business-manager-contracts-logistics-coordinator-job-job-south-san-francisco-ca-us-168149339.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=11,,Logistics/Transportation,678c235cac7469c62e36e394d11c32af
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:22:53:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client is seeking an Entry Level Accounting Professional in Washington, DC. This candidate will be assisting with Accounts Payable, Accounts Receivable and Ad-hoc Accounting support as needed.REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Business or Finance Proficiency with Microsoft Excel The ideal candidate will have some Accounting related internship experienceKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Entry Level Accountant Job in Washington,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Washington, DC 20036",,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-accountant-job-washington-dc-us-171794725.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=5,,Entry Level,e142f329d92123d92afa7b794a5a6104
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:22:54:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Learns how to conduct inspections to identify infestations or conditions conducive to infestations of wood destroying organisms and/or insects, birds, or other vertebrate pests for the purpose of making proposals and presentations to obtain sales contracts. Responsibilities • Attends company training programs and accompany other associates or managers during ride-alongs in order to learn job skills such as: • Recording accurate measurements and writing correct descriptions of property and/or other areas inspected • Preparing appropriate specs and treating instructions in accordance with existing laws, regulations, and company policy • Calculating job treating costs from company pricing instructions • Executing contracts on behalf of the company, observing company policy pertaining to credit terms of sale • Maintaining equipment, vehicle, and personal safety equipment in clean, working order • Learning sales techniques and product knowledge in order to sell termite control protection and renewals and/or monthly pest control protection to owners or agents of homes, stores, or industry • Gaining experience in dealing courteously with customers, leaving customers' premises and furnishings clean and as found • Passes all state licensing and/or company requirements • Attends call sessions to learn how to effectively collect on delinquent accounts of personal sales contracts • Contacts customers after service is performed to ensure satisfaction and develop additional prospects • Develops termite and/or pest control sales leads for each respective office lead furnished Education and Experience Requirements • High school education or general education degree (GED) required • Six to twelve months related experience and/or training in sales and dealing with the public or equivalent combination of education and experience is strongly preferred • Valid driver’s license from current state of residence required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals • Ability to calculate rate, ratio, and percent, and to draw and interpret bar graphs Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability 100713",Sales Rep / Outside Sales / Territory Sales Job in Canton,"Full Time, Employee","Canton, OH",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-outside-sales-territory-sales-job-canton-oh-us-171232208.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=11,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,cb17aedef83f2e628bd0250cf611490a
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:23:50:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Miami, FL that is seeking a Residential Post Closer.Responsibilities Include: Review closed loan documentation to ensure proper document execution Success for this candidate will be achieved by making sure that all loans are purchased by investors, final documents received, and loans are properly documented within the Loan Origination System Ensure all loans will be insured by FHA or VA in a timely fashion Post-close loans including shipping, managing investor suspense, MIP remittance, and purchase advice reconciliationREQUIREMENTS: Must have 2+ years of experience as a post closer/closer residential mortgage lending industry Must have experience selling/working with a portfolio of closed-end residential loans into the secondary market Critical understanding of recording, assignments, final documents, and servicing requirements Strong communication and computer skills Detail oriented and able to balance departmental and organizational objectivesKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Residential Post Closer Job in Miami,Full Time Employee,"Miami, FL 33131",,http://jobview.monster.com/residential-post-closer-job-miami-fl-us-171920759.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=12,"40,000.00 - 50,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),82f3671bec94bf83456bb7443f3e31d6
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:23:51:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Title Account Lead Auto Req ID 41615BR Job Description The Account Lead is accountable for managing the day to day relationship with our client.  The Account Lead anticipates client needs and delivers to outperform on the key performance indicators within the contract. The Account Lead creates and manages high performing teams which not only delivers operational excellence but keeps employees engaged and thriving. Executes against the account plan which ensures alignment with the client objectives and interests Drive high quality results which exceed the client’s expectations Respond to and addresses the day to day issues that surface with the client, understanding what issues require escalation Establishes clear goals and objectives for direct reports Provides frequent coaching and feedback to elevate performance Advances the firm’s diversity and inclusion priorities by focusing on talent moves, i.e. hiring, rotation and promotion Manages to account budget, proactively identifying and preventing exceeding the plan Partners with leadership to retain all current business lines and expand the book of business with the client to extend beyond existing product lines or geography Mitigates risk for the organization by ensuring A/R is maintained below 60 days payable  Engage leadership and experts in discussions to identify expansion opportunities Ensure delivery of service does not jeopardize account renewal The successful candidate will be results driven, able to execute an account plan to ensure exceptional delivery, and have the highest ethical standards. Possess strong analytical skills, intermediate to strong excel skills, ability to draw conclusions from data/make data driven decisions. ·        Possess strong vendor management experience for both hard and soft IFM service providers. ·        Experience in managing Cafeteria service providers is necessary. ·        Experienced at managing a Sourcing Strategy; timely with contract renewals, vendor negotiation and leveling bids. ·        Must possess strong capabilities in financial reporting, adept at budgeting, forecasting and providing detailed variance explanations. ·        Experience with work order system and reporting. ·        Experience in working with Landlords (Landlord/Tenant relationship building); client is a major tenant. ·        Comfortable with interfacing with senior levels of the client organization structure. ·        Working knowledge of building infrastructure / critical systems. ·        Experienced at developing talent. Global IFM experience is a plus. Full/Part Time Full-Time Regular/Temporary Regular Org Marketing Statement About JLLJLL (NYSE: JLL) is a professional services and investment management firm offering specialized real estate services to clients seeking increased value by owning, occupying and investing in real estate. A Fortune 500 company with annual fee revenue of $5.2 billion and gross revenue of $6.0 billion, JLL has more than 280 corporate offices, operates in more than 80 countries and has a global workforce of more than 60,000. On behalf of its clients, the firm provides management and real estate outsourcing services for a property portfolio of 4.0 billion square feet, or 372 million square meters, and completed $138 billion in sales, acquisitions and finance transactions in 2015. Its investment management business, LaSalle Investment Management, has $58.3 billion of real estate assets under management. JLL is the brand name, and a registered trademark, of Jones Lang LaSalle Incorporated. For further information, visit www.jll.com JLL is focused on winning in the marketplace and being the industry leader, executing better than anyone else and innovating to create great products and services. We operate in an atmosphere of excellence, integrity, respect and trust. We bring a sense of teamwork, inclusion and diversity in everything we pursue. Our clients see the results as we address their needs, solve their problems and bring new ideas. As a distinguished market leader, we offer challenging career opportunities in an exciting environment. Our future success as a firm depends on our ability to attract, develop and retain the very best people in the business.Our values define who we are, underscore our commitment to clients and provide direction for everything we do.Our unique culture has been recognized by industry experts and our peers. We are:•A “best company to work for’ in multiple locations around the globe, including Chicago, San Francisco, London, Ireland, Shanghai and Hong Kong•World’s Most Ethical Companies from Ethisphere Institute for seven consecutive years •America’s 100 Most Trustworthy Companies from Forbes Magazine•#1 Top Corporate Real Estate Firm 2013 from Watkins Research Group, Inc. for six consecutive yearsThis partial list of awards demonstrates our record of achievement and our commitment to fostering an award-winning culture. For further information, visit www.jll.com Information Security StatementEmployees are expected, at all times, to perform their responsibilities in accordance with the JLL Code of Business Ethics and the firm’s corporate policies. Employees granted access to the firm’s information technology are expected to follow the firm’s guidance designed to promote best practices for information security, data privacy and the appropriate use of technology systems. EEO Statement JLL is committed to developing and maintaining a diverse workforce, and strongly believes in equal opportunity extended to all individuals in all aspects of the employment relationship. Please visit www.JLL.com for additional information on JLL’s commitment to equal opportunity.",Account Lead Job in New York,Full Time,"New York, NY",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/account-lead-job-new-york-ny-us-171855889.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7cb868a205a96579c15684da997bbc76
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:02:02:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"The primary mission of the Associate Manager, Promotions & Sponsorships role is: Responsible for supporting the Hertz, Dollar, and Thrifty Promotions and Sponsorships Marketing efforts through development and execution of marketing strategies and campaigns. The Associate Marketing Manager is responsible for the day-to-day management Hertz/Dollar/Thrifty promotional and sponsorship marketing programs, performance and analysis. Will assist in the development, design and execution of promotional and sponsorship marketing strategies to grow the Hertz/Dollar/Thrifty brands and optimize performance for campaigns.Execution and project management primarily of promotional marketing programs as well as any other assigned sponsorship marketing projects across all marketing channels. Brief internal and external partners as required to ensure effective and efficient translation of promotion and sponsorship strategies into activation plans.Responsible for marketing analyses on promotional campaign performance.Responsible for the maintenance of promotion and campaign governance across all touch points and stakeholders.Supporting the Director of Promotions and Sponsorships with the maintenance and management of the promotions calendar.Partners cross-functionally to ensure campaign needs are addressed and information sharing is timely.Responding to any/ad hoc inquiries from internal stakeholders in regards to promotional campaign set up, terms, rate issues, etc.Manage sponsorship request email account with the Hertz Associate Brand Manager and evaluate relevance to Sponsorship strategy.Champion Sponsorship strategy and governance to all stakeholders.Partner with cross functional teams that focus on innovation and customer insights to develop and execute innovation plans including concept development, feasibility validation, project execution, internal alignment and tracking of in-market performance.Educational Background:Bachelors level degree required, MBA strongly desired; preferred fields of study include Marketing, Sponsorships or related discipline.Professional Experience:3+ years of demonstrated experience in a Marketing role with a proven track record in promotions and sponsorships.Knowledge:Brand MarketingIntegrated Marketing CommunicationsDigital MarketingAgency RelationsMarket ResearchCampaign Performance and AnalysisSkills: CreativeAnalyticalExcellent communications, both verbal and writtenDemonstrates initiativeSelf-starter and highly motivatedCollaborative in and outside of the company EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Associate Manager - Promotions & Sponsorships Job in Estero,Full Time / Employee,"Estero, FL 33928",,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-manager-promotions-sponsorships-job-estero-fl-us-169379476.aspx?mescoid=1100005001001&jobPosition=7,,Marketing/Product,e771261b79f77bc736f0f7a74475fd56
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:02:47:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Press Helper Job LocationNeenah, WI USPlant LocationFolding Carton Group (Neenah)Job CategoryManufacturing ProductionGrowth. Opportunities. Possibilities.Menasha Corporation is all about possibilities. Our two businesses, Menasha Packaging and ORBIS Corporation, are leaders in their industries, providing corrugated and plastic packaging products and related services to major global companies.Our employees make the difference, proving that great ideas, collaboration and quality turn possibilities into success. Working at Menasha Corporation means that your insights provide cutting-edge solutions for our customers. If you like to make things happen and are passionate about what you do, you’re going to want to be here.Join us and become part of the power behind possible.LICID:30289,REQID:3051,#LI-JL1MONID:30294,REQID:3051,*MON*,Shift RequirementsRotatingAbout The OpportunityPosition SummaryThis position is responsible for assisting and supporting the Operator with keeping the equipment running efficiently. His/her primary responsibility is to palletize finished product while checking for quality defects.Key Duties And ResponsibilitiesDemonstrate commitment to safety and performs job duties in accordance with company safety policies and proceduresUnderstand job ticket information to determine quantity, stock specifications, colors, special printing instructions, and any special customer requirementsKeep new rags stocked and empty dirty onesFill containers of cleaning solvents, water, fountain solution and ink as neededAssist the Operator with mounting platesContinuously check for quality defects on product running off conveyor beltCommunicate with the Operator when problems come up on the delivery endAssist with decisions regarding the quality of finished productComplete required quality inspections and paperworkWork with peers and other departments to improve quality and performancePalletize stacks of finished product on skidRemove product skids and change waste Gaylord binsMust be trained and qualified to operate balerMust be trained and qualified to operate the Roll Handling equipmentMust be trained and qualified to operate the skid turnerRun presses through breaks when neededContribute to overtime needs to meet customer demandsPlay an active role in the maintenance and cleanliness of the assigned press and surrounding work areaUnderstand department communication systems, schedules, time/attendance system and job reporting requirementsActively participates in Lean manufacturing initiativesEducation / CertificationsEducation RequiredHigh School Diploma or EquivalentEducation DesiredHigh School Diploma or EquivalentSkills ExperienceKnowledge, Skills, Or Abilities DesiredMechanical aptitudeIs attentive to detail accuracy, looks for improvements to work processes and takes advantage of tools resources, finds root cause to quality problems.Meets deadlines and responsibilities to help team meet goals, listens to others and values opinions, promotes a team atmosphere.Deals with others in a straightforward and honest manner, is accountable for actions, maintains confidentiality, demonstrates support of company values.Meets commitments, works independently, accepts accountability, stays focused under pressure, meets attendance/punctuality requirements.Adapts to change and adjusts to meet needs, is open to new ideas, takes on new responsibilities as requiredAdditional RequirementsPhysical RequirementsAbility to stand 8-12 hoursMust be able to use hands for grasping product, pushing pulling skids of product using manual pallet jack, reaching above shoulder height at times to remove items from shelving unitsMust be able to lift a maximum of 85 lbs.Frequent lifting and/or carrying objects weighing up to 25 lbs.Constant bending and liftingAbout Menasha PackagingMenasha Packaging Company is a leading designer and manufacturer of graphic consumer corrugated packaging, merchandising solutions, food packaging, shipping containers, material handling solutions, and pack-out and fulfillment services. As the largest independent retail-focused display and packaging company in North America we set new standards in sustainable packaging, and our printing and structural design capabilities are unrivaled in the industry. Our Retail Integration Institute (RII) Group uses an exclusive merchandising model with processes specifically designed to bridge the gap between consumer packaged goods companies and retailers. We currently operate seven RII campuses in geographically dispersed locations. Our 3,200+ employees include more than 100 designers and more than 50 project managers who, together with our highly skilled workforce, develop new, innovative and cutting-edge solutions for global customers. With over 40 locations we are geographically positioned to serve major food, beverage, consumer products, entertainment, electronics, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies with superior products and fulfillment services.As an operating company of Menasha Corporation, we celebrate over 166 years of unwavering dedication to a sustainable business strategy that focuses on keeping pace with change and market trends. Menasha Corporation is a privately held company comprised of two subsidiaries: Menasha Packaging Company and ORBIS Corporation. As one of America’s oldest family-owned manufacturing companies, Menasha Corporation employs over 5,000 in over 80 facilities in North America, Europe and Asia.Click to view our two-minute video that shares a quick glimpse about Menasha Corporation and our exciting future.Visit our careers site at to learn more about working at Menasha and to stay connected to future job opportunities.For more information about Menasha Packaging, please visit.",Press Helper Job in Neenah,"Full Time, Employee","Press Helper Job LocationNeenah, WI USPlant LocationFolding Carton Group (Neenah)Job CategoryManufacturing ProductionGrowth. Opportunities. Possibilities.Menasha Corporation is all about possibilities. Our two businesses, Menasha Packaging and ORBIS Corporation, are leaders in their industries, providing corrugated and plastic packaging products and related services to major global companies.Our employees make the difference, proving that great ideas, collaboration and quality turn possibilities into success. Working at Menasha Corporation means that your insights provide cutting-edge solutions for our customers. If you like to make things happen and are passionate about what you do, you’re going to want to be here.Join us and become part of the power behind possible.LICID:30289,REQID:3051,#LI-JL1MONID:30294,REQID:3051,*MON*,Shift RequirementsRotatingAbout The OpportunityPosition SummaryThis position is responsible for assisting and supporting the Operator with keeping the equipment running efficiently. His/her primary responsibility is to palletize finished product while checking for quality defects.Key Duties And ResponsibilitiesDemonstrate commitment to safety and performs job duties in accordance with company safety policies and proceduresUnderstand job ticket information to determine quantity, stock specifications, colors, special printing instructions, and any special customer requirementsKeep new rags stocked and empty dirty onesFill containers of cleaning solvents, water, fountain solution and ink as neededAssist the Operator with mounting platesContinuously check for quality defects on product running off conveyor beltCommunicate with the Operator when problems come up on the delivery endAssist with decisions regarding the quality of finished productComplete required quality inspections and paperworkWork with peers and other departments to improve quality and performancePalletize stacks of finished product on skidRemove product skids and change waste Gaylord binsMust be trained and qualified to operate balerMust be trained and qualified to operate the Roll Handling equipmentMust be trained and qualified to operate the skid turnerRun presses through breaks when neededContribute to overtime needs to meet customer demandsPlay an active role in the maintenance and cleanliness of the assigned press and surrounding work areaUnderstand department communication systems, schedules, time/attendance system and job reporting requirementsActively participates in Lean manufacturing initiativesEducation / CertificationsEducation RequiredHigh School Diploma or EquivalentEducation DesiredHigh School Diploma or EquivalentSkills ExperienceKnowledge, Skills, Or Abilities DesiredMechanical aptitudeIs attentive to detail accuracy, looks for improvements to work processes and takes advantage of tools resources, finds root cause to quality problems.Meets deadlines and responsibilities to help team meet goals, listens to others and values opinions, promotes a team atmosphere.Deals with others in a straightforward and honest manner, is accountable for actions, maintains confidentiality, demonstrates support of company values.Meets commitments, works independently, accepts accountability, stays focused under pressure, meets attendance/punctuality requirements.Adapts to change and adjusts to meet needs, is open to new ideas, takes on new responsibilities as requiredAdditional RequirementsPhysical RequirementsAbility to stand 8-12 hoursMust be able to use hands for grasping product, pushing pulling skids of product using manual pallet jack, reaching above shoulder height at times to remove items from shelving unitsMust be able to lift a maximum of 85 lbs.Frequent lifting and/or carrying objects weighing up to 25 lbs.Constant bending and liftingAbout Menasha PackagingMenasha Packaging Company is a leading designer and manufacturer of graphic consumer corrugated packaging, merchandising solutions, food packaging, shipping containers, material handling solutions, and pack-out and fulfillment services. As the largest independent retail-focused display and packaging company in North America we set new standards in sustainable packaging, and our printing and structural design capabilities are unrivaled in the industry. Our Retail Integration Institute (RII) Group uses an exclusive merchandising model with processes specifically designed to bridge the gap between consumer packaged goods companies and retailers. We currently operate seven RII campuses in geographically dispersed locations. Our 3,200+ employees include more than 100 designers and more than 50 project managers who, together with our highly skilled workforce, develop new, innovative and cutting-edge solutions for global customers. With over 40 locations we are geographically positioned to serve major food, beverage, consumer products, entertainment, electronics, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies with superior products and fulfillment services.As an operating company of Menasha Corporation, we celebrate over 166 years of unwavering dedication to a sustainable business strategy that focuses on keeping pace with change and market trends. Menasha Corporation is a privately held company comprised of two subsidiaries: Menasha Packaging Company and ORBIS Corporation. As one of America’s oldest family-owned manufacturing companies, Menasha Corporation employs over 5,000 in over 80 facilities in North America, Europe and Asia.Click to view our two-minute video that shares a quick glimpse about Menasha Corporation and our exciting future.Visit our careers site at to learn more about working at Menasha and to stay connected to future job opportunities.For more information about Menasha Packaging, please visit.",Wholesale Trade/Import-Export,http://jobview.monster.com/press-helper-job-neenah-wi-us-169095627.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,67ac083cc815928b5513436777692006
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:02:48:43,No,jobs.monster.com,".custom-description p{margin-bottom: 15px !important;font-size:14px !important;line-height: 18px !important;}.custom-description ul{margin:10px 0px !important;font-size:14px !important;line-height: 18px !important; }Position PurposeThe Social Media Manager, reporting directly to the AVP of Digital Marketing, is a highly motivated individual with experience and passion for designing and implementing the Company’s digital content strategy, creating relevant content, blogging, community participation and leadership.Position Responsibilities/Duties/Functions/Tasks1. Manage Social Media team, marketing campaigns, and day-to-day activities including:a. Curate relevant content to reach the company’s ideal customers.b. Create, curate, and manage all published content (images, video and written).c. Monitor, listen and respond to users in a “Social” way while cultivating leads and sales.d. Conduct online advocacy and open stream for cross-promotions.e. Develop and expand community and/or blogger outreach efforts.f. Oversee design (ie: Facebook Timeline cover, profile pic, thumbnails, ads, landing pages, Twitter profile, and blog).g. Design, create and manage promotions and Social ad campaigns.h. Compile report for management showing results (ROI).2. Ensure all digital content maintains brand voice and message.3. Vetting and approval of all digital marketing copywriting4. Become an advocate for the Company in Social Media spaces, engaging in dialogues and answering questions where appropriate.5. Demonstrate ability to map out marketing strategy and then drive that strategy proven by testing and metrics.6. Monitor trends in Social Media tools, applications, channels, design and strategy.7. Develop a strategy and implement a proactive process for capturing customer online reviews. Monitor online ratings and respond accordingly.8. Identify threats and opportunities in user generated content surrounding the business. Report notable threats to appropriate management.9. Analyze campaigns and translate anecdotal or qualitative data into recommendations and plans for revising the Social Media campaigns.10. Monitor effective benchmarks (best practices) for measuring the impact of Social Media campaigns. Analyze, review, and report on effectiveness of campaigns in an effort to maximize results.Position Qualifications1. Has 3+ years of experience in the field of Social Media and related team & process management.2. Possesses knowledge and experience in the tenets of traditional marketing. Marketing degree is welcomed but not required with relevant work experience.3. Demonstrates creativity and documented immersion in Social Media. (Give links to profiles as examples).4. Displays in-depth knowledge and understanding of Social Media platforms, their respective participants (Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn, Google+, YouTube, Instagram, Pinterest etc.) and how each platform can be deployed in different scenarios.5. Proficient in social media advertising and optimization on all major platforms6. Proficient in content marketing theory and application. Experience sourcing and managing content development and publishing.7. Enjoys a working knowledge of the blogging ecosystem8. Demonstrates winning Social Customer Service techniques. Possesses great ability to identify potential negative or crisis situation and apply conflict resolution principles to mitigate issues.9. Exhibits the ability to jump from the creative side of marketing to analytical side, able to demonstrate why their ideas are analytically sound.10. Exceeds at building and maintaining relationships, online and off.11. Is a Team player with the confidence to take the lead and guide other employees when necessary. (ie: content development, creation and editing of content, and online reputation management).12. Maintains a working knowledge of principles of SEO including keyword research. Highly knowledgeable in the principles of “Search and Social”.13. Displays ability to effectively communicate information and ideas in written and video format.14. Maintains excellent writing, presentation/training, and language skills. Bi-Lingual/Spanish-speaking skills will be considered a plus.15. Maintains working knowledge of reporting tools and platforms such as Google Analytics.16. Has experience tagging content for correct attribution in 3rd party reporting tools and 1st party systems.17. Makes evident good technical understanding and can pick up new tools quickly.Liberty Tax Service is an equal opportunity employer.",Social Media Manager Job in Virginia Beach,Full Time / Employee,"Virginia Beach, VA 23454",All,http://jobview.monster.com/social-media-manager-job-virginia-beach-va-us-169392040.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=9,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),b715041778f864598a6dcdd6e609b48c
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:23:51:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS Supply Chain Solutions is currently seeking a Customs Brokerage Representative I. The ideal candidate will have one year of Customs Brokerage / Import / Export or CHB entry writer experience, as well as one year of customer service / general office / data entry experience.  The Customs Brokerage Representative I responsibilities include but are not limited to the following:• Administrative tasks in the import operations department servicing the client and their suppliers, providing customer service as well as maintaining revenues from the client base and contracted vendors.• File break/down, classifying data entry, photocopying, scanning and some assembling of entries.• Auditing commercial documents, applying harmonized tariff schedule code for accurate duty assessment and to ensure all federal requirements are met.• Document review and assessment of accuracy, verifying country of origin/export, IOR, terms of sale and value to ensure that compliance and federal regulation requirements are achieved.• Daily follow up on documentation discrepancy issues which requires the ability to troubleshoot and communicate effectively, both verbally and in writing with customers and foreign origins.• All other task as assigned by supervisor and or manager.• Position may require a weekend schedule on a department rotation basis and not limited to working a holiday schedule based on the needs of the operation and requirements of the account.This job description is intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by persons assigned to this classification. It is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all job responsibilities, duties and skills required for this position.Minimum requirements:• A minimum of one year of customer service, general office, or data entry experience.• High School diploma or equivalent certificate.• Proficiency in Microsoft Office.• Accurate and rapid data entry.• Strong attention to detail, and ability to multi-task.• Excellent verbal and written communications skills.• Proven organizational skills.• One year of Customs Brokerage, Import/Export or CHB entry-writing experience preferred.• The ability to project a professional image to the customer and to represent UPS SCS in a positive manner. Import, Export, Customs, Clearance, Customer Service, Data Entry, Transportation, Logistics, and International Freight.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS CBR I - BDM  - Job in Blaine,,"Blaine, WA 98230",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-cbr-i-bdm-0700-1530-job-blaine-wa-us-169520701.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=7,,Logistics/Transportation,6c5ee62dabba06d702d46a7d0c38976d
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:23:51:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Buyer - PlannerLocation:Telford, PA - (GPS & Fluid Handling & Strobic)Business Units:Global Pump SolutionsDepartment:AdministrationKC Job Code:155Description CECO is diversified global provider of leading engineered technologies to the environmental, energy, and fluid handling and filtration industrial segments, targeting specific niche-focused end markets through an attractive asset-light business model, strategically balanced across the world. CECO targets its $5 billion+ of installed base, specifically to expand and grow a higher recurring revenue of aftermarket products and services. CECO’s well respected brands, technologies and solutions have been evolving for well over 50 years to become leading-edge technologies in specific niche global end markets, including natural gas turbine power, refinery & petrochemical engineered cyclones and mid-stream energy pipeline gas transmission. CECO is listed on Nasdaq under the ticker symbol “CECE.” For more information, please visit www.cecoenviro.com.   Buyer –  Planner  Position DescriptionResponsible for a wide variety of purchasing activities; suggesting and maintaining stocking levels, PO placement and administration, inbound logistics from suppliersKeeps ERP system information accurate/current, processes PO’s and associated paperworkContacts suppliers to place and/or expedite delivery of materialClarifies needs with internal departments and external suppliers to assure timely deliveries to meet CECO factory needs through evaluation of system information; open PO reports & shipping schedulePlaces PO’s for stock items, expedites supplier deliveriesInputs and maintains inventory stocking levels for raw materialsCommunicates supply and quality issues to managementDrives solutions to supply issues through negotiation, proposing alternate methods/materialsResponsible for PO placement, scheduled delivery management, and resolution of quality issuesCommunicates with stakeholders to provide accurate PO delivery dates, accurate lead-time for raw material procurement and updates AX systemAdds new supplier information into systemProcesses system Purchase order requirementsMaintains a positive company image and fosters supplier relations Requirements3-5 years or more years of purchasing/materials management experience in a manufacturing environment; requiredBachelor's degree; preferredPurchasing experiences with castings, motors and machine parts; preferred                                               CECO Environmental offers a competitive salary and a comprehensive benefits package including life, medical, dental, vision, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, 401k and more.CECO Environmental is an EEO and E-Verify Employer.  We sincerely appreciate your interest and will carefully evaluate your qualifications for employment.  Be assured your opportunity for employment with our company will be based only on your merit without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, mental or physical disability, or any other factor unrelated to job requirements.  ",Buyer - Planner Job in King Of Prussia,"Full Time, Employee","Buyer - PlannerLocation:Telford, PA - (GPS & Fluid Handling & Strobic)Business Units:Global Pump SolutionsDepartment:AdministrationKC Job Code:155Description CECO is diversified global provider of leading engineered technologies to the environmental, energy, and fluid handling and filtration industrial segments, targeting specific niche-focused end markets through an attractive asset-light business model, strategically balanced across the world. CECO targets its $5 billion+ of installed base, specifically to expand and grow a higher recurring revenue of aftermarket products and services. CECO’s well respected brands, technologies and solutions have been evolving for well over 50 years to become leading-edge technologies in specific niche global end markets, including natural gas turbine power, refinery & petrochemical engineered cyclones and mid-stream energy pipeline gas transmission. CECO is listed on Nasdaq under the ticker symbol “CECE.” For more information, please visit www.cecoenviro.com.   Buyer –  Planner  Position DescriptionResponsible for a wide variety of purchasing activities; suggesting and maintaining stocking levels, PO placement and administration, inbound logistics from suppliersKeeps ERP system information accurate/current, processes PO’s and associated paperworkContacts suppliers to place and/or expedite delivery of materialClarifies needs with internal departments and external suppliers to assure timely deliveries to meet CECO factory needs through evaluation of system information; open PO reports & shipping schedulePlaces PO’s for stock items, expedites supplier deliveriesInputs and maintains inventory stocking levels for raw materialsCommunicates supply and quality issues to managementDrives solutions to supply issues through negotiation, proposing alternate methods/materialsResponsible for PO placement, scheduled delivery management, and resolution of quality issuesCommunicates with stakeholders to provide accurate PO delivery dates, accurate lead-time for raw material procurement and updates AX systemAdds new supplier information into systemProcesses system Purchase order requirementsMaintains a positive company image and fosters supplier relations Requirements3-5 years or more years of purchasing/materials management experience in a manufacturing environment; requiredBachelor's degree; preferredPurchasing experiences with castings, motors and machine parts; preferred                                               CECO Environmental offers a competitive salary and a comprehensive benefits package including life, medical, dental, vision, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, 401k and more.CECO Environmental is an EEO and E-Verify Employer.  We sincerely appreciate your interest and will carefully evaluate your qualifications for employment.  Be assured your opportunity for employment with our company will be based only on your merit without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, mental or physical disability, or any other factor unrelated to job requirements.  ",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/buyer-planner-job-king-of-prussia-pa-us-169529613.aspx?mescoid=1300068001001&jobPosition=8,,Logistics/Transportation,2876724f72f69fb5b8db078bc51aa097
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:22:55:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for a class C driver who can also perform warehouse tasks. 80% driving and 20% warehouse Must have clean driving record, clean background and must be able to pass a drug test. Candidates must live in the area and have reliable transportation. Forklift certificate is required.   Driver will transport parts and merchandise to vendors no more than 20 miles away. Company pick up truck will be mode of transport.   Send me your resume today.",Driver (Class C) - Escondido,"Full Time, Employee","Escondido, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-class-c-escondido-ca-job-escondido-ca-us-169484393.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=7,,Logistics/Transportation,64492b7d7f391fcbb93fa426979b0c27
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:22:54:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is hiring individuals to work as part-time Package Handlers. This is a physical, fast-paced position that involves continual lifting, lowering and sliding packages that typically weigh 25 - 35 lbs. and may weigh up to 70 lbs. Part-time employees usually work 3 ½ - 4 hours each weekday (Monday through Friday) and typically do not work on weekends or selected holidays.Package Handlers receive a competitive hourly rate and also an attractive benefits package. Please note that these opportunities are part-time only working approximately 17 1/2 – 20 hours per week.UPS provides an excellent employment opportunity for students. Through the UPS Earn and Learn program, our student employees receive all the paid benefits of a great part-time job with UPS, plus outstanding education assistance of up to $2,625 per semester / $5,250 per year with a maximum lifetime benefit of $25,000. This assistance can be used for tuition, books and fees as long as you are attending an approved college, university, trade or technical school. You will be eligible for the Earn and Learn program on your first day of work.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Package Handler - Part-Time - Entry Level Warehouse Support Job in Columbus,,"Columbus, NE 68601",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-package-handler-part-time-entry-level-warehouse-support-job-columbus-ne-us-169515081.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=2,,Logistics/Transportation,ebc8c2c0de9e36ec1e4956bf2b2f191f
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:21:47:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br /> Job Description Our Shipping/Receiving Technician will be loading and unloading hazardous waste drums using various equipment such as forklifts. Once unloaded, they will be tagging/weighing to build shipment loads. This position is a physically intensive position and it can be in adverse environments like heat or cold year around. Key Responsibilities: Ensures Health and Safety is the number one goal by following policies, processes, and acting in a safe manner at all time Load and unload hazardous waste drums Build shipment loads Transport materials within facility Move vehicles around yard Operate a forklift when needed Completes paperwork for waste tracking movement  Qualifications: 6+ months related work experience Ability to work in adverse environments (cold/heat) Valid driver’s license Ability to work a 2nd shift and rotating weekends Fork lift experience highly preferred  Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market.  For many positions, we have implemented a Competency Based Progression and Pay Program, which directly rewards employees for developing increased proficiency in their key job functions through training and experience. At Clean Harbors you are offered unique opportunities for all stages of your career. Clean Harbors offers all eligible employees a comprehensive benefits package including:•      Competitive annual salary (CBPP Competency Based Pay Program)•      Opportunities for growth, development and internal promotion•      Health, Dental and Life Insurance•      401K, tuition reimbursement, and generous paid time off•      Company paid certifications, licenses and training To learn more about our company visit us at www.cleanharbors.com We thank all those interested in joining the Clean Harbors team; however only those that complete the online application and meet the minimum job qualifications will be considered for this role. Clean Harbors is a Military & Veteran friendly company. *CH Potential Applicants:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Shipping/Receiving Technician Job in Bristol,Full Time Employee,"Bristol, CT",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-receiving-technician-job-bristol-ct-us-168506463.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=19,,Logistics/Transportation,40ac42d5bebd5c99f767d78c79ce939d
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:21:46:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Excellent growth-oriented Fortune 1000 companyBonusable positionRelocation assistance provided.JOB FUNCTIONS:Facilitate multiple Lean Kaizen events, driving the cross-functional team to implement change resulting in streamlined processes. Instill the Continual Improvement/Lean Kaizen approach of breakthrough improvements throughout the Distribution Center. Proactively drive change and process improvements across all functional areas. Work with leadership to identify areas for Lean Kaizen events, establish goals and objectives for each event, create project charter and select cross functional team members and leaders. Participate in development of Continual Improvement/Lean training materials & curriculum. Help functional area associates periodically review their business (key performance measures, major accomplishments and significant issues & challenges) and identify improvement opportunities. Deliver/Present the Continual Improvement/Lean training courses to all levels of the Distribution Center, including the management team; trains and educates leadership and associates on the purpose, value and application of Continual Improvement tools. Support and facilitate the development of the Continual Improvement/Lean initiative and cascading the methodology throughout the DC. Drive associates to establish and track/monitor business performance metrics to measure results and ensure continuous, sustainable improvement occurs across Our Client's processes. Help associates measure results of implemented improvements and communicate successes, along with identifying training needs and resources required to support continuous improvement activities. Participate in the identification and implementation of new tools, technology and strategies to help promote continuous improvement within the DC. Provide and coordinate training on the use and application of various Lean tools/techniques. Assist associates in establishing and refining performance scorecards, including performance measures, drivers and influences along with establishing performance standards and improvement targets. Ensure Business Owners complete all tasks by acting as liaison for the Continual Improvement team and related cross-functional areas. Identify and incorporate external best practices into Our Client’s Continual Improvement/Lean initiative. Perform data analysis, prep work and follow through on all open action items required to successfully facilitate a Lean Kaizen event. Responsible for coordinating and participating in 30, 60, 90 day 6 month and 1 year follow-up meetings for each event to ensure action items are completed and improvements are realized and maintained. Communicate cross-functionally at all levels within the company, including senior management. Foster the culture in the DC and throughout the company to ensure fulfillment of Our Client’s mission and vision. Participate in special projects and performs additional duties as required.REQUIREMENTS:Bachelor’s Degree. (Engineering or Business major preferred).Minimum 3 years of Lean, Six Sigma, project management, training, and/or other related methodologies.(Distribution Center environment is preferred)Excellent oral and written communications skills required.Excellent presentation skills required.Excellent organizational and time management skills are required.Computer literacy and proficiency in MS Word, MS Excel, MS PowerPoint, MS VisioA valid driver’s license and the ability to travel 20% are required.",Distribution Center Lean Specialist Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/distribution-center-lean-specialist-job-columbus-oh-us-169429015.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=16,,Logistics/Transportation,a8cfab43df979fb24d7c6387d2b02727
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:20:50:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"With Staff Management | SMX, you'll get a weekly paycheck, learn new skills, meet new people, and work with a great management team in a clean and safe environment.Warehouse/Distribution Positions AvailableWe are seeking Enthusiastic, Energetic and Customer Centric individuals for our Warehouse Associate positions. The ideal candidates for these roles have a commitment to customer satisfaction. As customers make on-line purchases, a member of our team will get the product and package for delivery. Located in San Jose, CA near Santa Clara, Milpitas, and Sunnyvale.Job Responsibilities: The Warehouse Associate Job Duties consist, but are not limited to the following: Loading, unloading, and sorting packages for delivery service providers. These roles will continuously have you one the move and directly impacting the Amazon customer experience.We have several new part-time shifts: Sunday - Thursday 12:30AM - 5:30AM Tuesday - Saturday 12:30AM - 5:30AM Friday - Monday 12:30AM - 5:30AMPart Time3rd ShiftAssociate Requirements:HS Diploma or GEDMust be at least 18 years oldAssociate Benefits:Casual Dress CodePaid TrainingWeekly paychecksDirect Deposit or Cash Card pay optionsMedical / Dental InsurancePaid Sick LeaveEarn $13.75/HR Referral BonusWork Location Amazon - DSF3 San Jose, CA-70871700 Montague ExpySan Jose, CA 95131Recruiting LocationPlease bring 2 forms of ID with you. One should be a government-issued photo ID like a Driver's License, Military card or PassportAmazon - DSF3 San Jose, CA-7087 1700 Montague Expressway San Jose, CA 95131 (510) 792-4641 EOE",Monster,,"With Staff Management | SMX, you'll get a weekly paycheck, learn new skills, meet new people, and work with a great management team in a clean and safe environment.Warehouse/Distribution Positions AvailableWe are seeking Enthusiastic, Energetic and Customer Centric individuals for our Warehouse Associate positions. The ideal candidates for these roles have a commitment to customer satisfaction. As customers make on-line purchases, a member of our team will get the product and package for delivery. Located in San Jose, CA near Santa Clara, Milpitas, and Sunnyvale.Job Responsibilities: The Warehouse Associate Job Duties consist, but are not limited to the following: Loading, unloading, and sorting packages for delivery service providers. These roles will continuously have you one the move and directly impacting the Amazon customer experience.We have several new part-time shifts: Sunday - Thursday 12:30AM - 5:30AM Tuesday - Saturday 12:30AM - 5:30AM Friday - Monday 12:30AM - 5:30AMPart Time3rd ShiftAssociate Requirements:HS Diploma or GEDMust be at least 18 years oldAssociate Benefits:Casual Dress CodePaid TrainingWeekly paychecksDirect Deposit or Cash Card pay optionsMedical / Dental InsurancePaid Sick LeaveEarn $13.75/HR Referral BonusWork Location Amazon - DSF3 San Jose, CA-70871700 Montague ExpySan Jose, CA 95131Recruiting LocationPlease bring 2 forms of ID with you. One should be a government-issued photo ID like a Driver's License, Military card or PassportAmazon - DSF3 San Jose, CA-7087 1700 Montague Expressway San Jose, CA 95131 (510) 792-4641 EOE",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-worker-job-san-jose-ca-us-169436036.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=15,,,96a157ffbb66596104f9a7e4e51b7964
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:20:48:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS Freight, a leader in the LTL trucking industry, is currently seeking an Operations Clerk to answer customer inquiries, process paperwork, and follow procedures concerning overages, shortages, damages, claims, and the tracing of freight.An Operations Clerk will also be responsible to:Review invoicesWork with both central and local dispatch offices to assist in managing load schedulesAnswer customer inquiries relating to rate quotes, appointments, etc.Perform data entry functions (i.e. keying bills from manifests)Transportation industry understanding and/or previous data entry experience preferred.BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:Must be at least 18 years of ageU.S. citizen or otherwise authorized to work in the U.S.High school diploma or equivalentBasic computer skillsOTHER CRITERIA:Employer will not sponsor visas for position.UPS is an Equal Opportunity Employer UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Union Clerk - Part Time - UPS Freight Job in Bensalem,,"Bensalem, PA 19020",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-union-clerk-part-time-ups-freight-job-bensalem-pa-us-169438055.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=20,,Logistics/Transportation,f647a3ea6cd16deb728ef5b0eed40267
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:20:48:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: Lead a fleet of drivers.Lead and retain a designated fleet of drivers.Lead a minimum fleet of 50 manned tractors; for Shuttle Driver Leaders only-lead a fleet of at least 40 daycabs/Over-The-Road (OTR) tractors.Establish a good working relationship with each driver.Work with planning personnel to obtain loads for their fleet and dispatches drivers.Manage driver availability to maximize productivity of their fleet.Perform A.M. and P.M. checks on trucks and note daily.Perform monthly driver reviews within the first 30 days of a driver being upgraded to solo status or 30 days of employment for experienced drivers in order to measure and record performance. After initial review, perform quarterly.Manage driver performance and take proper disciplinary steps if necessary.Know, support and enforce company policies.Manage service levels of 98% for on time pick up and delivery.Manage fuel process in compliance with opti stop and DCI objectives.Ensure payroll accuracy for assigned drivers.Act as a liaison between the driver, DSSC personnel, and all internal departments.All other duties and projects as assigned.Skills: Ability to lead others, knowledge of the transportation industry preferred, ability to communicate well with others, ability to transfer knowledge, above average writing skills and organizational skills, professional appearance, ability to take direction from managers and detail oriented, ability to solve problems and work in high pressure situations, and computer based keyboard skills.Education: High School Diploma or GEDExperience Required: One year of leadership experience or a minimum of one year driving experience required. Four year college degree can replace experience required. Position RequirementsAbility to lead others, knowledge of the transportation industry preferred, ability to communicate well with others, ability to transfer knowledge, above average writing skills and organizational skills, professional appearance, ability to take direction from managers and detail oriented, ability to solve problems and work in high pressure situations, and computer based keyboard skills. Required EducationHigh School Diploma or GED Required ExperienceOne year of leadership experience or a minimum of one year driving experience required. Four year college degree can replace experience required.",Driver Leader Level Ii Job in Macclenny,"Full Time, Employee","Macclenny, FL","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/driver-leader-level-ii-job-macclenny-fl-us-169469113.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=18,,,9e62c35677075501360a59afb30b716c
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:20:47:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is hiring individuals to work as part-time Package Handlers. This is a physical, fast-paced position that involves continual lifting, lowering and sliding packages that typically weigh 25 - 35 lbs. and may weigh up to 70 lbs. Part-time employees usually work 3 ½ - 4 hours each weekday (Monday through Friday) and typically do not work on weekends or selected holidays.Package Handlers receive a competitive hourly rate and also an attractive benefits package. Please note that these opportunities are part-time only working approximately 17 1/2 – 20 hours per week.UPS provides an excellent employment opportunity for students. Through the UPS Earn and Learn program, our student employees receive all the paid benefits of a great part-time job with UPS, plus outstanding education assistance of up to $2,625 per semester / $5,250 per year with a maximum lifetime benefit of $25,000. This assistance can be used for tuition, books and fees as long as you are attending an approved college, university, trade or technical school. You will be eligible for the Earn and Learn program on your first day of work.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Package Handler - Part-Time - Entry Level Warehouse Support Job in Hailey,,"Hailey, ID 83333",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-package-handler-part-time-entry-level-warehouse-support-job-hailey-id-us-169514840.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=4,,Logistics/Transportation,be6962596e3ffa1bc379c595c149b703
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:19:45:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"                                                Shipping / Receiving ManagerOur client is a recognized leader in their industry. For over 50 years they have serviced the Delaware Valley with their locally manufactured products. This outstanding opportunity is open due to a recent promotion and is offered for the upwardly mobile individual. You will oversee all shipping and receiving activities for two warehouse units. Required:·         -BS/BA degree;·         -hands-on approach to managing all warehouse functions;·         -strong supervisory experience;·         -experience with Enterprise Software The company offers a competitive salary, comprehensive health/medical benefits and rewards performance. Qualified individuals are encouraged to respond immediately.  Keywords: warehouse, shipping, receiving, supervision, management, manager, trucking, receiving manager, shipping manager",Shipping / Receiving Manager Job in Trevose,"Full Time , Employee","Trevose, PA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-receiving-manager-job-trevose-pa-us-169444712.aspx?mescoid=1100025001001&jobPosition=13,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),e4f04bb25a21648e0889f636455b4812
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:19:45:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.Transport Service Company - Food Grade Division, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Dayton, OH.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and thrive!$2000.00 Sign On Bonus!!!We have INCREASED our PAY PACKAGE to include increased mileage pay, loading & unloading pay and more!We're also offering premium pay to drivers with Tank Experience! Call for details.Transport Service Company - Food Grade Division provides tank truck carrier services for manufacturers of food products. With over 40 years kosher food experience, Transport Service Co. offers a variety of liquid and dry food grade equipment. Food Grade's terminal operations span the Midwest and Southeast along with several support satellite locations throughout the United States.Transport Service Co.'s Food Grade business is categorized into two product segments, sweeteners and edible products. The sweetener product segment primarily consists of corn syrup, high fructose corn syrup and liquid sugar (""sweeteners""). The edible product segment consists of other bulk liquid food products such as: glycerin, juices, molasses, sorbitol, vegetable oils, beverage alcohols and many more.Our commitment is to provide our customers with the highest level or service excellence in our industry, exceeding their requirements and bringing added value to their overall logistics strategies. We differentiate ourselves with a driver-friendly culture that emphasizes a 100% commitment to safety and various quality-of-life opportunities for professional drivers.Company Drivers:Regional and OTR Flexible home time Competitive pay Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental and Vision plans Paid vacations and holidays 401K with company match Paid training on safe driving and product handling Satellite Dispatch Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with Transport Service Company.We require Class A CDL with 1 year recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank endorsement (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.Call 800-871-4581 for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.",Class A CDL Driver - TSC Job in Dayton,Full Time Employee,"Dayton, OH",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-tsc-job-dayton-oh-us-169487585.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=17,,Logistics/Transportation,1692c799d436711e474733d99bb3b5b4
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:18:59:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Start your career with Alsco today! This is a Union/Teamsters position with great benefits! GREAT OPPORTUNITY! Delivering and sales opportunity to the Crescent City area. Build your route to provide linen services to our customers. Alsco has been a successful linen supply company since 1889, we know our business and we want you to join us! Below is a detailed description of the job. Please apply online at Alsco.com or: https://rn22.ultipro.com/ALS1001/jobboard/NewCandidateExt.aspx?__JobID=6408 Classification:Exempt for ?Base plus Commission? routes, Non-Exempt for hourly routes. Job Summary:The Route Sales Representative meets our customers? needs through up-selling/cross-selling and provides superior customer service through proactively managing all route responsibilities. Performs other duties as required. Reports to the District Manager.Essential Functions:- Solicit new customers, up-sell/cross-sell/sample all lines of service or product and ensure a profitable product mix.- Actively participate in promotions and contests, training and audits.- Follow company policies and procedures regarding installation of new customers, managing customer needs and all aspects of service. Performance goals must be met on a regular basis.- Ensure customer loyalty, retention and provide outstanding customer service. Build relationships, communicate openly, educate customers, manage customer needs and proactively resolve concerns in cooperation with supervision.- Safely operate a delivery vehicle on each trip, following all applicable laws and company policy. Maintain vehicle cleanliness and perform regular vehicle inspections.- Handle and process customer payments. Keep route paperwork current.- Ensure timely and correct deliveries of complete textile loads, pick up soiled textiles and maintain proper inventories in accounts. Service items such as facility maintenance products.- Monitor and report competitive activity. Keep service agreements current and renewed.- Return from route and off load soiled textiles in the receiving area of facility.- Accurately prepare route paperwork and follow check-in procedures.- Follow written and verbal instructions and perform other tasks as directed by supervision.Additional Functions:- May work with and support other service personnel as required by supervision.Requirements: Qualifications:- Have and maintain a valid driver?s license, CDL when applicable.- Have and maintain a driving record free of chargeable accidents, speeding or safety violations.- Demonstrate excellent skills in the operation of vehicles and have a verifiable minimum one year experience of safe and successful driving.- Demonstrate excellent skills in customer service and route sales.- Excellent verbal and written communication skills in English, ability to comprehend and follow direction, as well as good time management skills and team player.- Recognize colors, sizes and types of product and count, add and subtract accurately.Education:- High School graduation or similar experience.Travel Requirements:- Daily, by delivery vehicle within a route.Typical Environmental Conditions:- Operating vehicles on public roads, in and out of customer locations, loading areas of a typical industrial laundry facility, Service Center or depot.- Indoor and outdoor areas of a typical industrial facility.Typical Physical Activity:- Physical Demands - sitting, grasping, driving, stooping, climbing stairs, moving carts up to 500 lbs, lifting up to 75 lbs, standing, walking, writing, speaking, hearing.Apply Now !",Route Sales Rep / Hourly Job in Crescent City,Full Time,"Crescent City, CA 95531",Rental Services,http://jobview.monster.com/route-sales-rep-5-8-hourly-job-crescent-city-ca-us-169539619.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=10,16.89+ /hour,Entry Level,00dfc823d452a3ffb9166909aabfcad4
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:18:57:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"ADS 2nd SHIFT YARD SUPERVISOR The Yard Supervisor directs the work activities of Yard personnel involved in the shipping, receiving and handling of product. Must have Supervisory Experience and knowledge of yard operations and be able to work 40+ hours and weekends. We offer a competitive salary, medical and dental and vision insurance, 401(k) and Profit Sharing programs and an Employee Stock Ownership plan. Apply at http://careers-ads-pipe.icims.com Location-London EOEThis listing brought to you by The Columbus Dispatch and www.columbusjobs.com/monster. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Monster,,"ADS 2nd SHIFT YARD SUPERVISOR The Yard Supervisor directs the work activities of Yard personnel involved in the shipping, receiving and handling of product. Must have Supervisory Experience and knowledge of yard operations and be able to work 40+ hours and weekends. We offer a competitive salary, medical and dental and vision insurance, 401(k) and Profit Sharing programs and an Employee Stock Ownership plan. Apply at http://careers-ads-pipe.icims.com Location-London EOEThis listing brought to you by The Columbus Dispatch and www.columbusjobs.com/monster. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-drivers-job-columbus-oh-us-169591528.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=14,,,6f4f92dc8295475e27a32e60bab653ed
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:50:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"KIK Custom ProductsKIK is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action Employer.Job ID 2016-3852# of Openings 1Job Location US - IN - Elkhart Posted Date 5/12/2016Division KCMOverview: Position SummaryWe are searching for a Material Planner to add to our Supply Chain Team. Our Material Planners are responsible for ensuring timely delivery of raw materials to the plant to meet our production schedules, to maintain inventory level goals, interprets changing demand, material plans and balances material inventories with the needs of a high-speed packaging facility. Our ideal candidate possesses knowledge and experience in Materials Planning, good negotiating skills, purchasing/buying in a manufacturing environment, and is a multi-tasker with above average problem solving capability.Essential Job Functions: Manage long term material requirement planning process for commodity and customer sets across plant network.Assure quality of supply plan by working with suppliers to ensure compliance with confirmation processes.Conduct capability/capacity reviews with suppliers to firm up supply plans.Participate on reviews led by our customers.Resolve material supply and safety stock issues with Plant material schedulers.Ensure purchase order planning process is compliant with customer and KIK contracts and commercial or legal requirements.Support quotes, RFQ's and standards for directed purchases.Analyze and summarize feedback on supplier performance and capabilitySupport periodic review process to refresh MOQ's, safety stock levels and lead times in order to achieve service and inventory objectives.Use integrity tools and routines to assure configuration of MRP system including quality of data.Work with customer team to support initiatives planning Qualifications: 2 years experience in manufacturing materials planningBachelor's degree MRP experience, JD Edwards experience an assetKnowledge of commercial purchasing termsExcellent communication and problem solving skillsStrong leadership skillsMust be high energy, smart with good interpersonal skills and high sense of urgencySelf motivated team playerPI94790933Apply Here",Monster,,"KIK Custom ProductsKIK is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action Employer.Job ID 2016-3852# of Openings 1Job Location US - IN - Elkhart Posted Date 5/12/2016Division KCMOverview: Position SummaryWe are searching for a Material Planner to add to our Supply Chain Team. Our Material Planners are responsible for ensuring timely delivery of raw materials to the plant to meet our production schedules, to maintain inventory level goals, interprets changing demand, material plans and balances material inventories with the needs of a high-speed packaging facility. Our ideal candidate possesses knowledge and experience in Materials Planning, good negotiating skills, purchasing/buying in a manufacturing environment, and is a multi-tasker with above average problem solving capability.Essential Job Functions: Manage long term material requirement planning process for commodity and customer sets across plant network.Assure quality of supply plan by working with suppliers to ensure compliance with confirmation processes.Conduct capability/capacity reviews with suppliers to firm up supply plans.Participate on reviews led by our customers.Resolve material supply and safety stock issues with Plant material schedulers.Ensure purchase order planning process is compliant with customer and KIK contracts and commercial or legal requirements.Support quotes, RFQ's and standards for directed purchases.Analyze and summarize feedback on supplier performance and capabilitySupport periodic review process to refresh MOQ's, safety stock levels and lead times in order to achieve service and inventory objectives.Use integrity tools and routines to assure configuration of MRP system including quality of data.Work with customer team to support initiatives planning Qualifications: 2 years experience in manufacturing materials planningBachelor's degree MRP experience, JD Edwards experience an assetKnowledge of commercial purchasing termsExcellent communication and problem solving skillsStrong leadership skillsMust be high energy, smart with good interpersonal skills and high sense of urgencySelf motivated team playerPI94790933Apply Here",,http://jobview.monster.com/material-planner-job-elkhart-in-us-169566913.aspx?mescoid=1300086001001&jobPosition=17,,,b8f019fd6c1ce47f7d7e732043b4c95d
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:50:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Meet and exceed customer experience and sales objectives for store. Supervise the overall daily operation of a store including hiring, development, discipline, and scheduling of employees to ensure an extraordinary customer experience, cost efficiency, and quality store operations. Maintain inventories at adequate levels, promote sales, and maintain the appearance of the store. Complete accounting and paperwork associated with cash receipts and prices and conducts physical inventories. Job level is determined by meeting store opportunity, customer satisfaction, audit scores, and other criteria. ROLES & RESPONSIBILITIES Customer Experience and Sales · Fully accountable for store implementation of The AT&T Retail Promise · Fully accountable for execution of sales, service and customer experience initiatives in store · Supervise store personnel to: o Meet and exceed assigned goals for: customer experience and reputation, sales and service, revenue and productivity o Demonstrate the right customer behaviors defined by Delivering an Extraordinary Experience o Ensure every seller follows the AT&T Retail Experience and executes on all 5 Key Behaviors at all times o Consistently demonstrate excellent leadership and coaching skills o Create a work environment where motivated people can excel · Oversee Store floor experience - Act as Floor General o Own Customer Coordination,Welcome and Wait Time process o Support Team and assist with customer transactions · Coach and counsel personnel on “opportunities” with key sales and reputation metrics, recognize positive performance against key sales and reputation metrics and hold people accountable for poor performance · Perform role plays with personnel on a regular basis to demonstrate “what right looks like” · Facilitate weekly personnel training/educational sessions · Monitor the Customer FeedbackTool on a daily basis · Resolve or escalate appropriately any billing or service issues Employee Management and Development · Interview, hire and make necessary discipline decisions, including terminations, for store personnel · Inspire and engage employees by motivating team to succeed · Lead by example · Develop employees for growth and promotion by delegating appropriate responsibilities and inspecting completion · Improve employee engagement throughout territory through appropriate behaviors and actions · Develop and execute individual development plans for store personnel · Observe and coach employees to provide feedback around sales technique effectiveness and providing excellent customer service · Conduct On The Spot (OTS) Coaching · Execute A & D process for direct reports · Ensure personnel adhere to the Code of Business Conduct and conduct investigations with HR as needed · Resolve quickly any Rep or Store level fraud issues communicated by ARSM, may involve working with Asset Protection and/or HQ Credit and Collections · Fully understand and assist in educating personnel on the compensation plan and ensure employees know how to maximize · Ensure Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) compliance · Approve and communicate temporary assignments and overtime for floating personnel Product Launches · Partner with Area Retail Sales Manager and other appropriate parties to successfully launch new products, services or processes · Actively inspect post-launch and drive improved results with best practices · Inspect that employees are properly trained on new products and promotions to sell with confidence · Document and report concerns with sellers’ knowledge and/or behavior and provide additional coaching and/or discipline as appropriate · Coordinate with security, facilities and mall management to ensure smooth product launch day execution Store Operations Staffing/Scheduling · Act as Floor General - responsible for all activity in store at all times · On the sales floor the majority of the time to coach and develop personnel · Partner with Area Retail Sales Manager to review headcount forecast plan and staffing · Employ Scheduling Tool to properly staff hot zones and meet business needs, training and special events such as product launches · Ensure employee preferences/constraints are loaded into the Scheduling Tool on a monthly basis Merchandising · Accountable for adhering to the iPOG and the merchandising standards · Instill a sense of pride and ownership in store appearance - where all employees understand their store is the face of AT&T to every customer Compliance · Drive operational compliance of back office processes, procedures and policies · Ensure timely completion of required training to empower personnel to succeed · Implement, execute and inspect existing and new retail programs, tools and training · Execute monthly cost reviews of overtime, discounts, returns and credits · Responsible for performing Access Review Tool (ART) periodic audits for direct employees to ensure they have the appropriate level of system/tool access for their roles and responsibilities. Other · Report fraudulent activity to Asset Protection · On call for store emergencies Demonstrate AT&T Extraordinary Leader Model Characteristics · Continuously display high integrity · Develop strategic perspective and champion change · Inspire others to high performance through collaboration and teamwork · Utilize professional expertise to solve problems and analyze issues · Capture initiative and strive for results Required Qualifications Two years sales/customer service experience in telecommunications or related industry One year management experience Excellent sales skills and demonstrated ability to meet or exceed performance standards Ability to motivate and lead direct reports Ability to work flexible hours, including evenings, weekends and holidays Ability to operate a personal computer, wireless equipment, copier and fax Desired Qualifications Three or more years sales/customer service experience in the telecommunications or related industry Previous management experience in the telecommunications or related industry Effective communication, presentation and interpersonal skills Strong organizational skills with attention to detail Ability to work at multiple locations within district preferred Familiarity with wireless terminology and AT&T Mobility systems preferred Provisions listed in these Job Descriptions may be changed or modified by AT&T Mobility without prior notice at any time, at the Company's sole discretion.",Store Manager I Mayfield Heights OH Job in Mayfield Heights,,"Mayfield Heights, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/store-manager-i-mayfield-heights-oh-job-mayfield-heights-oh-us-169469737.aspx?mescoid=1101116002005&jobPosition=12,,,63ddad2cde0ca7f611ee70d4cc866152
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:49:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.Transport Service Company - Food Grade Division, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Bloomington, IL.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and thrive!We have INCREASED our PAY PACKAGE to include increased mileage pay, loading & unloading pay and more!We're also offering premium pay to drivers with Tank Experience! Call for details.Transport Service Company - Food Grade Division provides tank truck carrier services for manufacturers of food products. With over 40 years kosher food experience, Transport Service Co. offers a variety of liquid and dry food grade equipment. Food Grade's terminal operations span the Midwest and Southeast along with several support satellite locations throughout the United States.Transport Service Co.'s Food Grade business is categorized into two product segments, sweeteners and edible products. The sweetener product segment primarily consists of corn syrup, high fructose corn syrup and liquid sugar (""sweeteners""). The edible product segment consists of other bulk liquid food products such as: glycerin, juices, molasses, sorbitol, vegetable oils, beverage alcohols and many more.Our commitment is to provide our customers with the highest level or service excellence in our industry, exceeding their requirements and bringing added value to their overall logistics strategies. We differentiate ourselves with a driver-friendly culture that emphasizes a 100% commitment to safety and various quality-of-life opportunities for professional drivers.Company Drivers:Regional & OTR Flexible home time Competitive pay Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental and Vision plans Paid vacations and holidays 401K with company match Paid training on safe driving and product handling Satellite Dispatch Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with Transport Service Company.We require Class A CDL with 1 year recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank endorsement (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.Call 800-871-4581 for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.",Class A CDL Driver - TSC Job in Bloomington,Full Time Employee,"Bloomington, IL",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-tsc-job-bloomington-il-us-169573700.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=9,,Logistics/Transportation,eab68b4276178cc35c0f3d30e4a14f0b
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:31:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"With Staff Management | SMX, you'll get a weekly paycheck, learn new skills, meet new people, and work with a great management team in a clean and safe environment.Warehouse/Distribution Positions Available Perform the required duties with safety and quality as the top priority. Take pride in your work and your daily productivity. Measure your individual contributions yet enjoy a team of individuals performing a similar function.Job Responsibilities:Staff Management | SMX, is hiring warehouse associates to load, unload, and sort boxes for delivery service drivers. You will need to read work orders and follow oral instructions to identify package destinations. Be prepared to work in a fast paced and casual environment.Part Time3rd Shift Associate Requirements: HS Diploma or GED Able to Lift 49 pounds Must be at least 18 years oldAssociate Benefits: Direct Deposit or Cash Card pay options Weekly paychecks Paid Training Paid Sick Leave Earn $14.00 per hour Referral BonusWork Location  Amazon-DSF1-7067990 Beecher StSan Leandro, CA 94577 Recruiting LocationPlease bring 2 forms of ID with you. One should be a government-issued photo ID like a Driver's License, Military card or Passport. Please visit our off site recruiting office.Amazon-DSF1-7067 39249 Cedar Blvd. Newark, CA 94560 (510) 792-4641 EOE",Monster,,"With Staff Management | SMX, you'll get a weekly paycheck, learn new skills, meet new people, and work with a great management team in a clean and safe environment.Warehouse/Distribution Positions Available Perform the required duties with safety and quality as the top priority. Take pride in your work and your daily productivity. Measure your individual contributions yet enjoy a team of individuals performing a similar function.Job Responsibilities:Staff Management | SMX, is hiring warehouse associates to load, unload, and sort boxes for delivery service drivers. You will need to read work orders and follow oral instructions to identify package destinations. Be prepared to work in a fast paced and casual environment.Part Time3rd Shift Associate Requirements: HS Diploma or GED Able to Lift 49 pounds Must be at least 18 years oldAssociate Benefits: Direct Deposit or Cash Card pay options Weekly paychecks Paid Training Paid Sick Leave Earn $14.00 per hour Referral BonusWork Location  Amazon-DSF1-7067990 Beecher StSan Leandro, CA 94577 Recruiting LocationPlease bring 2 forms of ID with you. One should be a government-issued photo ID like a Driver's License, Military card or Passport. Please visit our off site recruiting office.Amazon-DSF1-7067 39249 Cedar Blvd. Newark, CA 94560 (510) 792-4641 EOE",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-worker-job-san-leandro-ca-us-169518082.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=15,,,f402cc76133108f1fa06265a186e8f35
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:30:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: Leads and performs Customer Service functions regarding a specific or assigned number or assigned customers which could include regional, dedicated or National Accounts. Will work in conjunction with other internal departments to achieve territorial balance of capacity and freight while achieving high service levels. Will take total responsibility of ensuring all requirements are met company wide in regards to Customer expectations.Lead two (2) JIT/ high exposure accounts or one major account for Swift and have the skill set necessary to meet customer expectations.Lead and solicit business from a specific or assigned number of customers by using daily available capacity. Serve as an extension of Sales to expand business revenue by exploring all dedicated, rail and logistics opportunities with Customers. Be aware of the system wide balance/imbalance within the Swift network to book freight accordingly.Serve as Customer's first line of communication and refer Customer to the proper departments if/when necessary (i.e. Pricing, claims, etc.) Responsible for managing service issues by researching and coding all applicable service failures in the system to support accurate service reporting. Responsible for monitoring and tracing loads so that follow up can be made to Customers regarding late pickups and or deliveries; as well as any other changes that may occur. Anticipate and facilitate problem resolution on all load issues to meet or exceed total satisfaction of Customers.Commit to and receive detailed customer load information by telephone, fax or electronic tendering, and input all load information into the system accurately to ensure system integrity.Maintains knowledge of customer contractual requirements relative to trailer pools in order to keep turns at the level set to gain optimum utilization of company equipment..Responsible for managing and clearing assigned user discrepancy queue to expedite the billing process to ensure the number of days from e-calls to cash are minimized for cash flow optimization.Responsible for managing EDI related requirements regarding 214 Status releasing or other similar electronic transmissions as required by Customer.Create monthly reports regarding service levels for customers as well as participate on any service oriented conference calls to supply definition.Maintain a positive work atmosphere by acting and communicating in a manner which facilitates the success of business operations in order to meet company and customer requirements.Perform additional duties as assigned by leadership.Skills: Must possess professional skills deemed necessary to interact with Customers on a corporate level including making on-site visits when warranted. Use exemplary telephone skills to present a quality oriented image where the Customer is treated in a consistent, courteous, and efficient manner, so that the impression is one of excellence. Ability to set priorities and to communicate to areas involving changes that could affect daily operations. Keyboard skills, working knowledge of PC and AS400, Excel, Word, ability to work in a fast-paced team environment, excellent time management skills.Education: High School Diploma or GEDExperience Required: Minimum of three (3) years (five years is preferred) Customer Service or Customer Service Relationship experience required preferably in related industry; one (1) two (2) years of internal Customer Service Representative III preferred. Position RequirementsMust possess professional skills deemed necessary to interact with Customers on a corporate level including making on-site visits when warranted. Use exemplary telephone skills to present a quality oriented image where the Customer is treated in a consistent, courteous, and efficient manner, so that the impression is one of excellence. Ability to set priorities and to communicate to areas involving changes that could affect daily operations. Keyboard skills, working knowledge of PC and AS400, Excel, Word, ability to work in a fast-paced team environment, excellent time management skills. Required EducationHigh School Diploma or GED Required ExperienceMinimum of three (3) years (five years is preferred) Customer Service or Customer Service Relationship experience required preferably in related industry; one (1) two (2) years of internal Customer Service Representative III preferred.",Customer Service Representative Level Iv Job in Greer,"Full Time, Employee","Greer, SC","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-level-iv-job-greer-sc-us-169469104.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=19,,,61aebcc329b7b4fdb9f501bf5c96d691
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:24:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is accepting applications for temporary, seasonal full-time Package Delivery Drivers. This is a physical, fast-paced, outdoor position that involves continual lifting, lowering and carrying packages that typically weigh 25 - 35 lbs. and may weigh up to 70 lbs. A DOT physical exam is required. Package Delivery Drivers must have excellent customer contact and driving skills. Some UPS facilities may require the ability to drive a delivery vehicle with a standard (manual) transmission. Qualified applicants must have a valid driver’s license issued in the state that they live. Package Delivery Drivers are expected to comply with UPS appearance guidelines and wear the company-provided uniform.Full-time UPS employees work eight or more hours each weekday (Monday through Friday) and typically do not work on weekends or selected holidays.This job posting includes information about the minimum qualifications (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines), locations, shifts, and operations within the locations which may consider my application.  An applicant or employee may request an exception or change to, or an accommodation of, any condition of employment (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines) because of a sincerely held religious belief or practice.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Package Delivery Driver Job in Brewer,,"Brewer, ME 04412",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-package-delivery-driver-job-brewer-me-us-169436355.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=13,,Logistics/Transportation,dc62f625ebeb07c98b7fb146393b11c8
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:21:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is hiring individuals to work as part-time Package Handlers. This is a physical, fast-paced position that involves continual lifting, lowering and sliding packages that typically weigh 25 - 35 lbs. and may weigh up to 70 lbs. Part-time employees usually work 3 ½ - 4 hours each weekday (Monday through Friday) and typically do not work on weekends or selected holidays.Package Handlers receive a competitive hourly rate and also an attractive benefits package. Please note that these opportunities are part-time only working approximately 17 1/2 – 20 hours per week.UPS provides an excellent employment opportunity for students. Through the UPS Earn and Learn program, our student employees receive all the paid benefits of a great part-time job with UPS, plus outstanding education assistance of up to $2,625 per semester / $5,250 per year with a maximum lifetime benefit of $25,000. This assistance can be used for tuition, books and fees as long as you are attending an approved college, university, trade or technical school. You will be eligible for the Earn and Learn program on your first day of work.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Package Handler - Part-Time - Entry Level Warehouse Support Job in Garden City,,"Garden City, KS 67846",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-package-handler-part-time-entry-level-warehouse-support-job-garden-city-ks-us-168970643.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=2,,Logistics/Transportation,7c363b3bfcfff99f13fafb08285726bc
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:07:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Must meet DIRECTV state-specific minimum age requirement. High school diploma or equivalent required. Must possess a valid driver's license in the primary state of residence. Must be able to speak clearly, concisely, and to communicate effectively in a courteous and professional manner. Solid written communication skills required. Must be able to work full time, up to and including six days a week; which may include nights, weekends, and holidays, as required. Must meet company hiring criteria for pre-employment screening, including drug test, criminal background check, fitness for duty, and MVR check. Must be able to obtain all necessary certifications, including SBCA, Service, SW iM, and Ka/Ku, as required. Must be able to expect and embrace change. Working knowledge of Microsoft Office and inventory software systems preferred. SBCA and/or other industry certifications preferred. Six months experience in telecommunications, electrical, construction, or related field preferred. Working knowledge of handheld electronics, including smart phones, ipads, etc., preferred. Must be able to lift up to 75 pounds and climb ladders up to 40feet in length. Must be able to work in tight spaces, including attics and crawl spaces. Must be able to work outside in extreme weather conditions, including precipitation and temperature variations. Must be able to stand for extended periods of time. An essential duty of the position of Technician is to install satellite dishes with the use of a ladder on customers ‘homes. The ladders used by DIRECTV have been rated by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI)to hold a maximum total weight (including tool belt and equipment)of 375 lbs. To allow for the weight of equipment an individual's weight cannot exceed 325 lbs. *To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The qualifications and requirements listed are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. DIRECTV employees are committed, dependable, professional and accountable. We value integrity, honesty and respect for others. We have high standards for how our employees conduct themselves at work and in the communities we support. Come join our team as we entertain the Future. Qualifications Must meet DIRECTV state-specific minimum age requirement. High school diploma or equivalent required. Must possess a valid driver's license in the primary state of residence. Must be able to speak clearly, concisely, and to communicate effectively in a courteous and professional manner. Solid written communication skills required. Must be able to work full time, up to and including six days a week; which may include nights, weekends, and holidays, as required. Must meet company hiring criteria for pre-employment screening, including drug test, criminal background check, fitness for duty, and MVR check. Must be able to obtain all necessary certifications, including SBCA, Service, SW iM, and Ka/Ku, as required. Must be able to expect and embrace change. Working knowledge of Microsoft Office and inventory software systems preferred. SBCA and/or other industry certifications preferred. Six months experience in telecommunications, electrical, construction, or related field preferred. Working knowledge of handheld electronics, including smart phones, ipads, etc., preferred. Must be able to lift up to 75 pounds and climb ladders up to 40feet in length. Must be able to work in tight spaces, including attics and crawl spaces. Must be able to work outside in extreme weather conditions, including precipitation and temperature variations. Must be able to stand for extended periods of time. An essential duty of the position of Technician is to install satellite dishes with the use of a ladder on customers ‘homes. The ladders used by DIRECTV have been rated by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI)to hold a maximum total weight (including tool belt and equipment)of 375 lbs. To allow for the weight of equipment an individual's weight cannot exceed 325 lbs. *To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The qualifications and requirements listed are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. DIRECTV employees are committed, dependable, professional and accountable. We value integrity, honesty and respect for others. We have high standards for how our employees conduct themselves at work and in the communities we support. Come join our team as we entertain the Future. Job Home Services",Satellite Installation Technician Job in Liberal,,"Liberal, KS",,http://jobview.monster.com/satellite-installation-technician-job-liberal-ks-us-169115383.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=4,,,4f0c11f5bba9670d134ab12caf9bccae
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:06:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS Freight Truckload is hiring individuals to work as Full-time Flatbed Dedicated OTR Drivers. This position involves the driving of a tractor-trailer for the over-the-road delivery of freight to two or more locations. Dedicated drivers are primarily assigned to run freight for one customer, and may be assigned to an operation based at a specific customer location. These drivers are normally on the road from three to five days at a time.The term dedicated refers to the customer, not a particular lane or destination.Dedicated Drivers must pass a DOT physical and successfully pass a UPS Freight road test. Qualified applicants must have a valid Class A Commercial Drivers’ License with Haz-Mat endorsement. Dedicated Drivers are expected to comply with all appearance standards. Applicants must be at least 21 years of age. Applicants must be able to read, write and speak the English language. Applicants must also meet the Department of Transportation (DOT) and Company mental and physical requirements; and must be physically and mentally able to safely perform the essential job functions without obvious risk of injury to the employee or co-workers. Applicants must receive satisfactory results from a background check, as conducted in accordance with applicable laws; and must pass a drug screening.This job posting includes information about the minimum qualifications (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines), locations, shifts, and operations within the locations which may consider my application.  An applicant or employee may request an exception or change to, or an accommodation of, any condition of employment (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines) because of a sincerely held religious belief or practice.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Flatbed OTR CDL A Tractor-Trailer Truckload Driver (HazMat REQ) Dedicated Job in Pensacola,,"Pensacola, FL 32501",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-flatbed-otr-cdl-a-tractor-trailer-truckload-driver-hazmat-req-dedicated-job-pensacola-fl-us-169438035.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=1,,Logistics/Transportation,17d773d654df33502c24eed6eee555ed
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:06:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you.  (NYSE: XPO) Join XPO Logistics for the respect you deserve on day one and career opportunities moving forward.   At XPO Logistics, our rewarding culture is built on teamwork and respect. Safety is our #1 core value, so we maintain a fleet which includes new Freightliner®Cascadia® tractors with state-of-the-art technology. Each is equipped with Drive Safe Systems™ (DSS) which alerts drivers to potential safety risks and helps them respond. XPO Logistics trucks were also recently rated as best-maintained in the industry by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.   As a Driver Sales Representative (DSR) you can help us serve our customers better while you help yourself with many opportunities to advance your career. Great pay and benefits complete the package that makes XPO Logistics a rewarding culture. All this, and you’ll get to go home every day.   XPO Logistics goes the extra mile for you: Our DSRs are recognized among the best in the industry. Every day, you’ll be supported by a friendly team and state-of-the-art technology. Your ideas will be heard. You will have real opportunities to advance your career. You’ll get great pay, great benefits and the pride that comes from a rewarding career. XPO Logistics invests in safety: New Freightliner® Cascadia® tractors with the latest technologies. The first and only major LTL carrier to deploy significant safety technology as an integrated system across the entire fleet. More National Truck Driving Championship Champions than any other LTL carrier. Our drivers have recorded over 2 billion miles of safe driving. Five XPO Logistics DSRs have driven over three million miles without an accident.  Description of Essential Job Functions: Drive (under both the DOT regulations and in the opinion of the company); unload & load freight off/on trailers; lift freight and other objects of various shapes, sizes and weights (up to 50 lbs frequently and greater than 75 lbs occasionally); safely operate heavy equipment; move, position and connect/disconnect a converter dolly with an average weight/pull force of approximately 128 lbs; safely climb in and out of a tractor cab and trailer; sit for extended periods of time in a truck tractor and/or forklift; safely walk and stand for extended periods of time on various surfaces that may be uneven or slippery; operate a tractor/trailer combination up to 11 consecutive hours, in all types of weather, while safely transporting hazardous/non-hazardous materials; and safely walk, reach (including above your head), bend, climb, push, pull, twist, squat & kneel as necessary to perform the job duties.  Safely operate tractor-trailer combination, including doubles (and triples, where applicable). Perform vehicle inspections required under section 396.13 of the Federal Motor Carriers Safety Regulations. Maintain a current Class A CDL with Hazardous Materials, Doubles/Triples  and Tanker Vehicle (Tanker) endorsements. Operate and maintain records in accordance with Federal Motor Carrier Safety Regulations (FMCSR), Department of Transportation (DOT) and company policies as required. Provide service excellence to customers including generating sales leads to appropriate personnel. Able to work a flexible schedule and as many as 12-14 hours in a day, including any of the shifts (day, evening, night and weekend). Prompt, daily attendance at assigned work location. Perform other duties as assigned. Compensation & Benefits:   Pay starts at $21.30 per hour and may also include the opportunity for overtime and an annual company bonus. Benefit plans are based on length of employment, beginning with 401k eligibility and expanding up to full medical, dental, vision, prescription, life insurance and disability. XPO Logistics is a great opportunity for a challenging career with tremendous growth potential and the flexibility to be home every day.   Skills & Experience: Possess and maintain a valid Class A Commercial driver's license. Hazardous materials endorsement required. Doubles/Triples endorsement required. Tank Vehicle endorsement (Tankers) required. Must be 21 years of age or older. Forklift experience preferred. Safe driving record and history. Pass DOT drug test and have no prior positive tests or refusals. Pass a company paid DOT physical. Pass a company paid Post Offer Pre-Hire screen (physical essential functions) test.    “We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer.  Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.”   Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 5%",Truck Driver Job in Council Bluffs,"Full Time, Employee","Council Bluffs, IA 51501",,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-job-council-bluffs-ia-us-169531610.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=2,,Logistics/Transportation,5aac6382df92fc9db0a18c7adcc6e6fb
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:06:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Our Organization Composites One LLC is a family-owned distributor with over 60 years of composites experience. Our network of 32 local distribution centers is dedicated to serving the composites manufacturing industry. With more than 30,000 products from over 400 supplier partners reaching over 9,000 customers, Composites One is the leading distributor of composites materials in North America. Visit us at www.compositesone.com.This position is responsible for the accurate receipt, shipment, storage, and production process of materials according to all established Company and regulatory policies and procedures.  Primary Responsibilities: Ensures accurate and timely receipt of all materials following FIFO and potential freight claim procedures while supporting all freight and safety policies. Receives and unloads inbound material; processes inbound shipments, stock material, processes customer returns and notifies management of damaged shipments Performs a variety of warehouse duties such as pull/assemble customer orders, check outbound orders for accuracy/completeness, inventory stock checks, restock and label vendor product, move, store and replenish material, and conduct daily cycle counts as required. Picks, packs and ships material in a manner that professionally represents Composites one and suppliers Maintains the integrity of materials through proper handling and storage Helps maintain a clean and organized facility by sweeping, trash removal, etc.Position Requirements: A minimum of 2 years related experience in a warehouse environment, including experience with order picking, shipping, receiving, inventory counts, pick/pack. Knowledge of FIFO, OSHA requirements, safety awareness and hazardous materials shipping. Forklift certification strongly preferred; ability to use manual and electric pallet jack, drum dolly, floor scrubber, slitter and other warehouse equipment. Ability to learn internal database and software systems. Ability to work efficiently and independently, with minimal supervision. HS Diploma, GED or equivalent. CDL A license a plus.Physical Requirements: Moderate to heavy physical activity; ability to independently lift up to 75 pounds. Ability to walk and/or stand for entire length of shift; regularly required to stoop, kneel, crouch, bend or crawl; may be required to sometimes sit, climb or balance. Ability to reach, grasp, push and pull with hands and arms. Close vision, distance vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and ability to adjust focus; hand-eye coordination.Benefits Include: Health Insurance (Medical, Dental, Vision), 401K Plan with Company Match and Profit Sharing, Paid Time Off, Flexible Spending Accounts (Health and Dependent Care), Employee Assistance Program, Educational Assistance Program.Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) Qualified applicants are considered for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability, or other protected classification as defined by applicable law and regulation.ADA Accommodations Accommodations are available for applicants with disabilities in all phases of the application and employment process. To request an accommodation please contact the ADA Coordinator by email at ADACoordinator@compositesone.com.PI94763746Apply Here",General Warehouse Job in Ashtabula,Full Time,"Ashtabula, OH 44004",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/general-warehouse-job-ashtabula-oh-us-169423660.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=14,Hourly Wage,,9d32a75e0f7525a6c48f4f5005fdcac6
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:06:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Warehouse Manager – NightsUp to $100,000 per year, based on experience  Uline – Shipping Supply Specialists  ""The people I work with are as passionate as I am."" ""I came to Uline for a job. Instead, I found a career."" Uline is North America's leading distributor of shipping, packaging and industrial supplies. We're a family-owned company known for our incredible customer service and quality products. Our people make the difference.  We're looking for the best and brightest to take our Warehouse department to the next level. If you have passion and expertise in distribution, shipping and receiving, forklift operation, or picking and packing, Uline is the company for you.Uline seeks Night Shift Warehouse Managers for its upcoming branch in Kenosha, Wisconsin (south of Milwaukee).Kenosha branch is scheduled to open in 2017!Immediate openings for all positions!Join us to experience why Uline has been designated with the Forbes 2016 America’s Best Employers award. HOURS: Sunday - Thursday, 9:30 PM to 6 AM. POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES Manage nightly operations of warehouse, including: receiving, restock, transfers and facility clean up. Manage a staff of 80+ employees. Responsible for multiple layers of leadership. Lead and develop warehouse team to set up and enable outbound operations to provide unparalleled customer service. Maintain high levels of accuracy in inventory integrity and daily operations.Great career growth opportunities. MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS Bachelor's degree. Supervisory experience.Knowledge of warehouse procedures. Strong problem-solving skills. BENEFITS Complete insurance coverage – medical, dental, vision, life.401(k) with company match.Generous paid time off.Tuition reimbursement.3 bonus programs. Please visit www.uline.com/jobs to learn more about our job openings and benefits package. HOW TO APPLY Please click the “APPLY” button to submit your resume for immediate consideration! EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled",Warehouse Manager - Nights - Up to $,"Full Time , Employee","Milwaukee, WI 53201",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-manager-nights-up-to-100-000-per-year-job-milwaukee-wi-us-168672201.aspx?mescoid=1100025001001&jobPosition=4,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),40f2482e40996a7f4b110c96993df9b6
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:06:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a buyer. [Additional Description]This job will have the following responsibilities:REGIONAL distributor seeks a replenishment buyer. Responsible for assigned category procurement, inventory turns, stock status, vendor relations and allowances. 2+ yrs experience. BS/BA degree required- LOCAL candidates onlyFor IMMEDIATE consideration- Send current resume and salary to:David Scarborough  wds@judge.com  682-518-8142",buyer Job in Carneys Point,"Full Time, Employee","Carneys Point, NJ",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/buyer-job-carneys-point-nj-us-169531473.aspx?mescoid=1300068001001&jobPosition=5,,Logistics/Transportation,6daad0cd9517aa128a6959f41e752213
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:17:06:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.Advantage Tank Lines, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, now hasopen positions out of Dayton, OH!Apply today!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your LifeOwner-OperatorsLocal / home daily positions Competitive pay- percentage contracts Health insurance plans available 100% of Fuel Surcharge paid to Owner-Operator 100% of Billable Pump or Compressor Charge paid to Owner-Operator Excellent plans to purchase base plates Bobtail and Occ/Acc insurance Discounts on new truck purchases In-house maintenance repairs available Discounted fuel No forced dispatch Paid weekly Driver referral incentive pay*Independent contractors referring their own lease drivers are not eligible for referral payments And so much more!We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and be home daily!We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with Advantage Tank Lines.We require Class A CDL with 2 years recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank and Hazmat endorsements (or ability to obtain), TWIC - Transportation Worker Identification Credential (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.Call 800-871-4581 for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.Kenan Advantage Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Class A CDL Driver - ATL Job in Dayton,Full Time Employee,"Dayton, OH",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-atl-job-dayton-oh-us-169487602.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=15,,Logistics/Transportation,d28cd04398aa9271846610bae3e235d0
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:58:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS Supply Chain Solutions is currently seeking a Customs Brokerage Representative II. The ideal candidate will have a minimum of one year Customs Brokerage / Import / Export experience and will be familiar with HTS, customs regulations and OGA clearances.  The candidate will also have the knowledge and skills usually gained through a minimum of two years of general office or customer service experience.The Customs Brokerage Representative II responsibilities include but are not limited to the following: Preparation of customs entries and forwarding freight to designated locations. This may involve interface with international and domestic carriers, overseas offices, and importers.Prepare Customs entries and follow-up with the clearance process on all entries prepared.Communicate documentation discrepancies to client and supervisor.Coordinate freight delivery to designated locations.Resolve finance and accounting reconciliation exchange issues.Responsible for filing entries to customs via the Brokerage System in a timely and accurate manner.Responsibilities may include scanning entries into the SDIS system meeting allotted and sensitive time requirements.Administrative responsibilities include preparation of reports/presentations and analysis using various software packages and databases.Document review and assessment of accuracy, verifying country of origin/export, IOR, terms of sale and value to ensure that compliance and federal regulation requirements are achieved.Daily follow up on documentation discrepancy issues which requires the ability to troubleshoot and communicate effectively, both verbally and in writing with customers and foreign origins.Establish and maintain client relationships.All other task as assigned by supervisor and or manager.Position may require a weekend schedule on a department rotation basis and not limited to working a holiday schedule based on the needs of the operation and requirements of the account.This job description is intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by persons assigned to this classification. It is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all job responsibilities, duties and skills required for this position.  Minimum Requirements: At least two years of customer service, general office, or data entry experience.High School diploma or equivalentProficiency in Microsoft OfficeAccurate and rapid data entryStrong attention to detailExcellent verbal and written communications skillsProven organizational skillsAt least one year of Customs Brokerage or Import/Export experienceAbility to multi-task.Team oriented playerThe ability to project a professional image to the customer and to represent UPS SCS in a positive manner.US Customs Classification and BOSS (program) experience is desirable.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS CBR II - Air/Ocean Dept  - Job in Blaine,,"Blaine, WA 98230",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-cbr-ii-air-ocean-dept-1000-1830-job-blaine-wa-us-169520561.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=10,,Logistics/Transportation,f3e2967cef7abbde3e7e7550390c1401
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:57:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is hiring individuals to work as part-time Package Handlers. This is a physical, fast-paced position that involves continual lifting, lowering and sliding packages that typically weigh 25 - 35 lbs. and may weigh up to 70 lbs. Part-time employees usually work 3 ½ - 4 hours each weekday (Monday through Friday) and typically do not work on weekends or selected holidays.Package Handlers receive a competitive hourly rate and also an attractive benefits package. Please note that these opportunities are part-time only working approximately 17 1/2 – 20 hours per week.UPS provides an excellent employment opportunity for students. Through the UPS Earn and Learn program, our student employees receive all the paid benefits of a great part-time job with UPS, plus outstanding education assistance of up to $2,625 per semester / $5,250 per year with a maximum lifetime benefit of $25,000. This assistance can be used for tuition, books and fees as long as you are attending an approved college, university, trade or technical school. You will be eligible for the Earn and Learn program on your first day of work.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Package Handler - Part-Time - Entry Level Warehouse Support Job in O'neill,,"O'neill, NE 68763",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-package-handler-part-time-entry-level-warehouse-support-job-o'neill-ne-us-167429866.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=13,,Logistics/Transportation,39b9adff774432f2e6d5111b3dd26ce7
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:35:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: To manage, direct and assist Terminal Service Leaders in all areas of responsibility. Ensure terminal shop, operations, and customer needs are met and processes are in place.Manages designated outside terminal service managers including measuring performance, shop productivity, budgets, staffing, and discipline/discharge at these shop facilities. Responsible for annual budgeting, cost control, leadership review, contract review, and approval of processes/protocol development.Develops, sustains, and drives the implementation of Standard Operating Procedures, strategies for decreasing cost per mile, improving equipment reliability, improving Miles per Gallon, execution improvements, and process changes to the region.Monitor and interact with all aspects of their region and outside customer sites to reduce costs and breakdown frequency.Travels to off-site terminal shop facilities a minimum of three times per year. Performs evaluations of shops, Leaders, technicians and support personnel.Prepares month end closing of financials for the Maintenance departments and completes RAILS for each cost center that is over budget. Reconciles with Finance; prepares and maintains cost reports; provides budget information to the VP of Shop Operations and other department managersRecommends operational changes necessitated by high maintenance costs and poor reliability. Suggest alternative policies and procedures to enable the company to accomplish its maintenance objectives.Responsible for requesting the disposition of undesirable, under-utilized, and wrecked equipment, that is located within the region at terminals and customer sites to the Asset Sales team so they can arrange disposition.Works closely with the Sales team and assists were needed to resolve issues at customer sites.Responsible for failure resolution and continued efficiency of equipment.For shops with eight or fewer employees, responsible for the salary administration, staffing, and discipline/discharge at these shop facilities.Skills: Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite; possess excellent written and verbal communication skills with all levels of the organization; ability to manage significant budgets; possess strong negotiation and diplomacy skills; ability to make prompt decisions; complex problem solving skills and high-level analytical thinking; ability to perform strategic and progressive analysis toward constant improvements; detail-oriented.Education: Baccalaureate from an accredited university or college OR technical school graduate OR a minimum of 10 years in the maintenance transportation industry High School Diploma or GEDExperience Required: Ten years maintenance experience in the transportation industry and five years supervisory experience. One additional year of the required maintenance experience may be substituted for each one year of college. Position RequirementsProficient with Microsoft Office Suite; possess excellent written and verbal communication skills with all levels of the organization; ability to manage significant budgets; possess strong negotiation and diplomacy skills; ability to make prompt decisions; complex problem solving skills and high-level analytical thinking; ability to perform strategic and progressive analysis toward constant improvements; detail-oriented. Required EducationBaccalaureate from an accredited university or college OR technical school graduate OR a minimum of 10 years in the maintenance transportation industry High School Diploma or GED Required ExperienceTen years maintenance experience in the transportation industry and five years supervisory experience. One additional year of the required maintenance experience may be substituted for each one year of college.",Regional Maintenance Director Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/regional-maintenance-director-job-columbus-oh-us-169527164.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=10,,,7f8bc237a1f505391b13ecb434d6bafb
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:35:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Almo Distributing is a major multi-regional distributor of appliances and consumer electronics. Almo has been in the distribution business for over 65 years and has expanded to cover more than two-thirds of the United States. We are currently seeking a capable and reliable individual with good work ethic and attention to detail to join our 3rd shift Wisconsin warehouse team. Ideal candidate will have 2+ years warehouse distribution experience with forklift experience and a minimum of 1 year experience operating a Clamp Truck. We offer an exciting work opportunity in a growing & forward-thinking company. Full benefits package offered. Equal Opportunity Employer EOE/AA M/F/Disabled/Veteran For consideration, please complete our on-line application and resume attachment no later than August 7, 2016*Loading/Unloading trucks *Processing Orders *General Warehouse Duties * Forklift Operation * Clamp Operation-Forklift and clamp experience needed -Work well in a team environment -Possess a minimum of 5 years warehouse experience -Ability to lift 50 pounds -Basic Computer knowledgePI94778792Apply Here",Warehouse - Equipment Operator Job in Mequon,Full Time,"Mequon, WI 53097",Wholesale Trade/Import-Export,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-equipment-operator-job-mequon-wi-us-169481628.aspx?mescoid=4700802001001&jobPosition=17,,,52378a21efa7cdccdef826c2c63788fe
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:35:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Works in a fast-paced production environment known as an automated central fill pharmacy. Performs warehouse operations such as packing prescriptions, receiving, put away, cycle count process and shipping. Maintains continuous, consistent work flow in order to meet daily production goals. Manipulates packaging and sorting equipment and finished prescriptions going to stores. The incumbent is also required to perform all tasks in observance of Rite Aid's brand and strategy and adhere to our core values and service attributes. Multiple shifts are availableThe Facility is open Sunday thru Thursday The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned:•Assists in stocking shelves and maintaining inventory•Receives and stores incoming supplies•Sorts orders by store location and places in totes for shipping•Unloads product from truck•Manages/Manipulates store sortation system and delivery of totes to stores including paletization and strapping of totes.•Maintains the floor in a clean and orderly condition•Reads computer generated screens to find indicated merchandise on labeled shelves, verify size and strength of the product before putting product away•Processes orders for shipping•Folds and packs paperwork with prescriptions to prepare for shipping•Verifies paperwork with received items from DC•Separates product by lot numbers and expiration dates•Manages/Manipulates packing stations including the use of manual and automated bagging devices•Manages/Manipulates mail manifesting stations and weigh scalesSupervisory ResponsibilitiesThis position currently has no supervisory responsibilities. Qualification RequirementsTo perform this job successfully, the associate must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skills, and/or abilities required: •H.S. Diploma or General Education Degree (GED) preferred. •Minimal experience in CRT/PC preferred.•Minimal experience in Warehouse preferred.PI94786979Apply Here",Inventory & Packaging Clerk - Central Fill Job in Delran,Full Time Employee,"Delran, NJ 08075",All,http://jobview.monster.com/inventory-packaging-clerk-central-fill-job-delran-nj-us-169521410.aspx?mescoid=5101012001001&jobPosition=3,,Logistics/Transportation,c71a5bccc61fe7ad64fa4683ab581efd
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:35:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink is the third largest telecommunications company in the United States and is recognized as a leader in the network services market by technology industry analyst firms. The company is a global leader in cloud infrastructure and hosted IT solutions for enterprise customers. CenturyLink provides data, voice and managed services in local, national and select international markets through its high-quality advanced fiber-optic network and multiple data centers for businesses and consumers. CenturyLink is an S&P 500 company and is included among the Fortune 500 list of America’s largest corporations.　We are looking for a Senior Level Full-Stack Java Developer to join a growing, dynamic Software Engineering Team. The right person will have experience developing software by following various development methodologies and the ability to bring and apply the best of breed practices to the projects.　Job Responsibilities:Provide technical direction in the creation, delivery and integration of complex software solutions.Analyze, Architect, Design and Develop Software applications.Work with Business Partners, Architects and Business Analysts to define a solution that achieves the technical and business objectives of the project.Partner with other application teams to ensure optimal design and execution.Guide the project team to ensure they understand their deliverables and devise a plan for delivering them.Provide hands-on development of deliverables.Provide insight into the support and maintenance requirements for the solution.Ensure that the project team is following the company’s software development process.Be flexible to lead and work with diverse onshore and offshore teams.　Minimum Qualifications:Minimum 7 years experience in Software Development.Experience with Java, JEE, EJB, JMS, JSP, HTML, Struts, AJAX, Hibernate, XML, XSLT, XSD, PL/SQL, shell scripting, Web Services.Familiarity with emerging technologies like – AngularJS, JQuery, RESTful servicesKnowledge of Eclipse, SQL Plus, TOAD, SQL Loader, JBOSS, Weblogic, Apache, Oracle Preferred Qualifications:Experience and background in developing applications in the Telecommunications environment and strong understanding of Enterprise Products and ServicesStrong fundamentals with the ability to understand industry directions towards convergence and how it applies to application development.　Job Req 602 DICE4  Alternate Location: Monroe, LA (Louisiana)Company StatementCenturyLink is an industry-leading provider of communications, high speed Internet and entertainment services from coast to coast.  Our combination of business and residential service solutions – including home and wireless voice solutions and digital television – provide innovative solutions to our customers.  CenturyLink is proud to be a participant in the U.S. General Services Administration Networx program, the largest communications services contract in the world.  CenturyLink offers you the opportunity to develop and cultivate your career as we lead the communications industry into the future.Disclaimer:The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Sr Java Developer Job in Monroe,Full Time Employee,"Monroe, LA 71203",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-java-developer-job-monroe-la-us-169376461.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=1,,,b2ab82afd7ea001a8f11b805de61b1ee
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:35:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a warehouse supervisor. [Additional Description]This job will have the following responsibilities:Regional distributor seeks warehouse supervisor for growth opportunity in Carneys Point, New Jersey. DAY SHIFT!  Industry experience in food / perishable distribution a plus. High volume - 24/7 operation- nonunion workforce- strong leadership skills / supervision. BS/BA degree requirement. GREAT company - benefits + incentive bonus program- stable work history- LOCAL candidatesFor Immediate consideration- send resume and salary to:David Scarborough  wds@judge.com  682-518-8142",warehouse supervisor Job in Carneys Point,"Full Time, Employee","Carneys Point, NJ",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-supervisor-job-carneys-point-nj-us-169531464.aspx?mescoid=1100025001001&jobPosition=6,,Logistics/Transportation,b4fec73d3f93303853aa6b8361bd7c21
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:35:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: Recruit, screen, interview and hire qualified Driver applicants to improve Driver retention and safety standards.Seek out, interview, and screen applicants to fill existing openings while maintaining current knowledge of transportation laws, DOT regulations, and Company hiring criteria, as well as maintaining and promoting Company safety goals.Offer Driver applicants the most current information. Using relevant information and individual judgment to determine whether events or processes comply with laws, regulations, or standards.Utilize computers and computer systems to set up functions, enter data, or process information, while ensuring that departmental policies and procedures are followed to the highest standard..Interview, gather, and analyze information skillfully to obtain a complete application and pre-qualify applicants.Inform potential applicants about facilities, operations, benefits, pay, and specialty and dedicated opportunities.Read, review, and understand both MVRs and DAC Reports.Communicate with internal and external stakeholders, representing the organization to customers, the public, vendors, schools, and other external sources. Develop constructive and cooperative working relationships with others and maintaining them over time.May perform additional duties as assigned by leadership.Extensive travel, as required.Skills: Proficient with Microsoft Office suite; excellent verbal and written communication skills; sound judgment and problem solving skills; thorough and detail oriented; good listening skills; selfmotivated and good interpersonal skills; constantly maintain a professional appearanceEducation: High School Diploma/GED-Bachelors degree preferredExperience Required: One year recruiting experience or one year outside sales experience (professional level) or one year OTR driving experience with Swift/MS or four years transportation experience or a Bachelors degree may be substituted for required experience. Position RequirementsProficient with Microsoft Office suite; excellent verbal and written communication skills; sound judgment and problem solving skills; thorough and detail oriented; good listening skills; selfmotivated and good interpersonal skills; constantly maintain a professional appearance Required EducationHigh School Diploma/GED-Bachelors degree preferred Required ExperienceOne year recruiting experience or one year outside sales experience (professional level) or one year OTR driving experience with Swift/MS or four years transportation experience or a Bachelors degree may be substituted for required experience.",Driver Recruiter Job in Richmond,"Full Time, Employee","Richmond, VA","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/driver-recruiter-job-richmond-va-us-169469047.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=1,,,0dcb1503eddd44c75a5b1ceea36a0416
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:35:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Enterprise Rent-A-Car is the largest and fastest growing privately owned automotive rental and leasing company in the U.S. With over 7,000 branch offices worldwide, Enterprise ranks #1 in the Insurance Replacement Market with yearly revenues of over $10 billion. The Service Agent cleans vehicles inside and out (vehicles may be cleaned by hand or by operating washing equipment). The Service Agent also performs regular maintenance (non-mechanical services), moves vehicles, and performs other duties assigned by the manager, all completed in a safe and timely manner. Our part-time positions require a minimum of 20-25 hours worked. The Service Agent is responsible for the care and maintenance of the cars on the lot. This includes vacuuming and prepping the cars, shuttling cars to and from car washes and dealerships for servicing, car transports to and from offices, checking fluid levels, and changing tires.Clean vehicle exterior by hand, brush or by operating washing equipmentPolish, dry and clean vehicle windshields, windows, lights, mats and exterior body, by handVacuum, shampoo, add air freshener and clean vehicle interior (some stain removal may be required)Determine need for and add windshield fluid, gas, oil, water and antifreezePerform basic maintenance check: antenna, under the hood, inside the vehicle, inside the trunk, and outside vehicleVerify appropriate stickers are attached to vehicle (registration, plates, etc.)May be responsible for maintaining an inventory of cleaning suppliesMay assist with local automobile deliveriesPerform miscellaneous job-related duties as assigned Equal Opportunity Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/DisabledMust be at least 18 years oldMust have a valid driver's license with no more than 2 moving violations and/or at-fault accidents on driving record in the past 3 yearsNo drug or alcohol related conviction on driving record in the past 5 yearsMust be authorized to work in the United States and not require work authorization sponsorship by our company for this position now or in the future.Must be able to work for the set pay of $9.00/hour.Apart from religious observations, m ust be able to work the following schedule: NOT TO EXCEED 25 HOURS/WEEK",Part Time Service Agent (Car Detailer) Job in Norman,,"Norman, OK",,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-service-agent-car-detailer-job-norman-ok-us-169512167.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=9,,Student (Undergraduate/Graduate),d6d2b4cc5c15eb537cf64e5d50c85697
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:14:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"15235 Statesville Road, Huntersville, NC 28078 PARTS DELIVERY DRIVERPart-Time | Hourly Pay!2 Part-Time Positions Available Now! Parks Chevrolet in Huntersville is seeking a skilled, enthusiastic and hard-working Delivery Driver to join our team of automotive parts professionals. The Delivery Driver is primarily focused on getting the right parts to the right people at the right time.As a Delivery Driver, you will be responsible for making auto parts deliveries and engaging with customers. The delivery driver position's tasks will include lifting merchandise up to 60 pounds. All applicants must submit to a drug test and background check. A clean MVR is required. Must have experience as a driver. Parts Delivery Driver - Requirements: Experience as a Driver is requiredTeam oriented and focused on maintaining a high level of customer serviceValid driver's license and clean MVRAble to lift up to 60 pounds Job Benefits: The Part-Time Delivery Driver will receive hourly pay. We provide an excellent work environment! We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. All applicants must be able to demonstrate the ability to pass pre-employment testing to include background checks, MVR, and drug screen. parts delivery driver; delivery driver; porter; dealership driver",AUTO PARTS DELIVERY DRIVER Job in Huntersville,Part Time,"Huntersville, NC 28078",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/auto-parts-delivery-driver-job-huntersville-nc-us-169483880.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ab354a5cb44676d580dc258ab4ee909c
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:14:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Enterprise Rent-A-Car is the largest and fastest growing privately owned automotive rental and leasing company with over 8,600 branch offices worldwide, Enterprise ranks #1 in the Insurance Replacement Market with yearly revenues of over $16 billion. The Service Agent cleans vehicles inside and out (vehicles may be cleaned by hand or by operating washing equipment). The Service Agent also performs regular maintenance (non-mechanical services), moves vehicles, and performs other duties assigned by the manager, all completed in a safe and timely manner.The Service Agent is responsible for the care and maintenance of the cars on the lot. This includes vacuuming and prepping the cars, shuttling cars to and from car washes and dealerships for servicing, car transports to and from offices, checking fluid levels, and changing tires.Clean vehicle exterior by hand, brush or by operating washing equipmentPolish, dry and clean vehicle windshields, windows, lights, mats and exterior body, by handVacuum, shampoo, add air freshener and clean vehicle interior (some stain removal may be required)Determine need for and add windshield fluid, gas, oil, water and antifreezePerform basic maintenance check: antenna, under the hood, inside the vehicle, inside the trunk, and outside vehicleVerify appropriate stickers are attached to vehicle (registration, plates, etc.)May be responsible for maintaining an inventory of cleaning suppliesMay assist with local automobile deliveriesPerform miscellaneous job-related duties as assigned Equal Opportunity Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/DisabledMust be at least 18 years oldMust have a valid driver's license with no more than 2 moving violations and/or at-fault accidents on driving record in the past 3 yearsNo drug or alcohol related conviction on driving record in the past 5 yearsMust be authorized to work in the United States and not require work authorization sponsorship by our company for this position now or in the future.Apart from religious observations, must be able to work the following schedule(s): not exceeding 25 hours/weekmust be available between 7:00am- 6:00pm",Part-Time Service Agent( Car detailer) Job in Lawton,,"Lawton, OK",,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-service-agent-car-detailer-job-lawton-ok-us-169512632.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=7,,Student (Undergraduate/Graduate),1d12c46de0fa22795ff168f550d53f7d
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:12:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS Freight is hiring individuals to work as Full-Time City Drivers. This position involves the driving of a tractor-trailer and the daily pick up and delivery of freight from numerous commercial and residential customers on a given route.City Drivers must pass a DOT physical and successfully pass a road test. Qualified applicants must have a valid Class A Commercial Drivers’ License with Haz-Mat and Twin Trailer endorsements, issued by this state. Pick-Up & Delivery Drivers are expected to comply with our appearance policy.Applicants must be at least 21 years of age; and must be able to read, write and speak the English language. Applicants must meet the Department of Transportation (DOT) and Company mental and physical requirements; and must be physically and mentally able to safely perform the essential job functions without obvious risk of injury to the employee or co-workers. Applicants must receive satisfactory results from a background check, as conducted in accordance with applicable laws, and must pass a drug screening.This job posting includes information about the minimum qualifications (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines), locations, shifts, and operations within the locations which may consider my application.  An applicant or employee may request an exception or change to, or an accommodation of, any condition of employment (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines) because of a sincerely held religious belief or practice.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Full-time City Driver Job in Santa Rosa,,"Santa Rosa, CA 95401",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-full-time-city-driver-job-santa-rosa-ca-us-169514680.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=6,,Logistics/Transportation,63805bc6c0008641fcb5015219d48690
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:16:12:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: Drive profitable new revenue generation within Swift Logistics through the management and expansion of a portfolio of Swift Logistics accounts; generate and convert leads, create new brokerage opportunities, work with customer load boards; execute marketing campaigns and carry out other revenue generation initiatives. Deliver rapid and profitable growth, while leveraging and improving Swift's resources, relationships, and market position. Build internal and external relationships that deliver the most compelling short and long-term customer value propositions and efficient means of moving our customer's freight.Revenue Generation: Solicit freight from customers and prospects to drive rapid and sustainable growth. Monitor, bid and handle awarded freight by working with designated department personnel, reaching out to solicit partner carriers and/or through posting on load boards. Solicit capacity (including, but not limited to, Over The Road (OTR), Less Than Truckload (LTL), Rail, Drayage, Ocean Containers, Parcel and Warehousing) for assigned projects.Account Management: Further penetrate existing Swift Transportation shipper customers to drive aggressive revenue and profit growth; maintain knowledge of the contractual requirements of customers. Understand Swift Transportation's and Swift Logistics strengths and changes and leverage them appropriately.Networking for Growth: Network within Swift Logistics and Swift Transportation to identify, brainstorm and implement best practices and to grow our customer and revenue base. Serve as an extension of sales to increase customer business and opportunities by brokering to outside service providers.Pricing: Learn pricing best practices and effectively utilize all available tools and resources in order to effectively and profitably broker freight. Provide quotes to customers for potential new lanes of business.Metric Focus: Maintain focus on Key Performance Indicators, reports, metrics and methods for ongoing measurement of customer performance and departmental success. Embrace the use of Swift's business improvement tools and identify opportunities for continuous improvement. Responsible for data mining, collection, reporting and scorecards. Monitor Logistics Email Box and marketing campaigns to ensure timely lead follow-up and best-in-class customer service. Provide necessary presentations, reports and research as requested.Customer Service: Ensure flawless execution and hold others accountable for meeting customer expectations. Prioritize and communicate customer commitments. Set up new customer and shipper codes. Monitor and trace shipments from pick up to delivery, proactively notifying the customer of service issues. Research and code all applicable service failures.Customer Relationship Management (CRM): Maintain current reporting, contact information and key account notes through appropriate websites or other CRM tool(s). Leverage CRM tools to effectively maintain and expand customer base.Communication: Communicate effectively and professionally with internal and external customers; carry out calls to qualified and targeted prospects and accounts within assigned responsibilities. Achieve outbound call frequency objectives.Quality: Support quality and International Organization for Standardization (ISO) quality initiative, providing input and documents when required. Anticipate and facilitate problem resolution on all shipment issues to meet or exceed total satisfaction of customers and service providers. Assist designated department personnel with collection issues upon request. Adhere to all company policy and proceduresCulture: Maintain and expand a positive, professional and proactive work atmosphere by acting and communicating in alignment with company demands, ethics and guiding principles, and expectations.Perform additional responsibilities as assigned by leadership, including occasional business travel.Skills: Transportation and 3PL knowledge; sales and customer service experience, focused on value delivery; results oriented; entrepreneurial spirit with proven ability to solicit new customers and meet specific revenue targets; exemplary telephone skills; strong sense of urgency and purpose, with a bias for action; cross-functional collaboration to drive exceptional results; MS Office Suite tools; data management through spreadsheet and database applications; excellent interpersonal and collaboration skills; possess above average public speaking, negotiation, time management, writing and organizational skills; ability to understand and enforce company policies; maintain a professional appearance and work environment; self-confident and self-starter without the need of close supervision; ability to operate in a busy, demanding environment; ability to seamlessly adapt to ever changing duties and milestones; integrity, credibility and trust oriented.Education: High School Diploma or GED. Baccalaureate from Accredited University or College preferred. Each higher level of education achieved may be considered for substitute of each one year of required experience.Experience Required: Combination of a minimum of four (4) years of previous Sales, Inside Sales, Call Center, or Customer Service experience. Position RequirementsTransportation and 3PL knowledge; sales and customer service experience, focused on value delivery; results oriented; entrepreneurial spirit with proven ability to solicit new customers and meet specific revenue targets; exemplary telephone skills; strong sense of urgency and purpose, with a bias for action; cross-functional collaboration to drive exceptional results; MS Office Suite tools; data management through spreadsheet and database applications; excellent interpersonal and collaboration skills; possess above average public speaking, negotiation, time management, writing and organizational skills; ability to understand and enforce company policies; maintain a professional appearance and work environment; self-confident and self-starter without the need of close supervision; ability to operate in a busy, demanding environment; ability to seamlessly adapt to ever changing duties and milestones; integrity, credibility and trust oriented. Required EducationHigh School Diploma or GED. Baccalaureate from Accredited University or College preferred. Each higher level of education achieved may be considered for substitute of each one year of required experience. Required ExperienceCombination of a minimum of four (4) years of previous Sales, Inside Sales, Call Center, or Customer Service experience.",Account Manager Job in East Longmeadow,"Full Time, Employee","East Longmeadow, MA","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/account-manager-job-east-longmeadow-ma-us-169582957.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=15,,,333c9436eca212d5a54e0215db1f933e
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:15:48:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Searching for a Qualified Forklift Operators Position Overview Utilizing a sit-down forklift in manufacturing environment to load and unload trucks, work safely and efficiently.  Also, previous experience operating a clamp truck is preferred. The Ideal Candidate Previous forklift experience in a manufacturing environment.P·         Fantastic temp to permanent position with room for growth·         Maintain a neat and organized work area·         Excellent attention to detail·         Safety focused  About JMJ Talent Solutions and Staffing JMJ Talent Solutions has been proudly servicing our clients with integrity and responsiveness. Our staff focuses on the needs of our clients and the proficiencies of our candidates guaranteeing the best placements. We have long standing relationships with HR professionals in the market we serve. We are proud of our diligent work, our reputation, and our track record. We base this on our commitment to professional partnering, and it shows! Year after year, our business grows primarily through our customer service, satisfied clients, and happy candidates. JMJ Talent Solutions is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. Our policy of equal employment opportunity is to recruit, hire, train and promote persons without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, handicap or any other protected status. Visit or call our offices 2621 Highway Avenue Highland, IN 46322 | 219-838-56273195 Willowcreek Road Portage, IN 46368 | 219-764-96754361 Franklin Street Michigan City, IN 46360 | 219-879-4900 www.jmjtalent.com",Forklift Operator Job in Portage,Full Time Employee,"Portage, IN 46368",,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-operator-job-portage-in-us-167079677.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=9,,Logistics/Transportation,24b814950d8d35e714b82a80abba1312
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:15:47:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Supervises daily activities of package handlers to ensure that all assigned duties are accomplished safely and timely.  Supervisors typically work Monday through Friday.  Part-time management employees are generally expected to work 5 1/2 hours per day and are paid semi-monthly.  Medical, dental, and vision benefits are offered to employees and their eligible dependents.  Additional benefits include educational assistance, 401K, discounted stock, and paid vacations/holidays.Job Requirements:Maintain records and reportsCustomer service skills (internal/external)Phone etiquetteAbility to work varying shifts, additional hours and/or overtime depending on service needsMulti-tasking skillsPerform general office tasks such as paperwork, typing, and/or use of a computer, filing, calculating and use of telephoneGood cognitive reasoning skillsSelf motivationMicrosoft Office knowledge  Work cooperatively in a diverse work environmentAbility to direct the work of the other employees effectively Verification and submittal of timecards              Perform other functions that may be assigned                                             UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Part-Time Package Dispatch Supervisor Job in Ceres,,"Ceres, CA 95307",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-part-time-package-dispatch-supervisor-job-ceres-ca-us-168972065.aspx?mescoid=4300733001001&jobPosition=19,,Logistics/Transportation,ed08a3cd360e75d736d3e281e4755ab6
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:14:58:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: To supervise the daily operations of the shop maintenance area by working directly with the technicians and assuring that they have the necessary skills, training and tools to perform their job.Assists and supervises technicians, including inspection and review of work to assure quality job performance, recommends trainingAssist in the diagnosis and repairs of the tractor/trailer fleetAssist in the completion of all necessary tags and work ordersAssist in the moving of equipment in/out of the shop and around the yardMaintains a clean and safe work areaMonitors job performanceTroubleshoots problems with equipment and makes judgment calls on solutions to specific problemsAnalyzes and supervises necessary repairs to departmental equipmentWorks with vendors on outside repairs and costsMaintains personnel files and timecards.Shops with eight or fewer employees, will be managed by a Foreman and additional responsibilities may apply.May perform additional duties as assigned by leadership.Skills: Computer keyboarding, valid drivers license, ability to read and understand repair manuals, filling out tags and repair ordersEducation: High school diploma or GED preferredExperience Required: 3M - 12, 4M - 24, 5M - 36 months mechanical related experience in transportation, heavy equipment, or agriculture industry preferred. Position RequirementsComputer keyboarding, valid drivers license, ability to read and understand repair manuals, filling out tags and repair orders Required EducationHigh school diploma or GED preferred Required Experience3M - 12, 4M - 24, 5M - 36 months mechanical related experience in transportation, heavy equipment, or agriculture industry preferred.",Foreman Job in Macclenny,"Full Time, Employee","Macclenny, FL","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/foreman-job-macclenny-fl-us-169469126.aspx?mescoid=4701141002005&jobPosition=16,,,02ea30f3ccc9c176460719fdb6732fc2
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:14:57:27,No,jobs.monster.com," UPS Freight Truckload is hiring individuals to work as Full-time Dedicated OTR Dry Van Drivers. This position involves the driving of a tractor-trailer for the over-the-road delivery of freight to two or more locations. Dedicated drivers are primarily assigned to run freight for one customer, and may be assigned to an operation based at a specific customer location. These drivers are normally on the road from three to five days at a time. The term “dedicated” refers to the customer, not a particular lane or destination. Dedicated Drivers must pass a DOT physical and successfully pass a UPS Freight road test. Qualified applicants must have a valid Class A Commercial Drivers’ License with Haz-Mat endorsement. Dedicated Drivers are expected to comply with all appearance standards. Applicants must be at least 21 years of age. Applicants must be able to read, write and speak the English language. Applicants must also meet the Department of Transportation (DOT) and Company mental and physical requirements; and must be physically and mentally able to safely perform the essential job functions without obvious risk of injury to the employee or co-workers. Applicants must receive satisfactory results from a background check, as conducted in accordance with applicable laws; and must pass a drug screening.This job posting includes information about the minimum qualifications (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines), locations, shifts, and operations within the locations which may consider my application.  An applicant or employee may request an exception or change to, or an accommodation of, any condition of employment (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines) because of a sincerely held religious belief or practice.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS OTR CDL A Tractor-Trailer Truckload Driver (HazMat REQ) Dedicated Job in Chattanooga,,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-otr-cdl-a-tractor-trailer-truckload-driver-hazmat-req-dedicated-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169436738.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=6,,Logistics/Transportation,bd4bd5989040c851173af116f6ce158e
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:14:14:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.Transport Service Company - Chemical Division, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Elizabethtown, KY.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and thrive!We have INCREASED our PAY PACKAGE to include increased mileage pay, loading & unloading pay and more!We're also offering premium pay to drivers with Tank Experience! Call for details.Transport Service Co. Chemical Division has developed into a premium tank truck carrier over the past 60 plus years of offering outstanding service to the chemical industry handling both liquid and dry bulk chemicals. Transport Service Co. has a reputation of meeting the unique needs for customer's equipment and service requirements.Transport Service Company - Chemical Division is now offering premium pay to drivers with tank experience. ** Company Drivers:Regional and OTR positions Flexible home time Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental and Vision plans Paid vacations and holidays 401K with company match Paid training on safe driving and product handling Satellite Dispatch Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!Owner-Operators:Regional and OTR positions Flexible home time Competitive pay - mileage or percentage contract Loading and unloading pay Zone pay for local work Health insurance plans available 100% of Fuel Surcharge paid to Owner-Operator 100% of Billable Pump or Compressor Charge paid to Owner-Operator Paid Orentation and Training Paid Weekly Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay *Independent contractors referring their own lease drivers are not eligible for referral payments And so much more!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with Transport Service Company.We require Class A CDL with 1 year recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank and Hazmat endorsements (or ability to obtain), TWIC - Transportation Worker Identification Credential (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.** Premium pay requires Class A CDL with a minimum of 5 years recent, verifiable tank experience. Call 800-871-4581 for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.",Class A CDL Driver - TSC Job in Elizabethtown,Full Time Employee,"Elizabethtown, KY",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-tsc-job-elizabethtown-ky-us-169573736.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=2,,Logistics/Transportation,281755b61e7f4daad90b66541c31a234
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:13:47:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.Transport Service Company - Chemical Division, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Sheboygan, WI.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and thrive!We have INCREASED our PAY PACKAGE to include increased mileage pay, loading & unloading pay and more!We're also offering premium pay to drivers with Tank Experience! Call for details.Transport Service Co. Chemical Division has developed into a premium tank truck carrier over the past 60 plus years of offering outstanding service to the chemical industry handling both liquid and dry bulk chemicals. Transport Service Co. has a reputation of meeting the unique needs for customer's equipment and service requirements.Transport Service Company - Chemical Division is now offering premium pay to drivers with tank experience. ** Company Drivers:Regional and OTR positions Flexible home time Competitive pay Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental and Vision plans Paid vacations and holidays 401K with company match Paid training on safe driving and product handling Satellite Dispatch Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!Owner-Operators:Regional and OTR positions Flexible home time Competitive pay - mileage or percentage contract Loading and unloading pay Zone pay for local work Health insurance plans available 100% of Fuel Surcharge paid to Owner-Operator 100% of Billable Pump or Compressor Charge paid to Owner-Operator Paid Orientation and Training Paid Weekly Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay *Independent contractors referring their own lease drivers are not eligible for referral payments And so much more!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with Transport Service Company.We require Class A CDL with 1 year recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank and Hazmat endorsements (or ability to obtain), TWIC - Transportation Worker Identification Credential (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.** Premium pay requires Class A CDL with a minimum of 5 years recent, verifiable tank experience. Call 800-871-4581 for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.",Class A CDL Driver - TSC Job in Sheboygan,Full Time Employee,"Sheboygan, WI",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-tsc-job-sheboygan-wi-us-169573707.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=7,,Logistics/Transportation,a78405564f1728439cf5c02e672f8ba1
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:13:46:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"<!-- /* Font Definitions */ @font-face {font-family:Arial; panose-1:2 11 6 4 2 2 2 2 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:""Courier New""; panose-1:2 7 3 9 2 2 5 2 4 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:Wingdings; panose-1:5 2 1 2 1 8 4 8 7 8; mso-font-charset:2; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:0 0 65536 0 -2147483648 0;} @font-face {font-family:Calibri; panose-1:2 15 5 2 2 2 4 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:Cambria; panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} /* Style Definitions */ p.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal {mso-style-parent:""""; margin:0in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} a:link, span.MsoHyperlink {mso-style-noshow:yes; color:blue; text-decoration:underline; text-underline:single;} a:visited, span.MsoHyperlinkFollowed {mso-style-noshow:yes; color:purple; text-decoration:underline; text-underline:single;} p.MsoListParagraph, li.MsoListParagraph, div.MsoListParagraph {margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} p.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst {mso-style-type:export-only; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} p.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle {mso-style-type:export-only; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} p.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast {mso-style-type:export-only; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} @page Section1 {size:8.5in 11.0in; margin:1.0in 1.25in 1.0in 1.25in; mso-header-margin:.5in; mso-footer-margin:.5in; mso-paper-source:0;} div.Section1 {page:Section1;} /* List Definitions */ @list l0 {mso-list-id:114905430; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:826423068 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l0:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l1 {mso-list-id:227344612; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:682555316 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l1:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l2 {mso-list-id:1509322575; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:81815978 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l2:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} ol {margin-bottom:0in;} ul {margin-bottom:0in;} --> Position:  Director of Third Party Logistics Presented by:  North American Recruiting and Consulting Location:  Northern Louisiana Area Job Code:  CRT01006  Client Overview:Confidential Position Responsibilities:·      Manage operational goals and metrics utilizing management tools including effective labor management.·      Drive operational results setting expectations and accomplishing performance goals and objectives·      Comply with all environmental, health and safety federal, state, local regulations and company policies·      Monitor and adjust work direction and schedules according to business demands·      Create environment that fosters open and positive team communication by setting expectations and communication company goals·      Resolve day to day operational challenges as well as long term resolution planning, research inefficiencies make recommendations and implement changes·      Track metrics and coach staff to reach productivity, quality, service requirements, inventory control and safety goals·      Manage 3PL vendor, hold accountable for delivery performance, on hand inventory, including freight spend and overall costs·      Assure accurate inventory at all times and procedures are followed·      Audit of daily labor and billing reports·      Supervise timely and accurate data entry for all services performed·      Evaluate performance and provide feedback coaching, training and development to 3PL staff·      Works with Executive Leadership team to develop and maintain a strategic perspective in organizational direction, strategy and decision making·      Other duties may be assigned to meet business needs·      This role will be responsible for the following but is not exclusive to:  3PL Services, Location of Services, Schedule, Conditions of Service, Payment Schedule for Services and Fees, Communicating Carrier & Our Client’s Obligations, Proper documentation required, Performance, Authorized Representatives, Cancellation of Services, Warranties and Representations, Risk of Loss, Damage\Loss Claim Process, Change Order Process, and any other additional specifications set forth.Requirements:·      Minimum 7 years sales experience leading a team·      Ability to improve and drive operational processes·      Strong background in 3rd Party Logistics·      Strong business and financial acumen ·      Excellent communication skills·      Ability to work effectively with 3PL suppliers·      Clear, comprehensive understanding of Safety Rules and Regulations·      Demonstrated ability to manage complex long term projects·      Change management experience·      Effective team player·      Strong interpersonal, communication, and customer service skills·      Proficient in Microsoft Office Education Requirements:·      BS in logistics preferredCompensation:Base Salary from $80 K to $90K; There is a performance Bonus however the Bonus program is being reviewed and the % has yet to be set for this  role;  Excellent Benefits; 401K; Relocation Assistance Contact Information:Bob Turner, Ed. D. PresidentNorth American Recruiting and Consulting903-561-6928bob.turner@narecruiting.netwww.narecruiting.net  ",Monster,,"<!-- /* Font Definitions */ @font-face {font-family:Arial; panose-1:2 11 6 4 2 2 2 2 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:""Courier New""; panose-1:2 7 3 9 2 2 5 2 4 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:Wingdings; panose-1:5 2 1 2 1 8 4 8 7 8; mso-font-charset:2; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:0 0 65536 0 -2147483648 0;} @font-face {font-family:Calibri; panose-1:2 15 5 2 2 2 4 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:Cambria; panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} /* Style Definitions */ p.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal {mso-style-parent:""""; margin:0in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} a:link, span.MsoHyperlink {mso-style-noshow:yes; color:blue; text-decoration:underline; text-underline:single;} a:visited, span.MsoHyperlinkFollowed {mso-style-noshow:yes; color:purple; text-decoration:underline; text-underline:single;} p.MsoListParagraph, li.MsoListParagraph, div.MsoListParagraph {margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} p.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst {mso-style-type:export-only; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} p.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle {mso-style-type:export-only; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} p.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast {mso-style-type:export-only; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} @page Section1 {size:8.5in 11.0in; margin:1.0in 1.25in 1.0in 1.25in; mso-header-margin:.5in; mso-footer-margin:.5in; mso-paper-source:0;} div.Section1 {page:Section1;} /* List Definitions */ @list l0 {mso-list-id:114905430; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:826423068 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l0:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l1 {mso-list-id:227344612; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:682555316 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l1:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l2 {mso-list-id:1509322575; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:81815978 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l2:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} ol {margin-bottom:0in;} ul {margin-bottom:0in;} --> Position:  Director of Third Party Logistics Presented by:  North American Recruiting and Consulting Location:  Northern Louisiana Area Job Code:  CRT01006  Client Overview:Confidential Position Responsibilities:·      Manage operational goals and metrics utilizing management tools including effective labor management.·      Drive operational results setting expectations and accomplishing performance goals and objectives·      Comply with all environmental, health and safety federal, state, local regulations and company policies·      Monitor and adjust work direction and schedules according to business demands·      Create environment that fosters open and positive team communication by setting expectations and communication company goals·      Resolve day to day operational challenges as well as long term resolution planning, research inefficiencies make recommendations and implement changes·      Track metrics and coach staff to reach productivity, quality, service requirements, inventory control and safety goals·      Manage 3PL vendor, hold accountable for delivery performance, on hand inventory, including freight spend and overall costs·      Assure accurate inventory at all times and procedures are followed·      Audit of daily labor and billing reports·      Supervise timely and accurate data entry for all services performed·      Evaluate performance and provide feedback coaching, training and development to 3PL staff·      Works with Executive Leadership team to develop and maintain a strategic perspective in organizational direction, strategy and decision making·      Other duties may be assigned to meet business needs·      This role will be responsible for the following but is not exclusive to:  3PL Services, Location of Services, Schedule, Conditions of Service, Payment Schedule for Services and Fees, Communicating Carrier & Our Client’s Obligations, Proper documentation required, Performance, Authorized Representatives, Cancellation of Services, Warranties and Representations, Risk of Loss, Damage\Loss Claim Process, Change Order Process, and any other additional specifications set forth.Requirements:·      Minimum 7 years sales experience leading a team·      Ability to improve and drive operational processes·      Strong background in 3rd Party Logistics·      Strong business and financial acumen ·      Excellent communication skills·      Ability to work effectively with 3PL suppliers·      Clear, comprehensive understanding of Safety Rules and Regulations·      Demonstrated ability to manage complex long term projects·      Change management experience·      Effective team player·      Strong interpersonal, communication, and customer service skills·      Proficient in Microsoft Office Education Requirements:·      BS in logistics preferredCompensation:Base Salary from $80 K to $90K; There is a performance Bonus however the Bonus program is being reviewed and the % has yet to be set for this  role;  Excellent Benefits; 401K; Relocation Assistance Contact Information:Bob Turner, Ed. D. PresidentNorth American Recruiting and Consulting903-561-6928bob.turner@narecruiting.netwww.narecruiting.net  ",,http://jobview.monster.com/3pl-3rd-party-logistics-job-shreveport-la-us-169574607.aspx?mescoid=4300738001001&jobPosition=17,,,fb7c1b994fcf33dafceb4475791b6187
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:13:23:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Distribution Jr. ReplenishmentResponsible for the replenishment, putaway and manufacturing transfers of inventory and non-inventory goods and assuring all items are accurately accounted for. Also responsible for the proper distribution of Distribution Department inventory and non-inventory items to the correct staging location, department or individual recipient. Essential Responsibilities:Insure the accurate movement of materials within the Distribution Department to include replenishments, putaways and manufacturing transfers. Process cycle counts and Inventory corrections as required. Deliver inventory and non-inventory product to the correct workcell or individual and maintain delivery log of each packaged delivered. Put away material received into the proper warehouse locations for bulk materials and shipping supplies. Assist Shipping in the loading of daily shipments during dock hours. Participate in continuous improvement activities. Keep area clean, organized and safe. Perform other duties as assigned by the Distribution Supervisor or Distribution Group Leaders.   img.img { width: 0px !important;}Requirements: High School diploma with at least 2 – 4 years replenishment experience. Must have the ability to lift 50 lbs. The ideal candidate will have working knowledge of computers, the ability to read, write, and understand English, and basic math skills. Must be able to drive forklifts and operate electric pallet jacks and automated shrink wrapper. Hours for this position are Monday – Friday from 9:00 A.M. – 5:30 P.M. Apply Here PI94779055",Distribution Jr. Replenishment Job in Waltham,Full Time Employee,"Waltham, MA 02454",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/distribution-jr-replenishment-job-waltham-ma-us-169496205.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=6,,Logistics/Transportation,94b4f58437142332d904e6999a2559df
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:13:22:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pacific Coast ProducersPacific Coast Producers is an Equal Opportunity Employer.Location: Lodi PlantDescriptionSHIPPING LEADER DRIVERPacific Coast Producers, a leading private-label food processor with several locations in Northern California, has an opening for a Shipping Leader Driver in the Lodi Canning Facility. This is a full-time (with the possibility of lay-off during slower periods) collective bargaining position that may require shift or weekend work.PRIMARY DUTIES: •Responsible for all Inbound and Outbound trucking / rail. o Including writing paper work, Bill of Landings, Receivable Reports, using a computer. o Recording, using of a computer, the condition of loads in and out of the Warehouse. •Receives 3rd party product. Documents all receiving and loading activity. •Maintains designated storage compliant to customer requirements (safety and environmental). •Configures shipments bases on weight, cube, and shipper integrity. •Operate slipsheeter, clamp truck and forklifts (Certified). •Evaluates product, removes damage and repackage as needed. •Trained in specific handle, loading and rework of glass. •Loads and unloads truck, Pig and rail per customer directive. •Maintains inventory and secured area for high value items. •Submits to immediate supervision daily record of quantities loaded or unloaded. •Does a substantial amount of manual work. •Must hold forklift certifications •Full responsibility for OSHA compliance and Safety for person and co-workers. •Keep Warehouse in SQF compliance.Pacific Coast Producers offers equal employment opportunity to all applicants including females, minorities, Individuals with disabilities, and protected veterans.PI94788287Apply Here",Shipping Leader Driver Job in Lodi,,"Pacific Coast ProducersPacific Coast Producers is an Equal Opportunity Employer.Location: Lodi PlantDescriptionSHIPPING LEADER DRIVERPacific Coast Producers, a leading private-label food processor with several locations in Northern California, has an opening for a Shipping Leader Driver in the Lodi Canning Facility. This is a full-time (with the possibility of lay-off during slower periods) collective bargaining position that may require shift or weekend work.PRIMARY DUTIES: •Responsible for all Inbound and Outbound trucking / rail. o Including writing paper work, Bill of Landings, Receivable Reports, using a computer. o Recording, using of a computer, the condition of loads in and out of the Warehouse. •Receives 3rd party product. Documents all receiving and loading activity. •Maintains designated storage compliant to customer requirements (safety and environmental). •Configures shipments bases on weight, cube, and shipper integrity. •Operate slipsheeter, clamp truck and forklifts (Certified). •Evaluates product, removes damage and repackage as needed. •Trained in specific handle, loading and rework of glass. •Loads and unloads truck, Pig and rail per customer directive. •Maintains inventory and secured area for high value items. •Submits to immediate supervision daily record of quantities loaded or unloaded. •Does a substantial amount of manual work. •Must hold forklift certifications •Full responsibility for OSHA compliance and Safety for person and co-workers. •Keep Warehouse in SQF compliance.Pacific Coast Producers offers equal employment opportunity to all applicants including females, minorities, Individuals with disabilities, and protected veterans.PI94788287Apply Here",,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-leader-driver-job-lodi-ca-us-169539652.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=9,,,99d8bd97a55c16077f986e506d5541eb
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:13:00:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"City:St. AugustineState:FloridaPostal/Zip Code:32092 Allied Building Products, a division of Oldcastle, is a national independent distributor specializing in commercial &amp; residential exterior and interior building materials with over 200 locations from Hawaii to Boston. The company was founded in 1950 as a small family-operated business focusing on the metro NY/NJ region and through acquisitions across much of the United States is now established as a major industry player. We believe that our employees are our best asset. Allied still holds true to the core values of our humble beginnings that havemade us a true success. Drive your way to a new career! Like to be outside and not stuck in an office? As one of our drivers, you’ll work close to home and have your nights and weekends free.* Enjoy competitive pay and comprehensive benefits. Experienced, safety conscious, customer-focused drivers encouraged to apply! Who are we? Allied Building Products is one of the largest, most successful distributors in the building materials industry. We have over 200 locations, maintain a fleet of over 2,700 vehicles and employ over 3,100 people. As part of the Allied Building Products family, you’ll be a member of an organization with a history of success that dates back over 60 years. What will I be doing? As a full time driver, you’ll travel locally to deliver interior building materials(drywall) to our customers, while adhering to and understanding safety policies and regulations. A clean driving record and top-notch customer service skills are a must! We’re looking for experienced Truck Drivers with their CDL A or B driver license. Job Duties Pre-inspect truck, load with materials and verify load for accuracy Set up job perimeters, inspect site to ensure a safe environment to unload Unload truck at site –involves lifting of heavy drywall Guide helper to ensure safe unloading Communicate regularly with dispatcher to ensure timely product delivery at job site Communicate potential on-site hazards to branch management Keep log book up-to-date at all times Adhere to and understand safety policies and regulations Perform other duties as assigned Requirements CDLClass A or Bdriver license in good standing Must be able to lift 75+ lbs repeatedly throughout the day Preferences Experience handling building materials * Select branches have 4 hour Saturday shifts. What Allied Offers You Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Allied is a great place to grow! If you're up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Once you click apply now, you will be brought to our career site. Please complete your online profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Our system allows you to view and track your status 24 hours a day. Join ourTalent Communityto receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers onFacebook,Twitter,Instagram,Google+,Pinterest,WordPress (Career Blog)andLinkedIn! Allied Building Products is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on thislink. Allied Building Products is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network.",Truck Driver CDL A or B Driver / Local Travel / Full Time - St. Augustine,Full Time Employee,"St. Augustine, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-cdl-a-or-b-driver-local-travel-full-time-st-augustine-fl-job-st.-augustine-fl-us-169443758.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=5,,,c2cf7d5c8d98d335bb5f2364761412db
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:12:59:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job #4131:  Drafting Technician Location:  Doral, FL  Project Description: * Geocoding *Have a backlog of work to catch up on *Entering and manipulating data in Geographic Information System (GIS) applications which model telecommunications systems. * Applications include, but are not limited to, OSPInsight, Google Earth, MapInfo, Visio/AutoCAD. * Reviews engineering drawings and maintenance/inspection data to identify changes to database models and maps. *Performs facility and connectivity data entry. * Analyzes field reports and spectrum meters to verify fiber routes and accuracy of data entry; corrects errors as necessary.   *Skills required:  > 1 year experience with GIS database AND  > 1 year experience with field splicing optic cables (MUST) AND experience with engineering drawings *Attention to detail and a foundation in Engineering/telecommunications are required.  ",Drafting Technician Job in Doral,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Job #4131:  Drafting Technician Location:  Doral, FL  Project Description: * Geocoding *Have a backlog of work to catch up on *Entering and manipulating data in Geographic Information System (GIS) applications which model telecommunications systems. * Applications include, but are not limited to, OSPInsight, Google Earth, MapInfo, Visio/AutoCAD. * Reviews engineering drawings and maintenance/inspection data to identify changes to database models and maps. *Performs facility and connectivity data entry. * Analyzes field reports and spectrum meters to verify fiber routes and accuracy of data entry; corrects errors as necessary.   *Skills required:  > 1 year experience with GIS database AND  > 1 year experience with field splicing optic cables (MUST) AND experience with engineering drawings *Attention to detail and a foundation in Engineering/telecommunications are required.  ",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/drafting-technician-job-doral-fl-us-169256850.aspx?mescoid=1700208001001&jobPosition=10,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,39efd6d3bf84cf2905b1172ef293ec38
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:11:49:35,No,jobs.monster.com,Class A CDL Delivery Driver Home every night 4 DAY work week NO WEEKENDS Excellent benefit package Safety Incentive Attendance bonus Uniform provided Cell phone allowance 3 raises in the first year Apply at farner-bocken.com OR CALL US TODAY AT 712-792-7380 Pre-employment physical and drug screen required. EOE,Class A CDL Delivery Driver Job in Chippewa Falls,Full Time,"Chippewa Falls, WI 54729",All,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-delivery-driver-job-chippewa-falls-wi-us-169596330.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=9,,,a15e35a24bab5cca07ba4a79e6aab251
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:11:48:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Enterprise Holdings, through its regional subsidiaries, operates the largest fleet of vehicles in the world through a global network of nearly 8,600 airport and neighborhood locations under the Enterprise Rent-A-Car, National Car Rental, and Alamo Rent A Car brands. Locally, our Enterprise Holdings Administrative Headquarters located in Waukesha, WI is seeking to hire a Part Time Lot Attendant. This position will be supporitng our logistics team and is responsible for completing pre-delivery safety inspections and conducting in-fleeting procedures. Secondary roles include support of our Remarketing team through inventory management and lot organization. Previous related work experience is not required - our management team will provide extensive training. We are looking for a dedicated individual with strong work ethic and ability to take initiative. Must be available to work in Waukesha, WI - 53186Must be able to work outside in all weather conditionsMust be willing to accept $10 per hour to startAside from religious observation, must be available to work part time up to 25 hours per week: Monday, Thursday, and Friday 8am-5pm Primary Job Responsibilities:Perform in-fleet servicing on new vehicles according to company required procedures and utilizing the manufacturer delivery checklistInspect new vehicle deliveries from transporter for damages and/or missing parts and complete the delivery receipt as required by the manufacturerPerform basic maintenance check: antenna, under the hood, inside the vehicle, inside the trunk and outside vehicleNew car preparationDemonstrate good time management and organizational skillsPerform safe driving of vehicles throughout lotMaintain a regular and reliable level of attendancePerform miscellaneous job-related duties as assignedSecondary Responsibilities:Daily check in of vehicles (deletes, new & used car stock and lease disposals)Lot organization & management of vehicle inventory - in a safe & efficient mannerMaintain and organize key security and update inventory locationTransfer fuel from rental vehicles utilizing reclamation equipmentWork independently without immediate supervisionPhysical Demands and Environmental Conditions:Requires the ability to work outside in all weather conditionsAbility to withstand moderate physical activity including standing, walking, crouching and bending for extended periods of time Equal Opportunity Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Must be at least 18 years of age 6 months work experience requiredMust have valid driver's license with no more than two moving violations and/or at-fault accidents on driving record in the past three yearsNo drug or alcohol related conviction on driving record in the past three yearsMust be authorized to work in the United States and not require work authorization sponsorship by our company for this position now or in the futureMust be willing to accept the starting wage of $10.00 per hour to startAside from religious observation, must be available to work part time up to 25 hours per week Monday, Thursday and Friday from 8am-5pm",Part Time Lot Attendant - Waukesha Job in Waukesha,,"Waukesha, WI",,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-lot-attendant-waukesha-job-waukesha-wi-us-169509208.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=20,,Entry Level,cb87d2a2aef1ce662d130f251770fa5e
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:11:32:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"COLLINS & COMPANY a distributer in Bristol, Indiana is in need of a Warehouse Worker.Must have experience in picking and packing orders, loading and unloading trucks, and operating a forklift. A qualified candidate will have a high school education or equivalent, and be able to speak, read and write in English. Candidate must be able to regularly lift up to 75 lbs, Must be accurate, thorough and detail oriented. Company provides health insurance, 401K and paid vacations. Must be able to pass pre-employment drug test. Please apply in person at:17880 Commerce Dr., Bristol, IndianaThis job listing brought to you by The Goshen News",Warehouse Worker Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,46507,Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-worker-job-bristol-in-us-169492880.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c5dcb5a4ff3df19f9e6fe6786851656c
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:11:28:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: Leads and performs Customer Service functions regarding a specific or assigned number or assigned customers which could include regional, dedicated or National Accounts. Will work in conjunction with other internal departments to achieve territorial balance of capacity and freight while achieving high service levels. Will take total responsibility of ensuring all requirements are met company wide in regards to Customer expectations.Lead two (2) JIT/ high exposure accounts or one major account for Swift and have the skill set necessary to meet customer expectations.Lead and solicit business from a specific or assigned number of customers by using daily available capacity. Serve as an extension of Sales to expand business revenue by exploring all dedicated, rail and logistics opportunities with Customers. Be aware of the system wide balance/imbalance within the Swift network to book freight accordingly.Serve as Customer's first line of communication and refer Customer to the proper departments if/when necessary (i.e. Pricing, claims, etc.) Responsible for managing service issues by researching and coding all applicable service failures in the system to support accurate service reporting. Responsible for monitoring and tracing loads so that follow up can be made to Customers regarding late pickups and or deliveries; as well as any other changes that may occur. Anticipate and facilitate problem resolution on all load issues to meet or exceed total satisfaction of Customers.Commit to and receive detailed customer load information by telephone, fax or electronic tendering, and input all load information into the system accurately to ensure system integrity.Maintains knowledge of customer contractual requirements relative to trailer pools in order to keep turns at the level set to gain optimum utilization of company equipment..Responsible for managing and clearing assigned user discrepancy queue to expedite the billing process to ensure the number of days from e-calls to cash are minimized for cash flow optimization.Responsible for managing EDI related requirements regarding 214 Status releasing or other similar electronic transmissions as required by Customer.Create monthly reports regarding service levels for customers as well as participate on any service oriented conference calls to supply definition.Maintain a positive work atmosphere by acting and communicating in a manner which facilitates the success of business operations in order to meet company and customer requirements.Perform additional duties as assigned by leadership.Skills: Must possess professional skills deemed necessary to interact with Customers on a corporate level including making on-site visits when warranted. Use exemplary telephone skills to present a quality oriented image where the Customer is treated in a consistent, courteous, and efficient manner, so that the impression is one of excellence. Ability to set priorities and to communicate to areas involving changes that could affect daily operations. Keyboard skills, working knowledge of PC and AS400, Excel, Word, ability to work in a fast-paced team environment, excellent time management skills.Education: High School Diploma or GEDExperience Required: Minimum of three (3) years (five years is preferred) Customer Service or Customer Service Relationship experience required preferably in related industry; one (1) two (2) years of internal Customer Service Representative III preferred. Position RequirementsMust possess professional skills deemed necessary to interact with Customers on a corporate level including making on-site visits when warranted. Use exemplary telephone skills to present a quality oriented image where the Customer is treated in a consistent, courteous, and efficient manner, so that the impression is one of excellence. Ability to set priorities and to communicate to areas involving changes that could affect daily operations. Keyboard skills, working knowledge of PC and AS400, Excel, Word, ability to work in a fast-paced team environment, excellent time management skills. Required EducationHigh School Diploma or GED Required ExperienceMinimum of three (3) years (five years is preferred) Customer Service or Customer Service Relationship experience required preferably in related industry; one (1) two (2) years of internal Customer Service Representative III preferred.",Customer Service Representative Level Iv Job in Knoxville,"Full Time, Employee","Knoxville, TN","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-level-iv-job-knoxville-tn-us-169469096.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=20,,,8e81381c8dd09326a50d281a468d24e6
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:11:19:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryTrain and supervise daily activities of ramp agents and clerks to ensure that all assigned duties are accomplished safely and timely.  Supervisors typically work Monday through Friday: however, weekend work may be required based upon the location and business needs.  Part-time management employees are generally expected to work 5 1/2 hours per day and are paid semi-monthly.  Medical, dental, and vision benefits are offered to employees and their eligible dependents.  Additional benefits include educational assistance, 401K, discounted stock purchase program, and paid vacations/holidays.Job Requirements Customer service skills (internal/external)Phone etiquetteAbility to work varying shifts, additional hours and/or overtime depending on service needsMulti-tasking skillsPerform general office tasks such as paperwork, typing, and/or use of a computer, filing, calculating and use of telephoneGood cognitive reasoning skillsSelf motivationMicrosoft Office knowledge (ie. excel, word, wordperfect) Work cooperatively in a diverse work environmentAbility to direct the work of the other employees effectively Verification and submittal of timecards              Perform other functions that may be assigned                                             UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS PT Air Ramp Supervisor Job in Mather,,"Mather, CA 95655",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-pt-air-ramp-supervisor-job-mather-ca-us-169520736.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=6,,Logistics/Transportation,c70ac782a8488f3ad968f85040f69170
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:10:59:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: Ensure all assigned Driver Qualification files are accurate and complete. Facilitate orientation for students and drivers at designated terminal location.Process orientation paperwork and ensure Driver Qualification files are in compliance with local, state, and federal regulations as well as with Company hiring criteria and the process for Establishing a Driver File before the driver completes orientation.Conduct brief interviews with driver applicants in order to gather additional information required for the Driver file and forward the file to Safety Audit for reviewDisqualify applicants who do not meet the drug screen and hiring criteria; consult with appropriate leadership personnel on additional disqualification concerns.Ensure all drivers meet DOT/Swift requirements regarding medical exams.Update the status of each orientation attendee and submit a Driver New-Hire Personnel Action Form (PAF).Perform additional duties as assigned by leadership.Maintain a positive work atmosphere by acting and communicating in a manner which facilitates the success of business operations in order to meet company demands and expectations.Periodic travel required as necessary for training proposes.Skills: Must be proficient with Microsoft Word and Excel; be detail oriented and analytical; possess strong written and verbal communication skills; possess a positive attitude and highly motivatedEducation: High School Diploma or GEDExperience Required: Two years transportation experience preferred Position RequirementsMust be proficient with Microsoft Word and Excel; be detail oriented and analytical; possess strong written and verbal communication skills; possess a positive attitude and highly motivated Required EducationHigh School Diploma or GED Required ExperienceTwo years transportation experience preferred",Driver Orientation Facilitaror/ Administrator Job in Sumner,"Full Time, Employee","Sumner, WA","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/driver-orientation-facilitaror-administrator-job-sumner-wa-us-169516020.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=18,,,b9499b8e373299dca3d2217c79fd1f2e
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:10:49:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.Transport Service Company - Chemical Division, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Carrollton, KY.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and thrive!We have INCREASED our PAY PACKAGE to include increased mileage pay, loading & unloading pay and more!We're also offering premium pay to drivers with Tank Experience! Call for details.Transport Service Co. Chemical Division has developed into a premium tank truck carrier over the past 60 plus years of offering outstanding service to the chemical industry handling both liquid and dry bulk chemicals. Transport Service Co. has a reputation of meeting the unique needs for customer's equipment and service requirements.Transport Service Company - Chemical Division is now offering premium pay to drivers with tank experience. ** Company DriversLocal & Regional Flexible home time Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental and Vision plans Paid vacations and holidays 401K with company match Paid training on safe driving and product handling Satellite Dispatch Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with Transport Service Company.We require Class A CDL with 1 year recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank and Hazmat endorsements (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.** Premium pay requires Class A CDL with a minimum of 5 years recent, verifiable tank experience. Call 800-871-4581 for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.",Class A CDL Driver - TSC Job in Carrollton,Full Time Employee,"Carrollton, KY",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-tsc-job-carrollton-ky-us-169573712.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=6,,Logistics/Transportation,d69d92ff16297b1ca989232f0bc7b7db
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:10:49:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Meet DOT requirements and / or CDL qualified as required by job assignment.Bend, stoop, crouch, squat, crawl, climb, stand, sit and turn / pivot.Part-time: Up to 5 1/2 hours per day, 5 days a week.Extended hours may be required as necessary.Report to work on a regular and timely basis.Ability to work varying shifts and extended hours as business needs require.Must be able to travel by car and plane to attend meetings at other locations and call on non-UPS locations and customers.Must be able to supervise and train employees effectively.Perform office tasks using simple hand grasping, fine hand manipulation associated with assigned task such as paperwork, use of computer, filing, calculating and use of telephone.Have a sufficient ability to communicate, through sight and hearing, to perform assigned tasks and maintain proper job safety.Work in an environment with variable temperatures and humidity. Exposure to dust, dirt and noise. Enclosed work areas. Outside inclement weather. Elevated heights and uneven surfaces.Work cooperatively in a diverse work environment.Demonstrate cognitive ability to follow directions and routines. Work independently with appropriate judgment. Exhibit spatial awareness. Read words and numbers. Concentrate, memorize and recall. Identify logical connections and process up to 2-3 steps ahead.Other job functions that may be assigned. UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS PART TIME SUPERVISOR Job in Chico,,"Chico, CA 95928",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-part-time-supervisor-job-chico-ca-us-169438080.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=17,,Logistics/Transportation,b176ff349378d639c5de02497738dff9
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:09:57:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is currently seeking highly motivated, energetic self-starters to work as a Part-Time Operations Supervisor. This management position involves directly supervising seven to ten part-time Package Handlers. Part-Time Supervisors train, develop, and hold their workgroups responsible for safety, production and attendance. The Part-Time Operations Supervisor impacts the organization by contributing to the continued growth and profitability of UPS by maintaining the highest standards for account productivity, accuracy, customer service, organization, communication, cooperation, and safety. The Part-Time Operations Supervisor provides innovative and effective leadership and cultivates a functional working relationship with all levels of personnel throughout the organization. Part-Time Supervisors generally work Monday through Friday at 5 1/2 hours a day, with a guarantee of 27 1/2 hours  a week. Medical, Dental, Vision, Life, and legal benefits are offered to employees and their eligible dependents. Additional benefits include educational assistance, 401K, discounted stock, and paid vacations/holidays. Please note that these opportunities are part-time only. The Part-Time Operations Supervisor responsibilities may include but are not limited to the following:Management of department resources to ensure maximum output, accuracy, and efficiency at all times.Meet or exceed all established standards for accuracy and productivity.Direct daily transload activities to support account objectives for level of service, cost management, customer expectations, and volume requirements.Ensure that all department and/or corporate policies and procedures are communicated, understood, and adhered to. Establish and promote a positive, team-oriented work environment emphasizing employee involvement, pro-active communication, inter-departmental cooperation, and continual improvement on all levels.Implement employee personal development plans as required to ensure the continuing professional growth of department personnel. Ensure that all department employees receive specific and detailed orientation, skills and safety training, appropriate materials and information, regular evaluations, and pro-active coaching to support their continued development. Establish and maintain an aggressive cross-training program within the department to promote development, enhance flexibility, and ensure backup coverage of vital functions and processes. Function as an effective liaison and advocate on all levels to ensure that employee, department, and corporate needs are addressed in a timely and productive manner. Responsible to ensure that all employees adhere to safety policies and procedures at all times, operating in full compliance with department, station, corporate, OSHA, and WISHA requirements. Experience and Education:Candidate is preferred have a High School diploma or equivalent degree.Management/supervisory experience in a production/processing environment is preferred.Prior experience in both operations and customer service is preferred.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Part-time Supervisor Preload Job in Baldwin,,"Baldwin, WI 54002",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-part-time-supervisor-preload-job-baldwin-wi-us-169520678.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=8,,Logistics/Transportation,39b0b63af789b819058ddec23b4e11d3
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:09:47:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Truck Driver, Yard Goat Driver, Yard Hostler – Retail distribution center in Carson, CA seeks 12 Experienced Truck Drivers, Yard Hostlers, Yard Goat Drivers to move containers from one dock or building to another.  These are full time, temporary positions where you will earn $16 or more an hour, based on your experience. The facility has free onsite parking and a lunchroom with a refrigerator, microwave, and vending machines for your use. ALL SHIFTS ARE AVAILABLE INCLUDING PART-TIME WEEKEND WORK! To be considered, you must have at least 6 months of experience working as a truck driver / yard hostler.  Plus, you must:Be authorized to work in the United States.Be able to work overtime.Consent to a drug screen. This is a drug-free workplace. Consent to a background check. Prior convictions may not necessarily disqualify you from working for this company.  If you are skilled at safely moving trailers, then we want to hear from you now! Please send your resume OR work history and contact information to:Lua.borey@chartwellstaff.com",Truck Driver,"Full Time, Employee","Carson, CA 90745",AllRetailTransport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-yard-goat-driver-yard-hostler-job-carson-ca-us-169477983.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=9,16.00 - 16.00 $ /hour,Logistics/Transportation,4dbc8f4aed6e0d40b59866342fc3452f
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:09:46:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"CDL TRUCK DRIVERS NEEDED FULL TIMEPay rate $18 per hour, 40 hours minimum per week.Company provides health care & 401k retirement plan. Idealcandidates will have a CDL License with 5 years minimu experience. Job will entail hauling residual waste water to & fromour facilities in Williamsport, PA and Standing Stone, PA.No overnight driving required. Candidate needs a strong workethic & clean criminal background.Apply today by sending your resume:Eureka Resources LLC454 Pine St, 2nd FloorWilliamsport, PAprovided by The Williamsport Sun-Gazette",CDL Truck Drivers Job in Williamsport,Full Time,"Williamsport, PA 17701",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/cdl-truck-drivers-job-williamsport-pa-us-169497879.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6183bc279092842e5795f153f9aff4c1
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:09:00:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS Supply Chain Solutions is currently seeking a Customs Brokerage Representative I. The ideal candidate will have one year of Customs Brokerage / Import / Export or CHB entry writer experience, as well as one year of customer service / general office / data entry experience.  The Customs Brokerage Representative I responsibilities include but are not limited to the following:• Administrative tasks in the import operations department servicing the client and their suppliers, providing customer service as well as maintaining revenues from the client base and contracted vendors.• File break/down, classifying data entry, photocopying, scanning and some assembling of entries.• Auditing commercial documents, applying harmonized tariff schedule code for accurate duty assessment and to ensure all federal requirements are met.• Document review and assessment of accuracy, verifying country of origin/export, IOR, terms of sale and value to ensure that compliance and federal regulation requirements are achieved.• Daily follow up on documentation discrepancy issues which requires the ability to troubleshoot and communicate effectively, both verbally and in writing with customers and foreign origins.• All other task as assigned by supervisor and or manager.• Position may require a weekend schedule on a department rotation basis and not limited to working a holiday schedule based on the needs of the operation and requirements of the account.This job description is intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by persons assigned to this classification. It is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all job responsibilities, duties and skills required for this position.Minimum requirements:• A minimum of one year of customer service, general office, or data entry experience.• High School diploma or equivalent certificate.• Proficiency in Microsoft Office.• Accurate and rapid data entry.• Strong attention to detail, and ability to multi-task.• Excellent verbal and written communications skills.• Proven organizational skills.• One year of Customs Brokerage, Import/Export or CHB entry-writing experience preferred.• The ability to project a professional image to the customer and to represent UPS SCS in a positive manner. Import, Export, Customs, Clearance, Customer Service, Data Entry, Transportation, Logistics, and International Freight.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS CBR I - BDM  -  Job in Blaine,,"Blaine, WA 98230",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-cbr-i-bdm-1200-2030-job-blaine-wa-us-169520655.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=9,,Logistics/Transportation,17fd0233d2ae4f2152af53be14f934a7
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:08:59:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Local Garbage Company is looking for a DRIVER/ HAULER. Class B CDL required. Experience Preferred. For more information on the opening or to set up an interview, please call 402-466-0352",Truck Driver Job in Lincoln,Full Time,"Lincoln, NE 68516",All,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-job-lincoln-ne-us-169596394.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=10,,,d9568204129a8317d6dd6ce7538ed4ee
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:07:59:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Multiple Full-time & Part-time roles available!We offer amazing benefits including healthcare coverage and tuition reimbursement!Inventory Control SpecialistTechnology enhances your life – your job should too. At Microsoft Retail Stores, that is what we believe. We are the hub of Microsoft’s cutting-edge devices and services, here to provide customers with a world-class, omni-channel experience in this evolving retail world. We serve as centers of innovation, connecting customers with technology that simplifies their lives and inspires their creative potential. As a member of the Retail Stores team you will cultivate the skills to pave the way for your ultimate career path. Your unique talents, perspective, and abilities will help inform our journey and transformation as a company. We are seeking teammates who are dedicated to finding deeper meaning and purpose in their work. Join our journey – find your passion.The Inventory Control Expert (ICE) will be responsible for all merchandise that enters and leaves our retail stores.  The primary focus for the inventory team is to support the in-store customer experience while protecting the financial and physical assets of Microsoft.  This person is focused on all back-of-house operations, primarily focused on shipping/receiving, replenishment and inventory control.  This role involves administration and inventory management to support business demands. Key ResponsibilitiesPlanning, Organizing, and ExecutingUnderstand and apply all Microsoft’s compliance standards.Improve data integrity results quarter over quarter.Accurately receive merchandise into the retail location.Maintain stockroom organization per Microsoft expectations and guidelines to include all essential paperwork and records.Perform detailed receiving and cycle counts researching all variances; identify exceptions and shrinkage, and interact with store manager to resolve discrepancies/issues.Move merchandise to the sales floor so that merchandising standards and customer expectations are met and exceeded.Accounting and reporting of inventory surplus, product returns, and any damages.Maintaining and overseeing the records of all products or merchandise and communicate updates/reports to management as required or needed.Track and provide in-stock reporting for core items, shops, guidelines, promotional events, etc., informing management of any issues/discrepancies.Participating in all full physical inventories of the store (minimum annually).Accurately ship/transfer merchandise to other locations/warehouse/vendors as directed.  Additional Skills /Abilities required Have a love for Microsoft, be a brand evangelist, and have a deep understanding of Microsoft products (Windows, Office, Xbox, Windows Phone, Surface, and services).Excellent time management skills and a high-level attention to detail.Lead by example, take pride in your work, and enjoy helping and developing others while creating fun environments and energizing people through your passion.Have excellent verbal and written communication skills and a high-level attention to detail.Thrive in a fast-paced, dynamic, public-facing environment, driven to get results by directing a team. Flexibility with your schedule as hours will be based on business needs.   Basic Qualifications1+ year’s retail, customer service, stockroom, shipping & receiving, or warehouse inventory experience  Valid authorization to work in the U.S. is required; no visa sponsorship is available for this position Preferred QualificationsExperience in High volume retail or warehouse/back-of-house operations/inventory environment Experience with Shipping and Receiving  Teaching and Training inventory process DisclaimerThis description has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this position. The actual duties, responsibilities, and qualifications may vary based on assignment or group.Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, religion, national origin, marital status, age, disability, veteran status, genetic information, or any other protected status.",Inventory Specialist Job in Nashville,Employee,"Nashville, TN",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/inventory-specialist-job-nashville-tn-us-169423361.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=16,,Logistics/Transportation,613b2a85acabfc8f8e6a68b21f68bf6e
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:07:58:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Auto Parts Delivery Drivers / Couriers  Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theJacksonville area for same daydeliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with 20+years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimization business. Partsfleet II is technology drivento help best manage your business from services provided to reliable invoicepayment.  ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle: Car or SUV.*Contract(s) available in the Jacksonvillearea.  *Daytime routes available beginning at 10AMand 1:45PM running 2 hours each. Back up flexible routes intermittentlyavailable Monday through Friday. *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. www.fleetgistics.com Respond online today.​ Location: Jacksonville, NC Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 21844 Vehicle Type: Car, Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Jacksonville,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Auto Parts Delivery Drivers / Couriers  Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theJacksonville area for same daydeliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with 20+years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimization business. Partsfleet II is technology drivento help best manage your business from services provided to reliable invoicepayment.  ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle: Car or SUV.*Contract(s) available in the Jacksonvillearea.  *Daytime routes available beginning at 10AMand 1:45PM running 2 hours each. Back up flexible routes intermittentlyavailable Monday through Friday. *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. www.fleetgistics.com Respond online today.​ Location: Jacksonville, NC Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 21844 Vehicle Type: Car, Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",All,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-job-jacksonville-nc-us-169564702.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=4,,Logistics/Transportation,2a476d4b2fab02dc6c81723d3c72ba78
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:07:32:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"ENTRY LEVEL - Marketing / Advertising / Public RelationsGet your foot-in-the-door and come and grow with our young expanding firm. No experience is necessary.WE WILL TRAIN! What Matters Most To You In Your Next Position?- Opportunity for Advancement?- Continual Growth and Development?- Comprehensive Training and Mentoring? We are looking for Competitive Individuals to fill Entry Level positions in marketing, advertising, and public relations for our expanding firm. The right individual will love the thrill of a challenge and thrive in a high energy, fast-paced environment. An Entry Level Marketing Representative receives complete and individualized hands-on training in each division of our company. We take the time to develop and train the individual to handle any task and take initiative on any campaign. Trained, highly motivated, proactive representatives are invaluable to us. The right Entry Level Marketing Representative can expect to have opportunities for growth within the first few months that reflect their unmatched work ethic and dedication. ENTRY LEVEL OPENINGS IN THE FOLLOWING:ADVERTISINGMARKETINGCAMPAIGN DEVELOPMENTPUBLIC RELATIONSMANAGEMENT RequirementsAbility to start right awayHigh School degree or higherGreat Communication skillsReliable transportation to the office on a daily basis ***PLEASE NOTE THIS IS NOT AN ADMINISTRATION POSITION***College Students Welcome! THANK YOU FOR YOUR INTEREST IN OUR COMPANY AND GOOD LUCK! **After the review of your resume you will be contacted through email by our HR Department. Please be on the lookout for this email as it will be sent to you shortly if selected by our management team for a possible interview.    Apply if you have the following experience: entry level sales, customer service, manager, marketing, student, accounting, entrepreneur, summer job, entry level, sales, marketing, general, retail, restaurant, hospitality, home improvement, construction, management, administrative, administrative assistant, business development, business, internship, advertising, human resources, receptionist, entry level, retail, insurance, education, outside sales, strategy-planning, project manager, part-time, server, summer employment, promotions, pr, customer service, full-time, restaurant, quality control, assistant, secretary, public relations, summer, salesman, hotel, safety, executive assistant, summer work, communications, training, human resources, office manager, media, general, social services, sales manager, pharmaceutical sales, food services, jobs, summer, recruiter, sales, bartender, general business, project management, hospitality, server, collections, bookkeeper, intern, management trainee, purchasing, full time, part time, bilingual, inventory, recruiter, counselor, travel, teaching, help desk, law enforcement, trainer, media, professional, trainee, data entry, internship, administration, new graduate, hostess, executive assistant, hostess, sales management, coordinator, cashier, medical sales, distribution, financial, manager, sports, entertainment, international, consultant, real estate, telecommunications, general, retail, business, sports, entertainment, marketing, sports marketing, customer serviceKeywords: - entry level sales, customer service, manager, marketing, student, accounting, entrepreneur, summer job, entry level, sales, marketing, general, retail, restaurant, hospitality, home improvement, construction, management, administrative, administrative assistant, business development, business, internship, advertising, human resources, receptionist, entry level, retail, insurance, education, outside sales, strategy-planning, project manager, part-time, server, summer employment, promotions, pr, customer service, full-time, restaurant, quality control, assistant, secretary, public relations, summer, salesman, office, hotel, safety, executive assistant, summer work, communications, training, human resources, office manager, media, general, social services, sales manager, pharmaceutical sales, buyer, food services, jobs, summer, recruiter, sales, bartender, general business, project management, hospitality, server, intern, management trainee, purchasing, full time, part time, bilingual, inventory, recruiter, counselor, travel, teaching, help desk, law enforcement, trainer, media, professional, trainee, data entry, internship, administration, new graduate, hostess, executive assistant, hostess, sales management, coordinator, cashier, medical sales, distribution, financial, manager, sports, entertainment, international, consultant, real estate, telecommunications, general, retail, business, sports, entertainment, marketing, sports marketing, customer service    ",Immediate Hire -  Entry Level Openings - Marketing Job in San Antonio,,"San Antonio, TX 78217",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/immediate-hire-3-entry-level-openings-marketing-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169341824.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=8,,Customer Support/Client Care,b59570d90627d8cfd8cbcfe32af78767
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:06:57:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you. (NYSE: XPO) Job Summary:  Loads and unloads material within a warehouse or storage facility. Utilizes hand trucks, forklifts, hoists, conveyors, or other handling equipment to move material to and from trucks within the storage facility. Working from general procedures and instructions, the Material Handler will execute transactions in an accurate and timely manner. Responsible for performing department processes and safely operating equipment to complete duties. Essential Functions:·         Material Handlers must ensure timeliness; packaging, routing, and systems work is completed accurately and timely ·         Ensure safe work environment·         Participates in stand up activities with cross functional teams·         Participate and direct team in Lean Warehousing system on the floor·         Completes tasks by following pre-established procedures·         Follows detailed and defined instructions·         Applies basic skills and may develop advanced skills using tools and equipment appropriate for the position·         Must be flexible in ""timely"" transactions when moved to different work areas throughout the day·         Resolves task-related problems in straightforward situations·         Must be able to adhere to productivity goalsScope and Accountability:Completes routine, repetitive, and/or standardized tasks; emphasis is typically on manual skills.  Applies basic skills and may develop advanced skills using tools and equipment appropriate for the positions. Resolves task-related problems in straightforward situations. Qualification Requirements:Knowledge:. HS Diploma, or equivalent. Skills: ·         Individual must be able to read and comprehend English to understand work instructions and must have the ability to work well with others with little supervision.·         Must have experience in operating material handling equipment and using a RF gun.·         Must portray personal accountability.·         Must have team orientation and portray a commitment to task(s).  Experience: 1-2 years experience in warehouse environment preferred.   Physical Demands and Work Environment:Physical Demands:  While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands or finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; climb stairs; balance; stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl; talk and hear.  The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 45 pounds.  Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk and hear.  The employee is regularly required to stand or walk for extended periods of time, use hand and fingers to handle or feel tools or equipment. Specific vision abilities required by this job include, close vision, distance vision, depth perception and the ability to adjust focus and see color.  Must be capable to understand and follow procedures for loading of trucks. The duties of this job are performed in both an office environment and a warehouse environment, thereby experiencing some minor to moderate level of noise due to office equipment and warehouse equipment.   May require extended hours in order to meet customer's needs.  Work Environment:  The duties of this job are performed in both an office environment and a light industrial environment, thereby experiencing some minor to moderate level of noise due to office equipment and industrial equipment. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Material Handler Job in Bismarck,"Full Time, Employee","Bismarck, ND 58504",,http://jobview.monster.com/material-handler-job-bismarck-nd-us-172096465.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=15,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,40c25a994cffad015f0be1033497d1b5
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:06:56:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you have always thought “it could be better,” and want to work for a great organization where the people who touch the product are the most important part of the process, here's your opportunity. As a team member, you create outstanding value for our customers, by producing quality products under tight deadlines. At CoorsTek SPEED WINS! At CoorsTek we change our world by providing industry with break-through solutions for an amazing variety of engineered parts and integrated systems made from ceramics, metals, and plastics. CoorsTek currently has an opportunity available for a talented Production Operator II. This position will be located in Benton, Arkansas. Position Summary: Responsible for the production of high quality ceramic, metallic, and non-metallic products. Essential Functions: Required to wear appropriate personal protective equipment at all times.Has attained qualified status on multiple machines concurrently in assigned area under limited supervision, such as the following: CNC Lathe, CNC Mill, Hone, Bandsaw, Surface Grinders, Chamfer Grinder, Radius Grinder, Swing-arm Drill Press, various Mechanical Presses, Universal Grinders, Manual Lathes, ISO Press, Lap Machine, Double-headed Lap Machine, Polish Machine, Tumbler Machine, Sandblaster, Pressure Caster, Injection Molding Machine, Blanchard, Manual Mill, Wash Line, Manual Drill Press, CNC EDM, Vertical Mills, Ultrasonic Mill, Centerless Grinder, ID Grinder, Thumping Machine, Microblast Machine, and Slicing Machine.May perform basic machine adjustments, if necessary (off-sets, dressing wheels, setting tapers).May read and interpret drawings and blueprints to determine machine set-up and production methods.May visually or mechanically inspect parts for defects (cracks, chips, dimension, surface finish, etc) as part of in-process inspection; records results and notifies lead/supervisor of deviation as appropriate. May use one of more of the following for measuring and inspection: Tape Measure, various types of Micrometers and Calipers, Profilometer, Height Gauge, Optical Comparator, and Coordinate Measuring Machine.Understands and meets or exceeds quality standards; seeks to minimize reject rate.May be required to perform some simple machine preventative maintenance functions.Keeps machines clean; notifies supervisor or maintenance when machine abnormalities occur.May use the manufacturing computer system for basic departmental functions, such as entering part transfers and scrap; reports any discrepancies to lead or supervisor.May be required to interpret basic control charts and simple capability studies within Statistical Process Control (SPC).Willingly accepts responsibility of sharing skills and knowledge with other employees. May train other employees as required.Participates in continuous improvement efforts, supporting and implementing new ideas.Maintains good attendance and punctuality and an acceptable level of performance.Follows approved electronic work instructions; follows established department procedures, which may be found in electronic or paper form. Incumbent must be capable of finding and referencing work instructions when asked.Other Responsibilities:Knows and follows all safety requirements, including emergency evacuation; strives to maintain a safe work environment and reports potential hazards to lead or supervisor. All employees will be responsible for knowing where non-hazardous waste collection containers are located and for putting non-hazardous wastes in appropriate containers.Exhibits good cooperation and communication skills to effectively work within a team environment.Assists in any and all areas as assigned.Effectively gives and receives feedback; willingly asks questions and seeks direction, as needed.Performs other duties as assigned.May work any and all shifts/days as required.Maintains acceptable level of cleanliness in the work area. Education, Training, and Skill Recommendations/Requirements:High School Diploma, GED, or equivalent work experience of 1-3 years.May be required to complete Measurement and Drawing Basics training or equivalent.Must be able to perform basic math skills, i.e. addition, subtraction, multiplication, division.May be required to learn the use and application of Statistical Process Control (SPC).Must meet all training requirements as defined by department.Note: This job description is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities or qualifications associated with the job. As a full time regular employee, you will be eligible to participate in the Company's benefit programs. These programs include medical, dental, vision, company-paid life insurance; accidental death and dismemberment insurance, company-paid short and long term disability, PTO, and paid holidays. Also included is the Company's 401(k) plan, under which CoorsTek currently matches 100% of the first 6% of the employee's deferral. CoorsTek offers a casual, yet professional working environment. Enjoy working with an exciting company which has been in business over 100 years! CoorsTek is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will be given equal consideration regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, pregnancy, genetic information, veteran status, or any other category protected by law. Principals Only – No Agencies Please. Pre-employment drug screen and background check required. As a full time regular employee, you will be eligible to participate in the Company's benefit programs. These programs include medical, dental, vision, company-paid life insurance; accidental death and dismemberment insurance, company-paid short and long term disability, PTO, and paid holidays. Also included is the Company's 401(k) plan, under which CoorsTek currently matches 100% of the first 6% of the employee's deferral. CoorsTek offers a casual, yet professional working environment. Enjoy working with an exciting company which has been in business over 100 years! CoorsTek is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will be given equal consideration regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, pregnancy, genetic information, veteran status, or any other category protected by law. Principals Only – No Agencies Please. Pre-employment drug screen and background check required. Position Summary: Responsible for the production of high quality ceramic, metallic, and non-metallic products. Essential Functions: Required to wear appropriate personal protective equipment at all times.Has attained qualified status on multiple machines concurrently in assigned area under limited supervision, such as the following: CNC Lathe, CNC Mill, Hone, Bandsaw, Surface Grinders, Chamfer Grinder, Radius Grinder, Swing-arm Drill Press, various Mechanical Presses, Universal Grinders, Manual Lathes, ISO Press, Lap Machine, Double-headed Lap Machine, Polish Machine, Tumbler Machine, Sandblaster, Pressure Caster, Injection Molding Machine, Blanchard, Manual Mill, Wash Line, Manual Drill Press, CNC EDM, Vertical Mills, Ultrasonic Mill, Centerless Grinder, ID Grinder, Thumping Machine, Microblast Machine, and Slicing Machine.May perform basic machine adjustments, if necessary (off-sets, dressing wheels, setting tapers).May read and interpret drawings and blueprints to determine machine set-up and production methods.May visually or mechanically inspect parts for defects (cracks, chips, dimension, surface finish, etc) as part of in-process inspection; records results and notifies lead/supervisor of deviation as appropriate. May use one of more of the following for measuring and inspection: Tape Measure, various types of Micrometers and Calipers, Profilometer, Height Gauge, Optical Comparator, and Coordinate Measuring Machine.Understands and meets or exceeds quality standards; seeks to minimize reject rate.May be required to perform some simple machine preventative maintenance functions.Keeps machines clean; notifies supervisor or maintenance when machine abnormalities occur.May use the manufacturing computer system for basic departmental functions, such as entering part transfers and scrap; reports any discrepancies to lead or supervisor.May be required to interpret basic control charts and simple capability studies within Statistical Process Control (SPC).Willingly accepts responsibility of sharing skills and knowledge with other employees. May train other employees as required.Participates in continuous improvement efforts, supporting and implementing new ideas.Maintains good attendance and punctuality and an acceptable level of performance.Follows approved electronic work instructions; follows established department procedures, which may be found in electronic or paper form. Incumbent must be capable of finding and referencing work instructions when asked.Other Responsibilities:Knows and follows all safety requirements, including emergency evacuation; strives to maintain a safe work environment and reports potential hazards to lead or supervisor. All employees will be responsible for knowing where non-hazardous waste collection containers are located and for putting non-hazardous wastes in appropriate containers.Exhibits good cooperation and communication skills to effectively work within a team environment.Assists in any and all areas as assigned.Effectively gives and receives feedback; willingly asks questions and seeks direction, as needed.Performs other duties as assigned.May work any and all shifts/days as required.Maintains acceptable level of cleanliness in the work area. Education, Training, and Skill Recommendations/Requirements:High School Diploma, GED, or equivalent work experienceMay be required to complete Measurement and Drawing Basics training or equivalent.Must be able to perform basic math skills, i.e. addition, subtraction, multiplication, division.May be required to learn the use and application of Statistical Process Control (SPC).Must meet all training requirements as defined by department.PI95308486Apply Here",Production Operator II Job in Benton,Part Time Employee,"Benton, AR 72015",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/production-operator-ii-job-benton-ar-us-172060676.aspx?mescoid=5101030001001&jobPosition=2,,Equipment Operations,78f1378924f10ab1164747cbb0989518
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:06:07:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company Description:   Crown Equipment Corporation is a leading innovator in world-class forklift and material handling equipment and technology. As one of the world’s largest lift truck manufacturers, we are committed to providing the customer with the safest, most efficient and ergonomic lift truck possible to lower their total cost of ownership.   Job Responsibilities:   Assist MPMs with gathering, organizing and evaluating industry, corporate, customer and competitor data. Seek customer insights and marketing intelligence as directed by the MPM. Utilize excel workbooks to produce competitor analysis that highlight trends. Develop dashboards for further study or presentation. Measure and quantify customer demand and scope of the market segments. Create presentation materials and tools to assist the MPMs with preparing for meetings with the executives, legal, marketing and product teams as well as the sales organization. Provide efficient and effective tactical execution on collateral needs as required. Act as a liaison between MPMs and other groups in development of materials and facilitate the exchange of relevant information in all stages of the development process. Assist with building presentation materials in Microsoft PowerPoint, Word and Excel formats.   Qualifications:   This position requires participation in a Marketing or Business Program. Incumbent should be at least a sophomore in college.   EO/AA Employer Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Spring  Marketing Product Management Co-Op () Job in New Bremen,"Full Time, Employee","New Bremen, OH",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/spring-2017-marketing-product-management-co-op-18703-job-new-bremen-oh-us-172330884.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=6,,Marketing/Product,855ca33c36027a1bf879ba63d101152f
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:06:07:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Our 60+ year service and manufacturing business is seeking a Heavy Duty Suspension Parts and Service Manager. Qualified applicants must have the ability to:Manage and supervise manufacturing and suspension repair service employeesSchedule and assign daily repair jobsDiagnose and recommend specific service repairsInteract with customersInitiate and complete customer invoicesAnswer phones as neededMonitor InventoryPossess ability to read a parts bookHave an attitude of ""whatever it takes"" without short-cuttingBe proficient in Microsoft Windows softwareMust be self-motivated, forward-thinking and be a self-starterPrior suspension service repair experience is a major plus.  Monday through Friday, 6:30 a.m. to 4:30 p.m., no weekends.   Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 1-800-282-3433 Fax 740-452-9430 Address 1516 STATE STZANESVILLE, OH 43701",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/heavy-duty-suspension-parts-service-manager-job-zanesville-oh-us-172110970.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=19,,,bd55b5a754f905d106bfeb1e558d1eb0
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:05:47:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Progressive, growing poultry processing firm is seeking a qualified ShiftManager.  This key position offers competitive salary, benefits, andrelocation package.  Bonus program is also offered.The successful candidate will have 4 - 7 years poultry processing managementexperience.  Needs to know 1st and 2nd processing.WE PAY $250 FOR REFERRAL RESULTING IN PLACEMENT IN THIS JOB. Visit our website at ManagementServices.net to view all of our jobs.FOOD PROCESSING EXPERIENCE IS REQUIRED. We also have openings in the following FOOD processing areas: production, maintenance, quality assurance, quality control, engineering, plant management, operations, distribution, shipping, warehouse, sanitation, ammonia refrigeration, safety, 1st processing, 2nd processing, further processing, HACCP, SSOPs, PLCs, DSI, MDM, evisceration, cut up, debone, marination, bread and batter, par fry, fully cooked, vacuum packaging, bacon slicing, bilingual (English and Spanish).We are always looking for good candidates with poultry, meat, beef, pork, seafood, or frozen food processing experience.",Production Shift Manager Job in Lillington,Full Time,"Lillington, NC 27546",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/production-shift-manager-job-lillington-nc-us-171460335.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=7,"85,000.00 - 105,000.00 $ /year40,000",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),b1c0815a03b6eee5a2bb24700c948a6a
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:05:47:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sports and Entertainment Marketing - Entry Level MarketingOrlando Marketing Events is one of the premier sports and entertainment marketing and advertising firms in the Greater Orlando area. We specialize in direct marketing for Clients in the Sports/Racing and Automotive industries. The key to our success and growth is the ability to generate a greater marketing synergy for each and every client. In order to deliver results to our clients, we are in need of entry level marketing reps to assist in the sales, marketing, and customer service work we conduct for our clients through events.  We are filling entry-level sales, marketing, advertising and sales positions. Opportunity for management position.  Exposure to the following fields: Marketing and AdvertisingPromotional MarketingCampaign OrientationClient RelationsFace to Face MarketingTerritory ManagementWe need enthusiastic, goal oriented individuals, who want to succeed in a competitive high energy environment. We are offering: Compensation based on performanceFun and positive work environmentOpportunity for managementOptional travelUnlimited opportunities  We are filling entry level positions with individuals that have a track record of commitment, ambition, and leadership either through their athletic teams, in their participation in organizations on campus, or in their community. All majors and backgrounds will be considered.                                                  Call today for more information! 407.539.1200                                                          www.orlandomarketingevents.com                                                                 RequirementsOrlando Events will provide individuals with excellent leadership, guidance, a competitive merit based compensation, and a challenging career path. This is an entry level position so college graduates or people looking to get their foot in the door are encouraged to apply. Candidates must represent the following: Excellent communication skillsLeadership experienceAbility to work in a high energy environmentAmbition, strong work ethic, and open to new ideasBe a self-starter with problem solving skillsBe a career oriented individual ",Sports and Entertainment Marketing Job in Orlando,"Full Time, Employee","Orlando, FL 32810",Retail;Advertising and PR Services;Sports and Physical Recreation,http://jobview.monster.com/sports-entertainment-marketing-job-orlando-fl-us-171500544.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=4,,Marketing/Product,6883b8ece9a62c5748e9aedce028608b
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:04:49:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Public Relations and Marketing Assistant We are a Promotions and Public Relation firms in the Piscataway area looking for Entry Level Public Relations and Marketing Assistants to join our team. We are looking for innovative, team-oriented individuals who enjoy working with others in a fast paced environment and maintaining relationships with our prestigious clientele. *Purpose of Position*The main focus of this position is to promote our clients brand names by developing and supporting retail marketing programs, this is NOT a graphic deisgn position.  You will work closely with other Event Marketing Specialists, and corporate marketing and sales organizations to support sales activities (shows, events, campaigns, etc) and utilize your marketing expertise to help develop and execute marketing programs that will increase demand and drive revenue.*Primary Duties*Impacts sales results by developing, supporting and executing field marketing and segment activities.Executes Marketing campaigns and Plans Events depending on expertise.Works with various corporate/field marketing managers to determine appropriate customized programs and strategies for various market segments.Provides coordination and project management to ensure event success.Publicizes event and works with Account Development to raise awareness and drive high levels of attendance and participation by targeted audience. Requirements1-2 years experience or training in public relations, promotions, marketing or customer service preferred, but not required Experience in customer service or other people-oriented fields desiredExceptional organizational and project management skillsExceptional communication skillsAbility to work independently and contribute in a team environment",Public Relations Assistant - Immediate Hire Job in Piscataway,"Full Time , Employee","Piscataway, NJ 08854",Retail Advertising and PR Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/public-relations-assistant-immediate-hire-job-piscataway-nj-us-171537802.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=19,,Marketing/Product,875d5e57fc3e28d735a9187c46ddbddc
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:04:48:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position supports our manufacturing facility by maintaining and repairing equipment used in the production of steel containers, including: Rebuilding and maintaining precision spindles, dies and other assemblies.  Overhauling major equipment and components. Operating in-plant mobile equipment, including lift trucks, booms, man lifts, etc. Conducting quality checks on incoming tooling and reacts appropriately to the results. Job Requirements: High School graduate or equivalent, trade school or apprentice program completion desired with a minimum of two years of comparable experience in a manufacturing environment desired. Proficient in operating all machine shop equipment, including working knowledge of CNC grinding, lathes, mills, welding equipment, plazma cutters, etc. A good mechanical and troubleshooting skills and the ability to follow workplace safety requirements. Physical Requirements:  Able to work 12 hour shifts with many physical requirements, including lifting and carrying (up to 50 lbs.), climbing stairs and ladders, and occasionally working in confined spaces.  Able to work day and night shifts, and weekends depending upon shift schedule.  Occasional overtime is required.",Machinist / Millwright Job in Edison,"Full Time, Employee","Edison, NJ 08817",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/machinist-millwright-job-edison-nj-us-172106381.aspx?mescoid=5100938001001&jobPosition=5,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,8749e53ce4dc1fc1981eb675543f5370
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:03:49:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Job Window, an interactive candidate resource that specializes in connecting up and coming talent to entry level opportunities all across North America, is excited to announce that one of its premiere promotional & experiential marketing clients is looking for an Entry Level Promotional Marketing Assistant  to join their promotions team! As a leader in experiential marketing & client acquisitions, our client specializes in creating and implementing customized marketing strategies for a large portfolio of clients. By using a personalized approach to brand recognition, our client is able to connect brands directly with consumers through merchandising, sales, direct advertising, sampling, promotions, lead generation and special events within local markets and businesses including major retail locations across the globe! In this entry level role, the Entry Level Promotional Marketing Assistant  will use their upbeat personality and extraordinary ability to capture an audience to create excitement with target demographics during promotional events and throughout the duration of promotional campaigns in a variety of settings. The Entry Level Promotional Marketing Assistant will also assist the promotions team with executing any administrative, advertising, marketing and/or sales tasks required. Responsibilities of the Entry Level Promotional Marketing Assistant:Develop, setup and publish advertising used to create brand awareness and generate increased attendance during each promotionSet up promotional displays and visual merchandising required at each promotional event to create excitement of featured client brands as well as their products and/or servicesPromote consumer excitement and brand connections through consumer interaction and product/service demonstrations and explanationsBuild product & brand knowledge of each featured brand/product/service being promoted at each event. Educate new employees of product/service benefits, costing, details, etc.Manage supplies and inventoryBasic salesMaintain relationships with retail partners, marketing/advertising clients and stakeholders The ideal candidate will successfully progress from this Corporate Event Promotions Assistant  opening into an advanced management training program designed to prepare team members for a management role in one of the many aspects of promotional & experimental marketing including but not limited to:Brand marketingAdvertisingClient relationsSalesPublic RelationsMerchandisingSales PromotionClient AcquisitionAdvertising & Sales Account ManagementRequirementsRequirements of the Entry Level Promotional Marketing Assistant:0-2 years of experience in a sales promotion, marketing, advertising or any retail related setting is an asset. Internship experience and previous entry level experience will as be considered as working experience.Outstanding written & verbal communication skillsExcellent organization and planning skillsSelf-motivated and results drivenAbility to work some nights and weekends for events and promotionsExcellent time management skills and ability to adhere to a scheduleEnthusiastic about providing best possible customer service for clients and consumersPositive attitude & eagerness to learnIf you can’t wait to become an enthusiastic sales promotions professional and are ready to create and promote product, service & brand hysteria on a daily basis our client would love to hear from you! Local applicants only - We need to hire & train asap. Social security or valid permit is required as we are currently not offering sponsorships.Key Words: Marketing, Sales, Customer Service, Entry Level, Junior, Promotions, Advertising, Communications, Brand, Events.",Promotional Marketing Assistant - Entry Level Job in San Diego,"Full Time, Employee","San Diego, CA 92123",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/promotional-marketing-assistant-entry-level-job-san-diego-ca-us-171472044.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=19,,Marketing/Product,e8e57333e587c9e2a5f7a67a00cb88b2
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:03:48:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are now hiring for Sales & Marketing Coordinators in the Port St. Lucie area. These openings are ENTRY LEVEL, no experience is necessary, we love to train! We have a very successful history developing entry level candidates into high performing market managers. The primary focus of a Sales & Marketing Coordinator is:Designing and Executing Marketing and Promotional Campaigns for clientsManage Event Promotions — Promotions Materials, Public Relations, MerchandizingSales — Client Acquisition through excellent brand consultingWe are currently partnered with over 20 different clients in the telecommunications, home entertainment, consumer electronics, and HDTV industries! Our daily work environment is fun, fast paced and energetic. Our goal is simple: we want to help our clients exceed their goals by providing world class service, quality and value while providing an avenue to develop vibrant, enthusiastic individuals that are eager to learn and grow with our company.The Sales & Marketing Coordinator will be trained to::Learn marketing portfolio of clients quicklySchedule promoting and manage calendarPrepare the necessary marketing materials for eventsInteract with host employees at eventsManage client relationshipDUE TO OUR BUSIEST SEASON OF THE YEAR WE ARE LOOKING FOR IMMEDIATE HIRES. ALL OPENINGS ARE ENTRY LEVEL WITH OPPORTUNITY TO ADVANCE TO MANAGEMENT. *All promotions are from within*RequirementsSales & Marketing Coordinator Postion Requirements:Ability to learn basic sales and marketing skillsDetail orientedFun and outgoing personalityStrong people skillsAbility to work with a team as well as individuallyPerformance drivenExcellent time management skillsCoachableIf you have any of the following experiences we would like to hear from you: event sales, business-to-business sales, event promotions, retail, restaurant, fundraising, event marketing and promotions.",Sales & Marketing Coordinator - Entry Level Job in Port St. Lucie,"Full Time, Employee","Port St. Lucie, FL 34952",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-marketing-coordinator-entry-level-job-port-st.-lucie-fl-us-171472056.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=20,,Marketing/Product,966f212c472b739bc7b843141f84bc74
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:02:58:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pentair Overview Pentair is an S&P 500 diversified industrial company with $7 billion in revenue and 30,000 employees worldwide. A global leader, Pentair provides solutions to help its customers manage water use, deliver safe and sustainable energy, meet the world's increasing demand for food, and support, maintain and protect critical processes. Organized as four global businesses which include Valves & Controls, Flow & Filtration Solutions, Water Quality Systems and Technical Solutions, the company operates as One Pentair, driven by purpose, led by vision, guided by process, and united by its Win Right Values. Business Unit Overview Valves & Controls manufactures valves, actuators, and controls solutions for some of the most challenging applications throughout the oil and gas, power, mining, chemical and pharmaceutical, food and beverage and building and construction industries. We partner with customers to help keep their operations running safely, minimize downtime and improve business efficiency. Job Summary SCOPE OF RESPONSIBILITIES: Under the direction of the Warehouse Supervisor or Team Lead position is responsible for disassembly, inspection, assembly, and testing of a variety of automated assemblies. These duties may be part of the repair program, or as part of the new automated assembly program. The job also requires the person to exhibit knowledge of basic electrical/pneumatic actuator and valve functionality.   JOB DUTIES: Perform receipt inspection of various valves and parts being able to verify/ match incoming material with sales order, customer and receiving documentation.Basic knowledge and concept for using tubing and fittings.Have a good mechanical aptitude Perform basic assembly on various types of electric/ pneumatic assemblies and valve/gear assemblies.Must be able to read and interpret various electric and pneumatic drawings, customer specifications and component IOM’s.Must understand and follow pertinent Pentair Valves & Controls policies and procedures relative to all assigned duties and responsibilities.Must be customer oriented and willing to work overtime as required. Understanding this may involve evenings and weekends, often times with very little notice.Establishes and maintains acceptable attendance habits.Must be willing and capable of assisting on local service jobs when required.Perform other duties as required. Job Requirements & Skills QUALIFICATIONS: Physical tasks include walking, grasping, carrying, lifting, seeing, hand-eye coordination, listening, and writing, speaking and traveling.Mental tasks include reading, interpreting, analyzing, calculating, measuring and communicating.Perform product testing, lifting and installing product weighing 35 lbs., Work is performed typically indoors. Work which occasionally produces a high level of mental/visual fatigue, periodically performed under pressure, requiring intense mental application and attention to detail.Ability to perform all tasks safely. EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE: Basic knowledge of electrical and pneumatic type equipment usage (i.e. pneumatic and electric tools, fixtures and test equipment)Education equivalent to High School Diploma or G.E.D.Minimum 1 year mechanical experience COMPETENCIES: Action OrientedFunctional/Technical SkillsLearning on the FlyEthics and ValuesCustomer FocusDecision QualityProblem Solving EEO Statement Pentair is an Equal Opportunity Employer. ",Assembly Operator I Job in Bolingbrook,Full Time Employee,"Bolingbrook, IL 60440",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/assembly-operator-i-job-bolingbrook-il-us-172112403.aspx?mescoid=5100918001001&jobPosition=16,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,3edb107c0d10ce5bf45ab56c19ead6c1
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:02:57:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"A leading manufacturer located North of Boston, MA is looking for a Production Manager. This is a direct hire opportunity. Candidates must have at least 5 years of production leadership experience within injection molding manufacturing environments. Relocation assistance for qualified candidates. APPLY NOW!Responsibilities for the Production ManagerManage day to day production activities Coordinate production processesEnsure maintenance of production equipmentUtilize lean manufacturing and six sigma principles to optimize production processesRequirements for the Production Manager5+ years of production leadership experience and managing day to day production activities required5+ years of experience within an injection molding environment requiredSupervise direct reports and indirect reportsMust be metrics drivenBenefitsRelocation assistanceThis Job is located in Boston, MA -> United States",Production Manager - Injection Molding/Plastic/Manufacturing Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA 02130",,http://jobview.monster.com/production-manager-injection-molding-plastic-manufacturing-job-boston-ma-us-172051840.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=14,"79,000.00 - 99,000.00 $ /year",,3d175a1ea7132fa162de746f91971fcf
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:02:00:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Direct hire opportunity in the northeast SC area for a CNC Machine Programmer. Must have 5+ years experience developing programs for CNC Mills & Lathes. Responsibilities for the CNC ProgrammerDevelop machining processesUse MasterCam software to develop and maintain CNC machine programsSpecify equipment, tools and supplies neededProvide technical support and guidance to hourly employeesMeet and improve quality standardsIncrease productivity and improve performance standardsRequirements for the CNC ProgrammerMachine Tool Technology Degree5+ years developing programs for CNC mills and lathes in the manufacturing industryMasterCam knowledge and experienceUnderstand dimensional inspection requirementsFanuk controls experience a plusMachine installation and start up a plusBenefitsExcellent company benefits orfferedRelocation assistanceThis Job is located in Florence, SC -> United States",CNC Programmer - MasterCam/Machine Programmer/CNC machine Job in Florence,Full Time Employee,"Florence, SC 29501",,http://jobview.monster.com/cnc-programmer-mastercam-machine-programmer-cnc-machine-job-florence-sc-us-171609731.aspx?mescoid=5100930001001&jobPosition=17,"70,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",,9ad3e94c6ff4067f91a06eb573e36a8d
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:01:59:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"ENTRY LEVEL - ASSISTANT MANAGERDegree...No Experience? Experience... No Degree?We are expanding and are looking for individuals for entry level in all aspects of our business such as: CUSTOMER SERVICEMARKETINGCAMPAIGN DEVELOPMENTMANAGEMENTTRAININGSALESRequirementsRequirementsWe are a promotional advertising company with exceptional customer service that offers financial rewards and promotions determined by performance. We work with major companies in the sports and entertainment industry. These clients need high energy, upbeat individuals with great customer service skills to represent them!___________________________________________MUST BE ABLE TO START WITHIN 1 WEEKMust be willing to start ENTRY LEVELINTERVIEWS START IMMEDIATELY!!!  ",Entry-Level Assistant Management and Customer Service Representatives Job in Fullerton,"Full Time , Employee","Fullerton, CA 92831",Retail Advertising and PR Services Sports and Physical Recreation,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-assistant-management-customer-service-representatives-job-fullerton-ca-us-172323430.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=13,,Marketing/Product,ee8b6c9b33fa85b34b3fff57710166c0
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:01:58:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Growth. Opportunities. Possibilities.Menasha Corporation is all about possibilities. Our two businesses, Menasha Packaging and ORBIS Corporation, are leaders in their industries, providing corrugated and plastic packaging products and related services to major global companies. Our employees make the difference, proving that great ideas, collaboration and quality turn possibilities into success. Working at Menasha Corporation means that your insights provide cutting-edge solutions for our customers. If you like to make things happen and are passionate about what you do, you’re going to want to be here. Join us and become part of the power behind possible. About The OpportunityPosition SummaryDesigns, plans, and implements human resources programs for a plant. Administers corporate policies relating to compensation, benefits, visa/green card processing, employee relations, training, and health and safety programs. If applicable may be responsible for negotiating collective bargaining agreements.Essential to this PositionDuties & Responsibilities: Guide managers and employees through Performance Management (PM) process and is a supporter of the corporate PM system Gather business unit data (census, compensation, turnover, cost-per-hire, exit interview stats, etc.) that will help provide HR metrics at the corporate level Understand and stay current with labor legislation and industry trends in HR, the business and its industry; keep up to date with labor market dynamics as well as business current events Handle local benefits administration including open and new employee enrollment, status changes, benefits’ questions and problems Ensure compliance with state and federal employment related regulations and legal requirements including FLSA, EEO, AAP, OSHA, ADA, NLRA, FMLA, etc. Create a positive personal and business unit image in the community involvement and charity giving Assess the need for training and development; identify initiates and facilitates training and development programs at all levels of the organization aimed at individual, team, professional, and leadership development, as well as continuous improvement. Provide leadership in developing and effectively utilizing company safety resources to develop safety policies, investigate accidents, investigate injuries, and prevent accidents/ injuries and recurrences.  Manage workman’s compensation cases and OSHA regulation Coach/mentor and support the operations team by counseling and removing obstacles that may occur Establish or drive division wellness programs, pre-employment health assessments, drug screening, hearing conservation programs, first aid/ CPR training, etc. Maintain all employee records required by law or local governing bodies Conduct all exit interviews and recommend remedies if necessary; reports results to corporate HR  Essentials to Success: Six years of solid Human Resource Generalist with temp-workforce experience required, in a manufacturing/production industry desired Bi-lingual in Spanish required Practical knowledge/compliance of federal and state employment regulations Exceptional oral, and written communication skills Excellent listening skills Solid ability in working with confidential information Outstanding interpersonal, problem solving, attention to detail and analytical skills Ability to be responsive and persuasive at all levels of the organization Strong computer aptitude (primarily with Microsoft Office) and experience with an HRIS system Education / CertificationsEducation RequiredBachelor’s DegreeEducation DesiredBachelor’s DegreeField Of StudyHuman ResourcesOther Certifications Required Or DesiredPHR, SPHR, SHRM-CP, or SHRM-SCP PreferredSkills & ExperienceWork Experience RequiredMinimum 6 years of relevant experience requiredKnowledge, Skills, Or Abilities DesiredKnowledge of major responsibilities, accountabilities, and organization of the Human Resources (HR) function or department; ability to use and administer the organization's HR policies, strategies and environment Knowledge of and ability to use the organization's and industry's standards, procedures and policies relevant to human resources management Knowledge of federal, state and local laws and ability to advise on laws and regulations affecting HR practices Knowledge of HR approaches, tools and techniques; ability to inform, guide and advise managers in HR-related initiatives Knowledge of and ability to plan and develop an organization's HR operations in order to increase individual and organizational effectiveness Knowledge of and ability to implement HR related tasks, processes, and projects to ensure smooth daily HR operationsAbout Menasha Packaging Menasha Packaging Company is a leading designer and manufacturer of graphic consumer corrugated packaging, merchandising solutions, food packaging, shipping containers, material handling solutions, and pack-out and fulfillment services. As the largest independent retail-focused display and packaging company in North America we set new standards in sustainable packaging, and our printing and structural design capabilities are unrivaled in the industry. Our Retail Integration Institute (RII) Group uses an exclusive merchandising model with processes specifically designed to bridge the gap between consumer packaged goods companies and retailers. We currently operate seven RII campuses in geographically dispersed locations. Our 3,200+ employees include more than 100 designers and more than 50 project managers who, together with our highly skilled workforce, develop new, innovative and cutting-edge solutions for global customers. With over 40 locations we are geographically positioned to serve major food, beverage, consumer products, entertainment, electronics, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies with superior products and fulfillment services. As an operating company of Menasha Corporation, we celebrate over 166 years of unwavering dedication to a sustainable business strategy that focuses on keeping pace with change and market trends. Menasha Corporation is a privately held company comprised of two subsidiaries: Menasha Packaging Company and ORBIS Corporation. As one of America’s oldest family-owned manufacturing companies, Menasha Corporation employs over 5,000 in over 80 facilities in North America, Europe and Asia. Click here to view our two-minute video that shares a quick glimpse about Menasha Corporation and our exciting future. Visit our careers site at http://careers.menasha.socialsourcingnetwork.com/  to learn more about working at Menasha and to stay connected to future job opportunities. For more information about Menasha Packaging, please visit www.menashapackaging.com. MON2",Human Resource Manager Job in Aurora,"Full Time, Employee","Aurora, IL 60506",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resource-manager-job-aurora-il-us-171474821.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=10,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,ec541c6e1bbcdbebdc2d93217cff2be7
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:00:59:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job YOU ARE CORDIALLY INVITED: Zimmerman Advertising, one of the nation?s top-ranking and largest full-service agencies in the southeast has built an office infrastructure to support the nature of retail business. We are known for our ""brandtailing"" philosophy... the science of enhancing brand image while pushing next day sales for our clients.We have over 800 budget conscious, retail bleeding, merchandise loving, sofa sleeping, car driving, pizza eating, market activating, comp sales crazy, ROI focused team members in many offices around the country!DescriptionPurpose                     The purpose of this job description is to describe the authority, responsibilities, and duties of the Account Supervisor in the Retail division. Authority                    The Account Supervisor is selected and placed into the position by the appropriate Account Director of the Retail Division.  This position works under General Direction, providing overview of end result; work is completed unsupervised.  Incumbent uses independent judgment and discretion to accomplish tasks.  Plans/schedules/arranges own activities.  Has considerable latitude of discretion and judgment within scope of position.  Develops solutions to complex problems. Overall Objective  Responsible to support the Account Director in the leadership role in all advertising, marketing and business efforts for all assigned accounts. Become a liaison with Client marketing and sales operations, as appropriate.  Continually strives to find ways to grow Client’s business. Responsibilities                    Account Stewardship:Work with Account Director and all Agency departments to ensure that our goals for our Clients are metEnsure that all work is reviewed before it goes to the Client and is always on scheduleEnsure compliance with Agency/Client scope of work guidelinesMonitor clients business on a daily/weekly basis Client Relations:Maintain contact with Clients responsible for development of advertising programs.Anticipate Client needs. Work with Account Director to keep the Agency in the position of leadingAssure that Clients understand Agency procedures/systems. Obtain clear direction before taking actionSchedule regular meetings to ensure expectations are set and met Creative:Assist Account Director in developing and presenting annual/quarterly creative strategies, and conduct strategic review/input sessions, as appropriateWork hand-in-hand with creative team in exploring new creative concepts for Client. Provide ideas and inputFacilitate development of appropriate creative that achieves desired messaging and builds brand equity.Facilitate development of appropriate creative concepts for various projects/promotions.Provide all appropriate information and direction for development of accurate strategic briefsWrite creative briefs for inclusion of necessary marketing information to ensure soundness and accuracy, as appropriate, to be reviewed with Account DirectorEnsure quality, timeliness and cost efficiency of Agency creative productDirectly handle the production of Agency work. Attend shoots, when necessaryWork with the Account Director and Creative team to develop the most effective method of presenting to your ClientsReview any research results with Clients and present results as appropriateWork with Account Director on planning needs for clients Media:Ensure that media functions (planning & buying) deliver desired results for ClientAssist in annual planning process and work with Media team in overseeing development of strategic direction, guidelines and budget parameters for planOversee the maintenance of fiscal year media budget reportingProvide accurate direction to planning and buying groups regarding changes in plans per Client directionProvide input and encourage development of new and added-value media ideasWork with Media team in development and implementation of ethnic media plans, if appropriateIn coordination with Media team, present buy and post-buy recaps to ClientWork with Media team to ensure Client is given up-to-date competitive media spending information for its markets Marketing/Advertising:Take active role in future planning and idea generation for Client, providing strategic input and formulating innovative solutions to existing marketing and advertising problemsInitiate plan development.With the assistance of the entire Account team, develop marketing and advertising plans for Client (annual marketing plans, opportunity plans, creative direction, etc.)Develop market opportunity plansPresent plans to Client, as appropriateEnsure that the Client is provided with the latest market profile analysis and information for their key marketsEstablish regular competitive reporting for Client review (sales, share, targeted marketing efforts, SOV)Help in developing business-building efforts across the countryAssist in development of promotional solutions to market issues and review with ClientEnsure that a written service report covering all Client meetings (and pertinent phone calls) is distributed to appropriate Agency and Client personnelParticipate in an atmosphere that demands a business-building approach to Client’s businessStay updated on industry news and report any observations to the Account Director Other Management Responsibilities:Participate in New Business activities, as requestedBe a role model for subordinates to emulate -- show discipline, proper behavior, commitment, and loyaltyEnsure that the Intern Program is monitored and carried out as assignedProvide leadership to the account team. Encourage and motivate all members of the teamAssure that proprietary and other sensitive information is handled with utmost confidentialityProvide day-to-day supervision of any assigned personnel, guiding workflow, and assuring compliance with Agency policy and fulfilling Client requirementsTrain and coach any subordinates, thereby helping them to grow in responsibility. Delegate increasingly challenging jobs to subordinates to facilitate their growth. Establish objectives to assure subordinates achieve required experience/competency for promotion to the next level of Account Management.Participate in establishing appropriate objectives. Where delegated by Account Director, conduct objective-setting and evaluation sessions with subordinates (provide results to the Account Director).Required Skills RequirementsBachelors Degree in Marketing, Advertising, Communications or relevant, equivalent experience.Minimum 5+ years as a Sr. Account Executive or Account Supervisor in a full service agencyMedia savvy - print, tv, radio, and interactiveMust be computer literate with proficiency with MS Word, MS Excel, MS PowerPoint, and MS Outlook/Express with the ability to learn new computer systems.Strong verbal and written communication skills with people at all levels of an organizationProven leadership abilities and managerial experience The responsibilities are many, various, and not limited to those written in this document Please R.S.V.P. to this position by clicking here: https://zadv.silkroad.com/epostings/index.cfm?fuseaction=app.dspjob&jobid=304745&company_id=15765&jobboardid=24 About Omnicom: The largest Marketing and Media Company in the world, which continues to set the performance benchmark for holding companies. Within Omnicom?s portfolio are the best of breed agencies that are the envy of the industry. Each agency is provided unmatched resources and global access. www.omnicomgroup.com $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } }); Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Address 2200 W. Commercial Blvd., 3rd FloorFt. Lauderdale, FL 33309",Retail; Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/account-supervisor-3183-job-fort-lauderdale-fl-us-172149200.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=14,,,dab0ed86cae25f4c088df3d9abac771f
United States of America,US,09/Jun/2016:00:58:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sports Minded Entry Level Marketing And Advertising AssociateLOOKING FOR A FIRM THAT IS CONSTANTLY EXPANDING AND GROWING?ARE YOU READY TO JOIN ONE OF THE LARGEST ADVERTISING FIRMS IN SANTA FE COUNTY?Our firm is expanding at a tremendous rate! We are currently hiring for entry level and experienced customer service and marketing representatives that we can bring on to our already prestigious firm. Our company is looking for ATHLETES and SPORTS-MINDED individuals that we are going to take us to the next level during this unprecedented time of expansion!EXPERIENCE IS NOT MANDATORY BUT IS A HUGE PLUS!OUR FIRM WILL PROVIDE FULL PAID TRAINING!Our firm specializes in promotional campaigns while continually providing the top notch customer service experience that we have become known for. We are now looking to fill ENTRY LEVEL customer service, sales, advertising, marketing, and entry level management positions as soon as possible! We need the right team in order to achieve results! RequirementsWe are looking for COMPETITIVE, STRONG, SPORTS-MINDED individuals to take our company to the next level. Epic Consulting Group offers fully paid trianing and a guaranteed weekly salary between $400-$800 plus bonuses and incentives.Our firm maintains the policy of training our employees from scratch in the following areas:• Entry Level Management• Junior Marketing• Campaign Development• Event Coordination• Public Relations• Sales Associates• Customer Service STOP LOOKING AND START APPLYING!! Epic Consulting Group Be One of the Many to ""Like"" us on Facebook! This Firm Does NOT participate in the following:Door to Door / Business to Business / Telemarketing ",Sports Minded Entry Level Marketing And Advertising Associate Job in Santa Fe,Full Time Employee,"Santa Fe, NM 87501",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sports-minded-entry-level-marketing-advertising-associate-job-santa-fe-nm-us-172205245.aspx?mescoid=4100672001001&jobPosition=3,,Marketing/Product,e8d5434603f153ce785c583c10f0e8ff
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:03:05:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Public Relations Assistant- Entry Level Marketing We are looking for competitive individuals to fill Entry Level positions in marketing, customer service, and public relations for our expanding firm. The right individual will thrive in a fast paced professional environment and find motivation and fulfillment in the exciting challenges of a growing company. There is a high demand for our customer service oriented and cost-effective services due to the present economic state. We provide advertising, marketing, and public relations campaigns for burgeoning companies and break out products. We only get paid based on results, thus, clients consistently look for us to drive their company and respective brands forward and increase their bottom line. Why Entry Level Positions are important: An Entry Level Public Relations Assistant / Entry Level Marketing Representative receives complete and individualized hands-on training in each division of our company. We take the time to develop and train the individual to handle any task and take initiative on any campaign. Trained, highly motivated, proactive representatives are invaluable to us. The right Entry Level Marketing Representative can expect to have opportunities for growth within the first few months that reflect their unmatched work ethic and dedication.Entry level marketing, customer service, retail sales, promotional assistant, advertising, event assistant, marketing events, entry level promotional sales, event coordinator, entry level advertising sales, entry level management, entry level manager, retail marketing   RequirementsJOB REQUIREMENTSWe want talented and hardworking individuals who are looking to start their career with a growing company. Our ideal employee will be a self-starter with strong organizational and leadership abilities.Qualities We Feel Our Team Members Exemplify:Outstanding communication skills both verbal & written.Able to prioritize and work independently with minimal supervision.Able to work effectively in a team environmentLeadership mentality Because this is an Entry Level position, no formal experience is required. These are Entry Level positions in Customer Service, Marketing, Advertising, and Public Relations. We provide the training and development you need to become successful in your career path with our company. College graduates and interns are welcome to apply. Entry Level Marketing Representatives are trained in the following:AdvertisingMarketingCampaign DevelopmentPublic RelationsCustomer ServiceManagement",Public Relations Assistant- Entry Level Marketing Job in Fort Wayne,Full Time Employee,"Fort Wayne, IN 46845",Advertising and PR ServicesManagement Consulting ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/public-relations-assistant-entry-level-marketing-job-fort-wayne-in-us-168900336.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=5,,Marketing/Product,66cd91bf26bb3d12d5e72342abcad46c
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:03:46:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sales Management TraineeLooking to use your skills with an industry leader? In the Enterprise Management Training Program, you can use those talents on a daily basis as you interact and do business with customers and business partners alike. You’ll also be taught how to lead a sales team, be responsible for P&L, and develop a plan to grow the business – all while honing your management, customer service and communication skills. You’ll have real responsibility from day one in all aspects of the business. And with our performance-based promotions, you’ll have real opportunity as well. Join the company that has repeatedly been recognized as a great place to launch a career. This is where it all starts.Entry-Level Sales Management Training Program Opportunities at EnterpriseThe chance to run your own business and share in the profits you help createHighly marketable skills and training in business, management, marketing, sales and serviceRapid promotion based on performanceA fun, team-oriented work environmentDuring your first year, you'll learn valuable business skills from capable mentors who were once in your shoes. Nearly 100% of all our managers and corporate executives started out as Management Trainees and helped define their own career path that took them to where they are today. Day-to-day responsibilities include actively participating in everything from sales, marketing and customer service to operations and finance. As you progress, you’ll be evaluated every step of the way. And upon successful completion, you can expect rewards, pay increases and the opportunity for continued promotions. Thanks to our entrepreneurial philosophy, there’s absolutely nothing holding you back. Your own initiative and capabilities, coupled with your ability to think on your feet and market effectively, will dictate how fast you advance.Qualifications include: Bachelor's degree is required.Must be at least 18 years old.Must have a minimum of six months of face to face sales or customer service experience; OR six months of demonstrated leadership which could include the following: military, athletic/team activities, community, social or academic organizations.Must be authorized to work in the United States and not require work authorization sponsorship by our company for this position now or in the future.Must have a valid driver’s license with no more than 2 moving violations and/or at-fault accidents on your driving record in the past 3 years.No drug or alcohol related conviction on your driving record (i.e., DUI, DWI) in the past 5 years.Equal Opportunity Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled",Entry Level – Sales Management Trainee Job in Sacramento,"Full Time, Employee","Sacramento, CA 95824",,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-%E2%80%93-sales-management-trainee-job-sacramento-ca-us-162897467.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=12,,Brand/Product Marketing General/Other: Marketing/Product Product Management,7ebc6397c6e25583bb79f2cf9f7dc4a1
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:10:03:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"4080 Lexington Road, Nicholasville, KY 40356 ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE CLERK Competitive Pay Based on Experience Apply Online & Be Sure To Attach Your Resume Today! GLENN FORD LINCOLN needs an ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE CLERK to join our busy dealership office! The ideal candidate will be energetic, professional, and knowledgeable in basic accounting/bookkeeping procedures. Automotive dealership Accounting Experience is preferred, but not required. Accounts Receivable Clerk - Job Description: An Accounts Receivable Clerk performs a variety of accounting and bookkeeping duties according to established policies and procedures. Maintains contact with all relevant parties (such as vendors and customers) and observes confidentiality of all dealership matters. Accounts Receivable Clerk - Job Responsibilities: Uses accounting software programs, Arkona, Excel, Word, to perform duties and responsibilitiesReynold & Reynolds knowledge a plus but not requiredGenerates accounting statements and reports Researches cash receipts, coding and posting of receiptsPrepares daily bank depositResearches and applies unallocated cashOversees customer accounts, A/R write-offs and payment reversalsProvides monthly financial and management reportsCarries out all other Accounts Receivable Clerk duties as required, and assists with any special projects, as necessary Accounts Receivable Clerk - Requirements: Excellent Organizational SkillsProficient in accounting softwareDealership Accounting experience preferred but not requiredMust have general accounting knowledgeProfessional appearanceTeam player with positive attitudeGood Customer Service SkillsMust have a valid driver's license with good record Job Benefits: Competitive Pay Based On Experience!Medical Insurance401(K) Plan Flexible 5 Day Workweek and Paid VacationGreat Career Opportunity! We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. All applicants must be able to demonstrate the ability to pass pre-employment testing to include background checks, MVR, and drug screen. Accounts receivable clerk; automotive receivable clerk; accounting clerk; bookkeeping clerk; accounting jobs; automotive accounting jobs; Nicholasville, KY; Kentucky auto jobs; Nicholasville accounting jobs, Lexington area; Jessamine County",ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE CLERK,Full Time,"Nicholasville, KY 40356",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-receivable-clerk-flexible-5-day-schedule-excellent-career-opp'ty!-job-nicholasville-ky-us-171858195.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cd9dec2122914848d188adff68b79f18
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:10:26:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client (Public Pharmaceuticals Company) is Sunnyvale is seeking an immediate need for Operational Managers (Project Managers) for a temporary (3-6 months, possible temp-to-perm) assignment.  The Operational Excellence Manager is an expert in continuous improvement processes who is a key driver and supports all facets of Operational Excellence activities within the Finance and Infrastructure. He/she directly supports Procure-To-Pay process transformation and standardization by managing Operational Excellence projects, building and promoting the capabilities of Operational Excellence’s multiple organizational levels and ensuring process standards are consistently applied. The role will utilize LEAN tools to develop and implement initiatives that drive gains in efficiency, improve processes and overall quality as well as teach and facilitates implementation of standard processes, methods and tools to deliver results in process standardization. Typical duties/responsibilities may include, but are not limited to the following:Co-responsible for development and implementation of Operational Excellence projects including Continuous Improvement, Change Management, Project Management Office and Training Support deployment of initiatives, tools, frameworks and methodologies in the PTP workstream including process governance and LKU communitiesUse OpEx principles, tools, methods, and techniques, in direct support of achieving PTP business goals, improving performance, and increasing efficiency and productivity via process standardizationServe as a liaison between the various cross-functional groups and F&I management to co-develop and implement the various projects and process improvements initiatives Provides technical and business guidance on improvement projects to provide a continuous pipeline of improvement activities to meet the site’s annual goals and objectives Use project management and continuous improvement tools to develop mechanisms for monitoring overall program progress and to coordinate and drive the operational aspects of the various projects through implementationFacilitate and coach problem solving meetings Provide process and technical support in all phases of process improvement project implementationCoordinate PTP communication, change management and training with internal and external stakeholdersDevelop key relationships with functional leaders, key stakeholders, local key users and Subject Matter Experts to promote the deployment of improvement initiatives and adoption to changeImplement and publish PTP key performance metrics and dashboardsWorks with leadership across the F&I organization to identify and prioritize initiatives and develop plans to implement Compile, prepare and present information for project updates and technical presentations to staff and executive management Analyze root cause, coordinate and communicate corrective and preventive actions.  Requirements / Qualifications BA/BS in Finance or Accounting as advantage5-8 years plus of industry or consulting experience in internal controls, project management and / or process optimizationProven ability to coordinate and implement process end-to-end and continuous improvement Demonstrated ability to set priorities, establish clear expectations and execute identified projectsExperience in the areas of process optimization, change management, process management and standardization Strong influencing and relationship skills Excellent root case problem solving and process mapping skillsStrong computer, proficient in Microsoft Office specially Excel, PowerPoint and VisioAbility to liaise with, speak and present effectively to personnel at all levels of the organizationProven ability to work with cross-functional teams Hands-on experience of training and coaching others to support process standardizationSolution driven personality, dedicated to finding pragmatic solutions to complex problemsStrong communication and relationship management skills, able to influence without direct authorityHigh level of social competence, ability to work in different cultures and diverse environmentsPrevious experience in the areas of PTP process management/optimization, PMO, risk management Requires travel up to 15%   ",Senior Financial Analyst Job in Sunnyvale,Full Time,"Sunnyvale, CA",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-financial-analyst-job-sunnyvale-ca-us-171922023.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f606345157022085bbaa3dc39c7b4d90
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:10:55:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"This person will be responsible for the customer credit, collections and cash application process and assisting the Finance/Accounting teams in all aspects of the collections function.Responsibilities:Provide leadership and management to the Accounts Receivable, Cash Application, Credit and Collection teams. Ensure swift processing of new customer applications as well as leading & ensuring a proactive review of the existing customer base, which may involve diverse and complex analysis of financial statements to support growth for the business. Supervise the cash application process and coordinate resolution of all invoice disputes. Monitor violations of credit policies and process, provide analysis, conclusion and recommendations, present findings to senior management and suggest actions/penalties to be taken when appropriate. Review, develop and prepare reporting to identify customer risks and issues that require process improvement and to report to Vice President of Finance on action steps to resolve issues. Resolve collections issues by negotiating / examining customer payment programs, evaluating payment history, and coordinating contact with 3rd party collections company as needed. Implement and evaluatenew processes and establish internal controls. Analyze, Evaluate, and Determine credit terms and limits of all customers. Manage relationships with Credit Reporting Agencies Handle special projects and requests as needed. Experience:Bachelor’s degree with 7+ years of Credit management experience and a general knowledge of financial accounting systems. Proven experience and knowledge of the Fair Debt Collections Practice Act, the Fair Credit Reporting Act and Fair Credit Billing Act, as well as, Federal Bankruptcy Laws. Experience working with Letters of Credit, UCC filings and/or bank guarantees as necessary. Commitment to process improvements and the ability to think ""out of the box"" i.e. creative approach to problem solving Must possess the ability to multi-task in a fast paced environment while providing a high level of service, providing high quality work and hitting all deadlines Qualifications:Leadership skills and process improvement experience Strong understanding of Accounting, specifically how the sub ledger interacts with the general ledger. Excellent written and verbal communication skills including the ability to present sensitive information to senior leadership and gain consensus across multiple functions Strong quantitative / analytical skills and aptitude Strong computer skills with knowledge of Microsoft applications, particularly Excel and Access High degree of confidentiality and ethical behavior Team player, ability to work cross functionally and with all levels in the organizationWhy Join our TeamWork for a ""Brand Name"" Comprehensive benefits package Competitive Salaries Stable Company who continues to grow Great working environment",Manager of Credit,Full Time Employee,"Stoughton, MA 02072",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-of-credit-accounts-receivable-collections-job-stoughton-ma-us-171615697.aspx?mescoid=1300107001001&jobPosition=14,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,ed5478788d63fdf458eac7878b26042b
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:10:56:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full Time Brookdale Corporate Office - 6737 W. Washington St. Ste. 2300 Milwaukee, WI 53214 Job # TACOmkeWI067447Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Your responsibilities: * Prepares multi-state sales & use tax returns along with other gross receipt taxes.* Assist in data gathering and preparation of tax credits.* Tax account reconciliations prepared on monthly/quarterly basis.* Assist with tax audits.* Utilization of computer software for the tax return preparation, research, tax planning and calendar system.* Encourage teamwork through cooperative positive interaction with co-workers.Required skills and qualifications:* Minimum of an associate degree or bachelor's degree from four-year college or university preferred.* Zero to five years relevant experience* Excellent written, verbal and communication skills.* Ability to prepare work product with a high degree of accuracy.* Ability to work independently and complete assignments at specified deadlines with little supervision.* Ability to analyze issues and provide action plan.* Organization and time management skills* Value added job performanceIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Sales Tax Analyst Job in Milwaukee,Full Time Employee,"Milwaukee, WI 53214",Accounting and Auditing Services Business Services - Other Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-tax-analyst-job-milwaukee-wi-us-171794286.aspx?mescoid=1300116001001&jobPosition=6,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,56112ba2323772d2ca14c1b7b122bb6c
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:11:48:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"CONTROLLER (P/T) POSITION for NCD, Inc., an agency based in Ukiah that provides services for adults who have challenges. The Controller reports to the Executive Director and is an integral part of the Leadership Team. Controller is responsible for the preparation of financial reports, such as income statements, balance sheets, and analyses of historical and future income and expenses, etc. in addition to other duties. The Controller also provides HR functions regarding agency insurances, etc. Position will lead to full time. Experience required. Send resume to NCD, Inc., P.O. Box 146, Ukiah, CA. EOE",Controller Job in Ukiah,Full Time,"Ukiah, CA 95482",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/controller-job-ukiah-ca-us-171821187.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=3,,,b3d8e50d5201d4f2a01b94cf2c751a5f
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:11:49:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"About the Company:CMG Financial is a well-capitalized, privately held mortgage-banking firm founded in 1993. The company makes its products and services available to the market through three distinct origination channels including Correspondent Lending, Wholesale Lending and Retail Lending.  Throughout the mortgage banking and housing markets, CMG Financial is widely known for responsible lending.Job Description The Risk Investigator, reporting to the Manager, Risk Investigator is responsible for supporting activities of the Company’s fraud program. This job involves highly complex duties and independent decisions, including identification, investigation, and resolution of high risk or sensitive fraud cases, root cause analysis of fraud losses, and quality assessment, monitoring and reporting. Routinely requires decision making not defined by established policies and procedures. Essential Duties and Responsibilities • Performing duties related to planning, conducting and documenting inquiries into allegations of mortgage fraud, including single or multifamily originations, servicing, and other frauds involving CMG. • Conduct detailed investigations for integrity issues, misrepresentation and fraud when suspected. • Prepare written Investigation Summaries for all files • Enter findings, dates of investigation, and pertinent notes in all tracking systems • Complete Suspicious Activity Reports in a timely manner to ensure compliance with federal regulations • Provide direction to internal divisions on handling of suspected mortgage fraud • Leverage relationships as a liaison with internal business divisions • Facilitate information sharing opportunities and identification of fraud trends • Identify internal control weakness and recommend actionable mitigating strategies • Conduct interviews of victims, witnesses and suspects, both internal and external to investigate and decision fraud claims against CMG and its customers relative to all channel lines to minimize the loss exposure • Conduct channel or individual specific target reviews identifying fraud trends and making recommendations surrounding continuing and/or discontinuing business relationships. • Prepare notices to Correspondent Lenders and Brokers with continued communication throughout the appeal/denial proves • Ensure compliance with all applicable federal, state and local laws and regulations • Analyze publicly reported data as it pertains to the investigation • Complete all required compliance training. • Maintain knowledge of and adhere to internal compliance policies and procedures. Preferred Qualifications • Bachelor’s Degree in related field with 3-5 years fraud experience • Formal education can be offset with minimum of 5 years consumer financial industry experience (including 3 years residential mortgage industry experience) • Proficient in the Microsoft suite of software: Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint etc. • Ability to work in a fast paced fluid environment. • Excellent communication skills both written and verbal. • High level of integrity and confidentiality required. • Team oriented Comprehensive and competitive benefits including:1.      Medical (HMO, PPO, HSA)2.      Dental, Vision3.      Life/AD&D4.      401K with employer contribution5.      Tuition reimbursement6.      Wellness programs7.      Minimal waiting period for health benefits - active the first of the month following hire date  ",Mortgage Risk Investigator Job in Telecommute body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Telecommute,Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/mortgage-risk-investigator-job-us-171747839.aspx?mescoid=3300593001001&jobPosition=10,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,a0ca65d54032ad5d6f133e55f6a16d92
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:12:28:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Description Under direction, this position is responsible for the collection of delinquent balances of customers within a predetermined business segment aligned to a geographic location.•Initiates correspondence (verbal or written) to customers and field sales to enhance corporate cash flow. Ensures that the departmental Days Sales outstanding (DSO) goal is achieved. Presents a positive and service oriented attitude to internal and external customers to maintain and improve customer relationships.•Recommends efficiencies regarding departmental procedures and customer payment patterns ensuring they are appropriate to departmental goals and objective attainment.•Analyzes Portfolios, identify customers that require placement with third party collections, bankruptcy processes, submits credits and rebills, manual billing, and write-off preparation. Customers are only placed with external agency once internal efforts have been exhausted.•Evaluates account status to initiate credit suspension and pursues action with customer and sales force to ensure payment. Will appraise situation once resolved to potentially reinstate credit terms.•Identifies causes for customer deductions, recommends operational changes that reduce/eliminate reoccurring deductions.•Secures proof of delivery in order to substantiate services were rendered.•Provides training and mentoring capabilities to new hires. Will serve as a role model to internal and external customers to display professionalism and a Stericycle “can do” attitude.•Performs other related duties as required or requested. Position Requirements •Education equivalent to Associates Degree in Business Management, Accounting, Banking & Finance, or Liberal Arts, or the equivalent in related work experience, demonstrating a working knowledge of collection rules and regulations and aging procedures.•Two or more years of experience as a collector, or the equivalent in related work experience, demonstrating a working knowledge of collection policies and procedures.•Demonstrates proficiency in Microsoft Excel, Word, and Outlook.•Demonstrates the ability to type a minimum of 40 wpm. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class. May require mandatory immunizations and credentialing based on customer requirements",Collector Job in Indianapolis,Full Time,"Indianapolis, IN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/collector-job-indianapolis-in-us-171768275.aspx?mescoid=4300696001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),256218952bb3a5dc466fe9e426f7c1ec
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:12:35:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:Director Internal AuditRequisition ID:160017HJob Category:Financial ManagementPrimary Location:USA-VA: VIRGINIA-FALLS CHURCHSchedule:Full-timeJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:RegularJob Posting:Feb 17, 2016Description:Essential Job FunctionsDirects the organization and performance of certain functional areas and the activities of senior managers. Provides staff direction with an understanding and following of established company policies and procedures.Oversees business activities to ensure a high standard of professional excellence is maintained among staff members.Directs business function including, approval of overall project plan, budgets, and work breakdown structure.Establishes and implements short- and long-term strategies to deliver services to customers within reasonable schedules and budgets.Establishes and communicates goals and objectives, defines methodologies, tasks, and activities, and clearly describes roles and responsibilities for performing to personnel. Communicates broadly to help ensure overall coordination for cross-functional teams.QualificationsBasic QualificationsMaster's degree or equivalent combination of education and experienceMaster's degree in related field preferredFifteen or more years of related experienceNine or more years of experience in a supervisory or management capacity includedExperience working with the past and present CSC business environmentExperience working with concepts, practices, and procedures in areas of responsibilityExperience working with the management implications of various forms of financial dataOther QualificationsStrong communication skills needed to interface with high-level customer representativesStrong strategic management and planning skillsAbility to publicly represent company with internal and external clientsAbility to use own judgment and initiative in problem resolutionRemote Work Authorized:NoRelocation Assistance:AvailableClearance Level:NoneDivision:Finance",Director Internal Audit Job in Falls Church,Full Time,"Falls Church, VA 22042",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/director-internal-audit-job-falls-church-va-us-171695192.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),30d2262f13bfd9624a59a845c7097f25
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:12:41:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ready to roll up your sleeves at a large, growing company in the Tri-Valley area? Apply now! Our client, a rapidly-expanding CPG Company is looking to add a hands-on AP Supervisor to their ever-increasing Accounting team. You will handle the ins and outs of Accounts Payable processing and will have the opportunity to supervise one other staff member. You will process a high volume of invoices (nearly 500/week), handle full-cycle AP, reconciliations, vendor management, and balance the AP portion of the GL on a weekly basis. You'll thrive in a pet-friendly, fun environment, with a team that is dedicated to maintaining a great work/life balance. You'll receive great perks and benefits and can make up to $80k, depending on your level of experience.  You should have: 3+ years' experience in a hands-on accounts payable role A Bachelors Degree in Accounting, Finance, or a related field Experience with Oracle Advanced MS Excel skills (including SUM/IF formulas)  Don't wait! Submit your resume to www.AccountingPrincipals.com to be considered for this Accounting Supervisor position today.",AP Supervisor Job - Dublin,Full Time Employee,"Pleasanton, CA 94588",,http://jobview.monster.com/ap-supervisor-job-dublin-ca-job-pleasanton-ca-us-171802466.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=7,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,19cbfdacc205f6b4cdf9f23f735b491c
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:12:58:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Corporate Senior Business Analyst, Integration Management Office Finance San Francisco Job Requisition Number 8196BR Locations where job may be based El Dorado Hills, El Segundo, San Francisco, Woodland Hills Work Schedule Full Time Employment Type Regular Term Employee There's never been a better time to join Blue Shield! Looking for a chance to do meaningful work that touches millions? Come join the hardest working, nonprofit health plan in California and help us shape the future of health care. Blue Shield of California is focused on transforming health care by making it more accessible, affordable and customer-centric. Being a mission-driven organization means we do much more than serve our 3.5 million members: we were the first health plan in the nation to limit our annual net income to 2 percent of revenue and return the difference to our customers and the community, and since 2005 we have contributed more than $325 million to the Blue Shield of California Foundation to improve community health and end domestic violence. We also believe that a healthier California begins with our employees, so we provide them with resources to develop and maintain a healthy lifestyle through our award-winning wellness program, Wellvolution. We're hiring smart thinkers and doers who want to work for a leader and innovator in the challenging, ever-changing healthcare space. Come and help us make health care better for everyone. Job Details The Integration Management Office (IMO) focuses on the integration management of companies acquired by Blue Shield of California. This team is responsible for delivering high-quality results for integrations which are highly complex with people, process and technology impacts. The projects require team members to work as efficiently and effectively as possible in order to complete the necessary efforts. Team members follow proven project management methodologies, utilizing our tools and templates, consistently meeting our defined quality standards.Given the high profile and sensitive nature of this work, all program team members will be required to have:•    Advanced training and experience in industry standards and best practices:o    Project Management and Rapid Implementations (PMI and Agile).o    Quality Management (ISO/ASQ/Lean/Kaizen).o    Operational Management (Six Sigma).•    Proven success at integration management.•    Proven success at rapidly completing high priority and/or highly sensitive projects.•    Proven success at working across an enterprise (5,000 employees and greater), and within all levels of an organization.•    Demonstrated strengths at thriving in highly ambiguous and evolving environments, as well as high profile, urgent situations.•    This position will require 10 – 20% travel and may allow telecommuting.•    Primarily based in San Francisco, Woodland Hills, El Segundo or El Dorado Hills.Responsibilities:•    Develops the annual operating plans, capital budgets and forecasts for the IMO.•    Owns the integrated budget for the portfolio as well as supports project teams for on-going maintenance of project budgets.•    Provides budget reports cascading to senior management.•    Develops, prepares and analyzes reports with complex analysis and data for management review, and presents to various level s of management.•    Performs resource analysis in support of project portfolio using a variety of tools.•    Provides analytic support to building business cases for new business initiatives (cost/benefit analysis).•    Provides analytical support to business process solutions and for improving operational efficiencies.•    Identifies opportunities for improvement in operational performance and works cross-functionally to develop business solutions, and notifies management of issues and problems requiring immediate attention.•    Develops and makes presentations to various levels of management to support PMO leadership. Job Required Education/Experience Education/Requirements:•    Requires Bachelor’s degree and equivalent Four (4) to seven (7) years of experience or equivalent combination; two (2) to five (5) years with Master’s degree.•    Advanced knowledge of automated systems in a production/operations environment.•    Ability to identify, analyze, and resolve cross-functional problems related to business operations utilizing statistical analysis methodology.•    Advanced knowledge of and ability to perform analyses such as GAP, process mapping, root-cause, risk, and requirements data gathering.•    Advanced knowledge of PC and related software applications (Visio, Excel, Microsoft Project, and PowerPoint).•    Highly skilled in interpersonal and verbal/written communications, presentations, math, analytical and problem-solving, use of analytical tools (e.g., MiniTab, Excel graphs).•    Advanced project management skills.•    Able to work in a fast-paced environment.•    Able to live-scribe (take notes within the meeting while others are viewing note-taking typically utilizing web conferencing).•    Drive for results.•    Excellent written and spoken communication skills.•    Strong sense of integrity/ethics/trust.•    Adaptable and willing to work in fluid business situations.•    Polished and professional demeanor and appearance.•    Note: Work samples for budget tracking will be required during the interview process and, if necessary candidates will need to develop samples. . External hires must pass a background check/drug screen. Qualified applicants with arrest records and/or conviction records will be considered for employment in a manner consistent with Federal, State and local laws, including but not limited to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regards to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or disability status and any other classification protected by Federal, State and local laws.",Senior Business Analyst,Full Time Employee,"Corporate Senior Business Analyst, Integration Management Office Finance San Francisco Job Requisition Number 8196BR Locations where job may be based El Dorado Hills, El Segundo, San Francisco, Woodland Hills Work Schedule Full Time Employment Type Regular Term Employee There's never been a better time to join Blue Shield! Looking for a chance to do meaningful work that touches millions? Come join the hardest working, nonprofit health plan in California and help us shape the future of health care. Blue Shield of California is focused on transforming health care by making it more accessible, affordable and customer-centric. Being a mission-driven organization means we do much more than serve our 3.5 million members: we were the first health plan in the nation to limit our annual net income to 2 percent of revenue and return the difference to our customers and the community, and since 2005 we have contributed more than $325 million to the Blue Shield of California Foundation to improve community health and end domestic violence. We also believe that a healthier California begins with our employees, so we provide them with resources to develop and maintain a healthy lifestyle through our award-winning wellness program, Wellvolution. We're hiring smart thinkers and doers who want to work for a leader and innovator in the challenging, ever-changing healthcare space. Come and help us make health care better for everyone. Job Details The Integration Management Office (IMO) focuses on the integration management of companies acquired by Blue Shield of California. This team is responsible for delivering high-quality results for integrations which are highly complex with people, process and technology impacts. The projects require team members to work as efficiently and effectively as possible in order to complete the necessary efforts. Team members follow proven project management methodologies, utilizing our tools and templates, consistently meeting our defined quality standards.Given the high profile and sensitive nature of this work, all program team members will be required to have:•    Advanced training and experience in industry standards and best practices:o    Project Management and Rapid Implementations (PMI and Agile).o    Quality Management (ISO/ASQ/Lean/Kaizen).o    Operational Management (Six Sigma).•    Proven success at integration management.•    Proven success at rapidly completing high priority and/or highly sensitive projects.•    Proven success at working across an enterprise (5,000 employees and greater), and within all levels of an organization.•    Demonstrated strengths at thriving in highly ambiguous and evolving environments, as well as high profile, urgent situations.•    This position will require 10 – 20% travel and may allow telecommuting.•    Primarily based in San Francisco, Woodland Hills, El Segundo or El Dorado Hills.Responsibilities:•    Develops the annual operating plans, capital budgets and forecasts for the IMO.•    Owns the integrated budget for the portfolio as well as supports project teams for on-going maintenance of project budgets.•    Provides budget reports cascading to senior management.•    Develops, prepares and analyzes reports with complex analysis and data for management review, and presents to various level s of management.•    Performs resource analysis in support of project portfolio using a variety of tools.•    Provides analytic support to building business cases for new business initiatives (cost/benefit analysis).•    Provides analytical support to business process solutions and for improving operational efficiencies.•    Identifies opportunities for improvement in operational performance and works cross-functionally to develop business solutions, and notifies management of issues and problems requiring immediate attention.•    Develops and makes presentations to various levels of management to support PMO leadership. Job Required Education/Experience Education/Requirements:•    Requires Bachelor’s degree and equivalent Four (4) to seven (7) years of experience or equivalent combination; two (2) to five (5) years with Master’s degree.•    Advanced knowledge of automated systems in a production/operations environment.•    Ability to identify, analyze, and resolve cross-functional problems related to business operations utilizing statistical analysis methodology.•    Advanced knowledge of and ability to perform analyses such as GAP, process mapping, root-cause, risk, and requirements data gathering.•    Advanced knowledge of PC and related software applications (Visio, Excel, Microsoft Project, and PowerPoint).•    Highly skilled in interpersonal and verbal/written communications, presentations, math, analytical and problem-solving, use of analytical tools (e.g., MiniTab, Excel graphs).•    Advanced project management skills.•    Able to work in a fast-paced environment.•    Able to live-scribe (take notes within the meeting while others are viewing note-taking typically utilizing web conferencing).•    Drive for results.•    Excellent written and spoken communication skills.•    Strong sense of integrity/ethics/trust.•    Adaptable and willing to work in fluid business situations.•    Polished and professional demeanor and appearance.•    Note: Work samples for budget tracking will be required during the interview process and, if necessary candidates will need to develop samples. . External hires must pass a background check/drug screen. Qualified applicants with arrest records and/or conviction records will be considered for employment in a manner consistent with Federal, State and local laws, including but not limited to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regards to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or disability status and any other classification protected by Federal, State and local laws.",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-business-analyst-integration-management-office-finance-job-el-dorado-hills-ca-us-171599517.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=14,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,81c6761cca12f18f08a01cf436e10481
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:12:59:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is activity seeking a Billing Configuration Quality Analyst for an outstanding client in the Rockville, MD area!  This position is full time and permanent. This job will have the following responsibilities:Work collaboratively with Billing Specialists to improve quality of billing configuration procedures and documentation.Determine billing configuration inconsistencies and completion.Audit implementation projects to ensure configuration meets with Payer and State regulations.Maintains confidentiality; adheres to all HIPAA guidelines/regulationsQualifications & Requirements:BA/BS preferred3 - 5 years’ experience in Behavioral health-care billing & collection practicesKnowledge of Quality Review/Auditing of EHR configurationExperience working with Medicare, Medicaid, and commercial insurancesWorking knowledge of medical billing systems/softwaresWorking knowledge of CPT and ICD-9/ICD-10 coding systems; Coding certification preferredProficiency in Microsoft Office SuiteALL INTERESTED AND QUALIFIED CANDIDATES PLEASE SEND YOUR MOST CURRENT RESUME TO JBIGGS@JUDGE.COM OR CONTACT JESSICA DIRECTLY AT 484-434-2947. THANK YOU!",Billing Configuration Quality Analyst Job in Rockville,"Full Time, Employee","Rockville, MD",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/billing-configuration-quality-analyst-job-rockville-md-us-171867699.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=19,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,615f2e0b7fb8dd304b591b6856889f9d
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:13:35:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking an Accountant in Attleboro, MA.Essential Functions: Prepare and post journal entries, prepaids, payroll, banking and allocations Responsible for balance sheet reconciliations Prepare roll forward schedules Support report preparation Assist in the preparation of government reporting Participate in physical inventories Support fixed asset accounting and capital reporting Identify process improvements and streamlining opportunities Contribute to presentation package and supporting schedules Special projects as assignedREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Accounting Professional designation (CPA or CMA) or pursuing certification preferred 3 - 5+ years of general accounting experience, preferably in a metals manufacturing environment Knowledge in process and discrete manufacturing environments a plus Experience with an ERP system, preferably Syteline Experience with accounting software and database management techniques and tools Proficient in Excel, Outlook and PowerPointKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Accountant Job in Attleboro,Full Time Employee,"Attleboro, MA 02703",,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-job-attleboro-ma-us-171699841.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=2,"70,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),183883580217568343c10a6379ed0d3b
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:13:47:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Learns how to conduct inspections to identify infestations or conditions conducive to infestations of wood destroying organisms and/or insects, birds, or other vertebrate pests for the purpose of making proposals and presentations to obtain sales contracts. Responsibilities • Attends company training programs and accompany other associates or managers during ride-alongs in order to learn job skills such as: • Recording accurate measurements and writing correct descriptions of property and/or other areas inspected • Preparing appropriate specs and treating instructions in accordance with existing laws, regulations, and company policy • Calculating job treating costs from company pricing instructions • Executing contracts on behalf of the company, observing company policy pertaining to credit terms of sale • Maintaining equipment, vehicle, and personal safety equipment in clean, working order • Learning sales techniques and product knowledge in order to sell termite control protection and renewals and/or monthly pest control protection to owners or agents of homes, stores, or industry • Gaining experience in dealing courteously with customers, leaving customers' premises and furnishings clean and as found • Passes all state licensing and/or company requirements • Attends call sessions to learn how to effectively collect on delinquent accounts of personal sales contracts • Contacts customers after service is performed to ensure satisfaction and develop additional prospects • Develops termite and/or pest control sales leads for each respective office lead furnished Education and Experience Requirements • High school education or general education degree (GED) required • Six to twelve months related experience and/or training in sales and dealing with the public or equivalent combination of education and experience is strongly preferred • Valid driver’s license from current state of residence required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals • Ability to calculate rate, ratio, and percent, and to draw and interpret bar graphs Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability 100713",Sales Rep / Outside Sales / Territory Sales Job in Ocean,"Full Time, Employee","Ocean, NJ",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-outside-sales-territory-sales-job-ocean-nj-us-170593196.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=2,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,5db6ce4aa9280ea022613097ade1f453
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:13:48:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client in the Waltham, Massachusetts (MA) area is seeking a Corporate Tax Accountant on a temporary basis. Responsibilities Include: Analyzes financial statements and contributes to budgeting processes Assists in preparation of quarterly and yearly tax provision workpapers related to partnership income and state corporate taxes including analysis of deferred taxes and reconciliations for FAS 109 calculations Assists in tax calculations for budgeting and forecasting - including tax rates, tax payments, and impact of proposed transactions Work with federal, joint venture and state tax teams on special projects and processes, as needed May respond to notices from taxing authorities May assist with tax audits and maintaining corporate legal entity structureREQUIREMENTS: One or more years of experience with a public accounting firm tax department or corporate tax department Computer proficiency, including Microsoft Office applications and advanced Excel skills Ability to meet strict deadlines: CorpTax Software requiredKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Corporate Tax Accountant Job in Waltham,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Waltham, MA 02451",,http://jobview.monster.com/corporate-tax-accountant-job-waltham-ma-us-171917296.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),431b87921b0aac122982a40797538737
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:14:33:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Make AXA Advisors your First Choice Job DescriptionAXA Advisors is seeking driven individuals looking to work in an industry with unprecedented growth as Financial Professionals.  When entering the workforce for the first time, stability, financial freedom, and building a skillset through training and development are the most important factors that job seekers look for when searching for their ideal job.  Many entry level professionals discover that it is difficult to find a position that provides all of these things.  The Financial Professional is an independent position that provides entry level professionals the opportunity to build their own business and financial success potential by helping individuals and families make strong financial decisions to impact their future positively.The amount of support we provide for our Financial Professionals is unparalleled in the industry.  We make the route to success very easy if you have the drive and motivation to make it happen.  While other companies may throw their new employees into the fire and hope that a handful succeed, we believe in the people that we hire and will work with them constantly until they are ready to take the reins of their business and go full speed ahead.Job RequirementsIn order to be a successful Financial Professional, you do not need to have a degree in finance or economics or any work experience. What we do need is a Financial Professional who is a results-driven self-starter, able to take ownership in what he or she is doing and willing to work hard to achieve success. The most successful candidates find fulfillment in knowing that they are not only making a lot of money, but working towards building a career in the financial services industry.Requirements for the position include:•Must be a US Citizen or permanent resident•Individual who possesses integrity and a strong work ethic •Team player who possesses excellent interpersonal skills and communication abilities, with a high degree of  self confidence •A four-year college degree is preferred and relevant professional FINRA securities registrations are a plus.  BenefitsAs an AXA Advisors Financial Professional, you’ll be part of a recognized, respected company that offers:•High earnings potential and comprehensive benefits•Training, support and hands-on management•Advancement/management opportunitiesCompany Overview AXA Advisors, LLC is a member of the global AXA Group, “AXA Group” refers to AXA, a French holding company for a group of international insurance and financial services companies, together with its direct and indirect consolidated subsidiaries, including AXA Equitable.  AXA Group is a worldwide leader in financial protection and wealth management. AXA's operations are diverse geographically, with major operations in Europe, North America and the Asia/Pacific Area.AXA Advisors is positioned to offer highly motivated, achievement-driven individuals an opportunity to grow a thriving business. AXA Advisors, LLC (NY, NY 212-314-4600) member FINRA/SIPC, is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V.  Make AXA Advisors your first choice!GE-100359 (01/15) (Exp. 01/17) Report",Monster,Employee,"Phone 716-626-2507 Address 350 Essjay Road Suite 300Williamsville, NY 14221",Banking; Insurance; Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-advisor-entry-level-or-experienced-job-buffalo-ny-us-147616043.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=1,,,7a79e203a4e1185921fd0a2f6699f424
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:14:57:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accountant   -   ( 488661 )     Description   First Data is a global leader in commerce-enabling technology solutions, serving more than six million business locations and 4,000 financial institutions in 118 countries around the world. Our 23,000 owner-associates are dedicated to helping companies, from start-ups to the world’s largest corporations, conduct commerce every day by securing and processing more than 2,300 transactions per second and $1.9 trillion per year. First Data is committed to staying at the forefront of our industry, and we are innovating a wide range of next-generation commerce technology solutions to help our clients better detect fraud, gain insights into consumer spending patterns and build customer loyalty. There are many exciting opportunities for talented individuals who would like to join our team and play a meaningful role in helping us shape the future of global commerce. First Data’s Operations and Call Center functions are focused on providing the outstanding client service, support and experiences that are critical to our ongoing success. Our Operations owner-associates are responsible for the stability of our global network infrastructure by helping our financial institution clients with various aspects of transaction processing, including statement management, card production and ticket-issue resolution. Our Call Center owner-associates are often the first point of contact for our business clients, and they play an important role in driving client satisfaction. They are responsible for answering questions and resolving problems on a wide range of issues, including account activation inquiries, potential fraudulent activity and our full range of products and services. Position Description Overview Experience with problem solving, projects, and billing functions. Familiarity with financial transactions and corresponding postings. Extensive use of Excel, Access, and General Ledger/Billing System reports. Job Responsibilities According to Generally Accepted Accounting Procedures (GAAP), prepares standard and specialized reports including balance sheets and income statments. Analyzes moderately complex financial reports and records and makes recommendations relative to the accounting reserves, assets and expenditures. Reconciles and adjusts various general ledger accounts and bank statements for reporting purposes. Scope of Job Moderately complex accounting activities including financial analyses. General accounting knowledge. Autonomy General supervision, excercising discretion and independent judgement. Coordinates accounting matters with other departments or divisions.   Job Requirements Bachelors degree in Accounting/Finance or equivalent work experience. 2-4 years financial accounting experience. Competencies Financial Analysis Financial Recordkeeping Financial Reporting Accounting GAAP General Ledger Cost Accounting Fin & Acctg Systems First Data is an Equal Opportunity Employer (Minorities/Females/Vets/Disabled/LGBT)   Primary Location :   United States-Nebraska-Omaha-Omaha - 6902 Pine Street Job Field :   Accounting Schedule :   Full-time Job Posting :   Sep 1, 2016 Manager Level :   L2 - Supervisor/Professional Employee Status :   Regular",Accountant Job in Omaha,Full Time Employee,"Omaha, NE",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-job-omaha-ne-us-171788586.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a7b5f6c0a1768fa7a0c3be8670959966
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:14:59:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director of Accounting & RevenueDirector of Accounting & RevenueGlobal, publicly traded tech services company located north of Boston is seeking a Director to oversee the Accounting & Revenue Recognition function for their growing company. This person will need to have a strong technical accounting background so they can review complex revenue contracts and ensure that all accounting policies and review guidance from SEC. The ideal candidate will have a CPA and 10+ years of experience with strong revenue recognition exposure. Public accounting (Big 4 or large regional) and corporate experience is required. Candidates at the Manager or Senior Manager level coming directly out of public accounting will also be considered. Responsibilities: Review complex revenue contractsReview revenue guidance and apply accordinglyOversee internal controls are in compliance with US GAAPManage XBRL data tagging of SEC filingsWork with multiple other departments including Sales, Legal, and Finance in negotiation of license arrangementsMaintain balance sheet accounts and month-end close processOther ad hoc projects as neededQualifications: Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance, or related field10+ years of experienceCPA with public accounting experience (Big 4 or Large Regional)Strong knowledge Revenue Recognition (ASC 605 and familiarity with ASC 606) and other technical accounting areasExcellent communication and organization skillsFor immediate consideration please send resume in Word format to Matt Medeiros @ mmedeiros@hollisterstaff.com Hollister Staffing and all its related entities provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status or other categories protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Director of Accounting & Revenue Job in Lowell,Full Time Employee,"Lowell, MA",Computer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-accounting-revenue-job-lowell-ma-us-171801777.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=16,"145,000.00 - 160,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,c486c5ee0161db8335f7e39ae37e2da3
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:15:47:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"A rapidly growing, global, technology firm is looking to fill a Corporate Controller job in Chicago, IL.  The ideal candidate will have five or more years of accounting experience, a CPA and strong technical accounting skills. Initially the Corporate Controller will be responsible for leading the reporting process, consolidations, acquisition integration and will be the point person for the outside audit and tax firms but the role will grow substantially once those pieces are mastered.  This is an opportunity for someone to join an entrepreneurial company that doubled in size last year and work with a world class leadership team.  The company offers an extremely competitive base compensation and bonus potential, strong leadership that comes from top rotational development programs and many of the perks of a tech culture.  Corporate Controller Job Responsibilities include:• Lead the financial reporting process for global operations• Consolidation of foreign entities• Responsible for implementation of new accounting standards and researching and documenting the company’s position on certain complex transactions like acquisitions and revenue recognition• Manage a team of 15, including global staff• Ensuring internal controls• Point person for outside audit and tax firms• Customized reporting for Board of Directors• Assist in annual budget and forecasting process Qualifications:     • Five or more years accounting experience required• CPA required• Strong knowledge of GAAP required• Public Accounting experience highly preferred• Software revenue accounting experience preferred  If you are interested in pursuing this Corporate Controller Job in Chicago, IL or perhaps other available opportunities with Parker & Lynch then please email your resume in .doc format to Brian.Esko@ParkerLynch.com. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled ",Corporate Controller-- Growing Technology Firm Job in Chicago,Full Time Employee,"Chicago, IL 60606",,http://jobview.monster.com/corporate-controller-growing-technology-firm-job-chicago-il-us-171550044.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=2,"120,000.00 - 140,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,7853494f57adec929259d492f7245831
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:15:48:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Learns how to conduct inspections to identify infestations or conditions conducive to infestations of wood destroying organisms and/or insects, birds, or other vertebrate pests for the purpose of making proposals and presentations to obtain sales contracts. Responsibilities • Attends company training programs and accompany other associates or managers during ride-alongs in order to learn job skills such as: • Recording accurate measurements and writing correct descriptions of property and/or other areas inspected • Preparing appropriate specs and treating instructions in accordance with existing laws, regulations, and company policy • Calculating job treating costs from company pricing instructions • Executing contracts on behalf of the company, observing company policy pertaining to credit terms of sale • Maintaining equipment, vehicle, and personal safety equipment in clean, working order • Learning sales techniques and product knowledge in order to sell termite control protection and renewals and/or monthly pest control protection to owners or agents of homes, stores, or industry • Gaining experience in dealing courteously with customers, leaving customers' premises and furnishings clean and as found • Passes all state licensing and/or company requirements • Attends call sessions to learn how to effectively collect on delinquent accounts of personal sales contracts • Contacts customers after service is performed to ensure satisfaction and develop additional prospects • Develops termite and/or pest control sales leads for each respective office lead furnished Education and Experience Requirements • High school education or general education degree (GED) required • Six to twelve months related experience and/or training in sales and dealing with the public or equivalent combination of education and experience is strongly preferred • Valid driver’s license from current state of residence required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals • Ability to calculate rate, ratio, and percent, and to draw and interpret bar graphs Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability 100713",Sales Rep / Outside Sales / Territory Sales Job in Trenton,"Full Time, Employee","Trenton, NJ",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-outside-sales-territory-sales-job-trenton-nj-us-171864988.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=15,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,ca54294757a2ebfd78fbbe03fa8e26bd
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:16:45:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"CUSTODIAN To perform routine building service work to maintain cleanliness/sanitation of buildings/furnishings. REQUIRED: High school diploma or equivalent; physical ability to frequently pick up/carry items weighing up to 50 lbs; will perform physical labor over extended periods; and 1 year experience in custodial/related work. Qualified applicants must submit an application, September 5th – 9th, 2016 electronically to: recruitment@missouriwestern.edu Application forms are available on the Human Resources webpage at: https://forms.missouriwestern.edu/hr/application.asp . EOE As published in the St. Joseph News-Press",Custodian Job in Saint Joseph,Full Time,"Saint Joseph, MO 64501",All,http://jobview.monster.com/custodian-job-saint-joseph-mo-us-171833689.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=20,,,604b1b8ca2bdafaae3904f8df4028343
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:16:56:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"   Senior Vice PresidentTreasury, Tax, Financial Planning & Credit The Cato Corporation, a leading specialty retailer of value-priced women’s fashion apparel with corporate offices located in Charlotte, North Carolina, operates three concepts: Cato, It’s Fashion and Versona. The Company has over 1,300 stores throughout the United States and a diverse workforce of over 10,000 associates. The Company’s stock is traded on the NYSE under the symbol “CATO”. Cato is seeking an experienced Senior Vice President, Treasury, Tax, Financial Planning & Credit.  This positionis responsible for cash management, short-term investments, corporate banking and investor relations;tax compliance, planning and accounting; strategic financial and capital planning process; state, federal and OCC compliance for Cedar Hill National Bank; and Sarbanes-Oxley compliance.  In this role, you will direct cash management, forecasting and investments; federal and state tax compliance, research and strategy; budgets/planning and financial analysis; manage shareholder interface including investor relations, press releases, analyst relationship/inquiries, SEC/NYSE reporting and transfer agent relationship; and support senior management. Qualified candidates should possess 10 years retail experience in treasury, tax, control, financial/capital planning, investor relations and corporate governance; excellent written and verbal communication skills; solid understanding of accounting and financial modeling/analysis; excellent presentation skills; and above average PC skills.  Bachelor’s degree in Accounting or Finance required.  CPA preferred. To express your interest in this career opportunity, please submit your resume and salary requirements to:  The Cato Corporation, Attn:  Recruitment, PO Box 34216, Charlotte, NC  28234, Fax to (704) 551-7246 or Email to catojobs@catocorp.com.  www.catofashions.com.  EOE/Drug Testing",Senior Vice President Treasury,"Full Time, Employee","Charlotte, NC 28273",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-vice-president-treasury-taxm-finanical-planning-credit-job-charlotte-nc-us-171917013.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=19,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,76ff5360487276a5e475ee46bfb75a04
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:16:57:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Career Showcase is a Job Fair Company that specializes in Accounting,Human Resources,Customer Service, Banking, Marketing, Sales and many others. We partner with many fortune 500 companies to help them find the best talent the market has to offer. Companies come to our fairs to interview and hire the BEST of the BEST professionals, account executives and managers.Our fairs are open to recent college grads through executive level candidates. Candidates that attend our job fairs are more likely to obtain the career they are looking for than those candidates that just ""apply"" to job postings.2016 EVENING JOB FAIRMANY COMPANIES ATTENDING @ 5pm!!NJ's # 1 EVENING RECRUITING EVENT INVITES YOU...**NORTH NJ FAIR**THURSDAY SEPTEMBER 29, 2016 @5pmSHERATON CROSSROADS HOTEL1 International Boulevard, Route 17 NorthMahwah, NJ 07495*Time : 5.00 p.m....Be prompt to hear company presentations***YOU MUST PRE-REGISTER TO SECURE A SPOT AT THIS EXCLUSIVE HIRING EVENT http://careershowcase.com/event-details/?eventid=367&venueid=79 What to expectMANY COMPANIES ATTENDING!!! Our special ""INTRODUCTION FORMAT"" will give you the opportunity to hear about the companies in a ""THEATRE"" environment before the Career Fair even begins. EACH MANAGER/RECRUITER WILL BE PRESENTING THEIR COMPANY TO YOU. This will assist you in deciding which company you want to meet with. Dress Professionally Bring at least 15 copies of your resume Be ready to network with other candidates..A job fair is a great networking opportunity to connect with hundreds of other candidates in the marketplace Even if you are unsure about meeting with a company, approach them to “pitch"" yourself and your skills, you never know where it will lead Best chance to obtain the interview is to actually attend the event. Hiring managers are looking for those candidates that take the initative to actually ATTEND the fair Key Words: Account Executive, Sales Representative, Account Manager, B2B, retail sales, furniture, sales, financial services, customer service, Business Development Manager, Sales Manager, Financial Services, Insurance, Telecommunications, Pharmaceutical, Hospital Representative, Medical, Marketing, Advertising, Healthcare,office equipment, Telecom, Information Technology, Software, Security Services, Advertising, Payroll, Sales Management, Sales Trainee, Management Trainee, At home sales, cold calling, telemarketer, telemarketing, financial advisor, insurance sales, outside sales, outside sales representative, sales executive, salesman, salesperson, sales women, marketing, Melville, Long Island, New York, NY",ACCCOUNTING - JOB FAIR THURSDAY SEPTEMBER ...MANY NEW COMPANIES @PM Job in Mahwah,Full Time Employee,"Mahwah, NJ 07495",Business Services - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/acccounting-job-fair-thursday-september-29-many-new-companies-5pm-job-mahwah-nj-us-171916068.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=17,"30,000.00 - 150,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,1401db24bef45febb9529ca85117d7f8
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:16:58:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Title Analyst, Lease Administration Auto Req ID 43375BR Job Description Our Lease Administration platform supports a diverse set of client needs from basic management of lease abstractions and critical dates to full financial management of landlord invoices and reconciliation audits. We provide comprehensive knowledge and access to data across the portfolio that enables our clients to make strategic real estate decisions that support and enhance their core business. Responsibilities our Lease Analysts are responsible for the full scope of Lease Administration services include:   Abstracting and interpreting commercial lease documents (leases, amendments, subleases) Rent variance analysis and rent payment processing Data entry, validation and management of lease Reviewing annual landlord reconciliation statements and real estate tax calculations Reviewing CAM and other escalations & real estate tax invoices documents Reviewing annual landlord reconciliation statements and real estate tax calculations to ensure accuracy and lease compliance Rent variance analysis and rent payment processing to ensure accuracy and lease compliance Tracking and maintaining critical lease dates Required Skills and Education:  Bachelor’s degree in Business, Accounting, or FinanceAt least 2 years of work experience in finance, accounting, lease administration, or property managementAccounting experience, Commercial real estate experience in lease administration, real estate accounting or property management with exposure to commercial leasesExpertise in understanding and interpreting complex commercial lease language Full/Part Time Full-Time Regular/Temporary Regular Org Marketing Statement About JLLJLL (NYSE: JLL) is a professional services and investment management firm offering specialized real estate services to clients seeking increased value by owning, occupying and investing in real estate. A Fortune 500 company with annual fee revenue of $5.2 billion and gross revenue of $6.0 billion, JLL has more than 280 corporate offices, operates in more than 80 countries and has a global workforce of more than 60,000. On behalf of its clients, the firm provides management and real estate outsourcing services for a property portfolio of 4.0 billion square feet, or 372 million square meters, and completed $138 billion in sales, acquisitions and finance transactions in 2015. Its investment management business, LaSalle Investment Management, has $59.1 billion of real estate assets under management. JLL is the brand name, and a registered trademark, of Jones Lang LaSalle Incorporated. For further information, visit www.jll.com JLL is focused on winning in the marketplace and being the industry leader, executing better than anyone else and innovating to create great products and services. We operate in an atmosphere of excellence, integrity, respect and trust. We bring a sense of teamwork, inclusion and diversity in everything we pursue. Our clients see the results as we address their needs, solve their problems and bring new ideas. As a distinguished market leader, we offer challenging career opportunities in an exciting environment. Our future success as a firm depends on our ability to attract, develop and retain the very best people in the business.Our values define who we are, underscore our commitment to clients and provide direction for everything we do.Our unique culture has been recognized by industry experts and our peers. We are:•A “best company to work for’ in multiple locations around the globe, including Chicago, San Francisco, London, Ireland, Shanghai and Hong Kong•World’s Most Ethical Companies from Ethisphere Institute for seven consecutive years •America’s 100 Most Trustworthy Companies from Forbes Magazine•#1 Top Corporate Real Estate Firm 2013 from Watkins Research Group, Inc. for six consecutive yearsThis partial list of awards demonstrates our record of achievement and our commitment to fostering an award-winning culture. For further information, visit www.jll.com Information Security StatementEmployees are expected, at all times, to perform their responsibilities in accordance with the JLL Code of Business Ethics and the firm’s corporate policies. Employees granted access to the firm’s information technology are expected to follow the firm’s guidance designed to promote best practices for information security, data privacy and the appropriate use of technology systems. EEO Statement JLL is committed to developing and maintaining a diverse workforce, and strongly believes in equal opportunity extended to all individuals in all aspects of the employment relationship. Please visit www.JLL.com for additional information on JLL’s commitment to equal opportunity.",Analyst,Full Time,"Charlotte, NC",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/analyst-lease-administration-job-charlotte-nc-us-171855648.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),333f195efe3c257ae21b504b610552f0
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:17:10:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have an excellent opportunity for a Manager, Pricing Analytics in our Ewing, NJ location. The successful candidate will support the development of a best practice approach to maximizing profit/sales across the Church & Dwight portfolio through price analyses and recommendations that will achieve identified objectives by Brand. The Manager, Pricing Analytics will work internally across C&D functional groups to support the development of a sustainable model for Pricing Excellence. ResponsibilitiesSupport the development and implementation of a sustainable approach to Pricing Analytics that is customized across all C&D Brands that takes into account long-term brand objectives.Conduct analysis and make recommendations on pricing strategies taking into account market conditions, competitive environment, brand trade strategies, and future portfolio development mix.Analyze industry dynamics, market forces and competitors' pricing activities to evaluate potential implications for the company. Determine optimal responses to competitors' moves using an analytical framework and modeling.Incorporate retailer go-to-market strategies to pricing recommendations to optimize sales and profit potential.Scope of analysis and recommendations could include (but not limited to) the following: Product list pricing & MSRP, price/size architecture, promotional activity (depth, frequency, type, etc.) and new product pricing.Lead price and promotion elasticity research studies; translating insights into strategies.Develop pricing trackers/post-analysis of past recommendations.Work collaboratively with Finance, Research, Sales and Marketing teams and be able to anticipate/proactively manage the needs of cross-functional constituents.Ad-hoc analyses as needed.Education and ExperienceBachelor's degree from an accredited institution in Marketing, Finance or Accounting is required; MBA a plus.Five (5) or more years of Consumer Packaged Goods industry experience in business analytics, sales, category management, finance or sales strategy is preferred.Strong proficiency in Nielsen syndicated data.Skills and CompetenciesEffective communication and presentation skills.Strong collaborator and team player.Passionate about driving change within the organization.Ability to influence across multiple functions and levels to achieve pricing initiatives; Willingness to “have an opinion” backed up by insight and the confidence to influence key stakeholders.Strong analytical skills are critical: candidate must be able to manipulate and analyze data from various sources to identify opportunities and articulate solutions/conclusions clearly and concisely.Strategic thinker and problem solver who has the ability to apply analytic solutions to business problems.Strong project management skills.Highly motivated, results oriented individual that can manage multiple projects.Proficient skills in Microsoft Excel, PowerPoint, and Word are required; knowledge of SAP and Siebel a plus. Church & Dwight Co., Inc. is proud to be an equal opportunity employer M/F/Disability/VeteranPI95233248",Manager,Full Time Employee,"Ewing, NJ 08628",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-pricing-analytics-job-ewing-nj-us-171605408.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=7,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,9afaa528fb6f76682cf9975fce26b001
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:17:10:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Is It Time to Consider Something New?If you feel like you are moving too slowly along your career path and are inspired by the thought of helping people protect and enrich their lives, we can help you find your passion.With an average of 10,000 baby boomers reaching retirement age each day1, there has never been a better time to enter the financial services industry. Prudential is seeking professionals from a variety of backgrounds who are ambitious, people-oriented individuals with a desire to make a difference and own their own future. Overall Duties and Responsibilities ·Develop and implement sales and marketing plans·Prospect potential clients and discuss insurance and financial services·Build and execute strategies to help clients accumulate, preserve, and transfer their assets TrainingAt Prudential, you will receive coaching and mentoring from experienced managers to help you build a client network during a paid training program.Prudential provides individualized classroom training, as well as web-based learning resources that begin at the time of hire and provide continued development as you build your career. You will have the opportunity to work with dynamic teams to develop innovative solutions that address the diverse needs of clients.Compensation and BenefitsWe offer competitive compensation and generous work performance-based bonuses. This is an opportunity for you to potentially achieve a six-figure incomeNext StepsIf you are looking for a career with high earning potential – and are up for a new challenge – click “Apply” to connect with our management team. 1 Source: The Baby Boom Cohort  in the US:2012-2060,  accessed 2/27/2015,  *Candidates cannot be currently registered with another broker-dealer.  Securities products and services are offered through Pruco Securities, LLC.  Each is a Prudential Financial company located in Newark, NJ and is solely responsible for its own financial condition and contractual obligations. ©2015  Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities. Prudential, the Prudential logo, the Rock symbol and Bring Your Challenges are service marks of Prudential Financial, Inc., and its related entities, registered in many jurisdictions worldwide. Prudential is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. EEO IS THE LAW. The Prudential Insurance Company of America, Newark, NJ and its affiliates. Prudential is an Employer that participates in E-Verify.0272810-00002-00 Expires 10/10/2016                                                                      Version 1 – Revised 3/16/2015",Financial Professional Associate Job in Coral Gables,Full Time Employee,"Coral Gables, FL 33134",,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-professional-associate-job-coral-gables-fl-us-171224175.aspx?mescoid=1300117001001&jobPosition=4,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,b5b0a80e99187cd76dc6f1bb30384046
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:03:47:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary Accountable for total store security, loss/shrink prevention, inventory management and operational control effectiveness, working across all store shifts and covering all control functions for regular oversight activities. Job Responsibilities Manage security and shrink, performance, aligned with corporate expectations and store oriented financial goals Structured day/evening/night shiftwork to cover all critical control activities. Perform core security & loss avoidance tasks, to include: Suspicious activity review (Exception, Sysrepublic, scan-movement reports). StopLift report and response execution, including performance and disciplinary tracking. Receiving and inventory management process oversight & control validation, including Auto Replenishment Optimization and PICS activity. High-volume Self Check Out (SCO) exception monitoring Shrink line-item and account ownership: Loss review, including Auto Replenishment, known/unknown loss, markdown, scorecard, DSD extended invoice, inventory tracking/GP, GXS. Co-lead store shrink committee with Store Leader and enforce shrink management accountability & performance. High-loss-item reduction improvement recommendations and execution. High-risk area walkthrough & stock management New hire orientation / education Coordinate with other store security resources, including detectives, guards Identify suspicious customer and employee behavior for investigation with Loss Prevention leadership Conduct all shift reviews, including evening and night visits, and utilize CCTV periodically to ensure compliance to Company policies and processes in effort to reduce product theft Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent plus 18 months to 3 years of additional training Education and Training Desired Bachelors Degree Business, Security, Criminal Justice, Loss Prevention or related field of study Experience Required Minimum of one year experience in retail operations, loss prevention, security, or related field Experience Desired 3+ years experience in Giant Eagle or similar retail environment Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Analytical Computer Skills Numeric Computation/Reporting Presentation & Verbal Communic Project Management Work Environment Normal store environment with no continuous exposure to extreme temps, dust, etc Physical requirements Hearing (auditory) Reading Sight or Peripheral Vision Telephone Usage Communication (verbal) Writing Equipment Used Calculator Computer Copier Fax Machine Printer Telephone",Store Security Specialist (Full Time) Carmel Market District Job in Carmel,Full Time Employee,"Carmel, IN",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/store-security-specialist-full-time-carmel-market-district-job-carmel-in-us-168936833.aspx?mescoid=3300600001001&jobPosition=17,,Marketing/Product,440e135b7c5ceeaf87845784404bb1c3
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:04:56:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"General Warehouse Associate  ESSENIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES　Process the various types of orders by specific carriers.　Perform ship confirmation and labeling transactions.　Ability to read and communicate simple warehouse instructions in EnglishPerform order audits.　Pack orders properly, with correct dunnage, packing slips, correct box.Know how to manifest orders.　Meet or exceed established order pick/pack rates.　Work all areas of warehouse: Fast pick, pack, bulk pack and LTL.　If required, ability to operate electric pallet jack and/or high low machineryIf required, ability to operate a scanning gunIf required, ability to operate strapping machineAudit shipments.　Minimum Candidate Qualifications:High school diploma or GEDPrior warehouse experience preferredCompetencies: The position requires the employee to stand sometimes in excess of 7 hours and frequently walk, reach and lift. The employee is occasionally required to sit; climb or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must regularly lift and /or move up to 10 pounds, frequently lift and/or move up to 25 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and ability to adjust focus.",General Warehouse Associate Job in Burlington,Full Time Employee,"Burlington, NJ 08016",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/general-warehouse-associate-job-burlington-nj-us-169213481.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=19,$11.00+ /year,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,dc9d60c7e25b2031cbc6a966f953524c
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:04:57:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Senior Marketing Copy Editor/Content Writer Location: San Jose, CA Duration: 6 mos+ (renewable per quarter) Experis has an immediate position for a Sr. Marketing Copy Editor/Content Developer with the following skills: Description: - This is a hands-on writer and editor, not a content program manager. - Experienced marketing writer for digital copy (websites, banner ads, email) for a SaaS eCommerce environment. - Experience in creating copy for WebEx products as well as new offerings, delighting and inspiring customers and prospects. - Will work collaboratively with the UX Design team and a close-knit group of business strategists and project managers. - Will take strategic guidance from business owners and the content strategy lead. - Will be stepping into an existing voice, and will need to be a pitch-perfect mimic to avoid disconnects in the brand voice from page to page. Minimum Skills Required: - 7- 10 years of professional experience as a Content Writer/Editor - Eagle-eyed proofing skills backed by a deep understanding of language mechanics (grammar, punctuation, capitalization) - Demonstrated ability to write brief, fresh copy not old-school long-form or business-speak - Experience with product education: FAQs, How It Works, etc., or technical writing. - Must be able to explain Tech products and experience writing about technology products/services Required Samples: - Examples of style guide worked on or created - Demonstrative proofreading and editing skills - Marketing web content samples - Marketing samples that demonstrate fun, flair, and flow Desired Skills: - Working knowledge of SEO - Work writing for social media: Tweets, FaceBook skins, etc. - Interaction experience, particularly for eCommerce flows Send your qualified resume to jeannie.fernandez@experis.com for immediate consideration. Jeannie Fernandez Experis 408-431-4554Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Marketing Copy Editor/Writer Job in Milpitas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Title: Senior Marketing Copy Editor/Content Writer Location: San Jose, CA Duration: 6 mos+ (renewable per quarter) Experis has an immediate position for a Sr. Marketing Copy Editor/Content Developer with the following skills: Description: - This is a hands-on writer and editor, not a content program manager. - Experienced marketing writer for digital copy (websites, banner ads, email) for a SaaS eCommerce environment. - Experience in creating copy for WebEx products as well as new offerings, delighting and inspiring customers and prospects. - Will work collaboratively with the UX Design team and a close-knit group of business strategists and project managers. - Will take strategic guidance from business owners and the content strategy lead. - Will be stepping into an existing voice, and will need to be a pitch-perfect mimic to avoid disconnects in the brand voice from page to page. Minimum Skills Required: - 7- 10 years of professional experience as a Content Writer/Editor - Eagle-eyed proofing skills backed by a deep understanding of language mechanics (grammar, punctuation, capitalization) - Demonstrated ability to write brief, fresh copy not old-school long-form or business-speak - Experience with product education: FAQs, How It Works, etc., or technical writing. - Must be able to explain Tech products and experience writing about technology products/services Required Samples: - Examples of style guide worked on or created - Demonstrative proofreading and editing skills - Marketing web content samples - Marketing samples that demonstrate fun, flair, and flow Desired Skills: - Working knowledge of SEO - Work writing for social media: Tweets, FaceBook skins, etc. - Interaction experience, particularly for eCommerce flows Send your qualified resume to jeannie.fernandez@experis.com for immediate consideration. Jeannie Fernandez Experis 408-431-4554Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Milpitas, CA 95035",http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-copy-editor-writer-job-milpitas-ca-us-169265555.aspx?mescoid=2700442001001&jobPosition=19,,Marketing/Product,920a69ddda56b1f00681e6b9149afb2d
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:05:31:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Market Access, Managed Care, Value Proposition, POSITION SUMMARY:   Under general direction of the Director, Managed Markets, the Assistant Director is responsible for serving as an integral member of the Market Access team. Specifically, the position will be responsible for developing market access and managed markets strategies for assigned clients.    PRIMARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:   Technical Skills and Expertise Manage, implement and deliver on various project types potentially including: Value proposition creation (for client products to payers and providers) Message testing/payer market research Field force tools development and training (i.e., account manager tool kits) Sales aids (both payer and provider) Market segmentation analyses Interactive marketing / sales aids Brand planning engagements Account strategy Contracting strategy Commercialization strategy Pricing Serve as primary client/project manager Work collaboratively with market research team, creative team, and health outcomes/scientific team to produce client deliverables Account Management Provides leadership on some client accounts Grows existing client relationships and develops new business opportunities Business Development Responsible for lead proposal writing, contracting, client capabilities presentations, and pricing Creates project chain-linking opportunities through existing project client relationships Financial Accountability Manage project budgets Allocate human and financial resources as appropriate to ensure objectives are accomplished Train managers on financial matters related to performing job responsibilities Quality and Compliance Overall responsibility for timeliness, accuracy, completeness, and quality of all assigned projects Identifies areas for risk Fosters proactive, continued quality improvement Ensures and maintains highest integrity and honesty in all business activities Team Management/MentorshipTrains and develops staff, where appropriateIdentifies skills that are needed for projects or work activities and matches skill requirements with talentProvides active leadership to project teams and serves as a mentor to members Organizational Leadership Responsible for corporate culture to include embracing and fostering company values Supports company programs and initiatives Represents the company to associates and the public Adheres to company policies and procedures Be a part of or manage a high performance team Recognize changes in project scope and determine appropriate manner of feedback to client Provide feedback to team members to strengthen performance Maintain individual chargeability requirement Demonstrate commitment to the firm and inspire employees EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS: Minimum of 3 years of experience in managed markets marketing / market access within the pharmaceutical industry or a managed markets agency servicing the pharmaceutical industry. BS/BA required, clinical degree preferred (Pharm D, Phd). MINIMUM SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE AND ABILITY REQUIREMENTS:Structured and well organized Demonstrated success within the consulting environment or pharmaceutical industry Strong leadership skills and demonstrated experience in leading successful teams Broad technical knowledge of managed markets Ability to interact with and influence clients so that business can be driven into the company Interest and ability to “think outside the box” Excellent writing skills as well as the ability to communicate complex material in presentations and discussions in a straightforward manner Strong interpersonal skills in order to develop sound, long-term client relationships and an ability to influence clients without being overbearing Ability to work well in a dynamic, successful consulting firm, which maintains high quality standards and demands excellence.About Xcenda Xcenda, a business unit of AmerisourceBergen Corporation, is an integrated, world-class health care consulting organization focused on value, reimbursement and patient access.  For more than 2 decades, Xcenda has helped global biopharmaceutical companies as well as emerging  early-phase firms successfully commercialize innovative medical treatments and technologies in complex and cost-constrained global markets. Our broad, yet strategically connected, array of consulting services supports all phases of the product lifecycle.  Our experts provide customized solutions and innovative approaches that discover and communicate the value of pharmaceuticals and other healthcare technologies. Why Xcenda As a member of the Xcenda team, you will be working, learning, and teaching alongside intelligent, collaborative, and experienced professionals who are inspired by what they do and highly motivated to make a difference.  Whether you join us in one of our core locations: Tampa, Charlotte, San Francisco, Washington D.C. or Hanover, Germany – or work remotely like many of our Associates, you will experience what we call ""Commitment that Counts"" – a mindset and attitude we all share. It is the commitment that we have to our clients, to each other, and to the patients we serve that makes Xcenda such a special and unique organization and more than just a place to work. We are a group of highly motivated people -- all dedicated experts in what they do -- - who value accountability, collaboration, customer focus, innovation, integrity, and passion. We believe life is meant to be pursued and enjoyed through creative thinking, ethics and bringing an entrepreneurial spirit to everything we do. Share in our commitment to excellence. Play a vital role in helping patients gain access to life-saving therapies. Take the next step today and learn how you can join us. #LI-EB1 ",Asst Director,Full Time Employee,"Princeton, NJ 08542",,http://jobview.monster.com/asst-director-managed-markets-consultant-remote-position-job-princeton-nj-us-169431852.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=20,,Marketing/Product,bcc39f931cf4f49f679ee4c0db725c44
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:05:55:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PURPOSE The Measure Technician works independently in a traveling field role in support of Home Depot's Measurement Services center. The Technician's role is to provide quality professional customer service that consistently meets or exceeds Company standards of excellence and customer expectations. The position is directly responsible for creating, maintaining and improving customer relationships while interacting with customers on a daily basis during sales, product inquiry, taking on-site home measurements and coordinating installations in conjunction with the Measurement Services center. The position is also directly responsible for providing a positive customer experience, accurate measurements, entering and transmitting measurements by a CAD tablet and various related department goals. MAJOR TASKS, RESPONSIBILITIES, AND KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES 90% Providing customer service by assessing customer needs, communicating with customers and conducting home measures. 10% Review and edit of drawings in the CAD tablet. NATURE AND SCOPE Position Reports to: Local Field Manager Number of Direct Reports: 0 Environmental Job Requirements Located in a comfortable indoor area. Conditions could produce mild discomfort on occasion including but not limited to lifting, bending, squatting within customers’ homes. Travel: Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the timeMINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS Minimum Age: 18 Must pass drug test. Education: The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED. Years of Relevant Work Experience: 0 Physical Job Requirements: Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about. On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles. PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS Previous customer service or retail sales experience is preferred. KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, ABILITIES, AND COMPETENCIESSkilled at consistently providing outstanding customer service, following through on responsibilities to customers and recovering from any errors made.Demonstrated ability to complete projects and assignments accurately, catching errors before completion, despite a large workload, competing demands and a fast paced environment.Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate with customers.Ability to set priorities, plan and coordinate work activities and obtain and manage resources so that work objectives are accomplished on time.Associates must have strong computer skills, and understanding for CAD like applications.",MEASURE TECH - IRVING Job in Irving,Full Time Employee,"Irving, TX 75014",,http://jobview.monster.com/measure-tech-irving-job-irving-tx-us-169177496.aspx?mescoid=4300745001001&jobPosition=6,,,94128abd204c489739b4b4a97e39c1cb
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:05:56:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sales Management TraineeLooking to use your skills with an industry leader? In the Enterprise Management Training Program, you can use those talents on a daily basis as you interact and do business with customers and business partners alike. You’ll also be taught how to lead a sales team, be responsible for P&L, and develop a plan to grow the business – all while honing your management, customer service and communication skills. You’ll have real responsibility from day one in all aspects of the business. And with our performance-based promotions, you’ll have real opportunity as well. Join the company that has repeatedly been recognized as a great place to launch a career. This is where it all starts.Entry-Level Sales Management Training Program Opportunities at EnterpriseThe chance to run your own business and share in the profits you help createHighly marketable skills and training in business, management, marketing, sales and serviceRapid promotion based on performanceA fun, team-oriented work environmentDuring your first year, you'll learn valuable business skills from capable mentors who were once in your shoes. Nearly 100% of all our managers and corporate executives started out as Management Trainees and helped define their own career path that took them to where they are today. Day-to-day responsibilities include actively participating in everything from sales, marketing and customer service to operations and finance. As you progress, you’ll be evaluated every step of the way. And upon successful completion, you can expect rewards, pay increases and the opportunity for continued promotions. Thanks to our entrepreneurial philosophy, there’s absolutely nothing holding you back. Your own initiative and capabilities, coupled with your ability to think on your feet and market effectively, will dictate how fast you advance.Qualifications include: Bachelor's degree required.Must be at least 18 years old.Must have participation or work experience in any of the following: work experience in a customer service, retail or commission sales environment, OR participation or leadership in athletic/team activities, OR membership or leadership in community, social or academic organizations OR military leadership experience.Must have an unrestricted valid driver’s license with no more than 3 moving violations and/or at-fault accidents within the past 3 years.No drug or alcohol related convictions on driving record (DUI/DWI) in the past 5 years.Must be available to work an average of 48 hours per week.Must be living within a reasonable commute of no more than 1 hour to the location(s) listed above within 30 days of anticipated start date.",Entry Level – Sales Management Trainee Job in Albany,"Full Time, Employee","Albany, NY 12206",,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-%E2%80%93-sales-management-trainee-job-albany-ny-us-162897428.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=16,,Brand/Product Marketing General/Other: Marketing/Product Product Management,43cc07bcb5d1d8344ae12f67b14666f6
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:06:08:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"At STERIS, WE HELP OUR CUSTOMERS CREATE A HEALTHIER AND SAFER WORLD by providing innovative healthcare and  life science product and service solutions around the globe. Our mission is a strong statement of who we are and what we do –  Join STERIS in its vision to see the world free from Infection and Contamination as a   Material Handler I  Summary Responsible for the safe movement of Customer product.  Duties include movement of product within unprocessed storage area, transfer of product to processing area, loading and unloading processed product, places and retrieves monitoring devices on product, pre-shipping preparation and staging product in processed area.  Reviews product and process documents and instructions, i.e., Customer provided special instructions or work instructions, and ensures accurate processing.  May perform the duties of Material Handler, Warehouse or Warehouse Assistant as needed.  Essential Job Functions 1.Maximizes processing and minimizes downtime by monitoring equipment used for product movement and transfer; conducts and refers minor repairs referring major malfunctions and/or unsafe conditions to Supervisor or Maintenance Department; maintains a clean orderly work area, performs Material Handling, production functions as needed; processes product according to specifications if qualified by training and certification. 2.Contributes to accuracy of processing and product accountability by maintaining product documentation; implements appropriate corrective action as needed; places, retrieves and analyzes product monitoring devices per processing specifications. 3.May assist in maintaining product inventory by receiving, identifying, labeling if appropriate, and storing product within the Shipping and Receiving area in accordance with established procedure and any applicable Customer provided special instructions. 4.Loads and unloads product into and from processing station, includes forklift operation. 5.Contributes to safe product processing by responding to any alarm conditions in an appropriate manner; reports events and activities outside normal parameters to Supervisor or Operator. 6.Contributes in a team effort by performing according to the guidelines outlined in the STERIS Code of Business Conduct, the GMP and other directives; supporting the directives and decisions of higher level management and accomplishing other duties as assigned. 7.Maintains and advances technical skills, knowledge and abilities by assigned training. 8.Works in a safe manner and considers safety in all aspects of job. 9.Supports the Isomedix business imperatives of Growth, Operational Excellence, Leadership Excellence and Customer Focus, by acting with integrity, treating everyone with mutual respect, exhibiting a genuine commitment to the success of all employees, and delivering satisfaction to our Customers through teamwork, innovation and continuous improvement; this will be accomplished while acting safely and is defined as ""The STERIS Way."" 10.Exhibits a commitment to the Isomedix shared values of Customer Satisfaction and Continuous Improvement through ensuring defect-free workmanship, assisting others to meet the Customer’s needs, searching for efficient and effective ways to reduce waste, being active and accountable for Customer satisfaction, and satisfying the Customer’s needs with a sense of urgency. Education/License Requirements High School Diploma or GED required. Must be certified to operate manual and motorized material handling equipment, including, but not limited to, forklifts, pallet jacks, elevators, conveyors, etc. Experience Requirements (Skills, Knowledge and Abilities) Requires: Subject to passing Nuclear Regulatory Commission (NRC) required background check. Ability to effectively read, write and verbally communicate in English. Ability to work independently under general guidelines and supervision. Requires ability to navigate through defined computer screens. Above average organizing, analyzing and a minimum of Level 1 math skills (add and subtract 2 digit numbers.  Multiply and divide 10’s and 100’s by 2,3,4,5, ability to use the four arithmetic functions of add, subtract, multiply and divide with money, measurements, e.g. cup, pint, inch, foot, lbs. etc.). Requires effective interpersonal skills as demonstrated through prior experience. Able to adapt to changing duties and responsibilities. Normal hearing range sufficient to hear alarms, bells, horns, etc. Working Conditions Requires carrying, kneeling, stooping, lifting up to a maximum of seventy-five (75) pounds, climbing, walking, pulling, pushing, driving forklift, grasping, and talking in a processing and warehousing area.  Nature of work requires depth perception, near-and far-sighted vision, normal color distinction and normal finger dexterity.  Environment requires working in close proximity to controlled and contained ionizing radiation and / or controlled and contained toxic flammable gas (ethylene oxide) and other treatment/process chemicals of which further information is available through the facility’s Hazardous Communication Standard (Right to Know).  Work environment has potential for exposure to sub-protection levels of noise heat and humidity and moving parts, machinery and gears.  Exposure to fumes from material handling and transportation vehicles. Hours of work may exceed normal business hours.  Will require use of personal protection items as needed. STERIS is a $1.9B+, publicly traded (NYSE) organization of over 8000 employees and is dedicated to providing innovative infection prevention, decontamination, and health science technologies, products and services.  STERIS Corporation complies with all obligations with respect to online application systems under guidelines provided by the US Department of Labor's Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs. If you are a disabled person who requires reasonable accommodation to complete an online application, please contact the STERIS Human Resources Department by phone at 440-392-7047 or 800-548-4873, extension 27047 for assistance.   STERIS Corporation is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer and welcomes all qualified applicants.  Applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or religion or other legally protected status.",Material Handler I Job in Chester,Full Time Employee,"Chester, NY 10918",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/material-handler-i-job-chester-ny-us-169216424.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=1,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e550132f9bf55e6f11b036751e465ab3
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:06:55:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionThis is one of those opportunities that doesn’t come along often, but in this case it’s coming along 2 times.The profile extrusion company I am recruiting for is searching for two Production Supervisors – one for day shift (6am-6pm) and one for night shift (6pm-6am).  Here’s the best part – you work 12-hour shifts Monday, Tuesday, and Wednesday.  Thursday is an 8-hour day, and then you have the next three days off.   3-day weekends every weekend.The Shift Supervisors will ensure that all scheduled extrusion production is completed on schedule and in accordance with company goals and guidelines.  The supervisors are also responsible for training employees, enforcing safety policies and company policies, and disciplinary action when necessary.   The candidates must be able to work in an established culture while leading employees through change, growth, and process improvements.  Shift Supervisors report to the Plant Manager.  Job RequirementsMinimum Requirements:3 years’ experience in profile extrusion operationSupervisory experienceExcellent communication skillsGood organizational and problem solving skillsEssential Duties and Responsibilities Include:Provide daily leadership to direct reports and administer performance reviews.Direct and supervise all plastic extrusion activities in an effort to maximize output while minimizing scrap and rework.Perform quality checks using a variety of tools including: calipers, digital ball micrometers, depth micrometer gauges, optical comparators, certification blocks, and moisture analyzers.Actively pursue process improvements.Assist in production, as required, to meet requirements including machine/tooling set-up and tear-down.Strive to meet and exceed expectations. Adhere to safety guidelines and procedures.  Document and report safety incidents.Company:The hiring company is a leader and trusted partner in the profile and tube extrusion industry.  Excellent benefits include medical; 401k plan; and paid vacation and holidays. ",Plastic Profile Extrusion Production Supervisor Job in Sheboygan,Full Time Employee,"Sheboygan, WI",,http://jobview.monster.com/plastic-profile-extrusion-production-supervisor-job-sheboygan-wi-us-161977636.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=9,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,51ea24ce1a6f03b96bdb62e4eed5b801
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:06:56:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary The GetGo Cafe + Market Go Getter is a key player in keeping the kitchen and store running like clockwork, because our customers' clocks are ticking. As the front-line Team Member, you are often the first and last smiling face our customers see. From the morning rush to the afternoon lunch crowds, to the late-night snackers, you will collaborate with other Team Members to make sure that each customer waiting for a fresh sandwich, picking up dinner for their family, or simply waiting at the pump, is met with a warm welcome and the great service they deserve.At work and at play, you are a leader at heart. You know that you are only successful when those around you are set up for success. You are eager to cultivate an amazing team and have the ability to inspire Team Members to give their best each day. You are a problem solver and a creative thinker, and love to lead the way for others to foster their own creativity. You know that your customers aren't just grabbing a cup of coffee; they are often starting and ending their days at your store. Providing a familiar face and a comfortable and clean spot for a delicious meal is your M.O. for making someone who is ""just stopping by"" into a regular customer. Every opportunity to connect with people is an opportunity for you to exchange ideas and improve your business. Our leadership team is top of the line and ensures that each customer leaves with a smile and with everything they need to make the most of their day and be on their way. Job Responsibilities Maintain safety as the top priority in all aspects of our work, for our Team Members, customers, and products. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 16 years of age Shift 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p 3rd Shift - 10p - 6a (Overnight) Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Now Hiring NEW GetGo Cafe+Market Job in Noblesville,Full Time Employee,"Noblesville, IN",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/now-hiring-new-getgo-cafe-market-job-noblesville-in-us-168935559.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=11,,Marketing/Product,7983fc5c501c5350e9d08e7e32a79e9c
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:07:48:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"The position summary states the general nature and purpose of the job. Overall accountabilities are defined in this section. Supervise production employees on assigned shift to ensure production guidelines are being met within established timing, quality, and cost standards. This position has emphasis on semi-skilled and skilled operations, quality assurance and troubleshooting. Must possess a high level of technical proficiency to assist operators in problem solving while exercising considerable judgment and have the ability to supervise the production process. Direct the routine maintenance and set up of machines, equipment, and facilities. Responsibilities and tasks are written as follows: Safe Working EnvironmentMaintain safety or ergonomic programs to ensure a safe working environment.Perform daily walk around visual inspection of the department to observe for unsafe acts or conditions and take immediate action where necessary.Train employees to ensure safe operating procedures are followed, including lock-out and tag-out.Product Quality, Safety and KnowledgeMaintain desired product quality and safety.Maintain adequate knowledge of product and equipment to ensure ability to direct employees to perform the job properly.Monitor daily to ensure HACCP and USDA standards are being met.Take corrective action where necessary.Employee Relations and PoliciesMaintain a high standard of employee relations.Periodically review with all employees the company policies and procedures.Conduct monthly line meetings to address questions and concerns.Walk the floor daily to address immediate questions and concerns.Yields, Variances and EfficienciesMaintain or exceed goals on yields and efficiencies.Work weekly with Operations Managers and/or supervisors to become familiar with yields and variances, methods of calculations, typical problem areas, and methods of corrections and improvement.Communicate with employees daily to discuss work assignments.Product CostsStrive for continuous improvement of product costs.Perform daily checks to ensure that standards are being met.Take necessary steps to ensure downtime is maintained at the lowest possible level.Trace and analyze key product result measures for improvement opportunities.Other DutiesThe above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified.May perform other duties as assigned. To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals to perform the essential functions.Bachelor's degree or equivalent combination of education and experience.Ability to communicate effectively both orally and writtenAbility to problem solve and collaborate with othersMath aptitudeTechnical aptitude to learn and use multiple computer systemsSelf-motivated with a desire to learnAbility to be flexible and react to changing variablesAbility to coach, motivate and counsel employees to encourage optimum performance and engagementAbility to organize, motivate and train staffAbility to work in varying production environments (heat and cold)Must be able to work with a diverse workforce; bilingual is a plusMust be able to work long hours, possibly to work 6 to 7 days per week during peak times.PI94685301Apply Here",Production Supervisor Job in Carroll,Full Time Employee,"Carroll, IA 51401",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/production-supervisor-job-carroll-ia-us-169039347.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=9,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,cfbdab8d31f434d7e2838bd34c5ec8b4
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:07:49:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"TITLE:                        MACHINIST SUPERVISORINDUSTRY:               MANUFACTURINGAREA:                        Kansas CitySALARY:                   $ 60,000Our client, a well-established local manufacturer that provides products for OEM and also does custom manufacturing for a variety of applications, has commissioned Sterling St. James, LLP to help them source, screen and qualify candidates for a position of Machinist Supervisor.This is a fast paced environment that requires an individual that is focused and dedicated to the tasks at hand.POSITION OVERVIEW:The Machinist Supervisor will be the lead person and supervise about 5 other machinist. Individual will be a hands on supervisor and will write programs for CNC mills and lathes.  Upper management would like this individual to organize the department and schedule the work to reduce idle time and ultimately expand the department by making it a profit center within the company.ESSENTIAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:·       The Machinist Supervisor will improve the department by improving scheduling, and work flow through automation and organization and reducing errors and waste·       Be responsible for supervising people in the department·       Develop procedures ·       Establish this department as a “profit center” for the company(They have customers “waiting in the wings” for their machining services)QUALIFICATIONS / SKILLS / PROFICIENCIES:·       Must have experience as a Programmer/Machinist ·       Create programs using Mastercam software for both Vertical and Horizontal mills and lathes·       Ability to read blueprints·       Must be able to perform measurements, gauging and quality inspections as required·       Must be able to operate CNC mills, CNC lathes and other machinery to produce items as required·       Maintain equipment including PM·       Experience on Mori Seki, HAAS and Doosan equipment helpful·       Needs to be a “take control” individual – able to work independently·       Have accountability for the department and the results of changes·       Think “outside of the box” and looking for continuous improvement·       Able to utilize past experiences and contacts to accomplish a department turnaround·       Have pride in your accomplishments·       Be a team player but able to work independently with a minimum of supervision·       Able to multi-task·       Strong leadership skills·       Accomplished communication skills:·       Listening·       Written·       VerbalNEXT STEP:If you have an interest in pursuing this position send your resume as an attachment in MS Word format to receive immediate consideration.RECRUITER’S COMMENTS:This is a solid company and the products they make are essential to the clients they serve. This is a position that is difficult to duplicate in the current employment market and I expect the competition to be crisp. There is an opportunity for ownership since the company is an ESOP. Take the next step.",Machinist Supervisor Job in Overland Park,Full Time Employee,"Overland Park, KS 66211",Manufacturing - OtherEngineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/machinist-supervisor-job-overland-park-ks-us-169175812.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=20,"55,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Manufacturing/Production/Operations,de5a215a9e71bb1f1617efdd05da384d
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:08:59:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Marketing Communications SpecialistReports To: Marketing Manager Overview: Specified Technologies Inc., a top manufacturer of specialty construction building products in the fire protection industry is seeking a dynamic Marketing Communications Specialist to join our growing marketing team.  The successful candidate will apply their media relations and communications knowledge to plan, research, write, produce, and disseminate information to the marketplace.  Use print, electronic, social, presentations and face-to-face media to achieve objectives.   Essential Duties & Responsibilities:Primary duties include copywriting and developing and executing creative internal and external communications that promote the overall STI image, brand, capabilities, and value proposition.  This includes strong writing and content creation skills across a variety of channels and formats, including industry and trade publications, Internet and digital marketing outlets, press releases, social media, and marketing collateral. ·         Manage communications programs as directed by management in support of overall sales and marketing strategies. ·         Create, develop, and disseminate content and promotional materials to segmented audiences·         Work closely with Sales & Marketing team to execute digital marketing activities and coordinate product launches and promotions·         Provide marketing communication expertise in working with sales, marketing, & engineering to initiate, create, define, and develop tools, lead generation programs, support materials and marketing campaigns·         Build our brands, positioning, and market share via creative and leadership within communication channels such as website, press releases, advertising, traditional and social media, digital marketing, and trade associations·         Manage social media programs, content calendar, online communication, coordinate the development and execution of social media strategies and monitor engagement activity to track, assess, and report status of specific business metrics·         Collaborate with cross-functional teams to create and deliver press releases, media relations content, case studies, white papers, sales presentations, and corporate newsletter content and social media content.·         Create and edit copy, proofread and revise communications as needed·         Identify networking and publicity opportunities, speaking events, and coordinate content delivery with media and trade event calendars·         Research and develop content for publication and prepare presentations geared towards specific target audiences  Required Knowledge & Skills:·         Minimum of 5 to 7 years relevant experience in marketing, journalism, public relations and or social media·         Excellent listening and communication skills, including presentation and writing skills, experience in writing articles, web content and presentations·         Demonstrated skills, knowledge and experience in the planning and execution of communications, social media, and public relations activities.·         Solid understanding of the social media space. Experience with social media platforms, social media strategies, content, engagement, and monitoring of trends·         Excellent organizational skills with the ability to manage multiple short – and long-term projects with minimal supervision·         Must have strong creative and professional writing skills that provide relevance within the industry·         Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite, Adobe Creative Suite, Word Press, Hubspot and other Internet applications a plus Requirements:Bachelor's degree in journalism, marketing communications, business, English, public relations or related communications field preferred The company offers a competitive compensation package.Benefit package includes:401K PlanCollege savings planPaid time offMedical InsuranceDental InsuranceLife InsuranceFlexible spending Come join our team!Equal Opportunity EmployerVisit our website - www.stifirestop.com Qualified candidates please send a resume with salary requirements via e-mailPlease no phone calls!  ",Marketing Communications Specialist Job in Branchburg,Full Time Employee,"Branchburg, NJ 08876",,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-communications-specialist-job-branchburg-nj-us-169427184.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=7,,Marketing/Product,9edec0b72574669615e2b24dcf4e641e
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:09:00:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are now hiring for a Marketing & Promotions Coordinator in the Philadelphia area. This position is ENTRY LEVEL, no experience is necessary, we love to train! We have a very successful history developing entry level candidates into high performing market managers. The primary focus of a Marketing & Promotions Coordinator is: Designing and Executing Marketing and Promotional Campaigns for clientsManage Advertising Promotions — Promotions Materials, Public Relations, MerchandizingSales — Client Acquisition through excellent brand consultingWe are currently partnered with over 20 different clients in the health and wellness, beauty/cosmetics, and fashion industries! Our daily work environment is fun, fast paced and energetic. Our goal is simple: we want to help our clients exceed their goals by providing world class service, quality and value while providing an avenue to develop vibrant, enthusiastic individuals that are eager to learn and grow with our company.IDEAL CANDIDATES WILL BE TRAINED TO:Learn marketing portfolio of clients quicklySchedule promotions and manage calendarPrepare the necessary marketing materials for campaignsInteract with customers through field marketing activitiesManage client relationshipDUE TO OUR BUSIEST SEASON OF THE YEAR WE ARE LOOKING FOR IMMEDIATE HIRES. ALL OPENINGS ARE ENTRY LEVEL WITH OPPORTUNITY TO ADVANCE TO MANAGEMENT. *All promotions are from within*RequirementsAbility to learn basic sales and marketing skillsDetail orientedFun and outgoing personalityStrong people skillsAbility to work with a team as well as individuallyPerformance drivenExcellent time management skillsCoachableKey Words: Level Promotion, Sales Promotion, Sales Assistant, Entry Level Marketing, Corporate Advertising, Customer Relationship Management, Account Manager, Brand Promotion, Direct Marketing, Direct Advertising.",Marketing & Promotions Coordinator - Entry Level Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time, Employee","Philadelphia, PA 19104",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-promotions-coordinator-entry-level-job-philadelphia-pa-us-169422281.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=15,,Marketing/Product,183877477deba70f348b22215b46832e
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:09:09:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sales Management TraineeLooking to use your skills with an industry leader? In the Enterprise Management Training Program, you can use those talents on a daily basis as you interact and do business with customers and business partners alike. You’ll also be taught how to lead a sales team, be responsible for P&L, and develop a plan to grow the business – all while honing your management, customer service and communication skills. You’ll have real responsibility from day one in all aspects of the business. And with our performance-based promotions, you’ll have real opportunity as well. Join the company that has repeatedly been recognized as a great place to launch a career. This is where it all starts.Entry-Level Sales Management Training Program Opportunities at EnterpriseThe chance to run your own business and share in the profits you help createHighly marketable skills and training in business, management, marketing, sales and serviceRapid promotion based on performanceA fun, team-oriented work environmentDuring your first year, you'll learn valuable business skills from capable mentors who were once in your shoes. Nearly 100% of all our managers and corporate executives started out as Management Trainees and helped define their own career path that took them to where they are today. Day-to-day responsibilities include actively participating in everything from sales, marketing and customer service to operations and finance. As you progress, you’ll be evaluated every step of the way. And upon successful completion, you can expect rewards, pay increases and the opportunity for continued promotions. Thanks to our entrepreneurial philosophy, there’s absolutely nothing holding you back. Your own initiative and capabilities, coupled with your ability to think on your feet and market effectively, will dictate how fast you advance.Qualifications include: Bachelor's degree required.Must have a minimum of 6 months of experience in sales, customer service, management/leadership or marketing.Must have a valid driver's license with a good driving record (no more than 2 moving violations or at-fault accidents in the last 3 years).No drug or alcohol related convictions on driving record (DWI/DUI) in past 3 years.Must be at least 18 years old.Must be authorized to work in the United States and not require work authorization sponsorship by our company for this position now or in the future.Equal Opportunity Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled",Entry Level – Sales Management Trainee Job in Allentown,"Full Time, Employee","Allentown, PA 18103",,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-%E2%80%93-sales-management-trainee-job-allentown-pa-us-162897738.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=2,,Brand/Product Marketing General/Other: Marketing/Product Product Management,f386d8962e0cb8ff86b21b77e8b06c39
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:09:46:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Brand Manager-Entry Level Purpose: Marketing, Brand Management, & Sales - Paid Training - Travel Opportunities - ManagementMajor Responsibilities: Implementation of marketing & campaign plans, including product positioning, campaign development strategies, and market strategy insights.Discovery of strategic business opportunities through cross function collaboration with sales, HR, etc. Marketing opportunity for revenueProvide product/service support in order to establish proper channels of information and communication. Responsible for branding, advertising, trade shows, company events and promotional collateralWork with management on projects dealing with media relations, business communications, success storiesCore Competencies:These are personal traits that will best help the associate to successfully perform the essential functions of the job.Judgement and Decision Making - Considering the relative costs and benefits of potential actions to choose the most appropriate one. Integrity - Job requires being honest and ethical. Initiative - Job requires a willingness to take on responsibilities and challenges. Leadership - Job requires a willingness to lead, take charge, and offer opinions and direction. Achievement/Effort - Job requires establishing and maintaining personally challenging achievement goals and exerting effort toward mastering tasks. Dependability - Job requires being reliable, responsible, and dependable, and fulfilling obligations. Social Orientation - Job requires preferring to work with others rather than alone, and being personally connected with others on the job. Attention to Detail - Job requires being careful about detail and thorough in completing work tasks. Cooperation - Job requires being pleasant with others on the job and displaying a good-nature, cooperative attitude.Candidate must be very articulate, have a sense of humor, easygoing, but very disciplined. We need a culture fit RequirementsEntry Qualifications: Bachelor's degree in Marketing, Communications, Advertising or Journalism Minimum (0) zero to (5) five years of relevant experience in marketing management with proven success, however we offer paid training Must have wide range of experience and understanding of the marketing including product positioning, pricing, promotions, market research, sales and distribution.Should be a proactive self-starter with the ability to work independently. Need strong ability to set priorities, solve problems, and be resourceful under pressure. Experience working with agency/client partners, exhibiting the ability to generate maximum return through effective marketing strategies and direction.",Brand Manager-Entry Level Job in Orlando,Full Time Employee,"Orlando, FL 32809",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/brand-manager-entry-level-job-orlando-fl-us-169384374.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=5,,Marketing/Product,6d0b1e83b4a5b84d50b6ee981c4cf18a
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:09:47:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sports and Entertainment Marketing - Entry Level MarketingOrlando Marketing Events is one of the premier sports and entertainment marketing and advertising firms in the Greater Orlando area. We specialize in direct marketing for Clients in the Sports/Racing and Automotive industries. The key to our success and growth is the ability to generate a greater marketing synergy for each and every client. In order to deliver results to our clients, we are in need of entry level marketing reps to assist in the sales, marketing, and customer service work we conduct for our clients through events.  We are filling entry-level sales, marketing, advertising and sales positions. Opportunity for management position.  Exposure to the following fields: Marketing and AdvertisingPromotional MarketingCampaign OrientationClient RelationsFace to Face MarketingTerritory ManagementWe need enthusiastic, goal oriented individuals, who want to succeed in a competitive high energy environment. We are offering: Compensation based on performanceFun and positive work environmentOpportunity for managementOptional travelUnlimited opportunities  We are filling entry level positions with individuals that have a track record of commitment, ambition, and leadership either through their athletic teams, in their participation in organizations on campus, or in their community. All majors and backgrounds will be considered.                                                  Call today for more information! 407.539.1200                                                          www.orlandomarketingevents.com                                                                 RequirementsOrlando Events will provide individuals with excellent leadership, guidance, a competitive merit based compensation, and a challenging career path. This is an entry level position so college graduates or people looking to get their foot in the door are encouraged to apply. Candidates must represent the following: Excellent communication skillsLeadership experienceAbility to work in a high energy environmentAmbition, strong work ethic, and open to new ideasBe a self-starter with problem solving skillsBe a career oriented individual ",Sports and Entertainment Marketing Job in Orlando,"Full Time, Employee","Orlando, FL 32810",Retail;Advertising and PR Services;Sports and Physical Recreation,http://jobview.monster.com/sports-entertainment-marketing-job-orlando-fl-us-168754339.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=6,,Marketing/Product,4eb248e0764def547833023b745329a4
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:10:24:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Proto Labs (PRLB) is a leading online and technology enabled quick-turn manufacturer. Our technology, innovation and people have made us the world's fastest manufacturer of custom prototype and low-volume parts. Proto Labs revolutionized our industry by developing proprietary computing technologies and automated manufacturing processes that enable us to create ""Real Parts, Really Fast"".   Our FineLine Additive Manufacturing Division, located in North Carolina’s Research Triangle Park makes custom prototype and production parts for companies worldwide using Rapid Prototyping, Additive Manufacturing and 3D Printing technologies. We have a fast-growing, high-energy team of associates who work together in a friendly environment.   Position Overview: The Solvent Specialist safely handles Rapid Prototype (RP) models through the solvent cleaning process following Fineline Procedures and quality standards   Specific duties include: Safe removal of excess resin on RP models in a Solvent cleaning process.  Effectively use all checklists associated with the cleaning of RP models according to Fineline Procedures. Safe removal of cleaned RP models from build platforms. Maintain a clean and safe laboratory environment by complying with Fineline safety procedures, and regulations. Count parts and verify order quantities. Ensure order quantities and customer specifications have been met. Enter process information into computer. Interact with Leads, Quality Inspector and Supervisor regarding issues with order quantities or part quality. Assist in the removal and disposal of contaminated materials according to Fineline Procedures. Assist in the general clean-up and maintenance of the facility.  Maintain a “resin” free work environment outside of the specific part cleaning area. Contribute to team effort by accomplishing related tasks as needed. Continually seek to improve work processes and individual performance. Properly utilize Kanban (pull-card) system for maintaining correct inventory levels. Observe all Fineline safety and quality procedures. Wear all required PPE (gloves, lab coats, etc.). Perform other duties as assigned. Proto Labs is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer: Minorities, Women, Veterans & Disabilities. Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. Qualifications Education Required High School or better. Experience Required Strong attention to detail and ability to focus on one task for extended periods is required. Able to work in a fast paced, team oriented environment. Good written and oral communication skills Must be able to actively contribute in a team based environment; encourage open communication and positive interaction with peers and management to effectively reach a common goal. Must have a strong service and quality focus. Must regard safety as a core value. Able to work safely with sharp tools/objects including hobby knives, utility knives, files, abrasives, rotary tools, general cutters and more. Able to make precise, coordinated movements of fingers and hands to manipulate and work on small parts. Able to use measuring instruments such as scales and calipers. Able to use a computer and calculator. Able to read and write in English, and do basic arithmetic. Must be punctual and have good attendance. Able to comprehend and follow printed and computer-screen instructions, and take direction from Supervisors and Team Leads.",Solvent Specialist - Wednesday - Sunday Shift Job in Raleigh,Full Time Employee,"Raleigh, NC",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/solvent-specialist-wednesday-sunday-shift-job-raleigh-nc-us-169071863.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=11,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,ecea65c0ef8cb67eca91c3a35fb050b8
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:10:26:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"My client is one of the fastest growing Medical device companies in the Seattle area. They have asked me to help them find a Quality Documentation Specialist who is interested in working for a cool company. If you read the Job description below and feel as though your background and Skill sets are a fit, please send me your resume at bruce.trahant@experis.com and give me a call at 206.919.5880QUALITY DOCUMENTATION COORDINATORProof Document Change Notices (DCNs) for both design and process changes and ensure they are submitted and implemented according to Company procedures. Assist with maintenance of electronic Employee Training System (ETS) including the following: o Set up training for new employees o Create training instances triggered by DCNs o Update ETS after training has been completed o Conduct audits of ETS data Assist in maintenance of electronic equipment calibration system including: o Create record for new pieces of equipment and tools o Review calibration records for accuracy and update status in calibration system o Collect and prepare equipment for outbound service; check in upon return o Conduct audits of company equipment and tools against calibration system data As required, assist in documentation and record reviews, i.e., work orders, inspection records, manufacturing records, and sterilization load order reviews to ensure completeness and accuracy. Audit and maintain logs, e.g., NCRs, SCARs, CAPAs, etc. Clean and sort returned product evaluation lab. Filing and scanning as required. Regularly interface with internal employees, primarily those in Engineering, Research, Manufacturing, and Marketing. Some external company interface will also be required.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Quality Coordinator Job in Redmond,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Quality Coordinator,"Redmond, WA 98052",http://jobview.monster.com/quality-coordinator-job-redmond-wa-us-169133714.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=12,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,5712974e7642d77f958d1d8d2fa36799
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:10:28:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Power of MoreGetting more out of your life and career starts now. You’re at the beginning of your career. You’re motivated. Driven. Confident. You just need an opportunity to show someone what you can do. Here’s your opportunity. When you join the Power team — more than 1,300 strong and growing — you’ll experience a shared dedication to a greater goal, and an opportunity to be part of a future-focused team of innovative leaders as we expand nationwide. You’ll also have the opportunity to earn three times more than similar job titles in the big pharma and finance industries. We’re currently looking for future leaders to eventually oversee ongoing national expansion. If you have drive, a passion for marketing and the commitment to win at every level of your career, today is the day you make the decision to earn more, give more, and grow more. Marketing Representative As a full-time marketing representative you’ll be trained on all of our products with the opportunity to generate business through the delivery of interactive presentations to prospective and existing clients. The gateway to several other career opportunities at Power, this outside marketing position will fine tune your communication skills, negotiation tactics, and strategic planning.  Primary job responsibilities include:Interface with decision makers on a daily basisWork in outside business development position in various settings including retail and event marketingPromotion of Power’s products and services to prospective and existing clientsWorking knowledge of eco-friendly, green remodeling products and its benefits to the consumer Participation in ongoing training camps on a weekly basis  Qualifications:Highly developed interpersonal, organizational and communication skillsAbility to speak publicly with confidence and poiseStrong sense of ambition, self-motivation and self-disciplineResourceful problem solverOpen-minded with a passion for learning a wide-range of skills that will carry through a variety of career pathsNaturally outgoing and articulate individual who thrives in social settings Desire to mentor other colleagues after refining your skill setBA/BS preferredAbility to work Mon – Fri: 11 am to 7 pm & two Saturday’s per month: 9 am to 3 pm Salary and Benefits:$26,000-$35,000 base salaryConstant performance-based bonus opportunities with potential to earn an additional $10,000-$50,000 annuallyMonthly opportunities for performance-based non-monetary rewards, such as luxury vacations, high-end electronics, gift cards and tickets to concerts and sporting eventsFull medical, dental, life and disability insurance plans that can be tailored to your specific needs and the needs of your familyAmple paid vacation and holidaysA competitive 401(k) retirement savings program, matched by Power Access to the latest technology, such as laptops, smart phones and tablets that will help you reach your earnings goals faster and more efficientlyA dynamic social program filled with can’t miss events, parties, and activities, including an annual bonus in the form of a company trip to a Mexico each December for you and a significant other    Candidates with experience in the following areas are encouraged to inquire about our program: Sales, Green products, renewable energy, green jobs, business development, new accounts, marketing, windows, doors, siding, entry doors, roofing, insulation, kitchen, bathroom, fixtures, tiling, entry level, retail, eco-friendly, green collar, gutters, gutter guards, home improvement, events, event planning, home remodeling, siding, replacement windows, mortgage, customer service, management, trainer, energy, enterprise, energy saving,  recent grads, prospecting, lead generating, sales, customer service, marketing, finance, real estate, mortgage, collections, call center, financial analyst, bilingual, business analyst, recruiter, financial, support, business development, property manager, coordinator, lead generation, patios, landscaping, basements, administrative, customer service, inside sales, outside sales, business to business, B2B, D2D, door to door, customer service, customer care, client development, customer relations, client relations, sales presentations, marketing presentations, closing, closer ",Marketing Representative Job in Rosemont,"Full Time, Employee","Rosemont, IL",Architectural and Design Services,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-representative-job-rosemont-il-us-168862353.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=17,,Marketing/Product,f58f573d97512ae15ba375827890fef1
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:10:54:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Product Data AnalystThe successful candidate will be responsible forproduct data collection, processing and management while ensuring complete and accurate specifications on Anixter’s products. This position works closely with the Digital Marketing and Product Management teams to drive product content and enhance our online traffic.Key Responsibilities:Product Creation and Data Enrichment- Manage life-cycle of product content (such as Product Marketing Copy, Attribute and Supporting Documents and Images) and ensure accurate and complete information within a central repository.- Support business initiatives by working closely with cross functional groups to review and support vendor marketing strategiesData Quality- Establish and maintain relationships with suppliers to communicate Anixter’s data quality standards, determine most efficient way to transfer product information and collect data for processing- Audit product information for accuracy and consistency to ensure it meets the defined data integrity standardsBasic Qualifications:- Associates Degree or higher degree preferred, but not required- 0 to 3 years work experience in related field- Demonstrated ability to build relationships, both internally and externally with suppliers- Excellent written, communication and analytical skills- Resourcefulness and creative problem solving skills- Proficiency with Microsoft Excel and WordWork EnvironmentOur founders developed the Blue Book more than 40 years ago to present the beliefs and ethos that define our business style. While we have grown and changed dramatically since we were established in 1957, one thing has remained constant: our commitment to the values presented in the Blue Book. You can reviewThe Blue Book here.Anixter is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer; Minority / Female / Disabled / Veteran.We require all of our employees to perform work in an ethical manner and uphold a culture of honesty and ethics at all times.",Product Data Analyst Job in Glenview,,"Glenview, IL",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/product-data-analyst-job-glenview-il-us-169401724.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=16,,,a93475ff6e9c65c203128847d8574326
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:10:55:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Help us help our customers realize their dreams of a beautiful home! -Join The #1 Furniture Company-Join The #1 Furniture Brand Ashley Furniture Industries, Inc. is the largest manufacturer of furniture in the world. Established in 1945, Ashley offers one of the industry’s broadest product assortments to retail partners in 123 countries. Design, Build, Deliver: Using our internationally acclaimed in-house design team, we create the look without paying expensive design fees. Then, by adhering to some of the most efficient production standards in the world, we are able to maximize productivity and minimize waste, generating additional savings for you. Finally, all orders are filled from strategically located regional warehouses and are serviced by our own fleet of trucks, the largest in the industry. Essential Functions and Responsibilities: Make employment decisions and/or recommendations on hiring, improvement plans, transfers, promotions, corrective actions, terminations, pay adjustments. Make decisions relative to requests for time off. Listen, respond and address employee concerns. Coordinate with other supervision to ensure all operation activities are coordinated as an integrated whole. Coordinate the work and activities of employees by directing members of a department to meet production goals. Make decisions and solves problems by analyzing information and evaluating results to optimize production.  Audit production on a daily basis to ensure standard operating procedures are being met.  Facilitate employee training through safety training and weekly team meetings to ensure employees are educated on departmental issues and aware of the company’s goals and objectives. Manage and improve functional areas and institute performance measures through use and interpretation of Continuous Improvement tools.  Improve working conditions and processes (safety, quality, productivity, and cost) including supporting and directing employee to participate in improvement programs. Manage employee performance and assist employees in making improvements to their performance through coaching, mentoring and administering performance reviews. Recommend, plan and/or implement employee training and skill development activities. Make decisions and solves problems by analyzing information and evaluating results to optimize production. Analyzes and resolves employees’ problems in a timely manner. Communicate product or material issues with appropriate individuals in operations. Audit, maintain, and ensure employee time-keeping and absentee records are accurate. Attend all required meetings and training sessions.  Maintain departmental equipment to ensure proper and safe operations.  Maintains a safe work environment by ensuring employees wear PPE (personal protective equipment) and through safety compliance. Assist functional area Superintendent to improve systems of production control, standard operating procedures, safety, quality control and performance management. Support and ensure Ashley Furniture’s policies and procedures are administered and followed. Maintain reliable attendance.  Complete other duties, assignments, and special projects as requested. Education:  Required: High school diploma or equivalent Desired: Associates degree in supervisory management or related field  Experience: Two-years of experience in a manufacturing environment Previous experience in supervision preferred Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:  Manufacturing equipment and processes related to the department  Working knowledge of Continuous Improvement tools Documents management system Record Management Read Blueprints Work in a demanding, fast-paced environment Address difficult employee/vendor/production issues Create, interpret, and analyze Continuous Improvement tools Manage multiple tasks simultaneously Identify and analyze constraint processes and implement solutions Strong detail, analytical and problem solving skills Manage resources to optimum potential - equipment, facilities, employees and material Effective interpersonal communication skills Handle multiple projects simultaneously and within established time constraints Provide effective leadership: promote teamwork, and a demonstrated ability to lead people to get results Work independently as well as in team environment Must obtain powered industrial vehicle license Strong mechanical aptitude    We are an equal opportunity employer and provide a drug free working environment. While Ashley appreciates the interest of all candidates only those meeting specific position requirements may be contacted. Principals Only",Production Supervisor rd Shift Job in Arcadia,,Ashley Furniture Industries,"Arcadia, WI 54612",http://jobview.monster.com/production-supervisor-3rd-shift-job-arcadia-wi-us-169125119.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=19,,,977726e34fbecd1aef8967a957aa1032
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:11:49:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for hands-on working experience in a fun & past paced environment? Are you a proactive, enthusiastic and hardworking entry level professional looking to get your foot in the door? Need more excitement out of your typical 9-5? Then our client would love to hear from you! The Job Window, an interactive candidate resource connecting up and coming talent to entry level opportunities all across North America, has an exciting opening for a Retail Brand Ambassador with our most energetic and successful promotional marketing & advertising client inCincinnati!    With a passion for people and the ability to provide unique and interactive brand experiences for consumers and clients alike, our client is looking for an Retail Brand Ambassador to join their promotions & sales team and assist them with the day to day execution of marketing & promotional activities taking place inside some of the nation’s largest retailers. What makes this position different from other brand ambassador positions? Unique to our client, this firm is committed to providing comprehensive training to ensure that each team member is prepared to take on any task at their firm and has unlimited opportunity for growth. As a Retail Brand Ambassador, you will receive one-on-one training from a national manager in direct event marketing, customer service, and event planning to increase the likelihood of management opportunities in your future!  You’ll have the opportunity to work with leaders in some of the largest corporations in the nation and plan memorable retail event experiences for their consumers.Responsibilities of the Retail Brand Ambassador:Build and maintain rapport with customers in-store to establish proper channels of communication, contribute to a positive environment, and effectively meet company and client objectives.Effectively communicate features and benefits of clients’ products and conduct product demos to create a unique and positive brand experience.Liaise with major retailers and prestigious clientele to create tailored retail events to suit each clients’ needs.Assist in event set-up, tear down, and execution.Plan promotions and events, including development of ideas and creation of events calendar.RequirementsRequirements of the Retail Brand AmbassadorExperience in retail, hospitality, retail customer service, event marketing, field marketing, marketing and product demonstrations, retail marketing, sales, event planning/event coordinating, or brand promotions a plus.Confidence in your ability to be successful. Outstanding communication skills both verbal and written. A professional appearance and outstanding work ethic. A great attitude with a high-energy personality. Superior customer service skills. A desire to work If the Retail Brand Ambassador role sounds like the exciting career you’re looking for, apply today! Key Words: Retail Sales, Retail Customer Service Support, Retail Sales Associate, Sales Associate, Sales Representative, Sales and Promotions, Marketing Promotions, Marketing Assistant, Marketing Coordinator, Customer Services.",Retail Brand Ambassador Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH 45202",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-brand-ambassador-job-cincinnati-oh-us-168876714.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=2,,Marketing/Product,de70de3dabea7ab307cb42c78e0ea538
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:11:50:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Internet Marketing Specialist Uline – Shipping Supply Specialists  ""The people I work with are as passionate as I am."" ""I came to Uline for a job. Instead, I found a career."" Uline is North America's leading distributor of shipping, packaging and industrial supplies. We're a family-owned company known for our incredible customer service and quality products. Our people make the difference. We're looking for the best and brightest to drive results in our subsidiary retail and hospitality businesses. If you have passion and expertise in advertising, keyword optimization, direct marketing and analysis, Uline is the company for you.Uline seeks an Internet Marketing Specialist at its Corporate Headquarters in Pleasant Prairie, Wisconsin (just over the IL / WI state line).  Join us to experience why Uline has been designated with the Forbes 2016 America’s Best Employers award. POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES Manage keyword advertising campaigns, including bid, copy and keyword optimization.Analyze campaign results and recommend actions for improved performance.Build and maintain relationships with critical advertising partners.Develop in-depth understanding of keyword advertising and B2C direct marketing.Identify new advertising opportunities consistent with the individual brand of each business.Contribute to all advertising campaigns with a primary focus on search advertising.Collaborate with the Creative Special Projects and Advertising departments to ensure accurate campaign information and objectives.Prepare reports and analysis of all forms of advertising. MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS Bachelor’s degree.2+ years experience preferred.Proficient in Microsoft Excel and Access.Excellent written and oral communication skills.Ability to multi-task and react quickly to market changes.Outstanding organizational and analytical skills.Some travel to northern Wisconsin. BENEFITS Complete insurance coverage – medical, dental, vision, life. 401(k) with company match. Generous paid time off. Tuition reimbursement. 3 bonus programs. Please visit www.uline.com/jobs to learn more about our job openings and benefits package. HOW TO APPLY Please click the “APPLY” button to submit your resume for immediate consideration! EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled",Internet Marketing Specialist Job in Pleasant Prairie,"Full Time , Employee","Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/internet-marketing-specialist-job-pleasant-prairie-wi-us-165718998.aspx?mescoid=1500146001001&jobPosition=15,,Marketing/Product,21018f77286a05d89f7d54ce3cc7376c
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:11:53:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Job Window is now hiring a Marketing Sales Assistant on behalf of our client, a creative marketing and consulting firm in the local area.  Since their opening, our client has provided exceptional marketing, sales, and management training and has been recognized for the quality of their services by clients.  This firm has experienced tremendous growth and expansion with their marketing teams leading them and they are in immediate need of a Marketing Sales Assistant looking for an entry level opportunity in a sales and marketing career.As a Marketing Sales Assistant, you will be an integral part of our client’s Marketing Division.  You will be responsible for executing strategies to ensure the revenue attainment and growth of clients’ products. You will have the opportunity to network with prestigious clientele and work in a motivated team environment providing top notch customer service engagement and creative marketing strategies.Marketing Sales Assistant Job Description/Responsibilities:Interact directly with customers to market products, services and client portfolio.Maintain professional standards in customer relationships and marketingParticipate in daily training sessions and marketing campaign meetingsContribute to a positive and energetic environment that fosters creativity and growth No experience in advertising or public relations is needed for this position.  As a Marketing Sales Assistant, you will participate in a customized training period that will suit your knowledge and experience. This firm continues to train within their company to maintain the values and integrity that have allowed them to become one of the fastest growing outsourced marketing and sales providers.  Benefits of the Marketing Sales Assistant Position:Travel & training opportunitiesMerit based advancementUncapped bonuses & incentive plan100% Growth from within our client’s companyRequirementsQualifications of the Marketing Sales Assistant:Strong organizational skills and ability to network professionally.Self-motivated and comfortable working both independently and as part of a team.Ability to perform at a high level in a fast paced environment.Key Words: Entry Level, Brand/Product Marketing, Account Management, Business Development, Sales / Marketing Strategizing, Product Management, Direct Marketing (CRM), Sales Executive, Marketing Assistant, Account Sales",Marketing Sales Assistant - Full Time Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time, Employee","Philadelphia, PA 19102",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-sales-assistant-full-time-job-philadelphia-pa-us-169397030.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=19,,Marketing/Product,d9ccc60cc6d1599ad73540b702d056d0
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:12:58:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Job Window is seeking top talent for one of the most rapidly growing marketing and advertising teams in the Sacramento area! Local startups and national brands alike call on our client to launch new products and services, acquire new customers and increase sales activity through their innovative retail marketing and promotional advertising campaigns.   Due to recent campaign expansion throughout the Sacramento area, our client is looking for a Junior Marketing & Sales Assistant who can help take their client’s retail marketing promotions to the next level! We are looking for an outgoing, positive minded entry-level professional who isn’t afraid of face to face consumer interaction and is eager to learn the ins & outs of retail marketing & consumer sales strategy to assist our client with:The development of each brands retail marketing strategy to achieve defined business objectives and leverage global brand positioning and solidify the company's superiority through its customersSales/Retailer buying/marketing team relations in order to deliver compelling in-store POP, promotional and marketing programs that build Brands and drive sell-thru (relationships with Home Depot, Sam’s Club, Costco beneficial)Developing “Go To Market” strategy for existing and new product initiatives to drive consumer sales on behalf of the clientMonitoring marketing budget and sales initiatives execution and metricsAligning all customer facing Brand communication, presentations, and collateral. Train and educate Sales Team on how to deploy to Retailers and/or join in customer presentations.Proactively create selling opportunities based on Seasonality, VOC and Retailer Marketing Calendar with the goal of driving increased revenue and increasing monetary success of each client campaign.RequirementsOur client’s personalized marketing campaigns and techniques have enabled them to generate huge success for their clients. Their marketing & sales professionals execute their clients' needs in the best way possible: face to face. It is because of their superior marketing and sales force that they are able to offer their clients customers interaction in a friendly, courteous, and professional manner while responding to their questions or concerns. Their clients deem this the best possible way to acquire new customers and retain their existing ones. If you've ever worked harder than the person next to you (and the people we're looking for always have), you'll be pleased to know that here, there is an option for performance based compensation and base pay in this role! Full training is also provided.If you’ve got:Confidence in your ability to be successful. Outstanding communication skills both verbal and written. A professional appearance and outstanding work ethic. A great attitude with a high-energy personality. Superior customer service skills. A desire to work Access to reliable transportation The ability to pass a background checkSend us your resume! We are an equal opportunity employer and will not discriminate against any qualified applicant on the basis of a protected characteristic unless a bona fide occupational qualification exists.",Junior Marketing & Sales Assistant Job in Sacramento,"Full Time, Employee","Sacramento, CA 95815",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-marketing-sales-assistant-job-sacramento-ca-us-168867425.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=16,,Marketing/Product,7b9fcd1c88fa7bc9badcd9645e22e312
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:12:59:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PURPOSE The Measure Technician works independently in a traveling field role in support of Home Depot's Measurement Services center. The Technician's role is to provide quality professional customer service that consistently meets or exceeds Company standards of excellence and customer expectations. The position is directly responsible for creating, maintaining and improving customer relationships while interacting with customers on a daily basis during sales, product inquiry, taking on-site home measurements and coordinating installations in conjunction with the Measurement Services center. The position is also directly responsible for providing a positive customer experience, accurate measurements, entering and transmitting measurements by a CAD tablet and various related department goals. MAJOR TASKS, RESPONSIBILITIES, AND KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES 90% Providing customer service by assessing customer needs, communicating with customers and conducting home measures. 10% Review and edit of drawings in the CAD tablet. NATURE AND SCOPE Position Reports to: Local Field Manager Number of Direct Reports: 0 Environmental Job Requirements Located in a comfortable indoor area. Conditions could produce mild discomfort on occasion including but not limited to lifting, bending, squatting within customers’ homes. Travel: Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the timeMINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS Minimum Age: 18 Must pass drug test. Education: The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED. Years of Relevant Work Experience: 0 Physical Job Requirements: Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about. On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles. PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS Previous customer service or retail sales experience is preferred. KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, ABILITIES, AND COMPETENCIESSkilled at consistently providing outstanding customer service, following through on responsibilities to customers and recovering from any errors made.Demonstrated ability to complete projects and assignments accurately, catching errors before completion, despite a large workload, competing demands and a fast paced environment.Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate with customers.Ability to set priorities, plan and coordinate work activities and obtain and manage resources so that work objectives are accomplished on time.Associates must have strong computer skills, and understanding for CAD like applications.",MEASURE TECH - GURNEE Job in Gurnee,Full Time Employee,"Gurnee, IL 60031",,http://jobview.monster.com/measure-tech-gurnee-job-gurnee-il-us-169177493.aspx?mescoid=4300745001001&jobPosition=7,,,20e4b9c08c59606cb5eb17ba987bed68
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:13:28:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"ENTRY LEVEL MARKETING POSITIONS WITH FULLY PAID TRAINING!!  Company Description:Intrinzink Innovations, Inc. is an advertising and marketing firm looking for people with potential and  an ambitious drive, rather than experience, to aggressively expand in the Indy area.Intrinzink Innovations is hiring for ENTRY LEVEL marketing positions. We have an aggressive expansion plan laid out and are looking to find a person who would love to work in a, fun, competitive, positive-minded environment. What We Do:  Intrinzink Innovations, Inc. is an outsourcing customer acquisition firm. That means our clients hire us to provide a personal touch with customers that they can't do themselves and don't trust anyone else to do. Because our personal approach has proved to be so successful, we DO NOT do any telemarketing or door to door. We offer a salary or commission with bonuses available.  Who We're Looking For: * You must be ENTRY LEVEL or willing to start ENTRY LEVEL. * You must possess great people skills. * You must demonstrate excellent work ethic. * You must have a positive business attitude like the rest of our enthusiastic staff. * You must be confident you'll be successful, just waiting for a career opportunity where you can prove yourself.***MUST HAVE RELIABLE FORM OF TRANSPORTATION*** Why We Are Hiring:  Our clients are asking us to bring them more customers. Therefore, our goal is to find someone to help us in our expansion efforts. The person we hire will get management training and have unlimited growth opportunity.RequirementsOur Management Training Program focuses on the following areas:  * Sales and Marketing. (No telemarketing! No direct mailing! No commission only pay! No door to door) * Leadership Skills * Effective Communication Techniques * Marketing Campaign Roles * Sales Strategies * Team Management Employees with a proven track record will have the opportunity to participate in our Leadership and Management Development Program. PROMOTIONS based upon performance. No Experience Necessary!",ENTRY LEVEL MARKETING POSITIONS WITH FULLY PAID TRAINING!! Job in Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN 46240",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-marketing-positions-with-fully-paid-training!!-job-indianapolis-in-us-169316031.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=16,,Marketing/Product,b15b1ee226d9f8fab72395357b711679
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:13:46:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Church & Dwight, one of the leading consumer packaged goods companies in the U.S., currently has an excellent Fulltime opportunity open at our Harrisonville, MO location for Utility Operators. Church & Dwight offers a competitive benefits package along with advancement opportunities throughout the company. General Summary: Involved in machine start up/shutdown and operation of all the equipment involved in production on the liquid packaging line including: unscrambler, filler, SWF trayformer, SWF case sealer, Hartness case packer, and palletizer/stretch wrapper. Starting pay $12.38 - $14.65/hr with advancement to $19.15/hr Available shift (Monday-Friday):2nd: 3:00p – 11:30p3rd: 11:00p - 7:30aPerform operational set up/shut down and maintain operation of packing line equipment.Establish familiarity with raw material part numbers, sizes of bottles, and box quantities.Clear jams and restart equipment such as sealer, caseformer, and Hartness/Standard Knapp.Hand stack cases of finished goods onto pallets in the event palletizer is non-functional.Identify alarms on various equipment and appropriately and safely clear jam to restart packaging line.Apply and understand proper lock out/tag out procedures for each piece of equipment assigned to operate.Load bottles into unscrambler and/or load 200 oz. bottles directly onto conveyor.Load bundles of corrugate into caseformer executing safe lifting techniques.Inspect finished product for defects at various points on the packing line.Regularly perform housekeeping duties to keep work area clean and neat.Performs other duties as assigned.Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:Good oral and written communication skills.Good organizational/time management skills would be a plus.Ability to effectively interact with employees at all levels of the organization.Ability to work for long periods of time, under pressure, to produce results.Basic mechanical aptitude.Education and Experience:High school diploma or equivalency. Previous manufacturing experience helpful. Church & Dwight Co., Inc. is an EOE M/F/Disability/Veterans.PI94687045",Utility Operator Job in Harrisonville,Full Time Employee,"Harrisonville, MO 64701",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/utility-operator-job-harrisonville-mo-us-169066298.aspx?mescoid=5100985001001&jobPosition=5,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,c6cea0e7bc4bf135c314243a655c68c7
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:13:46:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Duties:Responsible for planning and coordinating assigned ERP independent and dependent demand requirements for all assigned Contract Manufactured Products at client-approved Tollers. This includes developing, publishing, and coordinating with the appropriate Contract Manufacturing Managers and Third Party Suppliers, weekly and monthly manufacturing schedules based upon MPS requirements. It is also the responsibility of the Contract MFG Production Planner to assist in evaluating and calculating capacity constraints by assigned contract manufacturers, in order to assist SCM and Operations Management in developing mid to long range capacity strategies.Skills:Analytical ThinkingBusiness and Technical CompetenceCommunicationContinuous LearningDecision MakingDelivering ResultsInnovation/CreativityNegotiationPlanning and OrganizingTeamworkEducation:1-3 Years Experience as a Production Planner with thorough knowledge of how an ERP System operates regarding the following modules - Material Requirements Planning (MRP), Master Production Scheduling (MPS), Inventory Management (IM), Production Control and Costing (PCC), Product Data Management (PDM), and Purchasing Modules. Additionally, needs general knowledge of an Advance Planning System, and the concepts of such a system, and how it relates to an ERP System. APICS CPIM Certification Preferred.Advanced skills in Microsoft Excel and AccessIn order to properly calculate assigned dependent and independent demands the incumbent must have excellent math skills; at least college level math, statistics, and / or algebra.Good written and verbal communication skills are required in order to communicate effectively with different levels of Management within the organization.Prefer experience working in a cGMP production environment (4-7 years)",Production Planner Job in St. Joseph,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","St. Joseph, MO",,http://jobview.monster.com/production-planner-job-st.-joseph-mo-us-169253993.aspx?mescoid=4300738001001&jobPosition=20,,,09175252b36bbf4b1c775ae06e3a36ae
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:01:45:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Lehigh Hanson is seeking a qualified Production Supervisor. This position will reside at our Jefferson, South Carolina location.  The Jefferson facility is close enough to the Charlotte, NC suburbs to commute. Reporting to the Plant Manager, this position is responsible for providing supervision and technical guidance to process department hourly work crews.  Will work on a rotating shift basis and provide relief for other process supervisors. Lehigh Hanson is one of the largest construction materials companies in North America with more than 500 active operations in the U.S. and Canada. Our core activities include the production and distribution of cement and aggregates, the two essential raw materials in concrete. Lehigh Hanson companies also produce ready-mixed concrete, asphalt and other concrete products. Lehigh Hanson is part of the HeidelbergCement Group, the global market leader in aggregates with leading positions in cement, concrete and other downstream activities. The Group employs approximately 45,000 people and operates in around 40 countries.  ESSENTIAL RESPONSIBILITIES and TASKS   Ensure the efficient operation of plant equipment.Supervise the workforce to maximize the production capability of the various process areas on a rotating shift basis.Maximize production of a quality product within company and plant specifications, goals, and objectives.Supervise personnel and equipment to minimize plant costs.Manage personnel and processes to insure compliance with all safety and environmental rules and regulations.Coordinate shift activities with other process supervisors to insure continuity of operations. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS  College degree preferred, but not required.2-5 years of experience in crushed stone manufacturing or related industry.Broad understanding of crushed stone manufacturing process, equipment, and process control systems.Ability to troubleshoot mechanical and electrical failures, as well as equipment performance.Ability to direct process and/or maintenance personnel to correct problems.Effective supervisory, interpersonal, and communication skills.Proficient PC skills, with experience in Microsoft Office, Outlook, Kronos and SAP a plus.Demonstrated commitment to continuous improvement.Knowledge of MSHA regulations and guidelines.  BENEFITS & COMPENSATIONWe know that our employees are critical to our overall success. We are dedicated to investing in their future to maintain long-term relationships for lasting commitments. We offer a comprehensive package of compensation and benefits programs which are regularly reviewed to maintain them at competitive levels.Lehigh Hanson is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to workplace diversity. M/F/D/VYour salary will be commensurate with your work experience and relevant skills.No Search Firms please.  IND123 ",Production Supervisor Job in Jefferson,Full Time Employee,"Jefferson, SC 29718",Metals and MineralsConstruction - Industrial Facilities and InfrastructureConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/production-supervisor-job-jefferson-sc-us-169204007.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=9,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,2fd0e5e01f9bc3ea20863d12d61b6360
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:01:45:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"As the Events Marketing Support Specialist, you will have multiple responsibilities providing assistance for Reynolds events.   You will support the execution of most events, including Road Shows and larger corporate functions.  Primary duties include printing, communications, managing expenses, multiple reports, shipping of materials, and tracking budget costs.  Additionally, you will help coordinate room blocks, transportation and travel schedules for associates as needed.  In this role, you will be interacting with internal associates, outside vendors, and customers on a regular basis.  If you have event planning experience, are a team player, and have a strong attention to detail, then this position is for you!REQUIREMENTS: •                     Bachelor’s degree or CMP (Certified Meeting Planner) •                     Strong and effective communication skills (written and verbal)•                     Strong experience with Microsoft Office, especially Excel•                     Detail oriented•                     Event industry experience preferredBENEFITS:We strive to offer an environment that provides our associates with the right balance between work and family. We offer a comprehensive benefits package including: Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance 401k with 100% matching up to 6% of compensationReferral bonuses with the opportunity to earn up to $7,000 per hirePaid holidays, vacation and sick days Professional development and training through Reynolds University Free on-site fitness center with a cardio room, weight room, daily fitness classes, and locker facilities On-site medical clinic staffed by a Nurse Practitioner Company-sponsored events and sports leagues including: company picnic, softball, volleyball, bowling, euchre and more!On-site softball field, basketball court, and volleyball court Gourmet cafeteria, open for breakfast and lunch, that features a salad bar and a variety of made-to-order cuisine optionsConvenience store with a full-service Starbucks coffee bar, reading materials and an assortment of snacks On-site Credit Union and ATMOpportunities to participate in charitable endeavors, such as our annual Bike Build for local military families, participation in the Reynolds Associate Foundation, company sponsorship in local charity 5k Run/Walks, and other volunteer opportunities Reynolds and Reynoldspromotes a healthy lifestyle by providing a non-smoking environment.Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age.",Events Marketing Support Specialist Job in Dayton,Full Time Employee,"Dayton, OH 45430",RetailComputer SoftwareBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/events-marketing-support-specialist-job-dayton-oh-us-168820952.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=12,,Marketing/Product,25f44694fca5fe5ce7ec9c6c21a90d10
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:17:16:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Client Services Manager AMK   We are seeking a dynamic Client Services Manager who can lead the creation and implementation of marketing events. In this highly visible role, the Manager for Client Services' responsibilities will focus on being the key point of integration across multiple internal functions. You will act as a liaison with the client and retailer to ensure the seamless delivery of events. Your mission is to create and deploy a culture of service excellence that exceeds client and retailer expectations. When you work for Advantage Solutions, you become part of the largest sales and marketing agency in North America where there are many opportunities for career advancement.   Responsibilities: Create, implement, execute and manage marketing events. Project management: event program tracking, timeline development and management, pre and post-promotional analysis, and reporting. Management of team members and ensure successful delivery of key SLAs and deliverables. Build strong client and retailer relationships to ensure that deliverables are successfully achieved while creating a culture of service excellence. Qualifications: Bachelor's Degree or equivalent experience 1-3 years of experience in Consumer products, brand, or agency Experience in event execution preferred. Strong negotiation, project management, research, analysis, and presentation skills. Creative thinker and self-starter who is able to effectively handle multiple tasks and projects simultaneously Excellent written and verbal communication skills Able to build and maintain strong client relationships Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity",Client Services Manager AMK Job in Bentonville,Full Time Employee,"Bentonville, AR",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/client-services-manager-amk-job-bentonville-ar-us-171849213.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=11,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,66fd15d83ccdf432e79371030e38ec08
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:17:16:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Recoupment/Collections Analyst Position Description CGI Federal, a wholly owned subsidiary of CGI, and an industry leader in providing clinical audit services to public and private healthcare insurance payers throughout the US, has an opening for a Recoupment/Collections Analyst. The Recoupment/Collection Analyst is responsible for maintaining and reconciling provider overpayment balances. They will generate provider notification letters from our system and review to ensure proper balances and quality letters are sent to providers. Specific responsibilities will include the following:. Maintain and reconcile provider balances• Work with customer in reconciliation processes• Responsible for generating and performing quality assurance reviews on notification letters • Work with mail fulfillment center for submitting quality letters for print and mail• Monitor project compliance with each contract or service level agreement (SLA) • Effectively respond to issues and concerns raised by internal and external clients • Support all requirements of Business Development, Client Relations and Project Managers• Serve as client interface as requiredTo qualify for this position, applicants must have a majority of the following skills, credentials and abilities:. At least 5 years of experience working in a similar environment • Proficient skills in MS Office, particularly Word, Excel and Outlook and ability to learn \ new proprietary IT systems• Excellent math skills and ability to manage and reconcile account balances• Highly developed organizational skills • Professional communication skills and proven ability to work with individuals at all level. Undergraduate degree in business administration, finance in accounting is preferred, but not requiredSelected candidate must be willing and able to successfully undergo a National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI) Your future duties and responsibilities Required qualifications to be successful in this role At CGI, we’re a team of builders. We call our employees members because all who join CGI are building their own company - one that has grown to 65,000 professionals located in 40 countries. Founded in 1976, CGI is a leading IT and business process services firm committed to helping clients succeed. We have the global resources, expertise, stability and dedicated professionals needed to achieve results for our clients - and for our members. Come grow with us. Learn more at www.cgi.com This is a great opportunity to join a winning team. CGI offers a competitive compensation package with opportunities for growth and professional development. Benefits for full-time, permanent members start on the first day of employment and include a paid time-off program and profit participation and stock purchase plans.We wish to thank all applicants for their interest and effort in applying for this position, however, only candidates selected for interviews will be contacted. No unsolicited agency referrals please.All CGI offers of employment in the U.S. are contingent upon the ability to successfully complete a background investigation. Background investigation components can vary depending upon specific assignment, or upon any US government security clearance if required. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, gender Identity, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, pregnancy, or other status protected by law. CGI will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with CGI’s legal duty to furnish information. Please click here to Apply On-Line.Cliquez svp ici pour postuler en ligne.",Recoupment/Collections Analyst Job in Cleveland,,"Cleveland, OH",Accounting and Auditing ServicesHealthcare ServicesGovernment and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/recoupment-collections-analyst-job-cleveland-oh-us-171794840.aspx?mescoid=4300696001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e97cbfbd5828a0b964c3cdba6f3285aa
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:17:16:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our client is in urgent need of multiple Auto Property Damage Claims Adjusters to work out of their office in Fort Worth, TX.Required Qualifications:1+ years of experience handling Auto Liability ClaimsAbility to conduct coverage investigations and effectively determine liabilityExperience working for a non-standard carrierActive Texas Adjusters LicensePreferred Qualifications:Ability to start right away!About TheBestIRS:TheBestIRS, Insurance Recruiting Specialists, is the leading provider of insurance jobs in Texas for Claims Adjusters concentrating in Workers’ Compensation, Property, Commercial Lines, Personal Lines and Catastrophe. TheBestIRS have been placing insurance professionals in direct hire, temporary and temp-to-hire opportunities with insurance carriers, self-insurance companies and third party administrators for nearly 2 decades and are adding new clients every day. Apply for one of our insurance jobs in TX and find out why TheBestIRS is the best choice for your insurance career.",Claims Adjuster - Auto Liability Job in Fort Worth,Full Time Employee,"Fort Worth, TX 76135",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/claims-adjuster-auto-liability-job-fort-worth-tx-us-171790677.aspx?mescoid=1300071001001&jobPosition=17,21.00 - 26.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,fdef0a8710623b98008d3d3f0d7906b5
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:17:56:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Title:                    Insurance Claims Specialist- FirstCareReports to:Associate ManagerLocation:            Coral Springs, FLSalary: $ 12.00 per hour, plus $100 monthly incentive bonus Responsibilities:Provide expertise or general claims support by reviewing, researching, investigating, negotiating, processing and adjusting claimsConsistently meet established productivity, schedule adherence, and quality standardsAuthorize the appropriate payment or refers claims to investigators for further reviewConduct data entry and re-work; analyzes and identifies trends and provides reports as necessary.Calculate other insurance and re-pricing benefitsWork claims files to ensure the appropriate eligibility and provider records are matched to the claim.Provide excellent customer serviceConsistently meet cycle time/productivity goals that are aligned with corporate objectives May provide 'buddy training' and feedback to new associatesAbility to consistently meet cycle time/productivity goals Required Qualifications:High School Diploma or equivalent required 1-2 years of experience working in 1) a healthcare provider setting performing insurance billing and/or collections or reimbursement processing or 2) banking or retail processing financial transactions. Ability to communicate effectively, both verbally and in writingGood typing and analytical skills.  Attention to detailAble to work in a production environment Ability to work with supervisor and team to probe for problem solving Preferred Qualifications:Knowledge of contract benefits and claims processing proceduresAnalyze processes and procedures and identify errors or inconsistenciesKnowledge of different health insurance in US  Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Title:                    Insurance Claims Specialist- FirstCareReports to:Associate ManagerLocation:            Coral Springs, FLSalary: $ 12.00 per hour, plus $100 monthly incentive bonus Responsibilities:Provide expertise or general claims support by reviewing, researching, investigating, negotiating, processing and adjusting claimsConsistently meet established productivity, schedule adherence, and quality standardsAuthorize the appropriate payment or refers claims to investigators for further reviewConduct data entry and re-work; analyzes and identifies trends and provides reports as necessary.Calculate other insurance and re-pricing benefitsWork claims files to ensure the appropriate eligibility and provider records are matched to the claim.Provide excellent customer serviceConsistently meet cycle time/productivity goals that are aligned with corporate objectives May provide 'buddy training' and feedback to new associatesAbility to consistently meet cycle time/productivity goals Required Qualifications:High School Diploma or equivalent required 1-2 years of experience working in 1) a healthcare provider setting performing insurance billing and/or collections or reimbursement processing or 2) banking or retail processing financial transactions. Ability to communicate effectively, both verbally and in writingGood typing and analytical skills.  Attention to detailAble to work in a production environment Ability to work with supervisor and team to probe for problem solving Preferred Qualifications:Knowledge of contract benefits and claims processing proceduresAnalyze processes and procedures and identify errors or inconsistenciesKnowledge of different health insurance in US ",,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-claims-specialist-job-coral-springs-fl-us-171788238.aspx?mescoid=4300756001001&jobPosition=7,,,458504bc955b628f6b81d42fc8641674
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:17:57:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is actively seeking a Billing Quality Analyst for a behavioral health software company located in the Rockville, MD area. This position is full time and permanent! This job will have the following responsibilities:Work with partnered agencies to determine any billing inconsistencies/discrepancies Help develop a work plan to correct any billing issues Assist Billing Manager with improving all internal processes and increase checks and balances to reduce billing errors Ensure compliance with documentation standards Qualifications & Requirements:Bachelors degree preferred CPC certification preferred Direct knowledge of CPT/ICD-9/ICD-10 coding systems At least 3 years experience with medical billing Experience in quality review/auditing ALL INTERESTED AND QUALIFIED CANDIDATES PLEASE SEND YOUR MOST UPDATED RESUME TO MARGARET BAGNELL AT MBAGNELL@JUDGE.COM OR CONTACT MARGARET DIRECTLY AT (610)617-1528. THANK YOU!",Billing Quality Analyst Job in Rockville,"Full Time, Employee","Rockville, MD",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/billing-quality-analyst-job-rockville-md-us-171867708.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=18,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,9a01fc5c331dba5247421fc550d0a430
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:18:38:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manager, Accounting Policy and Research Our Mission:   At STERIS plc, we help our Customers create a healthier and safer world by providing innovative healthcare and life science product and service solutions around the globe.   Who we are:  STERIS is a growing provider of infection prevention and other procedural products and services through our family of wholly owned subsidiaries, including: IMS, US Endoscopy, Albert Browne Limited, Eschmann Holdings Limited and Synergy Health Limited, among others.   Summary This position reports directly to the Assistant Corporate Controller as part of the Corporate Accounting team.  The Accounting Policy Manager is responsible for managing aspects of technical functions including accounting research, policy setting and assessment and design of strategic structuring alternatives. This position has direct responsibility and oversight for ensuring compliance with US GAAP and IFRS, and maintaining appropriate controls throughout the above area of responsibility. Position Responsibilities Manages and oversees the accounting issues resolution process and the research of technical accounting and reporting issues; advises senior finance team on technical accounting matters related to US GAAP and International Financial Reporting Standards (IFRS) Provides interpretation of ambiguous and complex accounting literature to address technical accounting questions related to special projects; works closely with Finance and Business Development personnel in the accounting and reporting review and analysis of significant, and highly complex business transactions Interprets new, existing, proposed, and finalized accounting pronouncements to determine the potential impact to the organization; provides summary of accounting impact to senior management  Collaborates with finance and business stakeholders across the organization keeping abreast of internal and external developments that could impact the company’s accounting and reporting to provide guidance and consultation on technical accounting issues and disclosures Build relationships across multiple departments and functions to achieve company and department goals  Play a key role in the company’s adoption of IFRS for UK filing purposes, including accounting policy elections, monitoring IASB developments and convergence with U.S. GAAP, and the development of data requirements under IFRS Documents accounting policies and positions both verbally and in writing with senior finance management as well as external and internal auditors and provided expertise in recommending enhancement and/or additions to the Corporate Accounting Policy Manual Assists in development and training through continuing education presentations for company personnel Bring a positive attitude and enthusiasm to work in a fast-paced and dynamic environment   In a numbered list, describe specific work experience requirements; include years of experience for each requirement:  Approximately 10 years of relevant job experience including 5+ years in public accounting and  manager/supervisory level experience Bachelor’s degree in accounting,  Certified Public Accountant  Accounting experience in a multi-national medical device or manufacturing company preferred In a numbered list, describe specific skills and/or business competencies: Manage and participate on special projects as required Employee must possess a thorough knowledge of accounting theories and practices. Excellent writing and communication skills are necessary. This position will regularly interact with corporate management and Operations Finance (Business support finance). Strong computer skills including Excel and Word are required. Team player. Extremely detailed and results-oriented. Oracle Financials experience preferred Proven ability to manage and prioritize multiple and competing tasks must be shown. Proven ability to develop plans and manage special projects. Strong and problem solving skills are a must.    STERIS plc is a $2B+, publicly traded (NYSE: STE) organization with more than 14,000 employees worldwide.  We are dedicated to providing our Customers with innovative infection prevention, decontamination, and health science technologies, products and services.   Visit https://www.steris.com/about/careers/ to learn more. STERIS plc is an Equal Opportunity Employer.  We are committed to equal employment opportunity and the use of affirmative action programs to ensure that persons are recruited, hired, trained, transferred and promoted in all job groups regardless of race, color, religion, age, disability, national origin, citizenship status, military or veteran status, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth and related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, and any other category protected by federal, state or local law.  We are not only committed to this policy by our status as a federal government contractor, but also we are strongly bound by the principle of equal employment opportunity. ",Manager,Full Time Employee,"Mentor, OH 44060",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-accounting-policy-research-job-mentor-oh-us-171565000.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=20,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,61c225aecd733f1824a93fbb14a22763
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:18:45:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Interlex Communications, Inc.Location: San Antonio, TexasPosition: Accountant, FT 40hrs/wkEd. Reqs: Bachelor's Accounting orBachelor's Business with Accounting MajorExperience: 2+ years performing GL analysis,reconciliation, AR, AP, P&L analysis,proficiency in QuickBooksSend resumes to hr@interlexusa.comClick here to see Newspaper ad",ACCOUNTANT Job in San Antonio,Full Time,"San Antonio, TX",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-job-san-antonio-tx-us-171832221.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2f6c60f2d315e7bfc05de557e11cba5e
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:18:45:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Position: Chief Financial Officer - 2318Department: AdministrationShift: 8:00 AM - 5:00 PMCampus: OakBend Medical Center - Jackson Street, 1705 Jackson StreetLocation: Richmond, Texas 77469Position Requirement:  The Chief Financial Officer is responsible for setting the standard for accounting and business practices at OakBend Medical Center. The Chief Financial Officer has oversight of the following functions: accounting and disbursements, budgeting and financial planning, treasury functions, managed care contracts, contract review, Health Information Management, Business Office, and Patient Access. The Chief Financial Officer is responsible for achieving financial and strategic objectives established by the Chief Executive Officer and the Board of Directors.Minimum Education:MBA required from a quality institution.Minimum Work Experience:15 years progressive financial management experience required.Required Skills, Knowledge, and Abilities:Must have a comprehensive understanding of accounting, business and financial processes, demonstrated strong leadership and sound management abilities.About OakBend Medical Center: OakBend Medical Center is an independent, nonprofit community hospital located in the heart of Fort Bend County, providing quality care and exemplary service with its three full-service hospitals, as well as many specialty centers. As a community hospital, caring for our patients is personal. Our patients are our neighbors, our family, and our friends. By acting with integrity and compassion, and each person taking ownership for providing quality care, we illustrate an absolute commitment to excellence in all that we do for our community. OakBend Medical Center distinguishes itself among its healthcare peers in Fort Bend County by housing several unique programs and facilities including the county’s only:• No Wait Emergency Room• 5-Star Hospital-based Skilled Nursing Facility• Neonatal ICU with the capacity to care for babies up to 12 weeks premature• Advanced Trauma Program• Acute Care for the Elderly (ACE) Unit• Geriatric Psychiatric Program• Geriatric Psychiatric ProgramOakBend Medical Center is located 25 miles outside of downtown Houston with multiple locations throughout the county and greater Houston area. We proudly serve the Fort Bend County community including the cities of Richmond, Rosenberg, Sugar Land, Missouri City, Needville, Fulshear, Katy, and Stafford. The OakBend Health System includes Hospital for Surgical Excellence in Sugar Land Texas, The Elite Center for Minimally Invasive Surgery, River Oaks Surgery Center, and Houston Metro Orthopedic & Spine, all located in Houston, TX.Benefits:   OakBend Medical Center is committed to our employees with the same level of care given to patients. Our highly competitive compensation packages include day one health insurance coverage, dental, vision, retirement and more! Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Position: Chief Financial Officer - 2318Department: AdministrationShift: 8:00 AM - 5:00 PMCampus: OakBend Medical Center - Jackson Street, 1705 Jackson StreetLocation: Richmond, Texas 77469Position Requirement:  The Chief Financial Officer is responsible for setting the standard for accounting and business practices at OakBend Medical Center. The Chief Financial Officer has oversight of the following functions: accounting and disbursements, budgeting and financial planning, treasury functions, managed care contracts, contract review, Health Information Management, Business Office, and Patient Access. The Chief Financial Officer is responsible for achieving financial and strategic objectives established by the Chief Executive Officer and the Board of Directors.Minimum Education:MBA required from a quality institution.Minimum Work Experience:15 years progressive financial management experience required.Required Skills, Knowledge, and Abilities:Must have a comprehensive understanding of accounting, business and financial processes, demonstrated strong leadership and sound management abilities.About OakBend Medical Center: OakBend Medical Center is an independent, nonprofit community hospital located in the heart of Fort Bend County, providing quality care and exemplary service with its three full-service hospitals, as well as many specialty centers. As a community hospital, caring for our patients is personal. Our patients are our neighbors, our family, and our friends. By acting with integrity and compassion, and each person taking ownership for providing quality care, we illustrate an absolute commitment to excellence in all that we do for our community. OakBend Medical Center distinguishes itself among its healthcare peers in Fort Bend County by housing several unique programs and facilities including the county’s only:• No Wait Emergency Room• 5-Star Hospital-based Skilled Nursing Facility• Neonatal ICU with the capacity to care for babies up to 12 weeks premature• Advanced Trauma Program• Acute Care for the Elderly (ACE) Unit• Geriatric Psychiatric Program• Geriatric Psychiatric ProgramOakBend Medical Center is located 25 miles outside of downtown Houston with multiple locations throughout the county and greater Houston area. We proudly serve the Fort Bend County community including the cities of Richmond, Rosenberg, Sugar Land, Missouri City, Needville, Fulshear, Katy, and Stafford. The OakBend Health System includes Hospital for Surgical Excellence in Sugar Land Texas, The Elite Center for Minimally Invasive Surgery, River Oaks Surgery Center, and Houston Metro Orthopedic & Spine, all located in Houston, TX.Benefits:   OakBend Medical Center is committed to our employees with the same level of care given to patients. Our highly competitive compensation packages include day one health insurance coverage, dental, vision, retirement and more!",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/chief-financial-officer-2318-job-richmond-tx-us-169474587.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=10,,,47b797df221744c6c96bcfbd449099d3
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:18:57:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Springfield, VA that is looking for a Project Accountant.Responsibilities: Process T&M, CPFF and FFP invoices in Costpoint; perform all project accounting functions in Costpoint such as Project setup, Revenue, Billing, and Project Reporting Provide internal and federal audit support related to their projects; analyze profit and loss and be able to explain variations; run system updates, project updates, and invoice and revenue postings Provide project reports to senior management on issues such as revenue adjustments, write-offs/downs, cash collections, and other information as needed Enter project set-up information in Deltek Ensure invoices are in compliance with customer contracts Meet monthly, quarterly, and year-end deadlines Work with customers, corporate accounting, and the operations department to research and resolve billing discrepancies and disputes Assist management with ad-hoc projects; contact past-due customer accounts to resolve delinquent payment issues and ensure the customer makes prompt payment Prepare and mail invoices, past-due notices, customer statements, and request-for-payment letters for delinquent accounts Monitor funding's, ceilings, backlog and POP dates; analyze and reconcile unbilled accounts receivables General clerical duties including filingREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Accounting/Finance/Business required A revenue/billing project accountant with a minimum of 3 years of experience in government project accounting Must have a minimum of 3 years of related work experience Proficiency in Deltek, Costpoint, Impromptu, Excel, DPM, and Microsoft Office products with particularly strong skills in Microsoft Excel Must be able to multi-task and must possess strong communication skills, both written and verbalKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Project Accountant (Costpoint ) Job in Springfield,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Springfield, VA 22151",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-accountant-costpoint-7-job-springfield-va-us-171796590.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),33877d85bbc1d92ecf6fed8efaf03a84
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:18:58:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is currently seeking a Data Analyst for a client in the Wayzata, MN area!!!.   The purposes of this role is to offer a new way to showcase travel data and drive change in the way travel is booked (both on domestic and international fronts) to ensure best value across the Client's and its various businesses. This job will have the following responsibilities:Work with sets of travel data (big data) Pull data from database into Power BI to create visualizationsUtilize critical thinking and analytical skills to recognize patterns, discrepancies, etc. Use creative thought and analytical skills to make recommendations regarding factors such as best times to book travel, how to obtain best value, etc. Participate in presentations to Client's leaders alongside managers Ad hoc requests including market research and pulling of specific reports/data sets for various businesses Some of these items will be time-sensitive Qualifications & Requirements:Bachelor’s degree (economics or something related to analytics preferred) Data analytical skills Interpretive ability Great Communication and influential skills (comfortable sitting in presentations to Client's leaders and being able to back up and explain data) Strong Excel Skills Tableau or Power BI experience ALL QUALIFIED CANDIDATES CALL ROMAN ESCOBAR AT 610-617-1478 AND SEND AN UP TO DATE RESUME TO ROMAN AT rescobar@judge.com Thanks,Roman",Data Analyst Job in Wayzata,"Full Time, Employee","Wayzata, MN",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/data-analyst-job-wayzata-mn-us-171867831.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=1,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,cca4a3dbd4414791d71984ebd8893d03
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:19:45:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assistant Controller - Global Media Tech (Up to $160k) Global Media Technology Firm is seeking an Assistant Controller to join the Finance Team located at their office in Needham. This position will be reporting directly to the VP of Finance as well as the Controller and will be primarily responsible for oversight of accounting operations, technical accounting, and shared services functions. This person will also have the opportunity to partner with the VP and Director of Finance on all M&A activities as well as some tax and treasury. This is an amazing opportunity for someone looking for a broader oversight into more complex and interesting areas of accounting & finance. Also ideal for anyone living south of the city looking for a more desirable commute. Responsibilities: Oversee the month end closing process and reconciliation of balance sheet accountsReview month-end P&L and Balance Sheet fluxes for reasonablenessEnsure numbers are accurate for consolidation on a monthly basisEnsure compliance with internal controls across all key processesOversee the proper documentation via memorandums of complex accounting transactionsManage auditor request list relative to technical accounting memos, questions, adoption of new standards, reconciliations, and other deliverablesEnsure compliance with global accounting policiesEnsure timely filing of statutory financial statements in CAN and UKPartner with FP&A to review and ensure timely distribution of monthly/quarterly financial information to relevant stakeholdersPartner with Corporate Controller and CFO on all M&A activities and integrationsOversee and manage the Company's billing, cash collections, cash applications and accounts payable functions (shared services)Partner with Tax Director on the annual and quarterly tax provision and other tax projectsPartner with Treasury Director regarding cash flow forecasts and supporting the servicing of the Company's debt agreements Requirements: Bachelor's degree in Accounting or Finance Required, MBA or MSA preferred CPA Requried 10+ years of progressive Accounting experience required Prior Public Accounting experience (Big 4 or Large Regional preferred) Strong technical Accounting experience Good prioritization, planning, coordination and time management skills · A solid knowledge of ERP systems (NetSuite a plus) Compensation: Up to $160k Hollister Staffing and all its related entities provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status or other categories protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Assistant Controller - Global Media Tech (Up to $k) Job in Needham,Full Time Employee,"Needham, MA",Accounting and Auditing ServicesAdvertising and PR ServicesComputer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-controller-global-media-tech-up-to-160k-job-needham-ma-us-171796304.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=16,"0.00 - 160,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,8826228cbeeef0cf04cbaa4ba96c2a50
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:19:46:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition ID 17579BR Job Title West Central Delivery Lead Location Missouri - Kansas City Office Location Kansas City, MO Why CDM Smith? CDM Smith provides lasting and integrated solutions in water, environment, transportation, energy and facilities to public and private clients worldwide. As a full-service consulting, engineering, construction, and operations firm, we deliver exceptional client service, quality results and enduring value across the entire project life cycle. Job Description CDM Smith has an exciting opportunity for a West Central Delivery Lead.  This position is part of the leadership team of the West Central Group of the North American Unit (NAU) reporting to the West Group's Delivery Director, Ian Stott.  We are presently considering candidates who are currently based, or will relocate to a CDM Smith office residing in the West Central Area.  The key responsibilities of this position will be to: Lead, train, and develop project delivery teams working on West Central Group service and construction projects, such that annual revenue, profit and cash management goals are met Drive clilent satisfaction and repeat busienss opportunities through pre-eminent project execution Drive project quality through proactive, preemptive, and preventative business processes Manage the West Central Group's Project Portfolio Leaders and take on a Project Portfolio load equal to $20 to $30 million in annual revenue Support the sales process through the active development of leads as a part of the project delivery process Work effectively with West Central Group sales teams to support area sales and business development goals Identify, avoid and mitigate project delivery risks and know how to appropriately price residual risk Engage NAU, TSU, CCI, and OGC business partners, as applicable, and in a timely manner, to assist in project execution (e.g. legal reviews of RFPs and contracts, teaming agreements, JV agreements, financial reviews of potential teaming partners, quality reviews, pricing strategy, resource identification ect.) Foster a learning organization through teaching, coaching, and implementation of lessons learned Provide input and leadership during the annual budget process Drive staff retention, hiring and growth through improved staff engagement Manage the human capital needs of the West Central Group's delivery organization (ie. Project Portfolio Leaders, Project Managers, Financial Manager, and Administrative Personnel) Foster collaboration between TSU and CCI on project delivery issues, including the mentoring and development of TSU and CCI staff that may migrate to NAU in the future Manage the P&L of the West Central Group  in partnership with the West Central Group's Sales Leader Drive the business case for change in your own words and deeds **We are open to considering candidates to be based in one of the following West Central offices  - Houston, Dallas, Austin, El Paso, San Antonio, Ft. Worth, Oklahoma City, Wichita, Omaha,  Helena,  Denver, Albuquerque, Salt Lake City, St. Louis, or Kansas City**  Minimum Qualifications Bachelor’s degree in an engineering discipline At least 15 years of professional experience in a project delivery leadership role and engineering management experience in Water, Environmental, and/or Infrastructure sectors PE License or AICP Certification Demonstrated abiltiy to communicate and operate effectively with peers in a matrix-type organization Demonstrated leadership experience in organizations associated with Water, Environmental, and/or Infrastructure sectors Demonstrated understanding of financial project management tools and project execution policies, procedures, and best practices. Knowledge and understanding of Profit and Loss Statements. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Self-directed, motivated, mission-driven with a positive attitude. Preferred Qualifications Master's degree in an Engineering discipline and/or Business Administration 15+ years of professional experience in a project delivery leadership role and engineering management in Water, Environmental and Infrastructure sectors  PMP Certification Experience with Project Delivery Systems Experience in Program Management Systems Assignment Category Fulltime-Regular Amount of Travel Required 40% EEO Statement We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate—as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status. Agency Disclaimer All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.",West Central Delivery Lead Job in Kansas City,,"Kansas City, MO",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/west-central-delivery-lead-job-kansas-city-mo-us-171209234.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=19,,,a63822e201c2372a0a4c5ad314cce5f8
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:20:03:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is hiring a temporary Accounts Receivable Specialist opportunity in Downtown Cleveland, OH. To be considered for this position, you will need high volume Accounts Payable experience with entering PO-related invoices and resolve discrepancies. This role involves a variety of functions including coding, reconciling credit memos and working with vendors to maintain proper records of accounts.   Qualifications should include:• Associates degree or equivalent 2+ years’ experience in accounting• Billing reconciliation and cash application experience• Positive attitude and professional conduct• The ability to perform monthly balance checks during month-end• Aderant system experience is a plus  If you are interested in this temporary Accounts Receivable Specialist opportunity in Downtown Cleveland, OH or other accounting opportunities from Accounting Principals please email Aisha.Holt@accountingprincipals.com and/or visit our website at www.AccountingPrincipals.com!  ;",Accounts Receivable Specialist Job in Cleveland,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Cleveland, OH 44114",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-receivable-specialist-job-cleveland-oh-us-171221999.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=7,15.00 - 16.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,167b61891374441e162aa94abf170936
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:20:32:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"As one of the largest regional gaming companies in the United States, Pinnacle Entertainment is committed to leveraging analytics as a driver of improved results. Reporting to the Manager of Strategic Planning and Analysis, the Sr. Analyst of Strategic Planning & Analysis will be responsible for supporting the analytical needs of executive management with additional support for the property Finance and P&A teams as needed. The candidate will focus on a variety of analysis including monthly and quarterly financial performance reviews, short and long-term forecasting, annual budgeting and standardized daily reporting while possessing a strong technical skill-set with experience automating processes and reporting.The Sr. Corporate Financial Analyst will be responsible for providing financial reporting, projections and analysis to support senior management in strategic decision-making and achieving revenue and profit growth objectives. The position has high visibility and interacts with CFO and other PNK leaders. Assist in the completion of regular financial forecasts throughout the yearSupport the annual budget process by maintaining the structural integrity of financial models and collaborating with corporate and property leadersCompile data, reports, and presentations for monthly and quarterly financial reviewsAs needed, collaborate with operational leaders to assist with analysis of the following areas: Marketing, Gaming, Hotel, F&B and LaborPerform ad hoc financial analysis projects and organize results in a meaningful and concise mannerCollaborate with Business Intelligence team and others to standardize reporting and automate reportsSupport analysis and projects in Finance, Marketing, Workforce Planning and Accounting as neededBachelor's degree in Business, Finance, or a related fieldAt least 2+ years of experience in a role with high emphasis on process and report automation using SQL, VBA and other relevant technical tools. The ideal candidate has a keen interest in automation and process improvement and continually seeks to replace manual tasks with highly efficient outputs. A passion for using data to drive better decision making and add business valueProven qualitative and quantitative financial skills including strategic and tactical business thinking. Results driven and able to strike the right balance between detail orientation and grasping the big pictureProficiency in financial statements analysis and familiarity with accounting principlesStrong written and verbal communication skillsProven ability to build confidence and trust with internal and external constituencies and provide excellent customer serviceHigh proficiency with MS Office, VBA and SQL requiredWorking knowledge of Timeline, Tableau and SAS preferredEssential CharacteristicsHigh standards for work quality, attention to detail and accuracyExtremely organized with the ability to work on and manage multiple projects within tight deadlineComfort working in a fast-paced and extremely dynamic environment. Must be self-sufficient, proactive and able to handle uncertainty and ambiguityMust be able to concisely summarize financial information and analyses in an easily digestible formatPI95244616Apply Here",SENIOR CORPORATE FINANCIAL ANALYST Job in Las Vegas,"Full Time, Employee","Las Vegas, NV 89169",All,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-corporate-financial-analyst-job-las-vegas-nv-us-171748011.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=7,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,769fb092e76f2e494387b71bbc7c993d
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:20:57:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in the Brookline, MA area that is seeking an AR/Payroll candidate on a temporary to permanent basis.Responsibilities Include: Preparing invoices Entering cash receipts Report cash balance Process payroll for 500 employeesREQUIREMENTS: Experience utilizing Great Plains a plus Any relevant education and/or training will be considered a plusKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Accounts Receivable / Payroll Job in Brookline,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Brookline, MA 02446",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-receivable-payroll-job-brookline-ma-us-171917305.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),455dfa7142c70775e7f1c81dc5a2b47b
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:20:59:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Finance Senior Data Analyst El Segundo Job Requisition Number 7881BR Locations where job may be based El Dorado Hills, El Segundo, San Francisco, Woodland Hills Work Schedule Full Time Employment Type Regular Term Employee There's never been a better time to join Blue Shield! Looking for a chance to do meaningful work that touches millions? Come join the hardest working, nonprofit health plan in California and help us shape the future of health care. Blue Shield of California is focused on transforming health care by making it more accessible, affordable and customer-centric. Being a mission-driven organization means we do much more than serve our 3.5 million members: we were the first health plan in the nation to limit our annual net income to 2 percent of revenue and return the difference to our customers and the community, and since 2005 we have contributed more than $325 million to the Blue Shield of California Foundation to improve community health and end domestic violence. We also believe that a healthier California begins with our employees, so we provide them with resources to develop and maintain a healthy lifestyle through our award-winning wellness program, Wellvolution. We're hiring smart thinkers and doers who want to work for a leader and innovator in the challenging, ever-changing healthcare space. Come and help us make health care better for everyone. Job Details Commercial Risk Adjustment is new to the industry (outside of Medicare Advantage), and will require deep and significant analysis, and data-mining, to help identify when a diagnosis is missing from a claims/encounter submission. This position will need to work closely with a multitude of departments, and be able to rapidly understand & navigate new situations and create solutions on the go.In order to create an effective team, nearly every single individual on the team needs to be extraordinarily strong in their technical background, and have the ability to learn quickly. In particular, the analyst needs to be able to lead and develop new programs and new processes while simultaneously being able to develop analytical tools to support these new programs.Senior Data Analysts need to be able to take charge and lead in situations where there is little guidance available, and still have the communication skills to be able to articulate complex concepts to individuals lacking in a technical background. At the same time, their technical ability needs to be extraordinary strong as they will be working with IT to help trouble shoot any IT build-out to support these programs.Responsibilities:•    Constructing analytics to support marketing positions and new business activities.•    Becoming knowledgeable of healthcare-related governmental regulations, procedures, and requirements. •    Other responsibilities as assigned. Job Required Education/Experience Education/Requirements:•    Requires minimum of a bachelor’s degree in a technical or quantitative field (GPA: 3.0+) or equivalent combination of experience and education.•    Excellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication and presentation skills. Leadership positions, public-speaking experience preferred.•    Programming knowledge & experience.•    SQL knowledge required.•    Independent problem solver, proactive, able to multitask.•    Patience for working on large scale problems.•    Basic proficiency with MS Office assumed (including Excel, Access, Word, PowerPoint, and Visio).•    Preferred experience:o    Medicare or Commercial Risk Adjustment Experience.o    SAS programming knowledge preferred.o    VBA programming knowledge preferred.o    Finance experience, including revenue and expense accounting.o    Healthcare Enrollment and Claims processing experience.o    Other healthcare experience, especially technical experience. . Blue Shield of California is committed to remaining a drug-free work place. All positions require a pre-employment background investigation and drug screen. Blue Shield of California is an Equal Opportunity Employer - EEO/MF/disabled/veteran. Sourcer #LI-AT1",Senior Data Analyst Job in El Dorado Hills,Full Time Employee,"Finance Senior Data Analyst El Segundo Job Requisition Number 7881BR Locations where job may be based El Dorado Hills, El Segundo, San Francisco, Woodland Hills Work Schedule Full Time Employment Type Regular Term Employee There's never been a better time to join Blue Shield! Looking for a chance to do meaningful work that touches millions? Come join the hardest working, nonprofit health plan in California and help us shape the future of health care. Blue Shield of California is focused on transforming health care by making it more accessible, affordable and customer-centric. Being a mission-driven organization means we do much more than serve our 3.5 million members: we were the first health plan in the nation to limit our annual net income to 2 percent of revenue and return the difference to our customers and the community, and since 2005 we have contributed more than $325 million to the Blue Shield of California Foundation to improve community health and end domestic violence. We also believe that a healthier California begins with our employees, so we provide them with resources to develop and maintain a healthy lifestyle through our award-winning wellness program, Wellvolution. We're hiring smart thinkers and doers who want to work for a leader and innovator in the challenging, ever-changing healthcare space. Come and help us make health care better for everyone. Job Details Commercial Risk Adjustment is new to the industry (outside of Medicare Advantage), and will require deep and significant analysis, and data-mining, to help identify when a diagnosis is missing from a claims/encounter submission. This position will need to work closely with a multitude of departments, and be able to rapidly understand & navigate new situations and create solutions on the go.In order to create an effective team, nearly every single individual on the team needs to be extraordinarily strong in their technical background, and have the ability to learn quickly. In particular, the analyst needs to be able to lead and develop new programs and new processes while simultaneously being able to develop analytical tools to support these new programs.Senior Data Analysts need to be able to take charge and lead in situations where there is little guidance available, and still have the communication skills to be able to articulate complex concepts to individuals lacking in a technical background. At the same time, their technical ability needs to be extraordinary strong as they will be working with IT to help trouble shoot any IT build-out to support these programs.Responsibilities:•    Constructing analytics to support marketing positions and new business activities.•    Becoming knowledgeable of healthcare-related governmental regulations, procedures, and requirements. •    Other responsibilities as assigned. Job Required Education/Experience Education/Requirements:•    Requires minimum of a bachelor’s degree in a technical or quantitative field (GPA: 3.0+) or equivalent combination of experience and education.•    Excellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication and presentation skills. Leadership positions, public-speaking experience preferred.•    Programming knowledge & experience.•    SQL knowledge required.•    Independent problem solver, proactive, able to multitask.•    Patience for working on large scale problems.•    Basic proficiency with MS Office assumed (including Excel, Access, Word, PowerPoint, and Visio).•    Preferred experience:o    Medicare or Commercial Risk Adjustment Experience.o    SAS programming knowledge preferred.o    VBA programming knowledge preferred.o    Finance experience, including revenue and expense accounting.o    Healthcare Enrollment and Claims processing experience.o    Other healthcare experience, especially technical experience. . Blue Shield of California is committed to remaining a drug-free work place. All positions require a pre-employment background investigation and drug screen. Blue Shield of California is an Equal Opportunity Employer - EEO/MF/disabled/veteran. Sourcer #LI-AT1",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-data-analyst-job-el-dorado-hills-ca-us-171861531.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=3,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,e7a18e2e7f1bc5b1a5f0d1bda30d1316
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:14:57:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"City:Savannah State:Georgia Postal/Zip Code:31415 Preferred Materials – Asphalt Division, part of Oldcastle Materials Southeast Division of Companies, is the leader in production of high-quality hot mix and warm mix asphalt, and, with a team of skilled contracting professionals, Preferred Materials – Asphalt Division also offers design-build and conventional-bid-build solutions for roadway and civil construction projects. Headquartered in Tampa, Florida, and with offices throughout Florida and in Savannah, Georgia, and Hardeeville, South Carolina, Preferred Materials – Asphalt Division performs asphalt paving, grading, and related roadway services. Our employees make Preferred Materials – Asphalt Division a great place to work. We promote a strong safety culture, where employees take responsibility for their own safety. We are seeking an experienced Quality Control technician to join ourteam in Kissimmee, FL.The Quality Control Technician performs routine testing of Hot Mix Asphalt and assist in adjustments to plant settings to ensure compliance with job or agency specifications. Essential Duties and Responsibilities but are not limited to the following: Performing daily QC testing on Hot Mix Asphalt as required by governing agencies and at the discretion of the QC Manager. Performs data collection and reporting. Assisting in mix design development and changes in plant production. Performs stockpile analysis on incoming aggregates and RAP stockpiles as needed. EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE: At least six months experience in asphalt quality control Ability to perform strenuous work. Must have some basic materials skills. Good penmanship, record keeping, and basic computer skills. Ability to follow verbal and written instruction. Ability to communicate effectively over the company radio. The job duties described herein are not exhaustive and may be supplemented Minimum Skills and Requirements: • High school diploma or GED Equivalent• At least six months experience in asphalt quality control • Knowledge and ability to perform mathematical skills (adding, subtracting, division, multiplication, percentages and weights).• Ability to read and comprehend technical manuals.• Must be able to read and use measuring devices.• Must be able to work nights and weekends.• Must possess a valid driver’s license for the territory of operation.• FDOT Asphalt Level I&amp;II training preferred. What Oldcastle Offers You Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle’s Southeast Division Companies include: Preferred Materials – Asphalt &amp; Concrete, Conrad Yelvington Distributors and Midsouth Paving &amp; Aggregates. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Follow Oldcastle CareersonFacebook,Twitter,Google+,Pinterest,WordPress (Career Blog)andLinkedIn! Oldcastle Materials, Southeast Division is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer EOE / M / F / Vet / Disability Oldcastle Materials, Southeast Divisions is part of theOldcastlecareers™network.",Quality Control Lab Technician - Savannah,Full Time Employee,"Savannah, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-control-lab-technician-savannah-ga-job-savannah-ga-us-169181997.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=13,,,e30b4c73cf02ae1dbc82778628f4c10d
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:21:35:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative Assistant Our client in the Houston, TX Galleria area is seeking an Administrative Assistant to join their team on Temp to Possible Hire basis. Company Profile:Our client is an up-and-coming company in the construction industry.   This is an opportunity to get in on a ground floor opportunity and see the impact your work makes on a daily basis.  As the company grows, so will your knowledge, experience, and opportunity for advancement. Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouse401k eligibility after just 60 days of employmentAdministrative Assistant Role:The Administrative Assistant will have an immediate impact by being the primary contact within the office.  Daily duties would include: • Answering phones and delivering messages appropriately • Data entry into QuickBooks • Internet research projects • Enter client information into CRM software • Answer calls from potential clients, answer general questions, and set up follow-up appointments • Ad hoc projects as requested my manager This is a busy office and the position will begin a bit non-traditionally.  Initially, the Administrative Assistant will be traveling often in the first month or two with the managers to various work sites.  This allows you to learn the business in-depth before settling into a back office role.  Administrative Assistant Background Profile:4+ years of professional office experience preferred High School diploma or equivalent is required Exposure to working with QuickBooksTechnology savvy with ability to learn new software/hardware quicklyBilingual in Spanish is a big plus Please visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/houston-galleria.html or https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/administrative.html Improve your job search reach with www.sumry.me/?afmc=ftl and let potential employers see you beyond just your resume.  It’s a smart way to invest in your search and the hottest trend in making a successful job transition.Frontline Source Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Administrative Assistant  Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-houston-tx-us-172647830.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=9,0.00 - 17.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,d314119e7ec0fbc4d2f33869fae914e3
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:21:13:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Volt is looking for an Accounts Receivable Specialist who has a strong background in collections.Essential FunctionsConsistently deliver a high level of service to achieve and maintain high satisfaction levels and support client retentionRespond to a minimum amount of incoming ACD calls daily and as business needs requireResearch, resolve, and respond to issues and inquiries from clients and brokersAppropriately elevate situations that could have company wide impacts to drive solutions as neededParticipate in client meetings and work with internal business partners to address moderate to complex client issuesPerform collection activities for past due receivables, including collection calls, collection letters, negotiating payment plans and sending accounts to outside collection agenciesProactively monitor fluctuations in client revenue to identify problematic issues and ensure accurate financial reporting for clients, internal reporting and complianceAct as point of contact for incoming calls from external and internal business partners regarding questions about billing and collectionsIn today’s job market, “who you know” matters more than ever – and that’s why you should get to know Volt. We’re one of the world’s largest recruiting companies, yet our success is built one successful placement at a time. Each of our recruiters has niche industry expertise, committed to connecting top talent with respected companies.Through Volt's Military Heroes Program, Volt secures the talents of American's veterans and encourages their dependents and spouses to contact Volt. Volt is a member of the Military Spouse Employment Partnership and is proud to support the Wounded Warrior Project. http://www.voltmilitary.com/site/8417/commitment.html For more opportunities, connect with us online at volt.com/NorCal.Volt is an equal opportunity employer.Two years' experience in a call center for insurance, medical, telecomm, retail or banking, or a Bachelor's degree with customer service experienceOrganization and time management skills to prioritize multiple tasks, and to be available for a high volume of incoming callsExcellent communication and interpersonal skills to effectively communicate with internal and external business partnersDemonstrated ability to identify and resolve complex problems requiring changes in priorities and workflow, or partnering with other unitsMust be detail oriented and accurateSolution-oriented approach to workProficient in a Windows environment with word processing, spreadsheet application and data entryStrong math skillsAbility to type 35 wpmAbility to perform 10-Key by touch (6,000 ksph)Clean credit history as reported by credit reportTestingTypingTen-KeyMathMS Excel",Collections Representative Job in Rancho Cordova,Full Time Employee,"Rancho Cordova, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/collections-representative-job-rancho-cordova-ca-us-171863989.aspx?mescoid=4300696001001&jobPosition=20,,General/Other: Accounting/Finance,006dddbf8765cc8300de4e501ae56928
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:21:20:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is currently seeking a Senior Accounting Associate to maintain the General Ledger for Customs Brokerage as well as exception processing for International freight transactions. The ideal candidate must be a subject matter expert in all areas of financial analysis and accounting procedures.This position is responsible for preparing, auditing and entering journal entries, as well as reconciling balance sheet accounts on a monthly basis.  He/She will also be responsible for preparing and receiving electronic charge memos (Centras), as well as internal customer support, including research of account balances and variance analysis.  The Senior Accounting Associate conducts shipment level research to determine the correct settlement for UPS International freight transactions for revenue recognition and/or accounts receivable adjustments, and ensures compliance with Enterprise Wide Accounting Policies and Procedures (EWAPPM). Preferred Skills Some training/experience in accounting, finance or business Knowledge of accounting, including use of concepts and principles Good working knowledge of computerized spreadsheets and databasesGood communicative, organizational, planning, analytic and problem-solving skills are preferredAccuracy and attention to detailProficiency with various software packages including Outlook, Excel, Access, Word, PowerPoint, and WindowsMINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:Four year undergraduate business degree obtained or working toward a four-year business degree in the area of Finance,Accounting or related field is preferredExcellent analytical, organizational and problem solving skills preferredGood working knowledge of accounting processes and principles preferredIntermediate knowledge level of Access, Excel, Word and PowerPoint preferredUPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Senior Accounting Associate Job in Coppell,,"Coppell, TX 75019",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-senior-accounting-associate-job-coppell-tx-us-171807858.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=8,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,ac3e557d51080e38a36d486aba2fc541
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:21:23:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Lending Compliance Officer who will implement and monitor the internal compliance audit monitoring program for the following departments: Residential Real Estate, Consumer Loan Center, Dealer Loan Center, Loan Services, Loan Documentations, Loan Adjustment and Commercial Hub’s to ensure regulatory reporting and documentation requirements are met. This position will also serve as the primary lead for all credit-related regulatory compliance, consumer, and commercial:This job will have the following responsibilities:Policies and procedures Risk assessments Implement new laws and regulations Monitoring- fair lending, TILA, adverse notices, flood, credit bureau reporting, data integrity, etc. The LCO consults and coordinates with Business Unit Compliance Officers, senior management, and internal audit department personnel regarding new and revised legislations and regulations, and revisions and new additions to policies, procedures and products. This position must maintain working relationship with the Compliance Departments and participate as a member of Bank’s Regulatory Compliance Committee.Qualifications & Requirements:Undergraduate degree desirable.  Mortgage banking courses highly desirable.  Possess strong analytical, communication, interpersonal, organizational and presentation skills.Work experience within the mortgage and consumer lending functions of a financial institution where the incumbent has gained an in-depth working knowledge of the following lending regulations: Equal Credit Opportunity Act (REG B); Truth in Lending Act (REG Z); Home Mortgage Disclosure Act (REG C); Real Estate Settlement Procedure Act (RESPA & REG X); Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA); Flood Insurance Regulation; Fair Lending Act; Fair Housing Act; State Banking lending laws, Fannie Mae/Freddie Mac/FHA/VA guidelines and the loan process from, underwriting through servicing. Incumbent must have a working knowledge of the lending function from product development to implementation. Audit, underwriting and secondary market documentation knowledge is required.",Lending Compliance Officer Job in Fairfield,"Full Time, Employee","Fairfield, CA",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/lending-compliance-officer-job-fairfield-ca-us-171867774.aspx?mescoid=1300073001001&jobPosition=17,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,87f4ded10d36fdae5f685322fe57deda
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:21:40:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce is currently seeking a professional Patient Registration Specialist for a job in Bloomington, Indiana (IN). They are looking for a customer service oriented person that loves people interacting and helping others.Responsibilities Include: Going to patients' hospital rooms in the Emergency Department Gathering demographic and insurance information and checking patients in/out of the hospital Processing related paperwork Interviewing patients, preparing standard registration forms, and performing other admission or transfer related tasks May be expected to perform clerical and secretarial work Call Insurance companies for verification of benefits Print charts, get patients admitted into their roomsREQUIREMENTS: 2+ years of experience preferably in healthcare or patient registration role Ability to work in a stressful environment Ability to stand/walk for long periods of time Excellent communication skills Very professional and personable demeanor Various shifts available, so flexibility to work various shifts is preferred (12-hours, every other weekend, days/nights, etc)Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Patient Registration Specialist Job in Bloomington,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Bloomington, IN 47404",,http://jobview.monster.com/patient-registration-specialist-job-bloomington-in-us-171920752.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),df49f3a135c0fa2d2f295cef6edb6c61
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:21:46:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you a detail oriented, critical thinker who enjoys working with numbers?  If so, this may be the perfect opportunity for you!Location: Onalaska, WIPurpose & Summary: The Accounts Payable Specialist is responsible for all of the accounts payable functions including the processing and monitoring of payments and expenditures.  Day to day responsibilities may include:•Preparing and entering invoices and load settlements utilizing accounts payable system•Reviewing invoices and ensuring proper documentation and approvals•Responding to vendor inquiries•Reconciling vendor statements•Assisting with month end financial closing•Maintaining and updating vendor filesRequirements: Associate’s degree in accounting or related field plus at least one year of experience in accounts payable or related role required.  Knowledge:•General knowledge of accounts payable and general ledger systems•Microsoft Office Suite•Basic accounting principlesSkills:•Strong problem solving skills•Documentation skills•Research and resolution skills•Data analysis skillsAbilities:•Ability to multi task•Ability to maintain a high level of accuracy in preparing and entering financial information•Ability to maintain confidentiality concerning financial information•Ability to work independently and as a teamPreferred Qualifications: Thorough knowledge of accounts payable/general ledger accounting systems and procedure.  Understanding of financial chart of accounts and corporate accounting procedures.  Dynamic Recycling is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled.All interested applicants must apply online at www.dynamicrecycling.com/careers to be considered for this opportunity.",Accounts Payable Specialist Job in Onalaska,Full Time Employee,"Are you a detail oriented, critical thinker who enjoys working with numbers?  If so, this may be the perfect opportunity for you!Location: Onalaska, WIPurpose & Summary: The Accounts Payable Specialist is responsible for all of the accounts payable functions including the processing and monitoring of payments and expenditures.  Day to day responsibilities may include:•Preparing and entering invoices and load settlements utilizing accounts payable system•Reviewing invoices and ensuring proper documentation and approvals•Responding to vendor inquiries•Reconciling vendor statements•Assisting with month end financial closing•Maintaining and updating vendor filesRequirements: Associate’s degree in accounting or related field plus at least one year of experience in accounts payable or related role required.  Knowledge:•General knowledge of accounts payable and general ledger systems•Microsoft Office Suite•Basic accounting principlesSkills:•Strong problem solving skills•Documentation skills•Research and resolution skills•Data analysis skillsAbilities:•Ability to multi task•Ability to maintain a high level of accuracy in preparing and entering financial information•Ability to maintain confidentiality concerning financial information•Ability to work independently and as a teamPreferred Qualifications: Thorough knowledge of accounts payable/general ledger accounting systems and procedure.  Understanding of financial chart of accounts and corporate accounting procedures.  Dynamic Recycling is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled.All interested applicants must apply online at www.dynamicrecycling.com/careers to be considered for this opportunity.",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-specialist-job-onalaska-wi-us-170268639.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=1,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,cf160e8c5e6bab017770c0c2351cf051
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:05:48:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"91L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job ID: 788047 Job Views: 97 Location: GRAYLING, Michigan, United States ZIP Code: 49739 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionTrucks. Bulldozers. Power shovels. These are the types of machinery that you will work on as a Construction Vehicle Repairer in the Army National Guard. In doing so, you will join the Army National Guard on the road to success.As a Construction Vehicle Repairer you will maintain and replace brake actuators, batteries, starter motors, alternators, mechanical fuel pumps, and hydraulic cylinders; adjust engine speed governor/valves, carburetors, dry-disc clutches, steering brakes, and fuel injector racks; charge suspension accumulators, transmission shift accumulators and main hydraulic accumulators; troubleshoot problems in vehicle engines, electrical systems, steering, brakes, and suspensions; tune up and repair engines; replace or repair damaged body parts, hydraulic arms, shovels, and grader blades; and establish and follow maintenance schedules.Your Army National Guard training will prepare you for all maintenance, troubleshooting, repairing, tuning, and other duties necessary to keep the Guard's construction vehicles running at peak performance. It will also set you up for a rewarding civilian career with auto and construction equipment dealers and farm equipment companies.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Construction Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight to 29 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job in Grayling,Full Time Employee,"91L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job ID: 788047 Job Views: 97 Location: GRAYLING, Michigan, United States ZIP Code: 49739 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionTrucks. Bulldozers. Power shovels. These are the types of machinery that you will work on as a Construction Vehicle Repairer in the Army National Guard. In doing so, you will join the Army National Guard on the road to success.As a Construction Vehicle Repairer you will maintain and replace brake actuators, batteries, starter motors, alternators, mechanical fuel pumps, and hydraulic cylinders; adjust engine speed governor/valves, carburetors, dry-disc clutches, steering brakes, and fuel injector racks; charge suspension accumulators, transmission shift accumulators and main hydraulic accumulators; troubleshoot problems in vehicle engines, electrical systems, steering, brakes, and suspensions; tune up and repair engines; replace or repair damaged body parts, hydraulic arms, shovels, and grader blades; and establish and follow maintenance schedules.Your Army National Guard training will prepare you for all maintenance, troubleshooting, repairing, tuning, and other duties necessary to keep the Guard's construction vehicles running at peak performance. It will also set you up for a rewarding civilian career with auto and construction equipment dealers and farm equipment companies.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Construction Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight to 29 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/91l-construction-vehicle-repairer-job-grayling-mi-us-175402616.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=11,,Entry Level,d4e024b4943506eed738cd7f1e4cec30
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:05:49:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Enrollment Agent I (EA I) supports Enrollment Solutions Operations through participation in commercial, state, and/or federal programs. The employee performs electronic fingerprinting functions according to the commercial, state, or federal customer's program requirements. This position is a trainee role and the incumbent will be introduced to various processes, taught how to operate various fingerprinting machinery, and trained to navigate through specialized computer software databases. Essential Job Functions (includes but is not limited to): Provide superior customer service to internal and external customersPerform basic maintenance and troubleshoot issues with fingerprinting equipment, including computer hardware and softwareObtain successful customer fingerprint images and capture biometric information to meet or exceed program standardsVerify customer identity and scan required documents into database systemSuccessfully complete required biometric and data capture processes and paperwork on each customerAdhere to all company and departmental employment policies regarding security and confidentialityPerform administrative duties such as time keeping, shift schedules, daily activity reports, card inventory, equipment inventory, and requisitioning supplies Note: In addition to the Essential Functions, also performs similar work-related duties as assigned.Required Skills: Customer and Personal Service - Knowledge of principals and processes for providing customer and personal services, including customer needs assessment, meeting quality standards for services, and evaluation of customer satisfactionTechnology - Knowledge of electronic equipment, computer hardware, and computer software, including applications and data entryClerical - Knowledge of administrative and clerical duties, such as word processing, managing files and records, stenography and transcription, designing forms, and other office proceduresMonitoring - Monitoring/Assessing performance of self, other individuals, and/or outside organizations to make improvements or take corrective actionIntegrity - Job requires ethics and honesty Required Experience: High school diploma or equivalent degreeMinimum one (1) year applicable experienceProficiency in Microsoft Office Suite is requiredPrevious experience processing credentials preferredSome weekend work may be requiredMust be at least eighteen (18) years oldMust be a US Citizen Travel Requirement, Working Conditions and Physical Demands: Travel requirement, such as:Ability to travel locally for activities such as meetings, classes, and workshops.Occasional overnight travel as required; should not exceed 25% of the time Working Conditions, such as:General office environment. The work area is adequately lighted, heated, and ventilated. Physical Demands, such as:Office environment where the employee may sit comfortably to do the work. Some walking, standing, bending, reaching, and carrying of light items such as papers, books, small parts; driving an automobile, etc. Requires eye-hand coordination and manual dexterity sufficient to operate a keyboard, photocopier, telephone, and other office equipment.The work requires light physical effort with frequent lifting and/or moving of materials in the 10-30 pound range and occasional lifting up to 50 pounds. Requires manual dexterity and ability to manipulate small objects. May require normal range of hearing and vision to operate machinery. Must be a US Citizen, without dual CitizenshipsMorphoTrust is an equal opportunity employer.We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex,sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics",Enrollment Agent I* (-) Job in Chicago,"Full Time, Employee","Chicago, IL","Computer Software, Computer/IT Services",http://jobview.monster.com/enrollment-agent-i-2652-758-job-chicago-il-us-168407897.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=12,,Customer Support/Client Care,45e71e32296183e749789f84b6d4c856
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:06:48:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:   Maintains friendly, efficient, positive customer service attitude toward customers, clients and co-workers.  Is responsive to customer needs. Maintain all assigned ancillary areas and department areas in a clean neat and sanitary manner. Maintains all assigned ancillary areas, department areas, and corridors with the correct preventative maintenance procedures as outlined in department policy as requested. Assists in enhancing productivity and efficient operations of the department. Promotes effective interpersonal and interdisciplinary relationships, maintaining professional conduct at all times. Demonstrates commitment to professional growth and competence by adherence to component and departmental annual training commitments. Inspects and utilizes judgment in determining which cleaning techniques outlined in orientation guidelines to follow. Demonstrated efficient and safe use of housekeeping equipment and solutions as observed by supervisor. May disinfect and sterilize equipment and supplies, using germicides and sterilizing equipment. Maintains a clean and orderly environment in the assigned area to protect safety and health of others. Diligently employs universal precautions when disposing of trash and bio-hazardous materials. Thoroughly mops and vacuums floors in accordance with established guidelines. Keeps cart properly stocked with equipment and cleaning supplies; ensures all chemicals are properly labeled, and all equipment is in good working condition. Performs other tasks, as needed, to maintain the assigned area in a clean and orderly fashion. Keeps utility and storage rooms in clean and orderly condition. Cleans rooms, hallways, lobbies, lounges, rest rooms, corridors, elevators, stairways, and other areas. Performs all other related duties.   Qualifications Ability to communicate effectively with clients, senior management, and Aramark support staff. Ability to respond effectively to changing demands.",Custodial Service Worker - Aiken Regional Medical Center - EVS Job in Aiken,"Full Time, Employee","Aiken, SC 29802",,http://jobview.monster.com/custodial-service-worker-aiken-regional-medical-center-evs-job-aiken-sc-us-168614923.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=19,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,9fdcb34d5794fceaec9e35aec444a38b
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:06:48:52,No,jobs.monster.com,A Growing Food Manufacturing company is in search of a Quality Specialist for their facility in New Jersey. The qualified candidate will conduct QA Product checks and complete documentation ensuring product match specifications.  Will assist QA to investigate food safety and quality issues. Will report issues and non-conformances and provide investigation results to Management.This position reports to the SQF Practitioner. Requirements for the role:*1-2 years of QA experience in food manufacturing (frozen) or related fields is preferred.  *Good verbal and written communication skills• Team player • Good work ethics • Basic computer skills. *Bilingual in English/Spanish is helpful. • Training in HACCP (Hazard Analysis & Critical Control Points) • SQF training/or willing to learn.  UI495732,Quality Specialist Job in Edison,"Full Time, Employee","Edison, NJ 08817",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-specialist-job-edison-nj-us-168758934.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=17,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,7f1f8b831d2dba65f37d41343b946e4f
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:07:18:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionNEW LOCAL CDL-A CAREER OPPORTUNITIES in HILLSBORO, FL• Competitive Pay + Benefits & Home Daily• Sunday thru Thursday - Multiple Shifts Available• NO Touch Freight - Shuttle Runs• Double & Triple Endorsements With Previous Experience Required• Steady Work - Good EquipmentAPPLY NOW or CALL 813-514-0883 FOR MORE INFORMATIONTransForce Drivers are Respected Professionals. Join the TransForce Team …Thousands of TransForce Drivers - 53 Branch Offices - 24 Years of Service!• We have an excellent reputation with our drivers and our customers.• TransForce shows genuine concern for your career objectives.• Safety is our priority. We comply with DOT and FMCSA.BENEFITS:• Competitive Weekly Pay - Direct Deposit or Debit Card• Medical - Dental - Vision Insurance• Life & Disability Insurance• Paid Time Off• 401KREQUIREMENTS:• 1 year of recent tractor trailer driving experience• No more than 3 moving violations in the previous 3 years• Not cited for a D.O.T. defined accident in the previous 3 years• No serious offenses in the previous 7 years or pattern of unsafe practicesTruck Driver - CDL Driver (Transportation)As a CDL Truck Driver you will be responsible for the safe operation of a commercial vehicle and the reliable delivery of our clients… products.TransForce, Inc. is seeking full time and part time local and regional CDL Truck Drivers at our 53 branch offices located throughout the U.S. We are the nation…s leading transportation staffing company and our drivers are respected professionals; safe, reliable, and profitable. Join TransForce and see why our 3,500 drivers are proud to be on the TransForce team. We offer steady pay, benefits, and good equipment. In addition you…ll enjoy assignment flexibility that you won…t find anywhere else. With TransForce you have the unique ability to consider a change in assignment rather than a change in employment if situations change.Keywords: tractor trailer driver, commercial driver, Class B cdl driver, professional driver CDL-A Driver, CDL A Truck Driver, Class A CDL Driver, Class A CDL Truck Driver, CDL Truck Driver, CDL Commercial Truck Driver.*cb*",TRUCK DRIVER - Local CDL A Driver (Transportation) Job in Hillsboro,Full Time Employee,"Hillsboro, FL",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-local-cdl-a-driver-transportation-job-hillsboro-fl-us-168171289.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=2,,Logistics/Transportation,ee838505239410917c9d61105a4d3857
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:07:50:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS Freight Truckload is hiring individuals to work as Full-time Dedicated Dry Van OTR Drivers. This position involves the driving of a tractor-trailer for the over-the-road delivery of freight to two or more locations. Dedicated drivers are primarily assigned to run freight for one customer, and may be assigned to an operation based at a specific customer location. These drivers are normally on the road from three to five days at a time. The term “dedicated” refers to the customer, not a particular lane or destination. Dedicated Drivers must pass a DOT physical and successfully pass a UPS Freight road test. Qualified applicants must have a valid Class A Commercial Drivers’ License.Dedicated Drivers are expected to comply with all appearance standards. Applicants must be at least 21 years of age. Applicants must be able to read, write and speak the English language. Applicants must also meet the Department of Transportation (DOT) and Company mental and physical requirements; and must be physically and mentally able to safely perform the essential job functions without obvious risk of injury to the employee or co-workers. Applicants must receive satisfactory results from a background check, as conducted in accordance with applicable laws; and must pass a drug screening.This job posting includes information about the minimum qualifications (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines), locations, shifts, and operations within the locations which may consider my application.  An applicant or employee may request an exception or change to, or an accommodation of, any condition of employment (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines) because of a sincerely held religious belief or practice.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS OTR CDL A Tractor-Trailer Truckload Driver Dedicated Job in Alexander City,,"Alexander City, AL 35010",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-otr-cdl-a-tractor-trailer-truckload-driver-dedicated-job-alexander-city-al-us-167600467.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=20,,Logistics/Transportation,6c0768da55b7ab770cb9df080129b516
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:07:51:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a leading legal publisher, seeks a patent attorney to write and edit patent prosecution resources in connection with a legal research product. This is a contract position expected to last for at least three months, with 20-40 hours per week. Work will be done remotely from any location. Attorneys must have at least six years’ experience practicing before the US Patent and Trademark Office (USPTO), with expertise in global patent acquisition, maintenance and portfolio management. Attorneys must have drafted, filed and prosecuted at least 35 original patent applications. Please send your resume to ebienenfeld@yorkson.com. ",Attorney - Patent Prosecution Job in New York,"Full Time, Employee","New York, NY",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/attorney-patent-prosecution-job-new-york-ny-us-167854232.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=8,,Legal,536d68f5554aac3135bd1934a52abe01
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:07:52:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Prospects for new customers via phone, interactively and in-person within relevant industries to present and close on commercial pest control services and products. Creates new business at the local and regional levels, and follows up with customers after the sale to ensure satisfaction, increase existing business and obtain referrals. Collaborates with internal departments to deliver solutions and provide quality service to new and existing customers. Responsibilities 1. Prospects for new customers via phone interactively through tip groups, networking, cross-selling and referrals, and by canvassing for large potential customers in industries such as food grade, food processing, distribution/logistics, healthcare, manufacturing, and companies with multiple physical locations. 2. Presents commercial pest control services and products to potential customers through in-person presentations and electronic communications. 3. Creates new business at the local and regional and national levels through creative calls, leads, prospecting, networking, cross-selling and referrals. 4. Follows up with customers after the sale to ensure satisfaction of service and products and to obtain referrals for new business. 5. Collaborates with the National Accounts department to deliver solutions to multi-unit locations assigned as contract leads. 6. Works with Branch Managers, Sales Managers, Service Managers, Region Managers and service professionals to ensure quality service delivery to new and existing customers; assists in resolving customer issues. Education and Experience Requirements • High School Diploma or GED equivalent • Associate’s or Bachelor’s degree preferred, or equivalent combination of education and experience • Two or more years experience in business-to-business (B2B) sales; proven sales history with increasing sales amounts year after year Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Demonstrated knowledge of selling techniques (prospecting, overcoming objections, presentation skills, gaining commitment, negotiation) • Skill in taking independent action and being a self-starter • Skill in written and verbal communication • Ability to build customer relationships and provide appropriate levels of customer service • Business acumen and the ability to calculate numbers and amounts • Skill with Microsoft Office software applications (Word, Outlook, Excel, PowerPoint) • Skill in adapting to new company software and using the internet to research target industries and specific businesses • Ability to travel locally on an extensive basis Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Business Development Rep / BB Sales / Outside Sales Job in South San Francisco,"Full Time, Employee","South San Francisco, CA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-development-rep-b2b-sales-outside-sales-job-south-san-francisco-ca-us-168141649.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=7,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,07b7f4540ef9256128ab90e9b3e76305
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:08:47:54,No,jobs.monster.com,Job Description:Looking for a Recruiter for Permanent Hire. Located in Mesa$ DOE $19.00 to $22.00 an hourLooking for High Volume Recruiter for Higher management positions. This position is a direct hire and you would need to have high volume recruiting experience.Please apply with resume if you are interested We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1043045 Job Experience:Must be able to pass background and drug testYears of Experience Required:,Human Resource Job in Mesa,Full Time Employee,"Mesa, AZ 85202",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resource-job-mesa-az-us-168142688.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d78af89dd4e50ff215eda1e6f64adb34
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:08:59:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink is the third largest telecommunications company in the United States and is recognized as a leader in the network services market by technology industry analyst firms. The company is a global leader in cloud infrastructure and hosted IT solutions for enterprise customers. CenturyLink provides data, voice and managed services in local, national and select international markets through its high-quality advanced fiber-optic network and multiple data centers for businesses and consumers. CenturyLink is an S&P 500 company and is included among the Fortune 500 list of America’s largest corporations.　We are looking for a Senior Level Full-Stack Java Developer to join a growing, dynamic Software Engineering Team. The right person will have experience developing software by following various development methodologies and the ability to bring and apply the best of breed practices to the projects.　Job Responsibilities:Provide technical direction in the creation, delivery and integration of complex software solutions.Analyze, Architect, Design and Develop Software applications.Work with Business Partners, Architects and Business Analysts to define a solution that achieves the technical and business objectives of the project.Partner with other application teams to ensure optimal design and execution.Guide the project team to ensure they understand their deliverables and devise a plan for delivering them.Provide hands-on development of deliverables.Provide insight into the support and maintenance requirements for the solution.Ensure that the project team is following the company’s software development process.Be flexible to lead and work with diverse onshore and offshore teams.　Minimum Qualifications:Minimum 7 years experience in Software Development.Experience with Java, JEE, EJB, JMS, JSP, HTML, Struts, AJAX, Hibernate, XML, XSLT, XSD, PL/SQL, shell scripting, Web Services.Familiarity with emerging technologies like – AngularJS, JQuery, RESTful servicesKnowledge of Eclipse, SQL Plus, TOAD, SQL Loader, JBOSS, Weblogic, Apache, Oracle Preferred Qualifications:Experience and background in developing applications in the Telecommunications environment and strong understanding of Enterprise Products and ServicesStrong fundamentals with the ability to understand industry directions towards convergence and how it applies to application development.　Job Req 602 DICE4  Alternate Location: Monroe, LA (Louisiana)Company StatementCenturyLink is an industry-leading provider of communications, high speed Internet and entertainment services from coast to coast.  Our combination of business and residential service solutions – including home and wireless voice solutions and digital television – provide innovative solutions to our customers.  CenturyLink is proud to be a participant in the U.S. General Services Administration Networx program, the largest communications services contract in the world.  CenturyLink offers you the opportunity to develop and cultivate your career as we lead the communications industry into the future.Disclaimer:The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Sr Full Stack Developer Job in Monroe,Full Time Employee,"Monroe, LA 71203",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-full-stack-developer-job-monroe-la-us-168161784.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=5,,,0dc52edf0f809919cef8a632e6099fc4
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:09:00:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"BlueStream is currently hiring a Senior Site Acquisition Specialist to join our team in the Bay Area! BlueStream strives to attract and retain top-caliber and future-focused employees who demonstrate the commitment and performance necessary to achieve results for today’s competitive marketplace. We are committed to offering tools and resources that empower and motivate our employees to drive the company’s success. In return, we reward high performance and provide them with numerous professional and personal growth opportunities.   Responsibilities: Existing site lease/file review to determine existing entitlements, candidate identification for new site builds, lease negotiations, identifying zoning and permitting requirements. Obtain landlord consent to access building roof tops in order to perform radio wave testing to see if they could be a possible candidate for new site builds. Accountable for planning, prioritizing and executing a project by working with operations, delivery organizations, construction and external customers. Develop a complete understanding of the scope of work, deliverables, timelines and quality; and effectively execute. Identify site issues and provide solutions or alternatives when issues arise. Manages change, formulates action plans, and mitigates risk to minimize schedule delays and cost.   Qualifications: Must have experience working with landlords in the Bay Area***** Experience in wireless/telecom, real estate, leasing, contracts preferred Excellent conflict management skills, excellent analytical & problem solving capability Expert ability using Microsoft Office products and database systems Good communications skills – written and oral Detail oriented and highly organized",Senior Site Acquisition Specialist Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA 94102",Telecommunications ServicesReal Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-site-acquisition-specialist-job-san-francisco-ca-us-168176455.aspx?mescoid=1300105001001&jobPosition=18,,Project/Program Management,ee01ac855a1df5293d816733abb0781c
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:09:27:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:  The Sales & Product Specialist (SPS) is responsible for assisting the Store Manager, ASM 1 – Sales Supervisor and ASM 2 – Sales Support Lead in the daily operations and maintenance of the store warehouse and the retail sales floor. This role involves extensive heavy lifting and routine movement of product. Individuals in this role are focused on supporting the store warehousing, operating and selling processes, customer service and helping the store achieve or exceed sales and profit goals on a daily, monthly and annual basis. A key accountability is insuring overall customer satisfaction throughout the sales and product delivery processes. Job Title:                                              SPS – Sales & Product Specialist Department:                                         Store Operations                       Reports To:                                          Store Manager              Job Status:                                           Non-Exempt (Hourly)                 Budget Managed ($):                            None     Position Qualifications: High school diploma, GED equivalency, or work experience sufficient to demonstrate high school level retail math and English skills Three to six months of related sales/retail/customer service experience; hardwood flooring knowledge a plus Previous warehouse or stockroom experience preferred Experience with Point of Sale (POS) systems, preferred Outstanding telephone skills Ability to drive/operate a forklift required (forklift certification required prior to operating equipment) Constant (more than 50% of the time) standing, walking, and hand/finger dexterity; lifting & carrying up to 80 lbs.; pushing & pulling up to 80 lbs. Frequent (between 33% -50% of the time) reaching, squatting, kneeling, bending, and twisting Occasional (up to 33% of the time) sitting, using ladder to climb Vision (Near, Distance, Color, Peripheral, Depth Perception) General Work Schedule:           This position will generally work a standard full time or part time workweek including evenings, frequent weekends (Saturday and Sunday), holidays and overtime as scheduled based on business and customer needs. Regular and predictable attendance is an essential function of this position. Work Environment: Sales & Product Specialists generally work in a warehouse and retail sales environment that involves the use of office equipment, such as computers and telephones, machinery/mechanical equipment, ladders and heavy equipment (forklift). Routine exposure to frequent and heavy lifting, moderate noise, outdoor elements (heat and cold) and airborne particles. Little to no travel required.  No direct or indirect reports.   The Company has reviewed this position summary to ensure that a description of the basic expectations, required qualifications and physical requirements have been included. It is intended to provide guidelines for job expectations and the employee's ability to perform the position described. It is not intended to be construed as the job description which provides a complete list of essential functions, responsibilities, skills and abilities. Additional functions and requirements may be assigned by supervisors as deemed appropriate. This document does not represent a contract of employment, and does not change the “at-will” relationship.  Lumber Liquidators reserves the right to change this position summary, the job description and/or assign tasks for the employee to perform, as the Company may deem appropriate.  Contact the Human Resources department (HR) with any questions. See job description.Additional Information:",Sales & Product Specialist - Burlingame,Full Time Employee,"Burlingame, CA 94010",Construction - Industrial Facilities and InfrastructureRetailConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-product-specialist-burlingame-california-ca-job-burlingame-ca-us-167474999.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=15,,Entry Level,a195ebc3906632c95f68e988176e4d80
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:09:34:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are seeking a top tier candidate for the Entertainment Contracts Coordinator role. This position will manage the Entertainment contract work-flow, review with Legal, and manage the process with the goal of improving contract administration and compliance through a standardized process. The position will assist with daily administration of contracts including but not limited to, coordinating negotiations of agreements with business owners, contract setup and closeout, contract modifications and maintenance of contract files. The ideal candidate will be process oriented, a team player and have great attention to detail. Responsibilities·       Liaison between Legal and Entertainment in coordinating Contracts.·       Train Entertainment Team on the legal process.·       Assist with the daily administration of contracts including but not limited to, contract set-up and close out, contract modifications and maintenance of contract files.·       Coordinate the contract implementation process, coordination fees and payments per contractual requirements.·       Interpret contracts and process correspondence with contracting parties.·       Edit, format, proofread and finalize contracts (Must know how to utilize Microsoft Word).·       Perform comparisons of documents.·       Proofread and finalize other compliance or legal documents.·       Draft routine documents, contracts, contract amendments, memoranda, correspondence, reports and standardized templates.·       Create informational summaries of contracts.·       Complete projects in accordance to deadlines without constant supervision.Requirements:Requirements·       Undergraduate degree from an accredited institution.·       Strong computer skills (including Microsoft Office software). Microsoft Word is a must. Must be able to redline documents.·       Extremely strong administrative and organizational skills.·       Strong oral and written communication skills.·       Basic knowledge of contract types, content licensing terms and legal requirements.·       Preferred previous experience in Contracts Administration in a Marketing or Legal Department.",Administrative Assistant Job in San Mateo,"Full Time, Employee","San Mateo, CA",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-san-mateo-ca-us-168187713.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=15,,Administrative/Clerical,5de2efbca22cdb38f10ce156f00e6507
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:09:47:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Austin, Texas (TX) that is seeking a Field Service Technician.Responsibilities: Maintains, analyzes, troubleshoots, and repairs computer systems, hardware and computer peripherals Documents, maintains, upgrades or replaces hardware and software systems Supports and maintains user account information including rights, security and systems groups Trains employees; identifies, analyzes, and repairs product failures; orders and replaces parts as needed Determines and recommends which products or services best fit the customers' needs Relies on instructions and pre-established guidelines to perform the functions of the job Works under immediate supervision Primary job functions do not typically require exercising independent judgment Typically reports to a project leader or managerREQUIREMENTS: May require an Associate's degree or its equivalent and entry level - 3 years of experience in the field or in a related area Has knowledge of commonly-used concepts, practices, and procedures within a particular field",Field Service Technician Job in Austin,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Austin, TX 73301",,http://jobview.monster.com/field-service-technician-job-austin-tx-us-168137387.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2f7ccc72b1d112850b59e632ce569e95
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:09:47:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:-Client is seeking an Application Engineer III.Summary: -Material Design Engineering is group of highly design-aware engineers, working closely with designers, to produce the infrastructure needed to build the user interfaces and experiences of the future.-We're reinventing how the client's manages icons, logos, and assets - with a goal of treating these important visuals in our products with the same diligence we treat code.-We need singular canonical assets, version control, and best-practices across the whole company for how we deliver these assets.-For this role, we're looking for an engineer passionate about good product design, who wants to build the tools and infrastructure to make it easier for UX and engineering to produce these designs Responsibilities: -Building scripts, tools, BUILD rules, prototype apps, and more that help product teams produce logos, icon fonts, and animated assets. -Manipulate, generate and publish designs to a central repository. Manage requests from teams across the company. Qualifications: -3-5 years' experience as a software engineer -1-2 years of working experience of Python, JavaScript/HTML/CSS; -Familiarity working with UI teams -Familiarity with Adobe Illustrator and Photoshop -Familiarity with Android and iOS Development",Application Engineer III Job in San Francisco,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","San Francisco, CA",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/application-engineer-iii-job-san-francisco-ca-us-168118624.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=5,,IT/Software Development,0ff457bd6fd929735fb822e43642ae5b
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:10:49:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Skilled Assistant Engineer Job Label:BGF02-632   San Francisco's premier provider of ferry and water excursions is looking for a Skilled Assistant Engineer.This is your opportunity to play an important role for San Francisco's premier provider of ferry and water excursions on San Francisco Bay.  As a Skilled Assistant Engineer, you will be part of an expert team of skilled union engineers who perform ongoing vessel and facility repairs for Blue & Gold Fleet using your working knowledge of diesel engines, pumps, hydraulics, pneumatic systems, marine sanitary devices and propulsion systems – prop and water jet. Specific Duties: Perform assigned vessel and facility repairs, including but not limited to: diesel engines, reduction gears, electrical, hydraulic, sanitary and pneumatic systems and deck related repairs. Ensure vessels are in USCG compliance at all times. Troubleshoot machinery and equipment failures and perform hands on repairs. Recommend repairs based on trouble-shooting abilities. Perform preventive maintenance on all vessels and maintain records. Preventative maintenance of shop vehicles.This is a union position. Blue & Gold Fleet is the premier provider of ferry and water excursion services on San Francisco Bay, offering the famous one-hour Bay Cruise Adventure, 90-minute Escape from the Rock Cruise and RocketBoat, the ultimate high-speed thrill ride along the city’s waterfront. The company provides regular ferry service to Sausalito, Tiburon, Angel Island, Vallejo, Alameda/Oakland, Harbor Bay and AT&T Park on game days, as well as motor coach tours to some of Northern California’s picturesque sites. Blue & Gold Fleet carries approximately 2.75 million passengers annually and operates a fleet of 19 vessels. To apply for this position or refer someone you know, please use our online interview system managed by Accolo. Apply for this job Once you have completed the online interview, your information will be forwarded to the hiring authority for decisions on next steps. Related Keywords: Maintenance Mechanic, Vessel Engineer, Vessel Mechanic",Skilled Assistant Engineer Job in San Francisco,Full Time,"San Francisco, CA 94133","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/skilled-assistant-engineer-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167405780.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d08e89f278bdf7564a2ac9853afcfc43
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:10:50:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"What makes SFHP different? Our people do. Every day, we are doing things to transform our city and the lives of over 130,000 people in the city! There hasn't been a more exciting time than now to join SFHP as we continue to grow and become a model for healthcare reform in the state and nation. Apply today for a tremendous career growth opportunity at SFHP!For more information visit us at www.sfhp.org THE EXCITING CHALLENGEYou are looking for a managed care office environment position and you are ready to make an impact on patient care.  San Francisco Health Plan is seeking a California Registered Nurse for its Inpatient Utilization Management team.  You must be a California Registered Nurse who is passionate about making a difference in the lives of individual members and improving our system of healthcare in San Francisco.  You should be a skilled team player, detail oriented, innovative and committed to the belief that managing care and utilization can be a tool to improve quality and promote sustainability of our safety net.  This is an onsite position located at our office in downtown San Francisco with the possibility of working onsite at a hospital in San Francisco. Schedule is standard office hours of:  8:30am to 5:30pm Monday-Friday.Schedule also includes occasional rotating weekends and holidays (these are remote, from home).ESSENTIAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIESAble to collect patient information and utilize clinical assessment skills to make decisions regarding medical necessity of services.Able to determine which cases should be referred to the Medical Director for evaluation.Able to apply clinical criteria and guidelines to ensure appropriate administration of benefits and optimum medical outcomes based on the use of relevant SFHP policies, InterQual criteria and Medicaid/Medicare guidelines. Works closely with hospital case managers to repatriate members back to member’s designated home hospital.Works closely with hospital staff to ensure appropriate discharge planning for our members at hospitals and skilled nursing facilitiesCollaboration with Medical Directors  to ensure quality and cost-effective careMeet departmental review and documentation standards for work assignments including compliance with mandated turnaround times for decisions and provider/member communicationThis position does not directly manage personnel, but requires team work with licensed and non-licensed staffCoordination of care and referrals to services and facilities such as home health, skilled nursing, intermediate care, infusion center, PT/OT, and speech therapyCoordination of  care for members requiring services from community agencies, the department of public health, and Medi-Cal carve-out and waiver programs Collaboration with team members on cross-departmental improvement efforts:  quality improvement projects, optimization of cost management, member satisfaction improvement, and decreasing out of medical group hospital admissions.Other duties as assigned.WHAT YOU WILL BRINGValid unrestricted Registered Nurse license in the state of California.A current California RN license to practice without restriction required.Two to five years of acute clinical experience in a hospital required. Ability to work independently and apply critical thinking skills towards making appropriate decisions.Excellent oral and written communication skills.Ability to work with socially and ethnically diverse populations.Prior experience in case management, resource management or utilization review preferred. Experience with Medi-Cal and or Department of Health Service regulations and standards preferred. Proficiency with PC-based computer systems, ability to learn new information systems and software. Experience with managed care systems or electronic medical record preferred.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS—PHYSICAL POSITION REQUIREMENTS; MACHINES AND/OR EQUIPMENT USEDMust be PC literate; MS Office skills (Word, Excel, PowerPoint).Regularly required to operate standard office equipment (personal computer, photocopy machine, fax machine, etc.)Ability to work on a computer up to 7 hours a day.Regularly required to sit for long periods of time, and occasionally stand and walk.Regularly required to use hands to operate computer and other office equipment.Close vision required for computer usage.Occasionally required to stoop, kneel, climb and lift up to 25 pounds.SFHP provides reasonable accommodation of religious practices that do not pose an undue hardship.WORKING CONDITIONSStandard office environment without unpleasant or hazardous conditions.  Work entails typical physical demands involved in office work.NOTE:  This description is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of duties, responsibilities or requirements for the position.  This position may change or assume additional duties at any time.  The employee may be requested to perform different or additional duties as assigned.WHAT WE OFFERThe chance to work in a vibrant atmosphere with the most amazingly talented people who are shaping the future of healthcare!Competitive & robust salary packageAn industry-leading suite of health care, pension/retirement and lifestyle benefitsVery generous PTO (in addition to 12 paid holidays)A healthy work/life balanceThe opportunity to make a difference in the lives of many in San Francisco!  If this sounds like you, please apply to the Utilization Management Nurse, Inpatient  position directly at www.sfhp.org/careers.&nbsp ;San Francisco Health Plan is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE) M/F/D/V Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",Inpatient Utilization Management Nurse Job in San Francisco,Full Time,"San Francisco, CA 94119",,http://jobview.monster.com/inpatient-utilization-management-nurse-job-san-francisco-ca-us-164949251.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=13,,,a157c0bd3d6887a1f252dc682d0b500e
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:11:27:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are now hiring for Marketing & Advertising Sales Coordinators in the local area. These openings are ENTRY LEVEL, no experience is necessary, we love to train! We have a very successful history developing entry level candidates into high performing market managers. The primary focus of a Marketing & Advertising Sales Coordinator is:Designing and Executing Marketing and Promotional Campaigns for clientsManage Advertising Promotions - Promotions Materials, Public Relations, MerchandizingSales - Client Acquisition through excellent brand consultingOur clients are currently partnered with over 20 different clients-ranging from health and wellness, automotive products and technology! Our daily work environment is fun, fast paced and energetic. Our goal is simple: we want to help our clients exceed their goals by providing world class service, quality and value while providing an avenue to develop vibrant, enthusiastic individuals that are eager to learn and grow with our company.IDEAL CANDIDATES WILL BE TRAINED TO:Learn marketing portfolio of clients quicklySchedule promotions and manage calendarPrepare the necessary marketing materials for campaignsInteract with customers through field marketing activitiesManage client relationshipDUE TO OUR BUSIEST SEASON OF THE YEAR WE ARE LOOKING FOR IMMEDIATE HIRES. ALL OPENINGS ARE ENTRY LEVEL WITH OPPORTUNITY TO ADVANCE TO MANAGEMENT. *All promotions are from within*RequirementsMarketing & Advertising Sales Coordinator - Entry Level Position RequirementsAbility to learn basic sales and marketing skillsDetail orientedFun and outgoing personalityStrong people skillsAbility to work with a team as well as individuallyPerformance drivenExcellent time management skillsCoachableMust be able to provide social security or a work permit - we are currently not offering sponsorshipsIf you have any of the following experiences we would like to hear from you: event sales, business-to-business sales, event promotions, retail, restaurant, fundraising, event marketing and promotions.",Marketing & Advertising Sales Coordinator - Entry Level Job in San Francisco,"Full Time, Employee","San Francisco, CA 94106",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-advertising-sales-coordinator-entry-level-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167251770.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=19,,Marketing/Product,36b85a21baab129a8fc2abb29a648cc8
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:11:48:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Renaissance Learning, the maker of industry leading products like Accelerated Reader, Accelerated Math and STAR Assessment products is looking for a Head of User Experience to lead the company's user interface design team. This role is the creative lead working with a team of enthusiastic, dynamic developers and user experience designers to accelerate the learning process for millions of students and teachers worldwide.If you are passionate about creating simple to use software, have experience managing multiple projects and guiding the implementation of usability techniques throughout the project lifecycle, and are interested in helping to lead a team that is truly influencing K-12 education throughout the nation and around the globe, we want to talk to you!Core Responsibilities: Lead and Manage a group of designers and user researchers working on Agile Scrum teamsEstablish overall company standards for design and design process, serving as the lead creative designer for Renaissance LearningParticipate in the brainstorming of and creation of concepts for best-in-class user experiencesServe as the Designer and UX lead on major strategic projects, playing a key role in designing the software built by responsible teamsTranslate abstract concepts into simple, elegant, and innovative designs expressed in sketches, diagrams, and rapid prototypes for desktop browser, tablet, and mobile devices Design the architecture, navigation, user flows, information and interaction solutions that effectively and directly solve user needs Work in close collaboration with the SVP of Products and General Product Managers to create Renaissance’s style and approach to UX Assist the Renaissance team in adopting and using Lean UX Act as a tireless advocate for the userAbout Us: Renaissance Learning is a leading provider of technology-based school improvement and student assessment programs for K12 schools. Our products help educators make the practice component of their existing curriculum more effective by providing tools to personalize practice and easily manage the daily activities for students of all levels. Whether you are based at our corporate headquarters in beautiful central Wisconsin or at one of our other many locations, you can make a real difference in education. We offer competitive compensation, enviable benefits, and smart, friendly co-workers—all in a relaxed, fun atmosphere where you'll have the opportunity to excel each day.Bachelor’s Degree in Science or ArtsAgile/Scrum development experience7-10 years of experience in designing web sites or web-based software and mobile experiencesStrong, analytical problem solving, decision-making, and leadership skillsIn-depth understanding of user-centered design principles and toolsProven results with creative solutions (portfolio evaluation)Excellent communication, writing, grammar, editing, and proofreading skills",Head of User Experience / Design Competency Manager Job in San Francisco,Full Time,"San Francisco, CA 94103",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/head-of-user-experience-design-competency-manager-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167599106.aspx?mescoid=1100041001001&jobPosition=17,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),93b5b3632139092f3ca598421b6a26a3
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:11:49:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you’re passionate about working with animals – and giving pet parents exceptional service – Petco is the place for you. At Petco, you can take your skills and passion and build a career that you’ll love with a strong, growing leader in the pet care industry. Working at Petco will open up a world of opportunities for you to pursue your professional goals – the kinds of opportunities only possible with a retail leader with over 1,300 stores covering the entire country and Puerto Rico. offers the support and inspiration we need to thrive. That’s the Power of Together.As a Pet Stylist with Petco, you will help pets look and feel their best. We’re looking to you to provide grooming services that enhance the positive union of pet and pet parent. To do so, you will passionately live out the varied duties of your roleAt Petco, we believe it is our duty to nurture the complete health and well-being of animals. We’re here to help pet parents navigate the ups and downs of pet parenthood. We offer more than just supplies and services – we offer ears to listen and shoulders to lean on. Our Petco family is made up of pet lovers who unselfishly put the needs of others before their own. And like all great families, this one offers the support and inspiration we need to thrive. As a Dog Trainer or Dog Trainer Apprentice with Petco, you will play an absolutely vital role in the Petco family. Within your store, you will be the primary resource and leader for Petco’s Positive Dog Training program. You must be committed to and show a genuine interest in enhancing communication and teamwork between dog and pet parent by offering positive solutions and rewarding success while providing a fun and safe environment for dogs, pet parents and store partners As a Pet Stylist you will:Interact professionally and effectively with all professional contacts with emphasis on company interestsProfessionally perform basic grooming services on animals as requested by customersPerform grooming services including brushing, bathing, ear and teeth cleaning, expression of anal glands, & trimming nails, etc.Assist with training grooming assistants, generating and developing the grooming businessAssist in booking grooming appointments, and performing follow-up phone calls and reminders to customersEnsure the safety and well-being of each animal, OSE standards are maintained, and maintain salon cleanliness and safetyUtilize grooming instruments including shears and dryersFollow owner's instructions and/or breed profiles/standards when clipping or trimming an animal’s coatComplete personal daily grooming payroll and commission paperworkMove animals and merchandise up to 30 pounds As a Dog Trainer Apprentice you will: Acting as a subject matter expert for Petco’s Positive Dog Training Program, products, services and in-store promotionsPromoting, conducting and instructing all current dog training curriculaBe a genuine Petco ambassador who exemplifies the Petco culture and values in all communications and interactions. Coaching, encouraging and motivating dogs and pet parentsEffectively deliver formal presentationsAchieve Dog Training goals by offering creative Training solutionsStrong ability to inspire and motivate self and others.Assisting in the loading, unloading and stocking of merchandiseEnsuring that store animals receive the highest quality care and are maintained in clean, safe and secure habitatsPromoting established safety and loss prevention procedures The ideal Pet Stylist candidate will have:A passion for animal welfareKnowledge of the grooming industryCompleted the Petco Pet Stylist Apprentice Program or have a minimum of one year experience grooming/styling pets under the leadership of a professional groomer.A personal skills evaluation by a Petco Pet Stylist, Grooming Salon Manager or General Manager.High school diploma or GEDThe ideal Dog Trainer Apprentice candidate will have: CPDT-KA or Karen Pryor Academy (KPA-CTP) certificationsPrevious experience teaching positive reinforcement dog training techniques in group or class settingsComputer skills with the ability to quickly research information from the InternetThe ability to work during peak traffic periods during week days and weekends Now HiringSloat Petco #308 1591 Sloat BoulevardSan Francisco, CA 94132 $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",SLOAT Petco #-Now Hiring Pet Stylists (groomer) and Dog Trainer Apprentice Job in San Francisco,Full Time,"San Francisco, CA 94132",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/sloat-petco-308-now-hiring-pet-stylists-groomer-dog-trainer-apprentice-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167476210.aspx?mescoid=3900635001001&jobPosition=19,,Entry Level,75bf0eff3269f38275f397be0afee46c
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:12:11:26,No,jobs.monster.com,PT PLANT ENGINEERING SUPERVISORBasic Skills: Efficient data entry skillsKnowledge of Microsoft Office programs Basic mechanical and electrical skillsComfortable using various tools and equipment Good leadership qualities Ability to work without direct supervision UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity,UPS Part Time Plant Engineering Supervisor Job in Oakland,,"Oakland, CA 94621",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-part-time-plant-engineering-supervisor-job-oakland-ca-us-167431378.aspx?mescoid=1100041001001&jobPosition=19,,Logistics/Transportation,582ea996e00fede2736a51209f829d06
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:12:13:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB OVERVIEW:With a role in the Macy's Cosmetics Department, you will have the opportunity to help others look their best every day. You'll make one-on-one connections with customers to learn their sense of beauty and style, develop your artistic side through customer consultation and make-up and product application, and attain a sense of accomplishment when your skills combine with your passion for beauty to reach personal and team sales goals. Previous cosmetics experience is nice to have, but is not required to begin a career in beauty at Macy's. Performs other duties as assigned.The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:- Assist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment by demonstrating proficient use of proprietary devices and applications; proactively create enhanced shopping experiences through the heightened use of tools, technology and collaboration- Partner with Sales Manager and Counter Manager to identify business driving opportunities and stock needs- Develop a repeat-business customer base in order to regularly communicate: upcoming events, new merchandise receipts and product replenishment to increase incremental sales- Participate in pre-selling and sales driving events as well as processing of new receipts, damages, testers, and return to vendors (RTVs)- Attend product training classes and seminars- Regular, dependable attendance & punctualityQUALIFICATIONS:Education /ExperienceHigh school diploma or equivalent. Previous cosmetic or fragrance sales experience a plusCommunication SkillsAbility to read, write, and interpret labels including warnings and ingredient lists on products. Ability to effectively communicate with and present information to customers, vendors, buyers, peers, and all levels of managementMathematical SkillsBasic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to calculate percentages and ratios. Must be able to make change using American Monetary units.Other SkillsSuperior organizational and time management skills. Must be able to build relationships and influence others. Ability to set and achieve goals. Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment. Must possess a strong sense of urgency and a thirst for knowledge. Must be able to lead by example.Work HoursAbility to work a flexible schedule including days, nights, weekends, holidays, and sales events,based on department and store/company needs.This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's, Inc. is an EqualOpportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",Retail Cosmetics Sales - Beauty Advisor Chanel,Part Time Employee,"Corte Madera, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-cosmetics-sales-beauty-advisor-chanel-part-time-corte-madera-ca-macy%E2%80%99s-the-village-at-c-job-corte-madera-ca-us-167812948.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=3,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,be2ae0fbb5362271effb5cad60761a31
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:12:58:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Job Duties for the Administrative Assistant:? Stay on top of ever-changing priorities and projects? Take on big-picture assignments and dive in to the little things to get them done? Follow-through on all action items? Taking notes from crucial meetings ? Manage general scheduling and multiple calendars? Organize and maintain company documents ? Take on new projects and initiatives? Priority focused - switch gears at a moment?s notice? Following-up and following-through on all action items? Correspond / interface closely with our project partners and business contacts? Handle private information with discretion? Maintain high level of confidentiality? Organize and arrange travel as necessary? Has professional phone and email demeanor? Understands basics of using social media platformsQUALIFICATIONS:? 1-2 years of work experience (either jobs or internships) in an office environment ? A Degree is preferred ? Knowledge of basic office programs and data organization We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1043634 Job Experience:,,, ? Energetic and enthusiastic personality? Creative problem solver? Self-starter, self-motivated? Strong work ethic? Superior communication & organizational skillsYears of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA 94104",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-san-francisco-ca-us-168194646.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),dc213eb59f0627f6e0e5c3d6be541467
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:12:59:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Contract Benefits AssociateRandstad Professionals Chicago team specializes in Human Resources, contract and contract to hire staffing and helps over 1000 professionals start and grow their career each year. We have an immediate opportunity for a Contract Benefits Associate that will play a part in Fortune 500 financial services company in the heart of downtown Chicago.Job Duties:As a Contract Benefits Associate you will spend the majority of your day managing all employee benefit transactions. You will partner with each department, and be responsible for all data entry and data analysis via excel. You will continuously strategize with all teams to assist with all benefits questions, changes and benefit terminations.Ideal CandidateThe ideal candidate will have 2-5 years of in employee benefits. They will have proven ability to manage time to meet deadlines and be an expert in Excel.Job RequirementsBachelor's Degree PreferredMinimum of 2 years of direct experience in employee benefitsSalary Range & Benefits $20-28/hr DOEHealth benefitsApplication Process Once we know you're interested, a Randstad Professionals recruiter will review your resume and contact you to better understand your skills and tell you more about the opportunity. We will meet qualified candidates face to face and our best talent interviews with the employer face to face - we will move quickly!Interviewing now! Click Apply to submit your resume today. Not ready to apply but want to learn more, call Kelly Gallagher at 312.263.9300",Contract Benefits Associate Job in Chicago,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Chicago, IL 60602",All,http://jobview.monster.com/contract-benefits-associate-job-chicago-il-us-167638708.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,26.00 - 26.00 $ /hour,Human Resources,1d5766b6e0c1070d65ef6f64549bb114
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:13:47:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:A well known Fortune 500 institution is seeking a Marketing ConsultantMARKETING CONSULTANTPay Rate: $40 per hourContract thru 12/2016Concord, CA Job DescriptionResponsible for consulting, planning, developing and executing marketing and/or sales development programs for a business/channel/region in support of business/product line goals. Responsibilities may include any of the following: product/sales collateral design, development, distribution; regional/channel marketing and sales support including local advertising and brand awareness, sponsorships, promotions and sales campaigns; support for de novo store openings; acquisition/utilization/retention/cross-sell initiatives; tracking, analysis and reporting on trends and program effectiveness/P&L impact, ensuring programs/projects adhere to compliance/privacy regulations and policies. Consults with line managers and recommends solutions to a wide range of difficult problems. May manage vendor relationships. May mentor lower level staff.: 4+ years marketing experience.This position will be responsible for creative validation and approval. The candidate should be familiar with print vendors, Routing for Legal and Compliance approval, and have high attention to detail. It would be preferred if the candidate is familiar with credit card marketing and has experience with the card processor First Data. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1043074 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Marketing Consultant - $ per hour Job in Burlingame,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Burlingame, CA 94010",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-consultant-40-per-hour-job-burlingame-ca-us-168142649.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7d0c3055e7e1299490ac4fe2f6774d5d
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:13:48:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"The AEP Technician is responsible for reworking blades and vanes of gas turbine engines in an overhaul environment:• Receiving training on proper methods for blasting, polishing, coating, brazing, and heat tinting blades and vanes.• Learn to operate and load heat treating furnaces with gas turbine engines and component parts.• Basic knowledge of operating precision tools and equipment to perform accurate dimensions.• Comply with work scopes instructions.• Use basic troubleshooting logic to identify defects in component parts.• Perform basic ERP and MRP transactions.• Read and interpret technical documents. Requirements:• High School Diploma or equivalent• Have no allergic reaction to chemicals or materials used in performing related tasks.• Ability to lift engine components weighing up to approximately 50 pounds.• Demonstrated ability to use precision measuring tools (Micrometers, Indicators, etc.)• Ability to read, write, comprehend and speak English at the 12th grade level or better.• Basic knowledge of Microsoft Word, Excel and Outlook.• Ability to work any shift and overtime as needed.• Ability to pass an FAA required eye exam.• Participation in an FAA Drug & Alcohol Abatement Program.• FAA Airframe & Power Plant License preferred.• Professional attitude with the ability to communicate clearly and effectively at all levels.• Self-motivated, with the ability to work alone or as part of a team.• Understand how to set and meet deadlines.• Previous experience with gas turbine engines and/or component parts. ",AEP Technician Job in Oakland,"Full Time , Temporary/Contract/Project","Oakland, CA 94621",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/aep-technician-job-oakland-ca-us-166423913.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=15,,Other,c761c45b8e808835d0af0e5329c18075
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:14:33:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"A great client of ours in Oakland has an immediate need for a Payroll Specialist. To be successful in this role, the Payroll Specialist will have a background in HR Management. This is a contract to hire opportunity that offers excellent perks, a fast paced work environment, and easy access to transit. Responsibilities include:Manage workflow to ensure all payroll transactions are processed accurately and timelyReconcile payroll prior to transmission and validate confirmed reportsUnderstand proper taxation of employer paid benefitsProcess correct garnishment calculations and complianceExecute eTime time and attendance processing and interface with payroll The requirements of this role are as follows:CPP preferred but not required2-4 years experience processing multi-state payrollWorking knowledge of payroll best practicesStrong knowledge of federal and state regulationsStrong PC skills including proficiency in Excel Should you feel you are the best fit for this role, please ""Apply Now!"" This Payroll Specialist job in Oakland won't be available for long!!!",Payroll Specialist Job in Oakland,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Oakland, CA 94607",,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-specialist-job-in-oakland-ca-job-oakland-ca-us-167470753.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=1,,Human Resources,df98049cc2b7e1f9f6dbbd5958357174
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:14:58:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.KAG West, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Richmond, CA.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and be home daily!Company DriversLocal, home daily positions Competitive pay Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental and Vision plans Paid vacations and holidays 401K with company match Paid training on safe driving and product handling Well-maintained equipment Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with KAG West.We require Class A CDL with 2 years recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank and Hazmat endorsements (or ability to obtain), TWIC - Transportation Worker Identification Credential (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.Call 800-871-4581 for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.",Class A CDL Driver -KAGW Job in Richmond,Full Time Employee,"Richmond, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-kagw-job-richmond-ca-us-167150231.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=11,,Logistics/Transportation,bc6a22fa0ab599f8531c886febe7f85d
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:14:59:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview External: Chevron is one of the world's leading energy companies, with approximately 60,000 employees working in countries around the world. We explore, produce and transport crude oil and natural gas; refine, market and distribute fuels and other energy products; manufacture and sell petrochemical products; generate power; and develop future energy resources, including biofuels and geothermal energy.Chevron is accepting online applications for the position of Research Assistant - Chemical Characterization & Atomic Spectroscopy, located in Richmond, CA through June 6, 2016 at 11:59 p.m. (Eastern Standard Time). Position Details: Overview: This position is with the Chemical Characterization and Atomic Spectroscopy Team (CCAS) in the Petroleum Materials & Characterization Team (PMC) of the Chevron Energy Technology Company. The CCAS Team is responsible for metals and non-metals preparation and analyses of a wide variety of organic and aqueous matrices. Sample preparation techniques include direct dilution, microwave digestion, acid digestion, wet ashing and fusion. A variety of analytical instrumentation is used: ICP AES; Flame & Furnace Atomic Absorption; ICP-MS and hyphenated techniques such as GC-ICP-MS &, LC-ICP-MS.Responsibilities for this position may include but are not limited to:The open position requires working in the Atomic Spectroscopy Laboratory.This is a high volume laboratory which requires fast turnaround time.The successful candidate will prepare samples and perform standard and non-standard analytical measurements using at least one of the following instrumental analyses: Atomic Absorption Spectroscopy, Atomic Emission Spectroscopy, and ICP Mass Spectrometry.Since this position requires working with multiple test methods, reviewing large volumes of data and quality control interpretation, applicants are required to have good planning, organizing and flexibility skills.Effectively communicate orally and in writing with supervisors, peers, facility support people, project customers and suppliers; document all experiments, data and analyses in laboratory notebooks and spreadsheets; write standard operating procedures and technical reports.Exhibit all Chevron Values/Behaviors like integrity, trust, respect for diversity, ingenuity, partnership, protecting People and the Environment and high performance. Have a passion for safety.Required Qualifications:High School Diploma or GED equivalencyMinimum of three years related experienceProficient with Microsoft (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, etc.)Analytical spectroscopy skillsPreferred Qualifications:Associate degree in ChemistryExcellent manual dexterity and eyesight to carry out work on small objects with precision toolsAbility to maintain and repair lab apparatusRelocation Options:Relocation will not be considered within Chevron parameters.International Considerations:Expatriate assignments will not be considered.Chevron regrets that it is unable to sponsor employment Visas or consider individuals on time-limited Visa status for this position.",Research Assistant Job in Richmond,Full Time Employee,"Richmond, CA",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/research-assistant-job-richmond-ca-us-168077196.aspx?mescoid=1900305001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),06bda0476aa903e12ae6782b4fd1fcbc
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:15:24:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are recruiting for Hines Interests; looking to add a Facilities Coordinator to their growing SF team! Your new company Working with an internationally recognized brand currently experiencing phenomenal growth across the U.S. and internationally, the Facility Coordinator will be based at client offices and will oversee the administrative support to facilities operations in San Francisco, CA. The portfolio is high end, versatile commercial office space. Your new role The job duties for the Facilities Coordinator will include, among others, management of external maintenance vendors, upkeep of their FM reporting and planning software, site inspections throughout the offices and coordination of the in house maintenance team. You will be in a client facing role, supported by a Facility Manager. What you'll need to succeed The successful candidate will have experience managing and coordinating large facilities in the past. You will have experience working within a professional, corporate environment. This is a client facing job, and so communication and presentation skills, as well as the ability to prioritize clients requests will be paramount to your success, with a significant focus on customer and client satisfaction. The FM coordinator must hold a high school education or similar. It would be advantageous if you have any client facing/3rd party maintenance experience previously, as would accreditation from IFMA, BOMA or other industry associations. What you'll get in return In return for your efforts, you will receive a leading compensation package which includes a competitive base salary, PTO, 401K, corporate benefits and a host of other work perks. There is also significant opportunity to progress your career within the group and a great opportunity to move into a Facilities Manager role in the future. To be considered for this Facilities Coordinator job in the San Francisco, CA area, please apply on-line today with a word version of your resume. For more information on this job, or others similar, please contact Craig Robinson at Hays Facilities Management on 212 548 4522. Whilst we thank you for your interest, only shortlisted candidates will be contacted. If this job isn't quite right for you but you are looking for a new position, please contact us for a confidential discussion on your career.",Facilities Coordinator Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/facilities-coordinator-job-san-francisco-ca-us-168122922.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=7,"40,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Administrative/Clerical,b6890b31048f763bd7ef70b420da5b6e
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:15:48:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Marina Maintenance Worker Job Label:MAG_154ABF9BD41 From amazing views and a sea of sea lions to chowder bread bowls and California wines, your visit to San Francisco starts at PIER 39.PIER 39, San Francisco's Premier Bay Attraction, is a festival marketplace featuring 110 specialty shops, 14 full-service restaurants and numerous fun-filled attractions. PIER 39 is located in San Francisco's Fisherman's Wharf, at Beach Street and The Embarcadero.PIER 39 is currently seeking a marina maintenance worker to join our marina team. PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITY: Work under the direction of the Marina Supervisor to perform all duties pertinent to the repair and maintenance and safety of all marina facilities and docks according to standard operation procedures and policies as set forth by the Marina Supervisor.SPECIFIC DUTIES:Dock/Marina Maintenance:Provides repair and maintenance and refurbishment of dock fingers and walkways.• Performs routine repairs, maintenance and replacement of dock side mechanical, electrical, and plumbing and pump out systems.• Provides emergency response for immediate dock repairs or maintenance.• Provides on call coverage when required.• Investigates and reports environmental hazard spills in the marina. • Maintains and replace parts for the navigation lights on the break water.Marina Patrol• Operates the marina patrol boat.• Provides emergency pump service to boats taking on water.• Monitors marina for unauthorized boats.• Monitors waterline, electrical and dock lines of the boats.• Tows tenant boats, debris, and deceased sea lions as directed.• Maintain positive and service oriented tenant relations.Buildings and Facilities• Provides repair and maintenance of marina building facilities.• Performs routine repairs, maintenance and replacement of marina building facilities mechanical, electrical, and plumbing.• Provides emergency response for immediate marina building facilities and maintenance.Other• Washes down sea lion floats.• Maintains equipment, tools and vehicles.• Report any safety hazards to supervisor for investigation.• Complete worksheet log daily.• Keep shop clear of hazardous or flammable items.• Wear appropriate safety equipment for specific jobs, for example lifejackets when operating the patrol boat or when on the break wall,• safety goggles when operating power tools.• Drives the company truck and electrical vehicle for marina related duty. Eg supply runs, and garbage pick up. • Performs special duties as assigned.• Completes building and dock maintenance inspection walkthroughs and supplies supervisor with list of issues requiring maintenance.• Performs tenant wellbeing checks as directed by supervisor.• Writes purchase orders when required by supervisor.Activities include; balancing, climbing, crawling, crouching, kneeling, grasping, hearing, pushing, lifting, pulling, standing, reaching, repetitive motions, walking, operating equipment, tools and power devices. PIER 39 is a 45-acre waterfront complex that is a gathering place for millions of San Francisco locals and visitors. In addition to its 14 full-service restaurants, 90+ shops and popular attractions, PIER 39 also has a 5-acre waterfront park and a 300-berth marina. PIER 39 is known for its spectacular views of the Golden Gate and Bay Bridges, Alcatraz Island and the San Francisco city skyline. PIER 39 is also home to the world famous California sea lions.  To apply for this position or refer someone you know, please use our online interview system managed by Accolo. Apply for this job Once you have completed the online interview, your information will be forwarded to the hiring authority for decisions on next steps. Related Keywords: Marina, Marina Maintenance Worker, Maintenance, boat patrol, repair and maintenance,dock maintenance inspection, Driver license, marina building facilities",Marina Maintenance Worker Job in San Francisco,Full Time,"San Francisco, CA 94119",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/marina-maintenance-worker-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167472411.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d6f75c4095824da0be3f9dc65c972d69
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:00:02:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently recruiting for an Estimator position within the Commercial and Institutional Construction industry located in the Albany, NY area.  This is a full-time, direct hire position with a well-established, growing firm. Ideal candidates will possess the following:·       Min. of 5yrs exp. Estimator within Commercial and Institutional Construction projects of ranging from $5 million - $15 million required ·       Must have competitive estimating, bidding lump sum and negotiating building projects exp. ·       Must have exp. working closely with Owners, Architects, Engineers, Consultants, and Subcontractors·       Ability to generate Value Engineering solutions ·       Exp. Working knowledge and understanding of construction costs and the factors that affect field production and construction methods·       Exp. reviewing contract terms to identify conditions affecting onsite and home office general requirements·       Ability to prepare comprehensive instructions to bidders and sub-trade bid package scopes of work·       Proficient in Microsoft Office, Sage/Timberline Estimating, On Screen Take –Off, and Primavera/Oracle scheduling ·       Bachelor’s Degree with a Concentration in Construction Management a plusFusco Personnel has been a leading Recruiting Firm in the Capital Region since 1994. Our success record speaks for itself! We specialize in executive searches, mid-level recruits, human resource consulting, as well as, temporary/contract and temp-to-hire staffing. There is never a fee to applicants.Fusco Personnel’s areas of expertise include information technology, finance, sales, human resources, accounting, engineering, bio-tech, clinical/non-clinical healthcare, and administrative/clerical personnel. Our superior service combined with our highly skilled bank of candidates set us apart from other firms. Fusco Personnel is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. Recruiting Talent and Culture",Estimator - Commercial Construction Job in Albany  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Albany 12203,,http://jobview.monster.com/estimator-commercial-construction-job-albany-ny-us-175259157.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=11,,,73a3fe51cb8bf5d6f6a0e928d72d1655
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:00:32:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a General Contractor Estimator with experience, please read on!We're a growing company located right outside of Albany, NY, our projects are located in and around the New England area. Our company is a renowned construction company with a strong history of success, we are now going through a tremendous growth now and we need your help. We're looking for an enthusiastic Estimator to join our fast growing team, who's looking for great upward career mobility.Our ideal candidate would not just call themselves just an Estimator. We are looking for a diverse background, someone who would call themselves a leader, someone who wants to complete their job and be proud of their work, and loves working in a diverse environment which allows them to be successful. That said we are looking for someone with personality that can be part of a collaborative team.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Estimator- General Contracting- General Contracting Estimator- Field Engineering- Assessments,- Outlook / Excel- Timberline- Commercial EstimatingWhat's In It for You- Vacation/PTO- Medical- Dental- Vision- 401(k)- car allowance- gas card - BonusWe are looking for an candidate that must be hungry and excited at the idea of being part of something. We want someone that's excited to be with us, and focused on the opportunity to do something great every day!So, if you are a General Contractor Estimator with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Estimator - Fast Growing Company! | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Fernando Madrona,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-estimator-fast-growing-company!-job-schenectady-ny-us-175414160.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=8,,,a1189dbb2866259f1476163d8ca9c71d
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:00:51:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. You can get started with as little as $2,000 dollars down. CLICK APPLY BELOW to learn more.We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",Construction,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-manufacturing-cleaning-services-start-your-own-business-with-the-master's-touch-job-cedar-rapids-ia-us-170732886.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=17,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,4787c65cb5c889612d03c59996d54d8c
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:00:59:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB TITLE: FOREMAN, Construction/ Dry WallLOCATION: Denver, ColoradoPOSITION &START: Full time/ Permanent Placement position, ImmediateREPORTS TO: Production Manager and/or SuperintendentMUST HAVE: 3 to 5 years in steel framing and / or commercial sheet rock experience, Drywall Experience, & Acoustical Ceiling Experience***Must have Dry Wall experience***Major Duties and Responsibilities:· Direct and supervise a trade crew on a consistent basis and frequently direct and supervise multiple trades.· Participate in the preplanning process in preparation for goals meeting.· Ensure the job is properly staffed.· Calculate unit costs based on quantity of material installed, hours worked, and labor dollars and take appropriate action to achieve goals.· Monitor, support, and enforce all safety rules and regulations of the Company and OSHA standards.· Ensure that all materials, tools, equipment, and general contractor are already scheduled daily and are on site in a timely manner.· Arrive at work on time at various locations.· Attend and participate in all required company training programs.· Conform, support, and enforce all company policies and procedures.· Attend all job site meetings whenever scheduled.· Other duties as assigned.Knowledge, Skills, and AbilitiesKnowledge of:· Company safety policies and applicable OSHA standards.· Mathematics, including addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, fraction, and decimals.· Company Productions System.· Overall Company resources needs and the willingness to share resources for the overall good of the Company.· Skill in verbal and written communication, including the ability to actively listen and express oneself clearly.Ability to:· Work on ladders, scaffolds and/or stilts.· Erect and dismantle scaffolding.· Supervise the use of all tools, material, equipment, and personnel.· Read detailed (blueprints) plans and specifications, and comply with building codes.· Lead a team environment, with frequent one-on-one and group interaction.· Make a presentation to different size groups and audience types.· Manage one’s behavior professionally when dealing with difficult people and situations.· Meet deadlines and prioritize tasks.· Motivate employees by giving positive feedback and appropriate rewards.· Break down and analyze problems to advise supervisors and direct reports on how to proceed.· Anticipate long-term implications, opportunities, or consequences of actions.· Manage and supervise multiple scopes of work.· Tactfully communicate with the General Contractor, Owner, and Architect in the best interest of all parties.· Set and meet production goals.· Read and interpret mainframe reports.· Learn use of computers.Better opportunities. Better balance. Better match. Whatever better means to you, we're the people who make it possible. Because your better drives us to seek out the best and brightest in the industry, work with the finest companies in their fields, and place the best talent in the marketplace. Isn't it time for something better?*We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and we celebrate diversity at all levels of our organization. Pre-employment drug screen is required as a condition of employment. Must be eligible to work in the U.S.   *A conviction record will not necessarily prevent you from being employed. You will be required to complete and submit a questionnaire. We will consider your age at the time of the offense, when the offense occurred, the seriousness and the nature of the offense, as well as any rehabilitation to determine your employability.",FOREMAN,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO 80209",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/foreman-construction-dry-wall-job-denver-co-us-174747298.aspx?mescoid=4701141002005&jobPosition=2,28.00 - 32.00 $ /hour,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,a6953e55f5fbc082e19278afa186fc45
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:01:00:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Construction Project Manager will play a vital role in project execution. The PM will also be identifying potential contractors, bid the work, negotiate the contract, and oversee the project execution. The Construction Project Manager will mentor crews regarding quality and actively enforce quality standards and safety. The Construction Project Manager will be accessible to crews and customers. We are looking for someone who can continue strong communication with customers as he/she will be expected to understand and exceed customer’s needs.The self-motivated Project Manager will direct work teams on wireless communication projects.WHAT YOU WILL DO: Responsible for communicating with the customers in regards to site schedule and general updates.Responsible for scheduling, contract negotiations and project oversight.Responsible for managing the activities of Civil crew.Coordinate all aspects of the bid process, including scheduling the bid walk, review of bids, production of a bid package, and other recommendations.Tracks and monitors construction schedule and progress through site reports.Prioritizes elements of job and have strong ability to multitask.Functions as primary liaison between customers, management, crews and Project Coordinators.Attends work as scheduled to support the ongoing success of the company.Other duties, responsibilities and special projects as assigned.",Construction Project Manager Job in San Jose,Full Time Employee,"San Jose, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-job-san-jose-ca-us-174255272.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=16,,Project/Program Management,932f856309dab40e4b22276a2c393513
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:01:45:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Taylor Bros. Construction Co., Inc. located in Columbus, Indiana is hiring for the following positions. Interested candidates should send their resume, cover letter and salary expectations to employment@tbcci.com for immediate consideration. Shop Assistant: Summary: Motivated individual to work in our shop/warehouse. Job responsibilities include pick up and delivery of materials & equipment to our job sites. Chauffeurs License preferred. Forklift experience required. Project Superintendent: Summary: Superintendents manage the day-to-day operations on building construction sites. They are the Companys representative and office liaison on construction projects. They are typically stationed on the construction site for a period of 3-20 weeks depending on the duration of the project. Must be willing to travel. Responsibilities/Duties Coordinates and manages on-site construction activities from pre-start up to completion Studies specifications/drawings to plan work-flows for construction and assures Quality control Assists in the development of project schedule; manages the schedule of activities on site; manages deadlines Initiates and maintains relationship with client Schedules work, including subcontractors and vendors Directs trade activities based on interpretation of project drawings & specifications Determines materials, equipment and tools needed and orders Creates as-built record set drawings and specifications as required by respective clients Leads safety meetings; serves as on-site safety officer at times Manages inspection processes with local authorities Maintains high safety and quality standards in accordance with company and industry standards Qualifications /Skills Minimum 2 years supervisory experience Computer and communication skills required Ability to read, analyze and interpret construction related documents Basic business mathematical skills Traveling RETAIL FIXTURE Superintendent: Summary: Fixture Superintendents manage the day-to-day operations and must be able to work in a Retail environment. They are the Companys representative and office liaison. Must be willing to travel within the United States. Responsibilities/Duties Coordinates and manages on-site construction activities from pre-start up to completion Studies specifications/drawings to plan work-flows for construction and assures Quality control Assists in the development of project schedule; manages the schedule of activities on site; manages deadlines Initiates and maintains relationship with client Determines materials, equipment and tools needed and orders Leads safety meetings; serves as on-site safety officer at times Manages inspection processes with local authorities Maintains high safety and quality standards in accordance with company and industry standards Basic knowledge of Retail Fixture Installation & Owner Furnished Materials Qualifications /Skills Computer and communication skills required Ability to read, analyze and interpret construction related documents Basic business mathematical skills Background with retail fixture work Project Manager: Summary: The Project Manager oversees the project to ensure it is constructed in accordance with the design, budget, quality and schedule per the plans and specifications. Positive interaction with our valued clients, partners, subcontractors and supplier teams is required. Responsibilities/Duties Provides overall project administrative and technical direction for assigned project Must have the ability to manage multiple projects at one time Coordinates all pre-construction, construction and close-out activities Plans and coordinates with our General Field Superintendent for all field activities Initiates project purchases, change requests and negotiations, budget tracking, schedule, etc. Ensures all company and client policies and procedures are adhered to Assist with the implementation of company and project safety policies Qualifications/Skills Minimum 5 years project management experience Bachelors degree in Construction Engineering or Technology Skilled in MS Office applications, Primavera Contract Management, P6, Blue Beam, etc. Excellent written and oral communication skills Competitive salary and great benefits package! Taylor Bros. Construction is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Join the Taylor Bros. Team! Report",TAYLOR BROS CONSTRUCTION Job Application for Taylor Bros. Construction Co.,,"Address 4555 MIDDLE RDCOLUMBUS, IN 47203",All,http://jobview.monster.com/taylor-bros-construction-co-inc-located-job-columbus-in-us-175453163.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=19,,,748f7f83865847eac7c11758791a6899
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:01:45:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"CIVIL ENGINEER opportunity at a highly regarded design/construction firm in Chicago, IL metro. Can be a Junior or Senior position. Need 2 to 5+ years design experience with roadways and facilities. A PLUS to have railway facility design experience. Need railroad design and construction management experience. A big plus to have PE registration. Includes relo.Responsibilities for the Civil EngineerLead and perform design of railroad auxiliary facility designs, and prepare plans, specifications, and related documentsOversee the evaluation, measurement, and quantification of existing site conditions. Direct survey staff with field data collection. Assist with the preparation of proposals for future work.Serve as liaison with client/owner, contractors, or others directly involved with design or construction efforts, ensuring the required coordination and problem solving between all parties in order to maintain project progress. Develop and maintain project schedules, accounting for client/owner needs and resource availability. Lead development of, maintenance of, and upholds internal standards for typical design details, CAD standards, design/construction manuals, or general standards of practice. Manage Subconsultants/Subcontractors engaged in support of design and construction projects.Control projects by managing the budget, invoicing, and reporting of projects, for both internal and client needs.Requirements for the Civil EngineerBS Degree in Civil Engineering from an accredited institution 2 years OR 5+ years of direct experience in Civil Design of roadways and related areas - (depending on Jr or Sr position)A PLUS to have Railway and related facilities design, engineering or construction experience A PLUS to have Construction Project Management experienceNeed working knowledge with CAD OR A PLUS to have experience with Microstation and Geopak or Inroads CAD design softwareNeed EIT -- A PLUS to have Professional Engineer (PE) licenseAbility to travel up to 40%Benefits for the Civil EngineerSalary in range shown based on extent of qualifications, any Railroad design experience, any Construction Project Management experience, and license statusComprehensive BenefitsGrowth opportunityRelocationThis Job is located in Downers Grove, IL -> United States",Civil Engineer - Road Design /Construction Project Management/Railway Facility Job in Downers Grove,Full Time Employee,"Downers Grove, IL 60515",,http://jobview.monster.com/civil-engineer-road-design-construction-project-management-railway-facility-job-downers-grove-il-us-175212549.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=18,"65,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",,18b476040a4f5dabfda2870503f62bd8
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:02:48:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.Job Responsibilities:An Engineer I is a company recognized individual contributor that applies approved technologies and architectures to specific requirements. They will develop and define plans for the implementation of new plant construction. The ideal candidate is responsible for engineering design plans and specifications, including gathering field data. The individual in this position will assure the most feasible, and economical means are used to complete the work. An Engineer I screens held orders, engineers small subdivisions, building entrance cable, or held orders, and obtains permits. Meets with and serves as a point of contact for larger entities, municipalities, government entities, developers/builders. This individual when required will conduct formal meetings and/or presentations regarding engineering and construction plans for the receipt of pricing proposals or bids. Partners with network planning and identifies projects for budgets and prepares justification. This employee provides cost data to support capital planning and budgeting, at a project level. Monitors and controls project expenditures against their owned projects. *** Please note, we are looking for candidates able to work in the following areas: Columbia City, Decatur, Plymouth, Warsaw, Lima OH ***Minimum Qualifications:Bachelors degree or equivalent work experience and educationMinimum of 2 years of relevant work experienceKnowledge of current approved products and technology used in engineering remote electronics, FTTT, GPON, Ethernet, MTU, MDU, aid to construction (BART), Joint use poles and held orders.Proficiency when working in Microsoft Office productsMust have good communication skills and the ability to give presentations.Must have a valid driver's license and satisfactory driving record. MVR check required.Preferred Qualifications:Bachelors degree in Engineering or related fieldProficiency when working company approved systems like Fireworks & BidMaster, WFMT, NDS,NBIE, and Martens.Knowledge of OSP design and a willingness to learn and to support the Engineer II and Senior Engineers.Alternate Location: US-Indiana-Columbia City; US-Indiana-Decatur; US-Indiana-Plymouth; US-Indiana-Warsaw; US-Ohio-LimaRequisition #: 116212 This job may require successful completion of an online assessment. A brief description of the assessments can be viewed on our website at http://find.centurylink.jobs/testguides/ EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Engineer I - Telecom Engineering & Construction Job in Decatur,Full Time Employee,"Decatur, IN 46733",,http://jobview.monster.com/engineer-i-telecom-engineering-construction-job-decatur-in-us-174882745.aspx?mescoid=1500133001001&jobPosition=8,,,328252bdc783e35d1f261cd0935de3b1
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:02:49:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Superintendent (Commercial Construction) with a strong background in mid-rise, out-of-the-ground commercial, hotel, and large commercial projects, please read on!What You Will Be Doing- Oversee all phases of construction from initial planning to completion- Personnel management of all site staff/ subcontractors- Work with Team to plan and execute the project.- Must demonstrate understanding of site logistics, site safety and construction operations.- Assures onsite superintendents conformance to company policy and reporting requirements- Assists the Project Executive and PM in planning and execution- Supervise all Onsite Construction Activity.- Understand Product Specification And Scope Of Work Requirements.What You Need for this PositionMust-Have: 1.) 5+ years of experience in Commercial Construction2.) Proven track record working as a Superintendent or Project Engineer3.) Strong background in Construction OperationsPluses (Not Required): 1.) Bachelor’s degree in Construction, Civil, or Architectural Engineering or Construction ManagementWhat's In It for You- Competitive salary - Bonus / Equity opportunities- Matching 401K- Excellent benefits- Generous PTOSo, If you are a Superintendent (Commercial Construction) with a strong background in mid-rise, out-of-the-ground commercial, hotel, and large commercial projects, please apply to this amazing opportunity! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Superintendent (Commercial Construction) | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Ryan Kelly,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/superintendent-commercial-construction-job-louisville-ky-us-175225337.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=14,,,f0f747bb40c20a743df729e8acc09f2b
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:03:48:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783132 Job Views: 98 Location: JOHNSTOWN, Pennsylvania, United States ZIP Code: 15904 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Johnstown,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783132 Job Views: 98 Location: JOHNSTOWN, Pennsylvania, United States ZIP Code: 15904 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-johnstown-pa-us-175419707.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=17,,Entry Level,8806f32ec6a131dc270d5b01a919f827
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:03:48:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you want to work close to where you live on the South Shore near Quincy, MA? Do you want to take advantage of your Construction Accounting and Human Resources background and use that experience to be the Chief Finance Professional within the organization? The Accounting and Human Resources Manager - Construction will report to the President and Owner of the business. If interested, please apply.Client DetailsConstruction Company located in Quincy, MA.DescriptionSupport the President, Group Leader and the needs of the entire Group.Bookkeeping duties including Payroll, A/R, A/P, reconciliations and job costingKeep contacts updated for Group President/Group Leader and Project Managers.Ensure that Cash Flow Reports and Aging Reports are distributed to Group President, Group Leader, and Project Managers.Establish and maintain files, records and database (i.e., schedule, management reports).Assist with financial operations: review, prepare, and monitor contract documents; compile data for budgets and personal expense reconciliations, etc.Compose, type, format and edit internal and external correspondence, including agreements and proposals.Review all project contract documentation to identify project risk and cost concernsMitigate project risk/cost through implementation of contract amendments, clarifications, and exceptionsExecute contracts through procurement of required company signaturesEvaluate performance/payment bond requests and certificates of insurance (provided by third party) for projectsManage other required project documentation in conjunction with internal office resources and corporate legal departmentVerify contract compliance.Under the direction of the Intermediate Estimator, calculate various statistical data - quantity take-offs,Material price lists, labor costs per man hour, equipment, etc.Assist with obtaining scopes of work and pricing from subcontractors and suppliers.Assist in closing bids.Research historical data (purchase orders, subcontracts, productivity analysis reports, etc.) and compile summary reports to develop guidelines and precedence for future estimates.Participate in developing project update and bid package estimate documents.Maintain files of working documents for back-up to estimating figures.Assist in the monitoring of conceptual estimates with actual cost data.ProfileBachelor's Degree in Accounting, Finance or Business Related Degree.Construction Accounting Experience Preferred.Managerial Experience Required.Construction Related Construction Software Essential.Ability to interact with Estimators, Supers and Project Managers.Job OfferThe Accounting and Human Resources Manager - Construction will enjoy the opportunity to work directly with the President of the Quincy Based Construction Company. The Accounting and Human Resources Manager - Construction is eligible for a competitive base salary, bonus eligibility, 401K plan, health insurance coverage and additional benefits. The company is located in Quincy, MA, and is in the Construction Industry. If you are interested please apply below.",Accounting and Human Resources Manager - Construction Job in Quincy,"Full Time , Employee","Quincy, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-human-resources-manager-construction-job-quincy-ma-us-174330778.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=12,"100,000.00 - 130,000.00 $ /year",,00d45966c59f44cac4ca42164b4e0dcd
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:03:50:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a fully integrated real estate development firm that works as a GC and Property Management firm. We are looking for a Project Manager to oversee new construction as well as manage facilities for our properties. We are a small family environment where our people wear many hats.Top Reasons to Work with UsCompetitive pay, benefits and bonus opportunities Stable company that has been in business for many years Small family environment, where people love what they doWhat You Will Be DoingThorough knowledge of facility maintenance requirements from construction processes through operation with experience managing HVAC, EMS, Electrical, Fire Sprinkler, and Fire Alarm systems, roofing, parking lot, landscape, and general building maintenanceComprehensive understanding of various building systemsEvaluate necessity for immediate repairs and preventive maintenanceSolicit estimates for work, able to verify and substantiate pricing for repairs and new equipmentCoordinate assigned maintenance vendor service activitiesMonitor and inspect completed repairs Assist with budget recommendations based on knowledge of maintenance needsCreate and oversee historical maintenance and repair databaseWorking knowledge of reading and understanding blueprints and specificationsReview and evaluation of subcontractor proposalsNegotiate and prepare subcontractor contract exhibitsPrepare and write subcontractor scopes of workReview subcontractor submittals for accuracy and conformance to plans and specificationsHave a general understanding of the permit processAbility to build and maintain a construction schedule Demonstrate an ability to deliver projects on time and under budgetWhat You Need for this PositionAt least 5 years of experience as a Facilities Project ManagerExperience working with Yardi (preferred)So, if you are a Facilities Project Manager with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Facilities Project Manager - Construction Experience Required | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Rachel Perez,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/facilities-project-manager-construction-experience-required-job-colton-ca-us-175225257.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=15,,,b31deee644356ce62aafc66d325252d1
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:03:50:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Since 2004, we have been a real estate investment, development, and management firm. We started with student housing, but quickly expanded to meet client requirements. These additional services currently includes development, and renovation while also utilizing asset management services in multi-family residential, office, retail & hospitality, and senior living. We are looking for a Construction Estimator to join our team and work on multi-family and senior/student living projects.Top Reasons to Work with Us- 10+ years of success and stability- Modernized construction management firm- Collaborative environment that rewards individual merit- Growing project listWhat You Will Be Doing- Create and maintain a database of cost indexes- Develop in house cost estimates and CPM schedules- Initiate and review contractor proposed estimates- Participate in GMP negotiations- Assist in the development of procurement/award strategy- Take part in all key bid scoping sessions with the GC and subcontractorsWhat You Need for this PositionQualified candidates will have 9+ years of experience with the following:- Estimating- Multi-family, residential, or student housing projects- Estimating softwareWhat's In It for You- Competitive compensation and salary- Full benefits: medical, dental, vision- 401 (K) with company match- Life insurance coverage- Paid time off (PTO)- Vacation, paid, and sick daysIf this sounds like you:1. Apply here!!or 2. Send an updated Word Doc copy of your resume to nick.colonna@cybercoders.com Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Estimator | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Nick Colonna,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-estimator-job-chicago-il-us-174867703.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=17,,,cc23273c150e64e0e2644dbcf1fec8da
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:04:07:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Superintendent with experience, please read on! ( Houston, TX) We a leading provider of construction management services, design-build, and integrated project delivery. We are looking to manage multiple crews and material budgets to ensure that the planned work and all aspects of the tasks are performed efficiently and effectively. May manage a small project of less than $5 million under the supervision of more experienced staff.What You Will Be Doing-Plan and produce units, and monitor/adjust crew sizes for maximum efficiency.-Create complete crew task plans and look ahead schedules with crew/subcontractors.-Manage crews or trades to fulfill work plans.-Coordinate crew operations with relevant subcontractors.-Assist In development/ implementation of project and crew specific safety plans, and ensure compliance using training, tool box talks and communication with in-house resources.-Attend in-house first aid, CPR on OSHA training. Maintain current OSHA 10.-Record timecards with accurate hours and ensure coded to proper cost codes.-Complete daily reports, logs and tracking reports.-Record unit cost information for weekly reports.-Ensure quality compliance through use of specifications-Assist in project closeout by supervising pre-punch activities and coordinating with owner, architect and governing authoritiesWhat You Need for this Position-Bachelors Degree, with preference for Construction Science or related field-Typically at least 6 years field supervision experience required. OR -Generally possesses skills & knowledge equivalent to employee with a minimum of 7-10 years commercial construction experience.So, if you are a Superintendent with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for Superintendent - Commercial Construction,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Samuel Leos,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/superintendent-commercial-construction-superintendent-ground-job-houston-tx-us-175017476.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=3,,,81a3f5e8b24dd350bfa65741fa9f8d8e
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:04:41:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Construction Project Manager with healthcare experience, please read on. We are a growing firm in a real niche market. With multiple FL offices, we are looking for project managers who can help us manage healthcare construction projects in the sub $5M space. Because we are a smaller firm, as the PM you will have full responsibility of the entire project.What You Will Be Doing- You will be directly responsible for working with the design team throughout the various pre-construction phases- Provide estimates, budgets, analyzing constructability, offering alternate/optional information to help the design team stay within the budget. - Prepare bid packages, facilitate the bid process, review proposals, negotiate contracts, write contracts, award contracts, and administer construction contracts. - Responsible for setting up budgets, schedules, cash flows, review monthly contractor requisitions, prepare owner requisitions, conduct owner/subcontractor meetings, manage changes, coordinate with the project executive, monitor the construction team, close-out procedures, schedule of values, and forecast/update on weekly basis.What You Need for this Position- Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Construction Management, or related field- Minimum of 6 years experience of stable, progressively responsible general contracting experience, including at least 2 years of project management experience in healthcare, or similar sector construction projects with most of your projects being in the $250-$3M range- A proven track record of excellent client and subcontractor relationships - Ability to take a project from concept through completion.So, if you are a Project Manager with construction experience, preferably in the healthcare space, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Project Manager - Construction with healthcare experience | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Tony Zerio,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-construction-with-healthcare-experience-job-fort-myers-fl-us-174916195.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=12,,,6812b844d99483f800f152a60d44c6ea
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:04:54:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"EPC client is looking for a Construction Site Safety Specialist for a long term project in New Jersey. You need 8-25+ years of relevant construction site safety experience and some very specific experience supporting Substation or Transmission & Distribution construction projects. Mob, demob, per diem & a trip home every three weeks will be provided.Responsibilities for the Safety ManagerProvide Site Safety & Health Support for the construction of mechanical systems, infrastructure, HVAC and air ducting for a DOD siteInterface with the subcontractors, the customer & internal support groups to ensure that the project safety requirements & specifications are metProvide advice, guidance, and assistance to personnel involved in projects regarding safety and health issues and work practicesInterface with Client Safety & Health Department on site safety & health issues and coordinate preventative measuresFacilitates adherence to safety policies & procedures while maintaining compliance with the local, state, & federal OSHA rules & regulationsCoordinate project safety & health walk-through assessments and then review any assessment findings with appropriate parties & follow up by documenting the items which require immediate correctionRequirements for the Safety Manager8+ years of experience as a Site Safety Specialist working in the field on power plant or similar heavy industrial construction projects4+ years of specific safety & health experience supporting high voltage Substation or Transmission Line construction projectsAn AS or BS degree in Occupational Health & Safety, Industrial Hygiene, or similar field is preferredMust have strong knowledge of OSHA Construction, OSHA General Industry, ANSI, NIOSH and NEC StandardsClient prefers that you hold a current industrial hygiene or safety certification in any of the following: CIH, CAIH, ASP, OHST or CHSTYou must have current training in CPR and First AidShoult have OSHA 10 and/or 30 Hour Outreach Construction Course completedBenefits for the Safety ManagerPTO Program401KHealth Insurance available, and more...This Job is located in Newark, NJ -> United States",Safety Manager - Construction/T&D/Substation Job in Newark,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Newark, NJ 07103",,http://jobview.monster.com/safety-manager-construction-t-d-substation-job-newark-nj-us-175130918.aspx?mescoid=2900540001001&jobPosition=4,40.00 - 50.00 $ /hour,,7b9df5501f20d06b7f79cfcc66ace8ae
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:04:56:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Construction Project Manager with experience, please read on!We're a design-build heavy civil construction company operating on the West Coast. We need an experienced Heavy Civil Project Manager to add to our growing team.Top Reasons to Work with UsCompetitive salary Job stabilityFull benefitsProfit sharing401(k)What You Will Be DoingProject Management of heavy civil construction projects throughout Southern California. You'll be responsible for supervising and delegating responsibilities to all crew members and subcontractors, and ensuring the smooth completion of the project.What You Need for this PositionAt least 10 years of experience as a Project Manager on heavy civil projectsExperience in mass transit, water resources, bridges, highway, or electrical a plusDesign-build experience a plusBachelors degree in Engineering, Construction Management or a related fieldSo, if you are a Construction Project Manager with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Project Manager - Heavy civil,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Richard Lara,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-heavy-civil-highway-structures-job-newport-beach-ca-us-175350628.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=19,,,67401bfa195292fa6e7a7fbf31feb77e
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:05:26:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783200 Job Views: 94 Location: CHESTER, South Carolina, United States ZIP Code: 29706 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Chester,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783200 Job Views: 94 Location: CHESTER, South Carolina, United States ZIP Code: 29706 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-chester-sc-us-175419465.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=7,,Entry Level,2c5c4fe077016d51a50776f56cf74355
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:15:48:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Manager, Talent AcquisitionRecruit Top Talent for a Fast-Moving Entrepreneurial Company MTM, Inc. is a healthcare and transportation management company whose mission is to partner with our clients in developing innovative solutions for accessing healthcare, increasing independence, and connecting community resources in a cost-effective manner.  To achieve this mission, as well as our overarching vision of communities without barriers, we leverage our core competencies in managing customer service operations and building provider networks.  Our clients include state and county governments, Medicaid and Managed Care Organizations (MCOs), transit agencies, third party administrators, and healthcare providers.  We are a privately-held company with over 2000 employees nationwide. We are growing fast -experiencing35% annual growth since we started.  Headquartered in Lake St. Louis with a new corporate office location in Chesterfield, MTM was recently recognized by the St. Louis Business Journal as one of the Best Places to Work (2015 & 2016),as the Healthiest Employer (2015), and asthe Second Largest Woman-Owned Business (2015).  We offer a generous compensation and benefits package including an annual bonus and long term incentive program at the executive level.  Learn more about us at www.mtm-inc.net.  We are seeking a leader with Talent Acquisitionexpertiseto join our team.  This vital role is responsible for the strategic vision and tactical leadership to plan, direct and oversee the execution of a recruitment strategy that draws top talent for our call center operations and corporate office. This leader is expected to foster a cohesive and accountable team environment by implementing best practices and metrics that effectively raise the bar for recruiting performance.  Reporting to the Director of HR Operations and Talent Acquisition, responsibilities include: Leadership: Oversee, mentor and develop a collaborative and high performing team comprised of five Talent Acquisition Specialists.Establish and execute short and long-term strategies for the talent acquisition delivery model across all locations.  Develop and execute communication strategies within talent acquisition including the development of key messaging, and creation, planning and execution of communication plans.Recruitment Process:Appropriately standardize MTM’s recruitment processes, ensuring all hires are the product of a robust process with careful vetting.  Ensure the team is organized, consistent and efficient with daily practices including ATS utilization, new requisition guidelines, active and closed requisitions, workflow processes, interview procedures, reporting, and compliance.  Instill practices to ensure a positive experience for all candidates regardless of the hiring decision.  Candidate Sourcing:  Develop, utilize and continually refine in-house sourcing capabilities/strategy through innovative practices and techniques. Recruit for key positions, leveraging social networking tools, external recruiting and networking events and traditional sourcing techniques.  Cultivating existing and build new relationships to form a strong pipeline of referral sources and candidates.  Educate and inspire the talent acquisition team to effectively market our employer brand and leverage social networks. Partner with external recruiters, staffing agencies and third party providers when necessary.  Business Partner:  Partner with HR and Hiring Managers to ensure effective delivery of the talent acquisition infrastructure across the organization. Collaborate with Hiring Managers and key HR Partners to clarify job specifications and develop and execute robust talent acquisition strategies that align with MTM’s long and short-term strategies. Metrics: Develop and reportkey metrics to monitor the talent acquisition team’s performance and efficiently utilize resources.  Use data analytics, reporting tools and KPIs to maximize recruitment performance and identify potential compliance deficiencies.   Diversity and Compliance: Partner with leadership to effectively support affirmative action plan implementation and promote diversity in our recruitment process.  Oversee administration and compliance for our ATS, related policies and recruiting resources.  Keep a pulse on industry, regulatory issues, and changing business environment to adjust delivery models, programs and practices in an efficient, cost effective, and compliant manner.  Negotiate and monitor contracts with third party recruiters, posting services, and outside service providers. Qualifications Include: 5+ years management experience leading a talent acquisition team.  Experience leading recruitment efforts for a wide range of roles on a national level.Familiarity with recruiting for large customer service/call center operations.  Proven track record of creating and executing a proactive, creative and metrics-driven recruiting strategy.  Bachelor’s degree is required. Ability to effectively lead and motivate ateam in a fast-paced, changing environment.  Ability to analyze data and exercise initiative, sound judgment, problem-solving and decision-making.  Stellar communication (verbal and written) and presentation skills. Strong interpersonal skills with the ability to maintain positive and effective working relationships across the organization.  Ability to travel as needed. Flexibility to split time between the Lake St. Louis and Chesterfield locations.Strong technical aptitude, including proficiency in MS Office applications.   Next Steps:  If you are interested, qualified and ready to take the next step, please submit your cover letter and resume on-line at www.csiapply.com.  Should you experience difficulties with the online system or wish to make a confidential inquiry, you may contact our search consultant at Collaborative Strategies via email at apply@csi-mail.com. All inquiries and resume submissions will be treated as strictly confidential.  Please do not contact MTM directly. Connecting talent with opportunity since 1994, Collaborative Strategies, Inc., is a St. Louis based consulting firm with a dedicated boutique search practice. We take pride in matching great leaders with entrepreneurial organizations such as MTM, Inc.  Equal Opportunity Employer1 ",Senior Manager,Full Time,"Saint Louis, MO","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/senior-manager-talent-acquisition-job-saint-louis-mo-us-168131161.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=14,,,406a762d47a2875a2d38126548e9ddc5
United States of America,US,06/Jun/2016:16:48:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Firm InformationReed Smith is a global relationship law firm with more than 1,800 lawyers in 26 offices throughout the United States, Europe, Asia and the Middle East.Founded in 1877, the firm represents leading international businesses, from Fortune 100 corporations to mid-market and emerging enterprises. Its lawyers provide litigation and other dispute resolution services in multi-jurisdictional and other high-stakes matters; deliver regulatory counsel; and execute the full range of strategic domestic and cross-border transactions. Reed Smith is a preeminent advisor to industries including financial services, life sciences, health care, advertising, entertainment and media, shipping and transport, energy and natural resources, real estate, manufacturing, technology, and education. For more information, visit reedsmith.com. Position SummaryThe Financial Industry Group has more than 250 attorneys in offices across the globe who provide a wide array of legal services to financial institutions and financial services companies, including advice on matters in lending, bankruptcy & restructuring, financial litigation, regulatory and investment management. As a member of a growing and energetic team of more than 60 professionals, this position is responsible for executing marketing and business development activities, as well as liaising with attorneys across the industry group in regard to business development objectives.The Business Development Supervisor will take an active role in working to expand business, improve profitability and increase the profile of the Financial Industry Group t practice group and other practice groups and projects as assigned. This position works closely with the growing and energetic firmwide marketing team of more than 60 professionals and is responsible for coordinating marketing and communications activities. Essential Functions Work with Practice Group leaders, other attorneys and BD Team to support business development, key account management, marketing, and client relations’ efforts to grow revenue in new and existing clients. Collaborate with firm resources to prepare market research and client analysis to identify industry trends and new business development opportunities; assist attorneys in pursuing leads. Effectively manage and implement business development and marketing activities through: Teaming with attorneys, business development and marketing on internal and external communications, including collateral materials. Developing credentials for use in marketing materials, RFPs, and other pitch responses, including the collection and maintenance of case/matter information; Drafting and editing practice area descriptions and attorney biographies; Supporting practice and firm marketing and public relations initiatives, including awards/directories submissions, with assistance from the marketing group; Managing and effectively utilizing client information through the firm’s CRM system; Cataloging and assisting with thought leadership opportunities, including speaking engagements and writing and blog postings—both for Reed Smith publications and externally with professional and trade organizations. Maintain group mailing lists within the firm’s CRM. Track new business opportunities in the firm’s CRM system. Assist in coordination and strategic planning related to local and national conferences, client seminars and sponsorships including budgeting and tracking associated costs. Monitor and report on appropriate Practice Development budgets. Work with the senior BD leadership to integrate lateral partners into the practice. Work as an active member of a team to ensure a quality professional product as well as the delivery of materials within established timeframes. Assist practice group and BD team with special projects, as assigned. RequirementsEducation: College degree in Marketing or related field required.Experience: 5+ years experience in a marketing-related field required, including 2+ years of law firm or professional services experience. Previous experience in marketing and business development disciplines, including business development, marketing communications, public relations, events and media relations a plus. An interest in and ability to understand the legal business environment, including industry terminology a must. Must have demonstrated experience working independently as well as within cross-functional teams in a collaborative, professional environment . Skills: Strong oral and written communication skills. Strong computer skills, including advanced knowledge of Microsoft Word, Excel, and PowerPoint, as well as willingness to learn database systems. Must be detail oriented, proactive and self-directed with ability to manage multiple projects and competing priorities under tight deadlines. Sound professional judgment and a high degree of poise and professionalism when interacting with internal and external contacts. Demonstrated ability to establish effective firmwide working relationships with individuals at all levels. Must be able to react to difficult situations quickly, effectively and diplomatically. Exceptionally strong organizational, project management and problem solving skills are required for this role. OtherSupervisory Responsibilities: NoneEquipment To Be Used: Personal computer and other office equipment such as telephone, calculator, fax, machine, copier, scanner, etc.Typical Physical Demands: Manual dexterity sufficient to operate standard office equipment.Typical Mental Demands: Able to deal with stress associated with fast-paced work environment. Multiple priorities/tasks. Make judgment decisions and adapt to changing work situations. Grasp and apply new ideas. Communicate with various personalities at all levels.Working Conditions: Works in typical office setting. Occasionally called upon to work hours in excess of your normal daily schedule.Reed Smith offers a challenging work environment, business casual dress code and a total compensation package that includes a competitive salary, flexible benefits program, tuition assistance, and generous 401 (k) plan.Qualified candidates only, No search firms. Reed Smith is an Equal Opportunity Employer.Reed Smith's success depends heavily on the effective utilization of qualified people, regardless of their race, ancestry, religion, colour, sex, age, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, disability, veteran's status, or any characteristic protected by law. As a firm, we adhere to and promote equal employment opportunity for all.",Business Development Supervisor - FIG - San Francisco Job in San Francisco,"Full Time, Employee","San Francisco, CA",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-development-supervisor-fig-san-francisco-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167842252.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=11,,Other,ebdea7657fdbf03beeab6b99ece8bc34
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:23:51:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Quality EngineerSummary/Objective The quality engineer position works directly with the Technical Quality Manager analyzing manufacturing processes for improvement using various methods of testing and inspection. The position designs and recommends processes for efficient and quality manufacturing.Essential FunctionsReasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.Develop, apply and maintain quality requirements and standards for development and manufacturing products. Serve as the primary quality assurance resource to department supervisor(s) for problem identification, resolution, loss reporting and continuous improvement. Maintain all quality records and documentation in accordance with the quality manual and specific customer requirements. Support concurrent engineering efforts by participating in design development projects representing quality assurance and the customer. Design, document and implement methods for process control, process improvement, testing and inspection. Ensure proper inspections have been performed to ensure product quality. This will include the inspection of incoming material as well as in process and final inspection of completed product. Promote and execute quality standards, inspection processes, test methodology, quality plans, documents and reports. Assist in process certification. Review customers purchase orders, contracts and change requests and ensure that the necessary criteria and provisions are included in quality and process plans.                     Develop, execute and analyze quality-reporting measures.                     Report to management on quality issues, trends and losses.                    Review suppliers purchase orders and establish supplier quality requirements.                     Participate in internal and external quality audits.                     Interface with supplier and customer quality representatives concerning problems with quality assurance and assure that effective corrective action is implemented.                     Serve as the quality assurance representative to the Materials Review Board (MRB).                     May compile, write and deliver training material on quality standards and activities.                     Maintain calibration records for mechanical and electrical test equipment within the department. Physical DemandsThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.The employee is occasionally required to sit; climb or balance; and stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl. The employee must frequently lift and/or move up to 10 pounds and may be required to lift and/or move up to 30 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and ability to adjust focus.Required Education and ExperienceEngineering degree in quality assurance engineering and 2 years of work experience, or Bachelor’s degree in mechanical engineering, electrical engineering, manufacturing engineering or equivalent and 2 years of work experience (or Associate’s degree in these fields plus and 4 years of work experience), or 6 years of work experience. Training in general safety, electrostatic discharge awareness, foreign object damage awareness and quality system awareness. Preferred Education and Experience Experience in ISO 9001, GMP, and AIB a plus.Other DutiesPlease note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.",Quality Engineer Job in Greensboro,Full Time,"Greensboro, NC 27406",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Greensboro-NC-US-165778264.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=9,Bonuses,Experienced (Non-Manager),1a5d3b938e2deaba8a28c9c2ffb221b9
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:23:50:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"An American corporation that manufactures agricultural, construction, and forestry machinery, diesel engines, drivetrains (axles, transmissions, gearboxes) used in heavy equipment, and lawn care equipment is looking for a Quality Engineer in the East Moline, IL area. This is a 7 month CONTRACT position with the possibility of extension. No per diem available. 1st shift - 7am-3.30pm. Will be required to travel every 5 weeks or so to suppliers within the U.S.Responsibilities for the Quality EngineerProvides quality planning, control, and improvement support for product development teams, manufacturing engineering, supply management, and manufacturing and/or distribution organizations to assure product quality meets the customers' expectations. This includes the application of quality tools within the Enterprise Product Delivery Process (EPDP), Enterprise Order Fulfillment Process (EOFP) and Customer Support Process (CSP). Also supports application of quality tools with key suppliers as an integral element of quality planning. Participates on PDP (Product Delivery Process) teams as the Quality representative, ensuring quality activities and plans are formulated and followed. Engages in applying/leading Quality tools in Product Delivery Process (PDP) teams. Encourages early interaction of both customer and supplier input to team activities. Participates in Design Process and Assembly Reviews (DPARs), print reviews, and design reviews of new products. Monitors and facilitates quality activities for part approval, verifies manufacturing processes (control plans, assembly instructions) and confirms process capability. Uses quality tools and practices to establish approval criteria to ensure the identification of quality failure concerns for both internal and external manufactured parts and assemblies. An example is Failure Modes & Effects Analysis (FMEA). Investigates unit quality related issues and concerns related to product and processes, gathers and analyzes data, resolves/facilitates resolution and implements corrective action. Engages in applying/leading Quality tools on Customer Support Process (CSP), Continuous Improvement (CI),and/or Value Improvement (VI) teams. Investigates product quality problems, determines root cause for quality problems, gathers and analyzes data and implements corrective action to reduce or eliminate non-value waste resulting from non-conformances, scrap or reclaim.Assists in identifying, communicating and resolving supplier quality problems. Engages in supplier quality plan formulation as necessary. Conducts audits of new and existing suppliers to determine manufacturing capability and adherence to accepted quality practices. Drives prevention actions. Facilitates and writes quality procedures for the purpose of maintaining/updating the factory quality system and supports quality system audits, reviews results with audit team, and participates in management review meetings. Provides training and/or supervision to co-workers, inspectors, technicians and auditors on quality procedures and tools to monitor critical processes to assure consistent control and/or to implement cost-saving ideas to improve our products to meet customer expectations.Requirements for the Quality Engineer4 year Degree in a technical field. 1+ years experience working with PPAPs (Production Part Approval Process)Benefits for the Quality Engineer401KHealthcareThis Job is located in East Moline, IL -> United States",Quality Engineer - Customer Support/Product Delivery/FMEA Job in East Moline,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"East Moline, IL 61244",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Customer-Support-Product-Delivery-FMEA-Job-East-Moline-IL-US-164901079.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=17,30.00 - 35.00 $ /hour,,f94d71121218168931fcd2145cffd275
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:23:43:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryThe Data Persistence Team is responsible for serialization of MATLAB data. Join the team responsible for developing automated test suites in C++ and conducting hands-on testing of new data persistence interfaces for MATLAB. Test data serialization for greater performance, robustness, and integration across multiple devices.You will have an opportunity to work with diverse technologies and programming languages such as C++, .NET, JSON and XML. You will qualify critical and new features like new MAT file formats to support Big Data applications.The Quality Engineer will serve as an advocate for software quality and is responsible for the development of testing strategies for new features. As a member of the MATLAB language development team, the Quality Engineer will participate in projects from their early design stages and play a critical role in driving them to final product release.Responsibilities Writing test plans and procedures Writing automated tests and test tools in C++ and MATLAB Working closely with the Engineering, User Experience, and Documentation teams Contributing to design reviews for product development Interacting with cross functional teamsMinimum Qualifications A bachelor's degree and 3 years of professional work experience (or a master's degree) is required. Familiar with object oriented design Proficiency with C++Additional Qualifications MS in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or related field, or BS in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or related field plus 3 years experience Proficiency in MATLAB programming, including familarity with MATLAB indexing, structures, and writing functions and scripts 1-2 years experience with quality engineering and the software development lifecycle Experience profiling and testing for performance a plus Familiarity with different computer platforms a plus Why MathWorks?It’s the chance to collaborate with bright, passionate people. It’s contributing to software products that make a difference in the world. And it’s being part of a company with an incredible commitment to doing the right thing – for each individual, our customers, and the local community. MathWorks develops MATLAB and Simulink, the leading technical computing software used by engineers and scientists. The company employs 3000 people in 15 countries, with headquarters in Natick, Massachusetts, U.S.A. MathWorks is privately held and has been profitable every year since its founding in 1984. MathWorks, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here.",Software Engineer in Test - Data Persistence Job in Natick,Full Time,"Natick, MA",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Software-Engineer-in-Test-Data-Persistence-Job-Natick-MA-US-165370643.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a264b4e3e4e015fdc7f585d568881c12
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:22:56:42,No,jobs.monster.com," ABOUT CHROMADEX:ChromaDex® is an innovative natural products company that discovers, acquires, develops and commercializes proprietary-based ingredient technologies which utilizes ingredient technologies, phytochemicals, chemistry and analytical testing services and product regulatory and safety consulting.  The Company provides seamless science-based solutions to the dietary supplement, food & beverage, animal health, cosmetic and pharmaceutical industries. Benefits include: Medical, dental, vision, matching 401k and more JOB SUMMARY:  ChromaDex Analytics has an immediate opening for a full-time Analytical Services Managerwith strong commitment to excellence and integrity. The right candidate will be responsible for overseeingall the daily operations and activities of the Analytical Services Group, training, organizing and coordinating the analysis of samples and projects to support outside clients and other groups within the Company. In addition, the right candidate will also maintain work systems, procedures and policies that enable and encourage optimum performance of subordinates to meet expectations of productivity, quality and goals.  Main duties include:Addressing complex technical challenges using independent thought and insight to reach across cross functional departments.Working on complex problems in which analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of various factors.  Overseeing analysis of intangible variables using expert knowledge of scientific principles and concepts.Guiding the development, optimization and validation analytical methods for testing various raw materials, dietary supplements and other products.Conducting appropriate Operational Qualification of analytical instrumentation for proper operation.Supervise all activities and personnel within the Analytical Services group.Provide leadership and training to laboratory personnel in the proper use of instrumentation, documentation, and reporting.Develop methods for the analysis of various applications.Write and review proposals, reports, methods, SOP’s and training manuals. As primary contact, effectively communicate project progress to customers, upper level management, other departments, and laboratory staff.  Organize, delegate, oversee projects and assignments ensuring accurate and timely completion of daily functions.Provide and implement certification plans and plans to increase productivity and efficiency.Ensure quality control and comply with good laboratory practices and ISO 17025 standards. Other duties may also include:Work with HR and/or Legal departments to promote a positive atmosphere, train employees on company policies and help resolve personnel issues as needed. Work with safety manager to protect safety and wellbeing of Analytical Services personnel. Required Competencies:Extensive knowledge of analytical instrumentation and methodology.Strong organizational and project management skills needed to prioritize projects.  Desired Skills/Knowledge:Knowledge of computer programs such as Access, Excel, Word, and PowerPoint. Knowledge of natural product and dietary supplement analysisKnowledge of ISO and cGMP requirements.  Training, Education, Experience:B.S. or B.A. degree in Chemistry or closely related field5+ years of analytical chemistry experience.  1 to 3 years of laboratory management experience.  Working Conditions:Must be able to perform routine tasks repeatedly, efficiently, and accurately in a timely manner, occasionally lifting up to 30 lbs. Must be able to work in a laboratory setting for extended periods and function safely and effectively under the environmental challenges associated with handling various raw materials, finished products, or fine chemicals (exposure to chemicals, carcinogens, corrosive and other chemicals).Must be capable of understanding, listening and following verbal and written instructions to accomplish desired goals and have the ability to communicate verbally and in writing all levels of the organization.  Interested Candidates: Please email resumes to hr@chromadex.comwith the heading “Analytical Service Manager” for review and consideration.  Applicants who do not meet the minimum requirements will not be considered. Selected candidates who meet the minimum requirements will be contacted for phone interviews, however, due to the volume of applicants, no confirmation will be provided of application status.  All replies are confidential and at the company’s discretion.  Unsolicited services or offers from staffing agencies or recruiters will not be accepted at this time. ChromaDex®, Inc. is an equal employment opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, sex, national origin, religion, physical handicap, marital status, veteran status, sexual orientation or any other basis prohibited by law. ",Laboratory - Analytical Services Manager Job in Boulder,Full Time,"Boulder, CO 80301",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Laboratory-Analytical-Services-Manager-Job-Boulder-CO-US-164486579.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,"60,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),97f3d882aeb21bc1b954be8e123164ff
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:22:55:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director of Immunoassay Development-POS_75033754-1DescriptionThe Translational Science and Biomarker group at Sanofi Pasteur in Orlando is seeking a Director to serve a leadership role for the VaxDesign campus, which is responsible for the design and implementation of in vitro human immune-based studies to assess vaccines, biologics, antigens, etc. The ideal candidate will provide inspiring scientific leadership, including driving our platform into new areas, creatively tackling the technical challenges facing team members, and applying innovative thought and processes throughout their work. This person will have to demonstrate their ability to be a pace-setting scientist, both internally and externally, to the company. They will also serve as a respected company asset in the external research community and a repository of expertise for the campus. The ideal candidate will also be expected to give scientific presentations and publish in peer-reviewed journals; they should be recognized for expertise in their chosen field of study.: Directors are expected to play diverse roles at the VaxDesign Campus:Oversee broad technical area within the company. Participate in business development forums and interact with other scientific experts. Directly oversees and participates in the preparation of proposals and reports.Be accountable for the representation and promotion of the scientific interests of the company via the publication of papers, the giving of scientific presentations, and by encouraging and identifying new research and funding opportunities.Work with senior management to develop, implement, and monitor the short, medium, and long-term scientific plans, programs, and projects of the campus.Manage programs to meet strategic objectives (deliverables), budgets, and deadlines. Manage research teams in a way that fosters a team-based culture and ensures positive interactions with other teams both internal and external to the company.Undertake annual HR review processes and sets goals/targets for the teams.Sanofi Pasteur, the vaccines division of Sanofi, is a global company that provides more than one billion doses of vaccine each year, making it possible to immunize more than 500 million people across the globe. A world leader in the vaccine industry, Sanofi Pasteur offers the broadest range of vaccines protecting against 20 infectious diseases.The company's heritage, to create vaccines that protect life, dates back more than a century. Every day, the company invests more than one million Euros in research and development.Sanofi, an integrated global healthcare leader, discovers, develops and distributes therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in the field of healthcare with seven growth platforms: diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and the new Genzyme.QualificationsKnowledge and Skill Required: This position requires a Ph.D. degree and 10+ years of solid and documented expertise in cell biology, immunology, biochemistry, molecular spectroscopy or other research/analytical area pertinent to VaxDesign areas of activity. The ideal candidate will have demonstrated leadership capacity, such that they can inspire and consolidate their team to meet the objectives of the campus and facilitate collaborative bonds with other teams both within and outside of VaxDesign. Sanofi Pasteur SA and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; nationality; marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; sex, gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; disability; veteran or military status or liability for military status; domestic violence victim status; atypical cellular or blood trait; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by law.Job:Laboratory/Process/Device DevelopmentPrimary Location:United States-Florida-OrlandoJob Posting:Mar 15, 2016, 12:38:49 PMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Director of Immunoassay Development Job in Orlando,"Full Time, Employee","Orlando, FL",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Immunoassay-Development-Job-Orlando-FL-US-165880907.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=7,,General/Other: R&D/Science,e57814491f9f62c577dc32ce6734c8d7
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:21:47:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Quality Assurance (QA) ManagerCabot, VT  This salaried position will play a major leadership role in quality and food safety programs for our two plants (manufacturing and packaging) and for all of their products.  Excellent technical knowledge of cheese and cultured dairy manufacturing is preferred.  The successful candidate must be motivated to learn all aspects of our lab facilities, and demonstrate a commitment to achieve excellence in customer satisfaction, process, and product quality / reliability. Qualified candidates must have a Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in a scientific field, and at least three (3) years’ experience in a food manufacturing / dairy environment in a supervisory / management role.  Commensurate experience in lieu of education will be seriously considered.  A solid understanding of microbiology and food science with SQF or equivalent experience is preferred.  Ideal candidates must have strong analytical, deductive reasoning and attention to detail skills, the ability to interpret and implement regulatory rulings, excellent problem solving, interpersonal communication and project management skills, good computer skills, and leadership experience that inspires team confidence and respect. Cabot Creamery offers a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package.  Apply online to jobs@cabotcheese.com, or mail your resume w/ cover letter to: Cabot Creamery CooperativeAttn: Human Resources193 Home Farm WayWaitsfield, VT  05673EOE     M/F/D/V",Quality Assurance (QA) Manager Job in Cabot,Full Time,"Cabot, VT",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-QA-Manager-Job-Cabot-VT-US-165221314.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=3,,,39f65ff775cccc19fd4aef13b9a5b9ff
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:21:46:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our customer is a full service precision machine shop, specializing in Swiss-Type machined components and subassemblies for the dental, medical, aerospace, commercial, telecom, automotive and defense industries. They have an immediate need for a CMM Lead Programmer; this is a first shift position. This is a contract to direct hire position working 4-10 hour days. This is a leadership role position. Company is located in a NE suburb of Minneapolis, MN. Primary duties and responsibilities Experience programming and running OGP (vision system) Inspection of tight tolerance parts per blue print and sample plan for in-process and Final inspection. Candidate must have Blue print understanding with GD&T knowledge. Using inspection tools (i.e. micrometers, calipers, drop indicators, thread gauges, plug gauges, comparators etc.) Candidate must know how to apply measurement techniques to dimensions including GD&T call-outs. Solid communication skills and the ability to work under minimal supervision. Candidate needs to be self-motivated team player with excellent work ethic. Maintain clean and organized work environment.  For Immediate ConsiderationCall Mike for details at 763-561-1061, email resume to materials@nerinc.com",CMM Lead Programmer Job in Minneapolis,Full Time,"Minneapolis, MN",,http://jobview.monster.com/CMM-Lead-Programmer-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-165481171.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=7,,,cbf1589442216f2cdcbf93644dfca92c
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:21:19:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position will use the candidate’s regulatory expertise on underground storage tanks (UST) sites to coordinate and consult with the California State Water Resources Control Board (State Water Board) on the rewrite and revision of the current State of California UST regulations.  The purpose of the work is to update the State Water Board’s UST regulations due to recent changes inacted by the Environmental Protection Agency to Federal UST regulations.The Senior UST Regulatory Specialist will be responsible for digesting and understanding the aspects of the recent changes to the Federal regulations and their correlation with State UST regulations. The position will require working with the California State Water Board on a regular basis and attending and participating in meetings with State Water Board’s decision makers on a bi-weekly basis in order to gain consensus and concurrence from stakeholders on regulatory implementation. The Senior UST Regulatory Specialist will apply practical knowledge and experience of UST regulations, statutes, governence, and regulatory drivers to ensure meaningful and applicable regulations.  The Senior UST Regulatory Specialist will be responsible for drafting concise language and will follow established protocol for regulation adaption by the State.   This position is currently a 12-month position with an opportunity to extend beyond the 12 month period.   It is anticipated that this position will require 32 hours per week.REQUIREMENTS:-Experience working with regulatory agencies-Strong communication skills-Self-starter with the ability to take initiative and drive results-An understanding of the design, operation, and maintenance of UST systems. -Have a working knowledge of the California State Water Resources Control Board policies and regulations-Have 5+ years as a Underground Tank Inspector and/or working for a Certified Unified Program agency-Extensive and direct experience in the implementation and knowledge of the fire code, electrical code, and building code-Experience in drafting Federal, state or local ordinance-Need to be able to sign a non-disclosure agreement, an agreement to not use the information gained during the project for financial gain, and confirm that there is no conflict of interest.-Ability to attend face to face multiple day meetings in Sacramento, and bi-weekly face-to-face meetings in the State Water Boards office in Sacramento.PLEASE APPLY VIA THE FOLLOWING LINK:   https://www.appone.com/MainInfoReq.asp?R_ID=1255918   ",Senior UST Regulatory Specialist_CNT Job in Sacramento,Full Time,"Sacramento, CA 95815",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-UST-Regulatory-Specialist_CNT-Job-Sacramento-CA-US-165768625.aspx?mescoid=1300079001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),04f080b1c063267f4d2c30baf48409b8
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:20:59:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br />",Environmental Technician CBPP Job in Monee,Full Time Employee,"Monee, IL",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Environmental-Technician-CBPP-Job-Monee-IL-US-165270724.aspx?mescoid=1900302001001&jobPosition=17,,Biotech/R&D/Science,f3d61cb6354da9369f490f12b0cd4ca1
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:20:57:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionIronNet Cybersecurity, is looking for mid-level Software Quality Assurance Engineer for browser based application testing, API integration testing, and backend component testing. Ideal candidates will be able to conduct a wide range of tests and analysis with full competency to ensure that software, systems, and services meet minimum standards and defined end-user and system requirements. ResponsibilitiesVerify component, system integration and application level features and functionality to ensure reliability, accuracy and performance reaches quality standards.Test, through all stages of the software lifecycle.Design, maintain, and execute test cases.Work with software engineers to analyze test results and debug problems.Translates assigned end-user requirements into fully documented test cases and scripts in accordance with approved test plans.Interacts with test team and other groups to identify, create, and maintain test data needed to execute test cases.Plan, design, develop, verify, deploy and maintain automated test cases.Evaluates results of test execution and records, retests, and closes defects when expected results not achieved.Report progress and issues to management and participates in development team status meetings as required.Participates in review of project requirements to understand test objectives and to provide input on testability of requirements. Requirements4-6 years practical QA experience.Understanding of software development lifecycle and agile development processes.Comprehension of test management, defect tracking, and requirements management tools.Experience with any/all of the following: Python, JavaScript, Java, C++, SQL.Strong debugging skills, ability to spot design flaws, race conditions, and performance bottlenecks across system architecture.Strong verbal and written communication, attention to detail, and analytical/problem-solving skills required.Experience testing in Linux, Windows and Mac OSX.Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience. Desirable QualificationsAbility to perform browser debugging with Chrome Web Tools, JSON objects, and CSSUnderstanding of fundamental computer science concepts; experience in analysis and implementation of data structures, algorithms, and software design.Ability to clearly define test strategies for features, and implement those strategies.Knowledge of Cybersecurity Analysis, Incident Response, and Network Engineering is a plus.",QA Engineer Job in Fulton,Full Time,"Fulton, MD 20759",,http://jobview.monster.com/QA-Engineer-Job-Fulton-MD-US-164859524.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1bf42faa7f0a03c6769d097d977ba399
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:20:20:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"The position has direct responsibility for managing the Plant Quality Assurance Department and to provide high quality products that meet customer expectations and comply with USDA and Smithfield Policies and Regulations, using the Smithfield Quality System. Must provide solid leadership to achieve company, plant, and department goals through various management, evaluation and improvement skills and strategies that improve overall quality and profitability. Is expected to master and implement all QA policies, programs and procedures and must be able to manage and effectively follow up on multiple projects and assignments. The Plant QA Manager reports directly to the Corporate QA Manager. include the following. Other duties may be assigned.1. 25% Quality Verification & Regulatory Compliance - On a daily basis the employee is responsible for seeing that all QA and Regulatory programs are followed, must make sound decisions and execute quality oversight. This will be accomplished while managing the Quality Assurance employees. Success is judged based on the employee's and the department's ability to execute the quality objectives as directed by the Corporate Quality Assurance Manager, as well as the adherence and execution of all Smithfield policies and programs associated with Foods Safety, Quality, and Regulatory Compliance.2. 25% Quality Improvement – Employee must take initiative, be solution oriented and work to prevent process or product failures by working with QA staff members and Operations to drive continuous improvement of product quality through developing quality plans, process controls, attention to process and specifications, and quality training. This will be judged through product performance, customer satisfaction and the cost of non-conformance along with how well special projects, including those assigned by the Corporate QA Manager are managed and executed.3. 20% Personnel Management – Employee must provide solid leadership and effectively manage staff members so quality and personal objectives are met. Employee is responsible for managing HR duties, performance plans, work schedules, vacations, assignments, and special projects as well as training and personnel development for staff.4. 15% Sanitation and Food Safety Support - Employee is responsible for insuring that operational and pre-operational sanitation is acceptable, as well as implementing and developing necessary verification activities including micro sampling to verify the effectiveness of sanitation. Responsibilities include managing and training staff members so at the necessary completion of Food Safety, CCP and sanitation paperwork that should ultimately result in no FS deviations. GMP and Sanitation audits are conducted by the department as required with documented corrective actions and follow-up as necessary. The Manager is required to take action in response to negative micro and Shelf Life data to drive improvement.5. 15% Personal and Professional Performance – Employee should seek continued education to enhance management and technical skills. Employee is expected to conduct daily activities in a professional manner, dress professionally, be at work on time, and follow company policies for time off.To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential dutysatisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonableaccommodations may be made to enable individuals to perform the essential functions.Education: Bachelor's degree (B.A.) in Food Science or related field and 5-8 years experience in the meat industry andprocesses; or equivalent combination of education and experience.Competencies:Knowledge and understanding of food science and meat processing.Knowledge of USDA, FSIS, HACCP, and SSOP requirements.Knowledge of SPC and statistics.Working knowledge of quality assurance principles.Ability to uphold regulatory, company, and customer standards.Ability to respond to common inquiries or complaints from customers, regulatory agencies, or members of the business community.Knowledge of Database software; Inventory software; Manufacturing software; Spreadsheet and WordProcessing software; QMS system and SAP.Must be able to travel up to 10% of the time.PI93120590Apply Here",Quality Assurance Manager (Fresh) Job in Smithfield,Full Time Employee,"Smithfield, VA 23430",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Manager-Fresh-Job-Smithfield-VA-US-164893190.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=18,,Quality Assurance/Safety,c8eefd8996827bf8c2519ccf99a71585
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:19:51:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"*HIRING EVENT*Locate Technician Positions AvailableUSIC is one of the nation's fastest growing underground utility locating companies. We have full-time Locate Technician positions available throughout the Austin area. The starting pay is $14.00 per hour. Prior locating experience is not required!Take the first step toward starting your locating career and join us at our upcoming job fair:Thursday, April 14th12:00 p.m. – 5:00 p.m.La Quinta Inn - Austin Round Rock North2004 North Interstate Highway 35Round Rock, TX 78681BENEFITS INCLUDE: • 100% paid training • Company vehicle – all vehicle expenses paid • Company laptop, phone and equipment • Advancement opportunities – we promote from within the company • Medical, dental, vision and life insurance • Paid holidays • 401(k) with company match QUALIFICATIONS: • Must be able to work outdoors in all types of weather conditions • Must be able to work in a confined space; walk, bend, and lift up to 75 pounds • Must be computer proficient • Must be available to work overtime and some weekends (as needed) • Must pass a drug screen • HS Diploma or GED required • Valid driver’s license and safe driving record required If you are unable to attend our job fair, please apply online at http://usicllc.source2.com . For technical assistance, please contact our Recruiting Center at 407-480-5545. EEO/AA",Utility Locate Technician Hiring Event // Job in Round Rock,Full Time,"Round Rock, TX 78681",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Utility-Locate-Technician-Hiring-Event-4-14-16-Job-Round-Rock-TX-US-165221827.aspx?mescoid=5100985001001&jobPosition=2,14.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,,be93982690cebf0344962b7b5ed6e2d3
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:19:46:09,No,jobs.monster.com,The Glenmontgroup currently has a Temp to Permanent opening for a QA engineer to work in an cutting edge up and coming software development company based out of Lakewood NJ. This positions is starting off as a w2 hourly contractor then converting to a yearly salary.If interested please send resumes to mike.devito@glenmontgroup.com In this role you will be working as a QA tester/analyst testing applications and reviewing scripts written by the development team. An attention for detail is a MUST as you will be the final set of eyes before applications are presented to clients. Testing will be Manual.,Temp to Perm Manual QA Tester (W only) Job in Lakewood,Full Time,"Lakewood, NJ",,http://jobview.monster.com/Temp-to-Perm-Manual-QA-Tester-W2-only-Job-Lakewood-NJ-US-165905117.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3ade941e1cb4a9b73d69ef2874d90580
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:19:45:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"About UsPrecision Analysis is a fast paced testing and fast growing measurement company serving the oil and gas industry. We have a full service laboratory, gas measurement field services, and air quality emissions testing field services. We currently have office/lab locations in Texas, Colorado, Wyoming and North Dakota.Position SummaryThis position works in the lab performing testing, analysis and reporting of gas, water and oil samples. This also involves cleaning cylinders and shipping, logging and tracking samples.Job Duties• Perform testing and analysis on samples including gas, oil, grease and water• Use LIMS system to log and track work samples• Follow safety and standard protocol procedures• Cleans and assist in maintaining lab equipment, lab area and work area• Process Chain of Custody forms• Assists with shipping/shipping reporting • Participate in accountability meetings with Lab Manager• Answer phones and place customer service calls as needed providing exceptional customer service • Cross-trained to function in all areas of the lab • Additional projects and duties as assigned Knowledge, Skills and Requirements• College course work in Science or Chemistry• Previous laboratory experience preferred• Proven analytical skills• Ability to solve problems effectively• Strong computer skills including Microsoft Office• Ability to work independently and on a team• Ability to learn new and apply new software programs• Ability to multi-task and prioritize work• Strong organizational skills• Excellent communication skills• Physical ability for the following: o Ability to sit, stand, stoop, bend, and lift and carry items o Normal range of vision and hearing o Manual dexterity o Ability to lift up to 40 poundsPosition TypeFull-TimeBenefitsWe offer health, dental, vision and retirement benefits as well as paid holidays and paid time off programs.",Lab Technician Job in Windsor,Full Time,"Windsor, CO 80550",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Lab-Technician-Job-Windsor-CO-US-165901675.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=8,,Entry Level,3390f9e63a3dd8029d1f93fb6293227a
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:18:58:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Compliance Analyst Description SUMMARY OF POSITION: Develops and manages the process that establishes and maintains quality assurance and regulatory programs, policies, processes, procedures and controls to ensure that the performance and quality of products conform to established standards and agency guidelines ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: 1. Manage CAPA workstream, CAPA investigations, CAPA & compliance audit trending of quality data streams. 2. Develop & establish continuously improving plans for site CAPA system, quality assurance programs & quality policies. 3. Plan, schedule & execute internal quality audits program for ventilation design sites. 4. Lead a team of auditor(s) to perform audits / assessments by collecting and analyzing objective evidence regarding issues and risks. Report findings (verbally and written) to management. 5. Evaluate corrective and preventive action responses to the assessment findings for adequacy, including root cause and timeliness. Elevate issues to management, as appropriate. 6. Provide expertise and guidance in interpreting governmental regulations, agency guidelines and internal policies to assure compliance. 7. Develop and maintain compliance policies supporting the Respiratory and Monitoring quality system. 8. Lead process improvement projects and conduct training with Quality to improve the GBUs overall quality system compliance. 9. Assist with site regulatory compliance specific needs such as external audit preparation, assessment of quality plans, responses to internal and external audit observations. 10. Maintain working knowledge of existing and proposed domestic and international medical device regulations and guidance documents and their impact on Medtronic's operations. 11. Prepare management reports depicting trends and useful data for management review purposes. 12. Support management during external inspections and participate in the management of external inspections as required. DEPARTMENT SPECIFIC/NON-ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: 1. Adheres to the competencies and skills for the specified position as defined in the Quality Professional Leveling Matrix. 2. Other duties as assigned with or without accommodation. MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS: Education / Experience: BS with 10-15 years Desirable but not essential: MS with 3-5 years PhD with 0-3 years Skills/Qualifications: Auditing experience to the 21CFR820.30, 21CFR820.100, ISO13485, IS0 14971:2012, CMDR and the Medical Device Directive. Formal training in CAPA compliance & Investigation techniques. Risk Management, ISO 14971, FTA, Design FMEA, Comparative Statistical techniques & sampling plans. Preferred Skills/Competencies: Previous experience working in a cross-functional team environment. ASQ CQE, CQA, CSQE and/or CRE certification. Familiar with statistical software tools (Minitab, Stat Graphics, Statistical), Familiar with IEC 60601 and product specific industry standards. DFSS / Lean Green Belt or Black Belt Other Skills: Computer literate and experience with PCs, networks, and applications Some travel required ORGANIZATIONAL RELATIONSHIPS/SCOPE: Position reports to: Quality Manager, New Product Development. Interface with: Project Manager(s), cross-functional project team(s), and quality colleagues. WORKING CONDITIONS: Performs work in engineering development labs, production facilities and normal office environments. DISCLAIMER: The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees assigned to this classification. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of employees assigned to this position.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Compliance Analyst Job in Carlsbad,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Compliance Analyst,"Carlsbad, CA 92008",http://jobview.monster.com/Compliance-Analyst-Job-Carlsbad-CA-US-165906725.aspx?mescoid=1300073001001&jobPosition=4,,Quality Assurance/Safety,87b46751647ebf3a5f12de585a0b925e
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:18:57:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"DRS Technologies is a leading supplier of integrated products, services and support to military forces, intelligence agencies and prime contractors worldwide. Focused on defense technology, we develop, manufacture and support a broad range of systems for mission critical and military sustainment requirements, as well as homeland security.   Headquartered in Arlington, VA, the Company is a wholly owned subsidiary of Finmeccanica S.p.A. which employs more than 70,000 people worldwide. We offer a competitive compensation package and a business culture which rewards performance. For additional information on DRS, please visit our website at www.drs.com   DRS Technologies, DRS Training & Control Systems (TCS), Fort Walton Beach, FL, provides engineering, manufacturing, and support of defense and aerospace systems for sea, land, air, and space use.  Our product and service areas include electronic control and monitoring systems, aerospace material handling systems, simulation and training systems, aerospace support equipment, contract manufacturing, engineering, and product support. In addition, DRS TCS has contract logistics support operations domestically as well as in Europe and the Middle East.   Job Location Fort Walton Beach, Florida Title:   Inspector III Quality Position Summary: Performs complex inspection activities, to assess conformance of products to the design as defined by the engineering drawings and/or models.   Duties and Responsibilities: Performs complex inspection activities, to assess conformance of products to the design as defined by the engineering drawings and/or models Inspects products, components, subassemblies, and/or systems to ensure conformance to requirements Adds organizational value by implementing innovative solutions and best practices involved in all processes of the product realization value stream Supports Quality Engineers with identifying nonconforming conditions that present existing or impending defective conditions at the system or subsystem level of assembly Oversees the preparation of inspection plans and checklists for inspections Aids with data collection and root cause analysis investigations Generate discrepancy notices and initiate Material Review Board actions Perform material movement transactions after completing inspection process Specializes in receiving inspection, in-process inspection, process verification/auditing, final inspection, etc Support, communicate, reinforce and defend the mission, values and culture of the organization   Basic Qualifications:   High School Diploma or GED with 5+ years of applicable Quality Inspection experience In-depth understanding of relevant manufacturing standards (such as J-Std-001/IPC-A-610) AND common mechanical techniques (such as geometric dimensioning and tolerance practices) Ability to use various measurement devices (calipers, pin gauges, go/no-go gauges, etc) to verify mechanical part compliance Experience reading mechanical drawings and able to verify parts dimensions against drawing requirements Experience using a Coordinate Measuring Machine (CMM), Optical comparator or other complex inspection systems is desired Knowledge of Cables, CCAs, and Electromechanical Assemblies Working knowledge of Microsoft Office Familiar with Oracle or Deltek CostPoint or similar ERP Business Systems Ability to effectively communicate and present information to team members Knowledge of and experience with Precision Machining, Heat Treatment, Welding, Chemical Treatment, Metrology and NDT   DRS Technologies, Inc. is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. We consider applicants without regard to race, color, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital or veteran status, or any other category protected by federal, state or local law. #MCSS Additional Information:Position Start Date: 2016-03-18Position End Date: 2016-05-05",Inspector III Quality Job in Fort Walton Beach,Full Time Employee,"DRS Technologies is a leading supplier of integrated products, services and support to military forces, intelligence agencies and prime contractors worldwide. Focused on defense technology, we develop, manufacture and support a broad range of systems for mission critical and military sustainment requirements, as well as homeland security.   Headquartered in Arlington, VA, the Company is a wholly owned subsidiary of Finmeccanica S.p.A. which employs more than 70,000 people worldwide. We offer a competitive compensation package and a business culture which rewards performance. For additional information on DRS, please visit our website at www.drs.com   DRS Technologies, DRS Training & Control Systems (TCS), Fort Walton Beach, FL, provides engineering, manufacturing, and support of defense and aerospace systems for sea, land, air, and space use.  Our product and service areas include electronic control and monitoring systems, aerospace material handling systems, simulation and training systems, aerospace support equipment, contract manufacturing, engineering, and product support. In addition, DRS TCS has contract logistics support operations domestically as well as in Europe and the Middle East.   Job Location Fort Walton Beach, Florida Title:   Inspector III Quality Position Summary: Performs complex inspection activities, to assess conformance of products to the design as defined by the engineering drawings and/or models.   Duties and Responsibilities: Performs complex inspection activities, to assess conformance of products to the design as defined by the engineering drawings and/or models Inspects products, components, subassemblies, and/or systems to ensure conformance to requirements Adds organizational value by implementing innovative solutions and best practices involved in all processes of the product realization value stream Supports Quality Engineers with identifying nonconforming conditions that present existing or impending defective conditions at the system or subsystem level of assembly Oversees the preparation of inspection plans and checklists for inspections Aids with data collection and root cause analysis investigations Generate discrepancy notices and initiate Material Review Board actions Perform material movement transactions after completing inspection process Specializes in receiving inspection, in-process inspection, process verification/auditing, final inspection, etc Support, communicate, reinforce and defend the mission, values and culture of the organization   Basic Qualifications:   High School Diploma or GED with 5+ years of applicable Quality Inspection experience In-depth understanding of relevant manufacturing standards (such as J-Std-001/IPC-A-610) AND common mechanical techniques (such as geometric dimensioning and tolerance practices) Ability to use various measurement devices (calipers, pin gauges, go/no-go gauges, etc) to verify mechanical part compliance Experience reading mechanical drawings and able to verify parts dimensions against drawing requirements Experience using a Coordinate Measuring Machine (CMM), Optical comparator or other complex inspection systems is desired Knowledge of Cables, CCAs, and Electromechanical Assemblies Working knowledge of Microsoft Office Familiar with Oracle or Deltek CostPoint or similar ERP Business Systems Ability to effectively communicate and present information to team members Knowledge of and experience with Precision Machining, Heat Treatment, Welding, Chemical Treatment, Metrology and NDT   DRS Technologies, Inc. is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. We consider applicants without regard to race, color, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital or veteran status, or any other category protected by federal, state or local law. #MCSS Additional Information:Position Start Date: 2016-03-18Position End Date: 2016-05-05",,http://jobview.monster.com/Inspector-III-Quality-Job-Fort-Walton-Beach-FL-US-165017626.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=19,,Quality Assurance/Safety,19a2314706587b3c0d966cd5495edf69
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:17:50:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary: The Senior Clinical Research Associate (Sr CRA) participates in the conduct of single and multi-center clinical research studies, presents at monitor training meetings and investigator meetings, monitors recruitment and overall study progress, addresses issues as they arise within the realm of the Sr. CRA position, and makes decisions with the guidance of the Clinical Research Manager (CRM). The Sr. CRA prepares study update reports and graphs. The Sr. CRA provides these functions for one or more studies simultaneously. The Sr. CRA position serves as support to the CRM thought the conduct of the study. This individual will be required to have technical, leadership and interpersonal competencies. This position will assure compliance with Good Clinical Practices and FIPCUS policies and procedures. Responsibilities: Participate in the planning of a study or multiple studies with the CRM. Perform operation and administrative duties assigned by the CRM. Assist with the CRO selection process and ensure contractual obligations are met. Assist the CRM with site study budget negotiations and payments. Assist CRM with Vendor identification and selection and payments vis a vis contractual agreements. Contribute to development of a payment schedule section for Vendors and process/obtain approval from management. Assist the CRM as a lead CRA to study start up, study execution and close out activities. Assist in the development and coordination of protocols and informed consent forms. Assist in the planning and coordinating investigation meetings. Prepare and present protocol and general study-related presentation to field monitors, investigations and adequately informed of protocol requirements, standard operating procedures and monitoring procedures. Review data in the electronic data capture system; enter and reconcile queries as necessary. May also be involved in query resolution. Assist in trend review. Participate in the development of site reference materials. Monitor site preparation, including sending regulatory document packages to sites. Assist the sites in obtaining the required forms and passwords for all electronic systems. Prepare training materials related to monitoring practices and procedures to be presented at monitor training meetings to ensure that the monitors are adequately informed of monitoring requirements and procedures. Review site qualification monitoring visit reports to assess site eligibility to participate in the study. Review monitoring reports throughout the study to ensure that sites are adhering to the protocol and to identify potential issues and propose solutions. Track and report on monitoring activities. Assist the CRM in CRO in vendor management, including independently holding meetings to identify and resolve issues. Maintain open lines of communication. Monitor ongoing progress of enrollment and other benchmarks at the investigative sites to assess adherence to the study protocol and timelines. Maintain FIPCUS internal tracking systems, including budgets and expenditures. Mentor CRA's regarding regulatory accuracy and set-up of the Trial Master File. Perform operation and administrative duties assigned by the CRM. Mentoring junior CRAs Ensure that conduct of all studies follow local or global SOPs and regulatory requirements. Requirements: A minimum of a bachelor's degree is required, preferably in a health or science related field. A RN or BSN is strongly preferred. A minimum of 5 years of experience in Clinical Research is required. Global experience is a plus. Must have experience with site qualification, initiation, regular monitoring and site close-out visits. Demonstrates an understanding of regulatory requirements including a working knowledge of FDA GCP and ICH guidelines. Must have knowledge of EDC system. Must have good written and verbal skills to communicate effectively with investigators and departmental personnel about protocol related topics. Must be able to present reports and updates at Project and Staff meetings (PowerPoint) Ability to make independent decisions for CRM back up. Must possess strong technical skills and include a working knowledge of Microsoft Office.",Senior Associate,"Full Time , Employee","Parsippany, NJ",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Associate-Clinical-Operations-Job-Parsippany-NJ-US-164805219.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=13,,Biotech/R&D/Science,89c91b7107b643aa4ea58a321a65ead5
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:17:49:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Through its people and brands, CNH Industrial delivers power, technology and innovation to farmers, builders and drivers all around the world. Each of its brands, including Case IH, New Holland Agriculture, Case and New Holland Construction, FPT Industrial, Capital, and Parts & Service, is a major international force in its specific sector. The New Product Quality Specialist (NPQ) is the platform core team member responsible for all aspects of quality affecting New Product and launches. This opening is responsible for supporting the Crop Protection platform. Main Roles / Responsibilities:Lead/execute the quality actions required in each phase of the Global Product Development (GPD) Process. During the GPD phases, continuously assess the quality status of the program, take actions within the platform to address issues and to define acceptable standards. Escalate unresolved issues as appropriate to facilitate resolution.Responsible for the deployment of Quality tools and lead the Quality and Reliability portion of the Risk Assessment checklist.Facilitate the disciplined execution of the Q&R Priority Tools (FMEA, Fault Tree Analysis, Control Plans, and other statistical techniques) through the design review process. As an expert reference on these tools, s/he must understand when each of these tools are used and how they are triggered, to ensure effective application to both hardware and software.Co-Develop robust and verifiable product requirements documents with the Product Marketing and Platform Manager for each project.Champion the ranking, tracking, and resolution of issues from Design Reviews, Design FMEAs, and test plans ensuring they are resolved prior to OKTS.Drive the Reliability Growth Process, specifically the development of the New Content Risk Index (NCRI) and the Proactive Activities Plan. Support the development of the Engineering Test Plan and Design Validation Plan along with the Engineering and PV teams and monitor the compliance of the plan.Set Quality and Reliability Goals for each project that align to corporate objectives and ensure their compliance through execution of the Proactive Activities Plan.Assure the Test Plan evaluates the product in all target market regions and under all operating conditions. Assess the progress of the test plan against these objectives at milestone reviews.Bachelors degree in Engineering required - Agricultural, Mechanical, Electrical or Hydraulics preferred.Minimum of 5 years of relevant experience to include experience in quality and/or crop production equipment.Experience with farming equipment, large off road vehicles, mining equipment and/or automobiles.Training and facilitation skills for the application of the above tools - experience being trained on control plans.Strong organizational and project management skills with the ability to work well both independently and as part of a cross-functional team.Knowledge of quality tools: Design Reviews, FMEA, Control Plans, Fault Tree Analysis, Product Validation/Verification using statistical techniques (do not need to have experience with each and every one listed).Demonstrated experience and ability to effectively communicate quality requirements through multiple stages of production process.Ability to travel 1 week out of the month.Preferred Skills/Experience:Experience working on a farm and/or knowledge of sprayers and/or crop production equipment.Experience working with dealers.Equal opportunity employer. This company considers candidates regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.",New Product Quality Specialist Job in Benson,Full Time Employee,"Benson, MN 56215",CNH Industrial,http://jobview.monster.com/New-Product-Quality-Specialist-Job-Benson-MN-US-164678210.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=2,,Quality Assurance/Safety,c4fa5fba8ffb4c799e4a673ea946c332
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:17:38:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"cGMP/Quality - Sterility Assurance [Pharma-Biotech]-POS_00406612-1DescriptionSanofi Pasteur, the vaccines division of Sanofi, provides more than 1 billion doses of vaccine each year, making it possible to immunize more than 500 million people across the globe. A world leader in the vaccine industry, Sanofi Pasteur offers a broad range of vaccines protecting against 20 infectious diseases. The company's heritage, to create vaccines that protect life, dates back more than a century. Sanofi Pasteur is the largest company entirely dedicated to vaccines. Every day, the company invests more than EUR 1 million in research and development. For more information, please visit: www.sanofipasteur.com or www.sanofipasteur.usPosition Summary:This position will be a primary Sterility Assurance contact for the Industrial Operations.Position Responsibilities:Sterility Assurance Traffic and Gowning program in support of the FFIP Focus Factory. Develop/Support Aseptic practices, training and coaching.Provide support to the following SA programs: Aseptic Process Simulations, Environmental Monitoring, Cleaning & Disinfection and Utilities monitoring.Author, assess, revise, review and approve standard operational documents such as: Reports, Protocols, Deviation/Investigation Reports, CAPAs, Change Control Requests, Logbooks, etc.Represent SA FFIP Support group by coordinating and/or attending routine meetings, spending time on the shop floor, providing supervision and support to SA non-exempt team, providing guidance and assistance to FFIP Focus Factory team members on SA programs and practices. Represent SA FFIP Support group by providing direct support to internal, corporate, and federal regulatory inspections, by providing pertinent information and material directly to the inspection team and inspectors.Facilitate system improvements as assigned by SA Senior Management.Technical competencies and soft skills:Thorough knowledge of contamination control, disinfection, microbiology, sterility assurance, aseptic processing, cGMPs and regulatory requirements.Ability to perform training. Proficient in TrackWise systems (CCR, Deviation, CAPA), eDoc, MS Office (Word and Excel) and BlueCielio. *Or other Quality SystemsStrength in several LEAD Competencies-Think Strategically, Act for Change, Strive for Results, Cooperate Transversally, Commit to Customers, Make DecisionsSoft Skills:Communication Detail OrientedWritingPeople SkillsAnalyticalBalanced Decision MakingNegotiationOrganizationWho You AreYou are inspired and driven by the Sanofi Pasteur mission to improve worldwide human health. You would fit in well with the Sanofi values of innovation, solidarity, confidence, respect and integrity and our ways of working (Focus, Agility, Accountability and Simplicity).Sanofi Pasteur SA and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; nationality; marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; sex, gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; disability; veteran or military status or liability for military status; domestic violence victim status; atypical cellular or blood trait; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by law.#li-spQualificationsBasic QualificationsBachelor's Degree in life sciences or equivalent. 5+ years’ experience in a cGMP controlled/ pharmaceutical industry3+ years’ exp in contamination control, disinfection, microbiology, sterility assurance, aseptic processing3+ years’ exp with TrackWise systems (CCR, Deviation, CAPA), eDoc, MS Office (Word and Excel) and BlueCielio. *Or other Quality SystemsJob:QualityPrimary Location:United States-Pennsylvania-SwiftwaterJob Posting:Apr 4, 2016, 11:47:52 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",cGMP/Quality - Sterility Assurance [Pharma-Biotech] Job in Swiftwater,"Full Time, Employee","Swiftwater, PA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/cGMP-Quality-Sterility-Assurance-Pharma-Biotech-Job-Swiftwater-PA-US-165735074.aspx?mescoid=1900254001001&jobPosition=3,,General/Other: Quality Assurance/Safety,2930e8ed3129285c6fe9e33c59f3b749
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:17:37:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently working with multiple clients across West Michigan to locate quality engineers. Our positions are within furniture and automotive settings. Looking for candidates that have experience with:ISO/TSMetals/Plastics CQE-not required but desired by some clients Developing PFMEA and control plans.All levels are being considered. For immediate consideration, click ""apply"" below, or send your resume to eng@impactbusinessgroup.com iMPact Business Group is a boutique staffing and recruiting firm located in Grand Rapids, MI; Tampa, FL; and Charlotte, NC. iMPact Business Group specializes in Engineering/Operations, Information Technology, and Accounting and Finance. For more information about iMPact Business Group, visit our website at www.impactbusinessgroup.com",Quality Engineer Job in Grand Rapids,Full Time,"Grand Rapids, MI 49528",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Grand-Rapids-MI-US-165414774.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=10,,,c36f21f87f397b4aef1e57d8ba2a91ac
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:17:28:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION SUMMARYResponsible for the accurate weighing, checking and mixing of specific chemical compounds for product formulations; the calibrating and monitoring of a variety of mixing machinery and the accurate documenting and maintaining of production logbooks and records. They’re also required to follow all departmental and company SOP’s and maintain accurate and timely record keeping on each formulation batch. PRINCIPAL ACTIVITIES PERFORMED BY THE INCUMBENT Responsible for the accurate formulation of all production lotsSets-up, load, operate and monitor all mixing machine equipment for product formulationsWeigh out and mixing exact amounts of chemicals according to specific formulas while monitoring (verifying) product output from mixing equipment operations.Calibrate, operate and monitor all formulation-related equipment (such as scales, meters, etc.).Perform the operations necessary to adjust pH of product for in-process testing before releasing to production linesPerform the operations necessary to adjust Oxygen levels of Oxygen sensitive product before releasing to productionRequired to understand and perform the formulation of batches using both a volumetric and gravimetric processes based on the requirements as specified in the individual batch recordsClean and sanitizes all tanks, equipment and chemical containers used in the product formulation process in accordance with current SOP’s and cGMP’sFills out forms for recording production volumes (batches) and complies with all current GDP standardsAssumes other duties and responsibilities, as necessary, within the compounding department, in an effort to provide the required support to ensure adherence to the production schedule REQUIREMENTSPerson must have either a B.S. Degree or equivalent education and experience.  Person should have experience working in, or around, pharmaceutical manufacturing related industries.  Ability to not only perform, but understand and accurately weigh / measure chemicals in both powder and liquid form and have the ability to read and retain written SOP’s that are required within the formulation department.",Compounder - Entry Level Chemist Job in Northlake,"Full Time, Employee","Northlake, IL",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Compounder-Entry-Level-Chemist-Job-Northlake-IL-US-165866471.aspx?mescoid=5100999001001&jobPosition=20,,Biotech/R&D/Science,2f89c952583f7a4e3fb79305ddc04aa5
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:17:28:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our partner in South San Francisco is looking for a Hybridoma Researcher to join their team!Hybridoma ResearcherDutiesSupport hybridoma discovery activities for antibody therapeutic and diagnostic propertiesCoordinate with scientists in Antibody Discovery, Immuno-Oncology, Protein Sciences departmentsDesign and optimize new and current immunization processesGenerate antibodies in mouse models; no animal husbandry involvedPrepare and qualify cell banks for immunizationPerform isolation of immune cells from spleen or lymph nodes for fusionDevise and implement screening strategy with consideration of antibody design goal for each projectPerform screening of hybridoma supernatantsClone, track and prepare hybridomas for storage in liquid nitrogenProcess, analyze and compile large sets of screening dataRequirementsDegree in Life Science (BS, MS, or PhD) with industry experienceExperience with cell culture, generation of cell lines, ELISA assays, sterile tecniques, and flow cytometry are a plusExperience with cells and flow cytometry preferredExtensive experience with cell culture and cloning techniquesImmunization techniques and hybridoma generationCell-cell electrofusionScreening of antibodies against soluble and cell membrane targetsFACS experience is preferredMust be able to work in a start up like environment",Hybridoma Researcher Job in South San Francisco,Full Time,"South San Francisco, CA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Hybridoma-Researcher-Job-South-San-Francisco-CA-US-165921707.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),120b01a2a289a4edb8c35e12b835f1bd
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:17:28:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Quidel Corporation is a leading manufacturer of diagnostic healthcare solutions serving to enhance the health and well being of people around the globe with well known and respected products that provide healthcare professionals with accurate and cost-effective diagnostic information at the point of care (POC). Our core competencies and capabilities focus on immunoassay and molecular testing in the areas of: infectious disease, women’s health, and virology. Quidel is searching for a Process Group Chemist to work at our San Diego Production Facility in Mira Mesa. This role will focus on the GMP production and manufacture of biologics and immuno-related components used in our lateral flow invitro diagnostic products. The ideal candidate will have experience working in a GMP/ISO facility and technical expertise in chromatography, antibody or related purification, conjugation and/or bead coupling. This position will interact with various departments and individuals at Quidel including: inventory control, process engineering, planning, quality assurance, and facilities. Added responsibilities include: - Review/reconcile documents and work orders- Lead/support departmental troubleshooting and process improvement teams- Participate in product transfers- Write/revise documentation- Train chemists and lab technicians- Identify and articulate complex problems and assume a coaching role to less experienced personnel.- Maintain adherence to production goals- Review Device History Records and work orders and initiates corrective action through ECO’s.Education and Experience:- Bachelor’s degree in Chemistry, Biochemistry, or related scientific discipline- A minimum of 3-4 years’ experience in a GMP environment producing like material or performing like processes.Knowledge/Skills:- Laboratory skills such as protein purification, antibody conjugation, and solution preparation- Data analysis and presentation- Basic Chemistry and Biochemistry principles- Experimental Design- Strong verbal and written communication- Working knowledge of QSR’s, ISO 9001, and/or GMP.- Computer knowledge, MS Office Suite including Excel. Before you apply, please make sure you share Quidel’s values. We pride ourselves on keeping these values in mind every day as we execute on goals and plan for the future. We are seeking employees who share the same mindset and commitment to be customer driven, focused on execution, and new product oriented. We succeed by being determined, optimistic team players. Quidel is proud to be an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer (Minorities/Women/Disabled/Veterans). We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Apply Online",Process Group Chemist Job in San Diego,Employee,"San Diego, CA 92121",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Process-Group-Chemist-Job-San-Diego-CA-US-165923375.aspx?mescoid=1900259001001&jobPosition=16,,Biotech/R&D/Science,51ee45d9246045883fcbf3938aecdd2a
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:17:28:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is a great opportunity for the right person to be a part of a fast growing company that will offer you a chance to fast grow your career.  We are looking for a Sr. Project Manager with at least 5 years experience and a degree or 10 years experience without a degree.Experience working for a General Contractor is  preferred.  You must be detailed and keep accurate records, be capable of doing up front work as well as managing projects in progress to completion.  You will report directly to the Operations Manager. l  ",Sr Project Manager Job function wrap(EL,Full Time,Multiple locations,Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Project-Manager-Job-US-164949586.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,"60,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /yearbonus based on profit and performance",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),0c911a48b50a82ba17d3ac610dfbf004
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:16:55:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary/Purpose Plans and directs activities concerned with development, application and maintenance of quality standards for production processes, materials and products. Essential Duties and Accountabilities Develops and initiates standards and methods for inspection, testing and evaluation • Devises sampling procedures and designs and develops forms and instructions for recording, evaluating, and reporting quality and reliability data • Establishes program to evaluate precision and accuracy of production equipment and testing, measurements and analytical equipment and facilities • Develops and implements methods and procedures for disposition of discrepant material and devises methods to assess cost and responsibility • Directs workers engaged in measuring and testing product and tabulating data concerning materials, product or process quality and reliability • Compiles and writes training material and conducts training sessions on quality control activities • Prepares design concepts, drawings and cost estimates for gauging and tooling. Ensures timely and accurate calibration of gauges and maintenance of test equipment • Interfaces with customers using verbal, written and graphical communication tools in response to customer claims and concerns Supervisory Responsibilities This position has no supervisory responsibilities. Job Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Mechanical Aptitude • Proficient Computer Skills – Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Access, Outlook) • Excellent Communication Skills Education and Experience: • Bachelor’s Degree and three to five years’ experience Work Environment/Physical Demands: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. • Work is mostly performed in a normal office setting with minimal exposure to health or safety hazards, and with substantial time spent working on a computer. Requires sufficient hand, arm, and finger dexterity to operate computer keyboard and other office equipment. • The performance of this position may occasionally require exposure to manufacturing areas which require the use of personal protective equipment such as safety glasses with side shields and mandatory hearing protection. • Travel by automobile and plane required approximately 10-20% of time. Employee may perform other duties as requested, directed or assigned. listed above Additional Information:",QA Specialist II - Job in Blythewood,Full Time,"Blythewood, SC 29016",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/QA-Specialist-II-Job-Blythewood-SC-US-165919833.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=16,"61,000.00 - 75,000.00 /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),18c1e706fcefa71baea2694d517096ce
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:16:49:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"PRIMARY PURPOSE:  Interfaces with all related TCF departments to insure compliance to TCF's Quality Control Manual, Engineering Standards, Customer specifications, and other formal procedural specifications, such as NQA-1, ISO, AWS, ASME, ASNT-TC or API when applica­ble.  KEY RESPONSIBILITIES·        Provide all related departments with technical guidance, training and assistance in the interpretation of our quality system, Engineering Standards and other formal procedural specifications and customer specifications.  Act as a resource throughout the company on quality assurance and quality management issues.·         Support and guide performance of QC Technicians. ·       May include ISO Management Representative, coordinate the implementation of our quality system throughout the Company, interface with registrar and coordinate external audits, review quality management systems and recommend improvements and corrective/preventive actions.·         Lead NQA-1 Audits as assigned.·         Manage ISO9001 internal audit system and document control system including record retention.·     Perform supplier quality functions.  Support Purchasing Department through input to supplier selection and support of supplier corrective actions as needed.·         Provide training on quality assurance related subjects throughout the organization.·         Coordinate continuous improvement initiatives between manufacturing operations and corporate level operations.·     Support customer satisfaction efforts by maintaining customer satisfaction Management System Reporting, supporting customer audits and inquiries, and resolving customer requested corrective action.·         Support warrantee/RGA process by maintaining warrantee Management System Reporting and supporting corrective and preventive actions related to warrantee and RGA’s.·         Other duties as assigned QUALIFICATIONS·         Bachelor's degree in Mechanical Engineering or equivalent.·         Five plus years experience in quality management and/or quality engineering.·         Lead Auditor Certificate in accordance with ISO standards.·        Familiarity with quality systems and processes such as:  ISO9001, TS16949, NQA-1, ISO17025, 10 CFR 50 Appendix B. SPC, CQP, FMEA, QFD, MPP, PPAP metrology control, supplier quality, lean manufacturing and/or six sigma methodologies.·       Strong computer skills.·       Good communications skills.·       Ability to travel 25%.",Quality Assurance Engineer Job in Covington,Full Time,"Covington, OH 45318",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Engineer-Job-Covington-OH-US-165370428.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=5,,,5cbf09f37194d0bbe9fb17fa97ef2c7e
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:16:48:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary:As directed by the Quality Manager, the Staff Quality Engineer I is accountable for supporting new product development incorporating any computer software, hardware and maintenance through the application of Quality engineering skills for medical devices. This person will handle projects and tasks, from product inception through product launch and maintenance and play an active role in the processes to ensure products meet quality standards consistent with both Corporate and unit policies, while meeting all design control and other regulatory requirements.  Responsibilities: ·       Provide coordination and guidance to cross functional teams to ensure software quality objectives are met for product software, manufacturing software, quality system software, and software technologies included or used in the creation or production of medical devices·       Extensive application of technical principles, theories, concepts and quality sciences, tools, and systems with measureable / confirmed results·       Track record of root cause determination and effective corrective / preventive action implementation·       Provides training for product development teams and continuous improvement team on best practices·       Conducts audits as member of a quality system audit team (e.g. SME, etc.)·       Writes and leads risk management activities including risk management reports, software risk analysis, hazard analysis, failure trending and failure analysis·       Support of the following: -   Design Control-   Software Lifecycle Process-   Risk Management-   Identification of CTQ's-   Unit Quality Independent Reviewer During Design Reviews-   Manufacturing equipment Software validations/Computer system validations-   Advise on Regulations-   Provide functional support to cross-functional teams-   Usability Engineering/Human factors ·       Guides the successful completion of major programs and may function in a project leadership role·       Ensures quality conduct of projects, including design, data summary and interpretation, report preparation and review adherence to applicable regulations·       Decisions, recommendations and results further the achievement of goals critical to organizational objectives ·       Implements and communicates the strategic and technical direction for the product/project team·       Identifies any issues that may delay product or project and recommends appropriate action to be taken ·       Works under consultative direction toward predetermined long-range goals and objectives·       Creates and supports documentation·       Considered Site / functional level Subject Matter Expert Qualifications·       Bachelor’s degree in a technical discipline, preferably Computer Sciences, Information Technology, or other Software Engineering related discipline·       A minimum of 8 years relevant experience or a combination of equivalent education and relevant experience·       Demonstrate functional knowledge and expertise in product development, software development, software lifecycle processes, regulatory requirements, international standards, and risk management·       Prior experience with Medical device software development·       Understanding of IEC-60601, IEC-62366 and IEC-62304·       Class II / III medical device experience·       Knowledge of design control principles Preferred skills:·       Prior experience with Medical electrical system software·       Prior experience with reusable medical devices·       Prior experience with reliability engineering testing·       Training in design of experiments and statistics ·       Knowledge of six sigma methodology·       Demonstrated ability to support internal / external audits·       Certified Quality Engineer and Certified Quality Auditor",Medical Device Quality Engineer Job in Franklin Lakes,Full Time,"Franklin Lakes, NJ 07417",,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Device-Quality-Engineer-Job-Franklin-Lakes-NJ-US-165772775.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=1,,,7616a20e19818cb2224bab15f1b961ab
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:16:45:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Regulatory Affairs and Design Assurance professional, Level I (RADA I) will be responsible for supporting Meridian’s Product Realization Process and ensuring products are designed and manufactured in a manner consistent with applicable Regulatory Requirements.  The RADA Associate will be responsible for ensuring product compliance throughout all stages of the product lifecycle:  Research, Development, Transfer, Validation/Verification, Labeling, Regulatory Application and Lifecycle Maintenance. The RADA Associate will work with cross-functional teams to provide Regulatory guidance in support of business objectives.  KEY DUTIES: Provides Quality and Regulatory support to Design Control activities, including research and development, design transfer, clinical trials, validation and verification for new product introductions and existing product modifications. The RADA professional will serve as the Quality Assurance/Regulatory Affairs Project Team Representative for design projects.Prepares product regulatory submissions in support of world-wide commercialization and business objectives.Evaluates technical protocols and data in support of Clinical Trials, Validation, Verification and product manufacturing.Directs activities associated with adverse events, medical device reportable events and product recall activities.Evaluates regulatory impact of changes associated with product design change and routine change control.Drafts and reviews product labeling, including Instructions for Use (IFU/PI), to ensure adherence to applicable regulations and standards.Supports international distribution of product by ensuring export and regulatory requirements are satisfied prior to purchase order release.Provides regulatory input to product lifecycle planning.Monitors product lifecycle and compiles information associated with changes as directed.Compiles new product technical information and feature summaries in support of international market expansion.Manages and completes long-term projects supporting the business and quality objectives of the organization.Other duties as assigned.QUALIFICATIONS:Education/Experience: BS in Biological Science, Microbiology, Chemistry or equivalent.Knowledge of FDA and ISO regulated environment (Medical Devices, Pharmaceuticals, In Vitro Diagnostic Medical Devices strongly preferred).A minimum of three years experience in FDA/ISO regulated industry; Quality Assurance, Quality Systems, Design Control, Regulatory Affairs or equivalent preferred.A minimum of three years of Regulatory Affairs experience is preferred, including preparation of Pre-IDEs, 510(k) applications, EU Technical Files, Canadian Class II and III licenses, STED documentation, et cetera.Knowledge of design, development and clearance of Medical Device preferred.Professional certifications such as CQA, CQE or CQM/OE preferred.Skills, Specialized Knowledge and Abilities:Demonstrated strong leadership, project management and organizational skills.Highly motivated, detail oriented, must have a constant awareness of Customer Requirements  and must demonstrate an ability to make fact-driven decisions; maintain accurate and concise records, uphold regulatory and quality system requirements including 21 CFR 820, ISO13485, 98/79 EC, and SOR/98-282.Demonstrated working knowledge of US FDA Quality System Regulations and ISO Quality Management System Standard for Medical Devices.Must be organized with strong attention to detail and able to prioritize and balance workloads and meet strict critical deadlines along with performing under pressure in a fast-paced environment.Readily adapts to changing priorities, effectively manages own time, sets priorities to ensure tasks, multiple projects are prioritized and completed on time.  Must possess exceptional communication (written and verbal) skills, interpersonal skills, problem solving and ability to interact effectively with all levels of the organization both internally and externally.Ability to speak in large groups and actively engage participants.Strong background utilizing MS Office applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook) .Ability to read, understand and follow all company SOPs and guidelines.Ability to maintain regular attendance and punctuality requirements. May be required to work additional hours outside of the normal work shift to ensure departmental goals are met (evenings and weekends).Requirements (Physical, Mental, Environmental Demands):Ability to walk up and down several flights of stairs throughout the work day in a multi-location facilityMust be able to wear personal protective equipment (latex or nitrile gloves, safety glasses/face shields, lab coat, etc.).Must be able to adhere to applicable bio-safety practices when on the manufacturing floor.Ability to work on a PC including repetitive use of a keyboard and mouse for long periods throughout the course of the work day.Ability to sit and stand for long periods of time, stoop, reach, bend throughout the course of the work day.Must be able to analyze, concentrate and solve complex issues routinely through the course of the work shift and remain focused in a fast paced open environment throughout the course of the work day.Must be able to travel by car/air to other MBI locations and/or supplier locations as needed. We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer Minority/Female/Disability/Veteran. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.",Regulatory Affairs and Design Assurance Associate I Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45244",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Regulatory-Affairs-Design-Assurance-Associate-I-Job-Cincinnati-OH-US-146553514.aspx?mescoid=1300079001001&jobPosition=2,,Quality Assurance/Safety,bd9508e96c3fa6d045edc8b2ff5fb27f
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:16:45:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Multiple opening at all levels.  Looking for ACI certified Techs.  Qualified candidates please submit a resume to:  agk@stlohio.comSolar Testing Laboratories, Inc. (STL) is an independently owned and operated Cleveland-based material testing lab that provides geotechnical and environmental engineering, materials testing, and construction inspection. We at STL are seeking experienced individuals in all aspects of the services we provide. We offer a safe, clean work environmental and put value in all our employees regardless of position. Part of our success for over 45 years is due to advanced and continued training for all positions within our organization. Looking for a chance, looking for advancement, looking for security, looking for a career, looking for a great opportunity......look no further than Solar Testing Laboratories, Inc. Solar is looking for an experienced Field technician that will witness and observe soils, concrete, asphalt, steel, and other materials being tested in accordance with job specifications. Preferred RequirementsBackground in Inspection and materials testingTesting for compaction of soil with a Humbolt nuclear densometerTesting placement of concrete and asphalt. Preferred CertificationsNICET Construction Level II and Soils Level IACI Field TechnicianOAIMA Level INETTCP The successful candidate should be a team player, energetic, self-motivated, eager to learn, possess good written and verbal communication skills with attention to detail. Must have a valid driver’s license and good driving history. Training will be provided to the successful candidate (if necessary). Limited travel may be required. Solar Testing is a Drug Free Workplace and Equal Opportunity Employer. ]]>",Technician - ACI Concrete Job in Brooklyn Heights,Full Time,"Brooklyn Heights, OH",Metals and Minerals,http://jobview.monster.com/Technician-ACI-Concrete-Job-Brooklyn-Heights-OH-US-165639606.aspx?mescoid=4700797001001&jobPosition=19,Excellent Benefits,Student (High School),52fe4ba0cc0a037a80289c7a62807404
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:16:45:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Quality Engineer needed in Charleston, WV!If you are looking to make a difference from your first day and are interested in finding a home with a stable company that continues to grow, our client is for you. You will get the best of large and small companies with this manufacturing leader. Their facility operates as a close knit and successful team where all employees make an impact, while its parent company is a worldwide leader that provides stability and financial backing. You will be an important part of this team's continued success right from the start with this facility. Currently, they are looking for a Quality Engineer.Duties of the Quality Engineer include:Being a key point of contact for customer quality issuesPerforming root cause analysis and necessary corrective actionsDeveloping Control Plans and PPAPsParticipating in Advanced Product Quality Planning (APQP) processMonitoring and modifying quality documentsEnsure products comply with ISO and TS 16949 standardsWorking on company quality standardsRequirements of the Quality Engineer include:A minimum of an Associate's DegreeProven experience as a Quality Engineer in manufacturingKnowledge of ISO and TS 16949Automotive manufacturing highly desiredStrong communication and customer interaction skillsIf you are interested in the Quality Engineer position, please email your resume in Word format or call us directly at 614-760-5799 for a confidential discussion regarding your career search. Please visit www.omnione.com for additional career opportunities.",Quality Engineer Job in Charleston,"Full Time, Employee","Charleston, WV",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Charleston-WV-US-165774436.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=9,"60,000.00 - 78,000.00 $ /year",Quality Assurance/Safety,86903b6884fbd922855eaa0b9f8fe031
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:16:45:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title- Sr. Package Technical SpecialistJob Location-New Brunswick,08903Start Date-April 25,2016Pay Rate-   Hourly on Fortira’s W2 Position Description:Background in packaging engineering or related engineering field with experience managing, creating and revising packaging component specifications (secondary and tertiary package components) and BOMs (Bills of Material). Author protocols and reports for package performance testing. Knowledge of package performance testing standards (ASTM, ISTA, USP). Experience conducting laboratory studies preferred. Interface with manufacturing sites and component suppliers to define and establish package specifications and project schedules. Knowledge of SAP, Minitab, MS Word, MS Project, CAD.Kindly email resume to poonam.mundhra@fortira.com or call at 6097243092",Sr. Package Technical Specialist Job in New Brunswick,Full Time,"New Brunswick, NJ 08903",,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Package-Technical-Specialist-Job-New-Brunswick-NJ-US-165916022.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=9,,,4f30e039396aba04778748e240fe9f8c
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:16:45:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking an Automation Engineer in Salem, NH. Description: Participates in cross-functional discussions to review the impact of application changes from both internal and external interfaces on the quality of their applications Works with application development teams to participate in solution design to ensure testability of functions and applications Identifies areas for improving efficiency, shortening of test cycles, and automation of test scripts Facilitates implementation of automated test scripts. Has significant interaction with internal customersRole should include as its primary duty either: The exercise of discretion and independent judgment with respect to matters of significance Design work (Design means a tailored design in order to meet a specific client request) or Programming (Programming means writing original programs using computer code that is intended for use on a wide scale basisSummary: Looking for an Automation Tester with strong QTP experience. Must be able to write VB codes and create excel macros. Experience in creating MS Access Forms / Queries / Tables Implement and develop automated test practices for both web and windows applications primarily using Visual Studio's Coded UI module for both web and windows applications. Excel macro experience is a plus Design and create test scripts using QTP, C# and/or VB.NET to address areas such as database impacts, software scenarios, regression testing, negative testing, error or bug retests, or usability in preparation for implementation Creation of Visio flowcharts Work with the Business Test Manager and colleagues to define process and strategy associated with automation Identify, analyze, and document problems with program function, output, online screen, or content Plan test schedules or strategies in accordance with project scope/delivery datesREQUIREMENTS: Solid understanding of the Software Delivery Lifecycle (SDLC); Participate in product design reviews to provide input on functional requirements, product designs, schedules, or potential problems Minimum of five years of relevant IT/Quality assurance work experience testing Web-based applications A technical 4-year degree in computer science, computer information systems, engineering or equivalent is recommended but can be substituted for substantial test engineering experience Must demonstrate strong time management skills, ability to multi-task & handle multiple test assignments & prioritize one's own work Must have excellent verbal and written skills being able to communicate effectively on both a technical and business level Excellent attention to detail and ability to analyze detailed business requirements, raise questions and seek resolution to outstanding clarifications required for test case identification Excellent work ethic Strong experience working with large scale consumer web/mo Has deep knowledge of multiple complex applications and provides subject matter expertise to set direction and create test strategies and test plans for one or more releases of an application",Quality Assurance Analyst Job in Salem,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Salem, NH 03079",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Analyst-Job-Salem-NH-US-165764074.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e35ec0e22093a814c94b9612ac643a04
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:16:44:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Essential Responsibilities Develop and validate HPLC procedures for small molecule drug substances and drug products Perform forced degradation studies and develop stability indicating assay and impurities methods Perform routine HPLC analysis and validation studies Maintain current expertise with relevant ICH, GMP, and FDA guidelines  Educational Qualifications B.S. to Ph.D. in chemistry or related field 5+ years analytical laboratory experience or equivalent combination of education and experience is required Relevant experience in good manufacturing practices (GMP) laboratory is required  Specific Skills and Requirements Experience in standard lab instrumentation (HPLC, UPLC, etc.) Experience with LCMS or GC preferred but not required Be proficient in LIMS, Microsoft Excel, and Word Must have basic knowledge chemicals their properties, structure, reactivity, and be able to handle with safe and appropriate techniques   ",Method Development Scientist Job in Cleveland,Full Time,"Cleveland, OH",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Method-Development-Scientist-Job-Cleveland-OH-US-165913404.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=15,"60,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /yearExcellent benefits, relocation assistance if needed",Experienced (Non-Manager),d9859dd3a12ce67ac7c2258e6aadeaba
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:15:49:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Established maker of automotive interior trim components seeks a QUALITY MANAGER for its manufacturing facility located outside of AUGUSTA, GA. The QUALITY MANAGER will manage internal and external quality data collection / corrective action efforts, and act as the liaison between the company and its suppliers / customers on quality related issues. IMMEDIATE, DIRECT-HIRE OPPORTUNITY WITH A WORLD CLASS ORGANIZATION!Responsibilities for the Quality ManagerDevelopment of APQP / PPAP plans (programs) for suppliersConducts audits at supplier sitesMaintain, write and follow TS16949 guidelinesOrganize and monitor improvement plans with suppliers Requirements for the Quality ManagerBachelor's degree (OR related work experience) with at least three years of experience in automotive industry quality engineering / supplier quality engineringDemonstrated knowledge of 8-D’s, APQP, PPAP, FMEA and other required quality system toolsExperience in / exposure to interior trim components (plastic/foam) highly desiredBenefits for the Quality ManagerThe company provides a competetive benefits package to include relocation assistanceThis Job is located in Augusta, GA -> United States",Quality Manager - Automotive/Interior trim/Supplier quality Job in Augusta,Full Time Employee,"Augusta, GA 30901",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Manager-Automotive-Interior-trim-Supplier-quality-Job-Augusta-GA-US-165230989.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=9,"85,000.00 - 92,000.00 $ /year",,7773ace8c13773917b3edc8b54fb0f9a
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:15:48:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryThe App Building team is seeking a highly motivated Software Engineer in Test with a passion for testing user interface capabilities. Being part of a dynamic team, you will be responsible for testing the next generation of tools and capabilities of the web-based GUI Design Tool in MATLAB. You will also engage early in the software development process, influencing requirements specifications, attending usability sessions, and discussing software design and testability with developers, to ensure high quality of our software and products in functionality and performance.Responsibilities Design and develop new test suites for state of the art interface design technologies, with strong emphasis on web-based GUI test automation. Develop test plans based upon functional and design specifications. Analyze and report bugs and work with software engineers to resolve them. Participate in functional specification, test specification, documentation, and code reviews. Foster a continuous process improvement environmentMinimum Qualifications A bachelor's degree and 3 years of professional work experience (or a master's degree) is required. Programming experience in MATLABAdditional Qualifications Programming experience in JavaScript and/or Java Knowledge of object oriented design Experience with JavaScript test frameworks or tool, such as Selenium, QUnit, and/or FuncUnit Experience with GUI-building tools/software packages Capacity to multi-task several testing activities concurrently Why MathWorks?It’s the chance to collaborate with bright, passionate people. It’s contributing to software products that make a difference in the world. And it’s being part of a company with an incredible commitment to doing the right thing – for each individual, our customers, and the local community. MathWorks develops MATLAB and Simulink, the leading technical computing software used by engineers and scientists. The company employs 3000 people in 15 countries, with headquarters in Natick, Massachusetts, U.S.A. MathWorks is privately held and has been profitable every year since its founding in 1984. MathWorks, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here.",Software Engineer in Test - MATLAB App Building Tool Job in Natick,Full Time,"Natick, MA",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Software-Engineer-in-Test-MATLAB-App-Building-Tool-Job-Natick-MA-US-165370864.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4bf5f26b19351e1a8919fe92f7a5edc5
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:15:44:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"ATR International, Inc. is a leader in the staffing industry and places a wide range of professionals at many of the most innovative companies. We are currently recruiting for the following position for one of our clients. If this position is not a fit for you, click here to send us your resume and our recruiters will find one that is.  Position Information: Job Title: Cell Biology- Inside Sales Location: Billerica, MA Duration: DIRECT POSITION Compensation:  DOE  Contact Information:Joann Trieu: joannt@atr1.com  Job Description:We are seeking a Cell Biology- Inside Sales for a very important client. Responsible for selling company products/systems and services to end-user customers in assigned territory, industry, or accounts, primarily through outbound and inbound telephone sales activities. Acts as part of a sales team, and supports Field Sales staff. May act as sole sales representative for assigned territory, industry, accounts, or products. Represents the company to the customer and the customer to the company in all sales-oriented activities. Focuses on acquiring new customers and retaining and growing an existing installed base of customers. Responsible for closing the sale on systems and products or may generate leads for Field sales staff. Carries team or individual quota. Requires application of in-depth technical knowledge of products. This position will involve extensive use of CRM to document all call and emails in accounts. Strong customer relationship skills, organization and excellent communications are crucial to succeeding in this role. -Handle complex leads, qualified and nurture the leads to potential business opportunities -Works on inside sales assignments with broadly defined objectives -Solves non-routine issues, challenges and problems within field of specialization    Job Requirements:The ideal candidate will need the following Qualifications:Bachelors or Masters degree in Life Sciences,preferably in Cell Biology. 1+ years of inside sales experience, ideally 2+ year of experience. Skills and Certifications cell biology lab experience inside sales lead nurturing lead development closing    Is this position not a fit for you? Click here to send us your resume and our recruiters will find one that is.                                       To be considered for this position, please click the ""Apply Now"" button.Visit our website at www.atrinternational.com for an up-to-date listing of opportunities. ",Cell Biology- Inside Sales Job in Billerica,Full Time,"Billerica, MA 01821",,http://jobview.monster.com/Cell-Biology-Inside-Sales-Job-Billerica-MA-US-165904899.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=7,,,7ded69ef119f154b040149b04ce9a738
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:15:43:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Saft is a world leader in the design and manufacturing of high-tech battery systems for industrial applications; for use in space, aeronautics, telecom, transportation and defense.  Saft has become a world leader by doing what we do best and by bringing all our skills to bear on a common goal. Saft consists of over 4,000 dedicated professionals worldwide - each with different technical backgrounds, united by a unique Saft spirit emphasizing technical excellence, teamwork and customer satisfaction. Join our innovative team! We have an immediate opening for a Quality & World Class Manager for our Valdese, NC facility. This position will provide support to the manufacturing activities with assistance in the areas of product flow, tooling, and fixtures. Implement efficiencies and ergonomic improvements and maintain world class 'lean' manufacturing systems and culture in line with Saft methodologies and business needs. Duties Include (but are not limited to):  Develop and maintain QA systems and procedures in order to maintain and improve Saft's market position and ensure the delivery of products meeting specification Deliver ever improving value to Saft customers in order to improve Saft's competitiveness. Ensure the quality of incoming goods in order to support manufacturing and customer delivery schedules. Improve the capability of manufacturing processes in order to ensure the quality goods produced. Support the manufacturing operation with training and audit feedback in order to improve operator's knowledge and abilities Manage the nonconforming material disposition system in order to ensure timely disposition and root cause identification and correction Control department expenses to meet budget levels Factory support to meet key indicates of productivity and quality Trouble shoot and improve manufacturing processes in order to improve quality and reduce costs Develop and manage the site World Class ( Lean Manufacturing ) programs in order to support the business meetings it's objectives and continuous improvements Health & Safety of dept. personnel Any other duties, as assigned MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS: 4 year Bachelor of Science Degree or equivalent, 4 year Technical Degree 5-10 years in manufacturing environment, developing and maintaining  Quality & lean manufacturing processes and procedures Knowledge of QA systems, ISO9000, SPC, Kaizen / Six Sigma (ideally Black Belt), experience of ISO13485 preferred Must have good/substantial knowledge of the total organization and domestic market, general/good knowledge of international market.   The successful candidate will enjoy World Class benefits such as: Medical/Dental/Vision Generous 401k match Life and AD&D Insurance Tuition Reimbursement Vacation & Holiday Pay Much More... If you meet the minimum qualifications for the position, please submit your resume and salary requirements in confidence to:  Batteryjobs@saftbatteries.com or you may apply online through the link provided   See Job DescriptionAdditional Information:",Quality & World Class Manager Job in Valdese,Full Time,"Valdese, NC 28690",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-World-Class-Manager-Job-Valdese-NC-US-165468155.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=6,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),fdcc0d99bb28e663f84106b0cb916088
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:15:43:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client in the Florham Park area of NJ has an excellent opportunity for a Senior Software Quality Assurance (SQA) Analyst. Responsibilities: •As a Senior QA Analyst on the development team, work collaboratively on both the ongoing flagship solution as well as multiple side projects leveraging various technologies.•Participate in the design, estimation, and delivery of all new software features as a member of a multidisciplinary Agile team. This will include test case writing and the execution of manual tests.•Help establish and evolve the team’s strategy to ensuring that products sustain a high level of quality while meeting business needs.•Evaluate and assist in the selection of and implement an automated solution for regression testing.Requirements:•Strong QA background, an aptitude and desire for learning new frameworks and technologies, and able to work effectively both as a member of a distributed team and independently. Proven understanding of QA methodologies and tools.•3+ years of experience in software development.•Experience with scripted automated testing.•Working knowledge of SQL.•Strong interpersonal communication skills (verbal and written).•Demonstrable ability to respond positively to user feedback and constructive criticisms.Please email your resume to edougherty@seanryaninc.com",Senior Software Quality Assurance (SQA) Analyst Job in Florham Park,Full Time,"Florham Park, NJ 07932",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Software-Quality-Assurance-SQA-Analyst-Job-Florham-Park-NJ-US-165894631.aspx?mescoid=1500137001001&jobPosition=5,,,7de70f54607cba4c52741297a5b86335
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:15:13:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our partner in the San Francisco East Bay Area is looking for a QC Microbiologist I to join their team!QC Microbiologist IDutiesPerform LAL (Endotoxin) and Bioburden testing of in-process samples, raw materials, equipment rinses, WFI and bulk drug substance using Membrane Filtration method and Pour plate methodPrimarily support in process testingWill be cross trained on environmental monitoring and in process testingPerform biological indicator (BI) testing for autoclave validationPerform microbial identification on environmental monitoring samples in process testing samplesPerform growth promotion testing of microbiological mediaAssist in the preparation of periodic trend reports and analysis of microbiological dataAssist in laboratory investigations of microbiology excursionsEnter data in QC LIMS or other databases in a timely mannerEnsures sampling, testing and release timelines are metMust have experience with GMP and GDPSkills: Degree in MicrobiologyMust be able to demonstrate excellent pipetting skillsMust have working knowledge of relevant Standard Operating Procedures, U.S. and E.U. Good Manufacturing Procedures and other regulatory requirementsMust be able to work flexible hours for coverage on minimal weekends and holidaysMust be able to work overtime sporadically",QC Microbiologist I Job in Union City,Full Time,"Union City, CA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/QC-Microbiologist-I-Job-Union-City-CA-US-165921765.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),48aa9162b71162094aa7f040fa1f00a7
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:14:59:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Immunomedics, Inc., a biopharmaceutical company located in Morris Plains, NJ, is seeking a QA Associate to be responsible for the administration of the Regulated Document and Training systems. This position may also be cross-trained on Product Disposition and Raw Material Release/Clinical Shipments functions. Primary Responsibilities:Administer Regulated Document system:Assign unique document numbers, incorporate comments, issue/make effective, distribute official copies, and notify departments.  Audit/Update binders as required.  Maintain electronic logs as assigned. Provide reports to management as required.Coordinate Training system:Ensure active curriculum for each employee in the GMP system.Maintain electronic database and hardcopy files.Send notifications/reminders as necessary.Provide reports to management as required.Facilitate the coordination of the Investigation (NCR) system.  Review, file, and maintain Magnehelic gauge readings.Cover Quality Assurance and Compliance administrative functions such as ordering office supplies and mail distribution.Participate in audits, investigations, SOP preparation/review/revision, and other projects as required. Qualifications:Bachelor’s degree in science or equivalent is required; Biology/Chemistry preferred. 1-3 years of prior work experience/training in a Biotechnological, Pharmaceutical, or Clinical (GxP) environment required.  Experience in QA Regulated Document and Training functions strongly preferred.  Excellent written and verbal communication skills required, including Responsible Business Communication.  Scientific writing experience preferred.  Superior attention to detail, organizational skills, and the ability to handle multiple tasks in a timeline-driven environment necessary.  Strong customer service philosophy required; experience a plus.  Must be proficient with MS Office applications. Starting salary will be between 40k-45k, commensurate with experience, plus a comprehensive benefit package. United States work visa sponsorship is not available for this position.  Please note that Immunomedics, Inc. is not an E-Verify employer and cannot assist EAD holders in extending their OPT authorization. At the time of application, please indicate if you have legal authorization to work for Immunomedics, Inc. in this role. Please apply only if you meet all of the required qualifications listed above and provide salary history and/or expectations at the time of application.  Resumes without salary information will not be considered.  For immediate consideration, please contact: Human ResourcesImmunomedics, Inc.300 American RoadMorris Plains, NJ 07950973-605-8282 Faxhr@immunomedics.com Email is our preferred method of application and will enable the fastest response time.  When applying by email, please submit resume/CV as a Word or PDF document. We are not accepting phone calls or emails from recruiters for this position. For more information about our company or a career with us, please visit: http://www.immunomedics.com/available-positions.shtml Immunomedics is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Local candidates preferred. No relocation assistance for this opportunity. ",Quality Assurance Associate,Full Time,"Morris Plains, NJ 07950",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Associate-Documentation-Job-Morris-Plains-NJ-US-165773455.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=14,"40,000.00 - 45,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),da379215b08313e710776002b2d7fdc1
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:14:59:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Global Project Managers needed for 100% home-based positions focusing specifically in Oncology for a niche CRO! This person would serve as the head of their Oncology/Hematology group leading cross-functional teams and managing clinical trials from start-up through close-out processes. Don't miss the opportunity to work within this organization's revolutionary new team with a clear path to career progression and organizational advancement. This is a permanent position offering an extremely competitive salary and full benefits (medical, dental, life, holiday, 401K match).Responsibilities include:-Leading cross functional teams throughout entire clinical development process-Develop study timelines and budgets-Client and vendor management-Ensuring all project deliverables meet and exceed client needs-Clinical trial management from start-up to close-out-Serve as the point of contact between clinical teams, vendors, and manufacturing-Protocol generation, feasibility/site selectionThe ideal candidate will have:-Minimum of a Bachelor's degree-Oncology trial management-Global trial management experience-4+ years in clinical development-2+ years leading/managing large cross-functional teams-Excellent oral communication and presentation skills-Strategic thinker with a broad approach to solving problems-Innovative and thorough in all aspects of management abilities",Senior Clinical Project Manager Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Clinical-Project-Manager-Job-Atlanta-GA-US-165892744.aspx?mescoid=1100049001001&jobPosition=18,,,a6e483d6e82333e0d244e6606e0992b9
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:14:59:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB POSITION DESCRIPTION TITLE:                  Quality Process TechnicianJOB GRADE:       HourlyREPORTS TO:    Production SupervisorSTATUS:             2nd SHIFTDEPARTMENT:  ExtrusionNEW                 NEW Position SUMMARY OF POSITION: This position performs all dimensional and visual requirements on manufactured parts that will be shipped to JAC Products, Inc. internal and external customers.  In addition, this position shall be responsible for implementation of new job try-outs and for assisting in the training of employees.          Shall adhere to all safety, health and environmental procedures, policies and practices, such as; utilizing personal protective equipment and proper attire in keeping with safety standards.        Math skills are required along with ability read measurement tools such as micrometers, calipers, etc.        The use of various lab testing equipment is part of everyday work duties.  PRIMARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:To perform this position successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.  The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required. Floor InspectionMonitors the daily performance of the Operation, Operators to Work Instructions and validating product made for meeting the acceptance criteria, including any safety-related issues. Quality Process Technicians are accountable for proper weight counts of specific parts designated by the customer. Quality Process Technicians is responsible to ensure product is inspected, measured and gaged correctly to the instructions and is acceptable. Completion of the Quality Technician Checklist or any part specific inspection checklists must be maintained to the frequency required. During inspections, the Quality Process Technician must report defective product and contain any suspect stock.  The stock must be contained & sorted back to the “clean point” / origin of problem. Shall be responsible for keeping updates on all quality-related issues, such as; Quality Bulletins, quality postings, completing any SPC charting required and all other issues pertaining to their positions. Shall be knowledgeable of Corporate Quality Appearance Standards and Toyota Inspection Standards (TIS) or any other customer specific required appearance requirements.  Quality Process Technician shall be responsible for completion of all required daily documentation. Quality Process Technician is responsible for approval of the 1st piece and last piece inspection and retention of parts per the work instructions for each area - mold, mold/assemble, or assembly.  Comparisons between 1st and last pc of the same run and last pc and 1st pc for a new run is also required to be completed. QPT should check that the lot control documentation is being kept current to the stock in use at each round. Upon approval of full bin/ tote being checked and meeting all quality requirements, stamp with QPT stamp (must be legible). Receiving InspectionComplete Receiving Inspection to the checklist provided for each part number utilizing the lot control sampling table.  Inspection required and method of check shall be followed per lot. Stamps each container on the pallet/skid to show acceptance of the product. Reports problems found, placing stock on hold until review and documents on the Receiving Inspection form.   Part Change (engineering change or other) when received, shall be communicated to the appropriate Quality Engineer  Dock AuditPerforms final inspection on all final products that are ready to be shipped to our internal and external customers. Stamps each container to identify inspection is complete and acceptable. Completes all paperwork documenting inspection results. ReworkMust perform functions such as sanding, trimming, degating, buffing, repackaging of parts, etc. Completes all paperwork documenting rework and disposition of stock.  GeneralThe Quality Process Technician is to report any problems with the equipment or gages to the Quality Supervisor for repairs. Shall be knowledgeable of all labor reporting functions, which includes serial number labels and bar-code labels. Assists employees with understanding the job requirements and determining their training needs. Shall be responsible for completion of rejected material tags. Shall be involved with implementation of new job tryouts.  Quality Process Technicians will work closely with Process and Quality Engineers on initializing new job procedures, such as; trimming, packaging, area layout, etc… Responsible for maintaining a clean work environment, in addition to, daily housekeeping of assigned presses, visual control and workplace organization. Responsible for understanding and participating in all aspects of the continuous improvement process.  Daily job performance is expected to support the JAC Quality Statement. Performs all other functions as required; included are any work assignments relating to the efficient flow of work within JAC Products, Inc. Shall maintain a professional and team oriented attitude throughout the shift.      SKILLS/COMPENTENCIES:Maintain a team-oriented environment that allows for individual differences and provides for individual growth.Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, policies and procedure manuals and operating instructions. Ability to perform basic mathematical functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication and division. Ability to use small hand held tools, such as; clippers, knives, and small power tools.Knowledge of safety equipment on presses.Knowledge of Corporate Quality Standards.Basic computer skills, including P.C. knowledge and current technology software familiarity. Well developed communication skills - both written & oral.Excellent organizational skills.Ability to use quality equipment, such as; calipers, datamytes and scales.Problem Solving Capabilities.Knowledge of SPC and all other job related core tools  PREFERRED EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS: Note:  Possession of a High School Diploma or General Education Degree (GED) is required for all new hires in all positions.  PREFERRED EXPERIENCE: Six (6) months as a Press Operator.Minimum of six (6) months in a like or similar position – manufacturing or automotive related.  PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS/WORK ENVIRONMENT:The work environment characteristics and physical demands described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.  Ability to stand or walk for long periods of time and perform repetitive motion type tasks regularly.Ability to regularly lift and/or move up to ten (10) pounds, frequently lift and/or move up to twenty-five (25) pounds, and occasionally lift up to fifty (50) pounds.Ability to endure heat.While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly exposed to vibration, repetitive motion, bending, lifting, twisting, crouching, reaching, pushing and/or pulling.While performing the job functions of this position, the employee frequently works near powered motor vehicles, power tools, and automated assembly fixtures.While performing this position, the employee regularly uses manualand powered hand tools, (electric, battery operated and/or air powered).  ",Quality Process Technician Job in Franklin,Full Time Employee,"Franklin, GA 30217",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Process-Technician-Job-Franklin-GA-US-165533746.aspx?mescoid=1700218001001&jobPosition=5,$15.12+ /hour,Quality Assurance/Safety,ec7618de085b5577adf9497cd31d3209
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:14:59:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce Inc. is immediately seeking a QA Automation Engineer for our enterprise infrastructure technology client in San Jose, California (CA).You will be joining an elite team of testers responsible for developing automated testing for product functionality and validation.Responsibilities: Creation, execution and automation of test plan Advocate use and participation in developing automation infrastructure in Python Design and implement network topologies to validate functionality, stability and longevity of products Collaborate with development engineering to identify and resolve defectsREQUIREMENTS: 5+ recent years of experience in QA / Automation position Experience in automation testing of Layer 2 and Layer 3 protocols in complex network environments Experience in creating test plans for platform or network products Proficient in virtualization environments (VMware ESXi, KVM, etc) Proficient in Linux system administration Excellent automation skill in Python Excellent verbal and written communication skills Ability to work independently as well as in a collaborative environment",Quality Assurance Automation Engineer Job in San Jose,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","San Jose, CA 95134",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Automation-Engineer-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-165411805.aspx?mescoid=1500137001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e3242eea071918b06b2747b28f827f2b
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:14:58:13,No,jobs.monster.com," The Colonial Group specializes in the placement of outstanding talent in Lean Manufacturing environments.  Our clients understand that our decades of industry experience give us unique insight and access to top talent at all levels. The Colonial Group is a nationally recognized, award-winning firm dedicated to helping both clients and candidates join together to form a mutually beneficial relationship. Our client, a world-class manufacturer, is currently looking for a Quality Engineer responsible for maintaining and improving the effectiveness of the ISO 9001 Quality Management System and ISO 14001 Environmental Management System, which involves direct interface with key process owners and their employees as well as customers and suppliers 8669 QUALITY ENGINEER  Responsibilities: §         Utilize principles from multiple approaches including Kaizen, 5S and Lean Manufacturing to lead continual process improvement activities. §         Develop training modules and perform training as part of the implementation. §         Analyze internal and external customer complaints, identify systemic issues and determine root cause, and develop corrective as well as preventive action plans. §         Perform QMS and EMS audits as assigned and determine equipment calibration intervals. §         Support the Quality team by obtaining and interpreting technical information as requested. §         Evaluate supplier performance and implement corrective or preventive action as needed for improved performance. §         Participate in design reviews and product validation and verification activities. §         As part of a team develop test methods for systems as well as lower level assemblies. §         Maintain and develop QMS and EMS documentation through document review and Document Change Requests. §         Interpret and evaluate customer requirements in terms of standards and regulations. §         Adhere to the highest practicable safety and housekeeping standards. §         Act as the Quality Control coordinator for component assembly inspection/test system inspection.  §         Responsible for training of Quality Assurance functions. §         Support Engineering management in departmental planning and coordination to meet or exceed quality, delivery, cost containment and productivity goals. §         Perform R & M studies, quality checks with Faro arm and basic metrology devices. §         Review technical publications and attend training to stay abreast of technical developments in the industry. §         Mentor co-workers with on-the-job training and develop quality training for all departments. §         Promote teamwork and foster an exemplary working environment. §         Interact with co-workers in a manner, which enhances employee satisfaction. §         Monitor and coordinate rework review and develop methods to reduce work. §         Work with management to develop process improvement methods EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE §         Bachelor of Science degree and five years of related experience and or training. §         Experience with ISO implementation a plus.§         American Society for Quality (ASQ), Certification as a Quality Engineer (CQE), Reliability Engineer (CRE), or Quality Auditor (CQA) highly desirable.§         Detail-oriented, and possess a working knowledge of Quality Analysis and problem solving skills.§         Must have proficient verbal and written communication skills.§         Working knowledge of the application of ISO or similar Quality System in manufacturing or related environment. §         Fundamental knowledge of all aspects of order processing, engineering, manufacturing, and logistics.§         Basic computer skills. Jim Woodjim@colonialgrp.com",Quality Engineer Job in Dayton,Full Time,"Dayton, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Dayton-OH-US-165640527.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b17a66120955026f5b1572d5b2e932cb
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:14:56:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Main Responsibilities1. Base in Haisheng Tarrytown office to work closely with China headquarter, to research regarding the crop production from Haisheng’s agriculture division in China; 2. Collect information from agriculture division in China, collaborate with the U.S. agriculture institutes, to provide solutions for crop production improvements;3. Develop, execute and continuously improves a strategic plan for agriculture division, allocate and utilize available resources to maximize return on strategic plan;4. Organize and deliver technical training, coaching and leadership to agriculture division for the development and commercial growth of fruit and vegetable products;5. Research and deliver advanced agriculture technology to the fields.Position Requirements1. Master degree in agriculture science related major, Doctor degree is preferred;2. Willing to travel domestically and internationally;3. Fluent in English, Mandarin is preferred;4. Able to perform successfully in a fast-paced, dynamic, team-based environment;5. Strong research and communication skills;6. Self-motivated and assertive with a result orientation.",Agriculture Scientist Job in Tarrytown,Full Time,"Tarrytown, NY 10591",Agriculture/Forestry/Fishing,http://jobview.monster.com/Agriculture-Scientist-Job-Tarrytown-NY-US-165917455.aspx?mescoid=1900239001001&jobPosition=8,,,cf877ae26cf93e8c8e6c116219ba7195
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:14:30:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking a QA Tester with a strong manual testing background who has tested SAP applications.   Experience with various forms of SAP manual testing including SAP Finance(FI) modules including AR, AP, GL, month/year end closing activities.  Will develop the test scenarios and test cases, executes test cases to verify that the system is built as per the requirements.Must Haves:Testing SAP Finance(FI) modules including AR, AP, GLSOAP/Web services testingStrong experience developing and implementing test plans & test cases.Strong experience performing manual testingStrong experience implementing QA process and methodologiesRetail experience a PLUSHana is a Plus",SAP Tester Job in Plano,Full Time Employee,"Plano, TX 75024",,http://jobview.monster.com/SAP-Tester-Job-Plano-TX-US-165913407.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=6,48.00 - 55.00 $ /hour,Quality Assurance/Safety,382069f06020799a0bcb1ea4b4bb304b
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:14:30:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Quality Control Technician needed to work for our Manufacturing Company in Moreno Valley. Seeking a talented Quality Control Technician that has a minimum of 2+ years in Quality control experience in a Manufacturing environment. Must be proficient in MS Office and on the computer. This company requires pre-employment hiring criteria prior to starting. Shift is Monday thru Thursday,  4 x 10's 7:00am to 5:30pm. Pay is $12+hr doe with a bonus of $1.50 an hourSkills needed:Able to read blue printsWill be using measuring tapeSteel Toe Boots requiredMust be able to speak English Attention to detailMust be confident to communicate in a mfg environment,  good communication skills as he/she will be informing employees or supervisors even managers of quality issuesGeneral SummaryThe Quality Assurance Technician will perform testing, inspection and analysis of products to assist the company with achieving world-class status for product safety and quality. Specific Duties & ResponsibilitiesCommunicates product quality issues and drives improvementLeads defective product screening initiativesPerforms/Leads rework to correct non-conformancesPerforms stock checksEvaluates Consumer ReturnsPerforms other duties as required",Quality Control Technician with Manufacturing exp Job in Moreno Valley,Full Time Employee,"Moreno Valley, CA 92553",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Control-Technician-with-Manufacturing-exp-Job-Moreno-Valley-CA-US-165221148.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=4,12.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Quality Assurance/Safety,0974ccfaccfea96d8dbc8036af2e59b7
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:14:30:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsible for providing timely and prefessional ongoing quality management of clinical trial data by identifying errors/inconsistencies in CRF data and ensuring their resolutions in order that databases can be declared clean and locked according to strict performance standards. Review and contribute to the development of trial validation plan related documents and create/approve final CRF design, validation checks and reports necessary to assure high quality and consistent data. Review and contribute to the preperation of protocols, CRF's and prepare or review/contribute to operations manuals. Organize / chair data management meetings. Support and assist clinical data managers, clinical data assistants for allocated trials. All other duties as assigned. Support data management activities such as clinical data review, third party data reconciliation including ECGs, central lab, biomarker, IVRS, PK, SAE reconciliation and local lab data review Skills:.1-3 years in clinical data management pharma/CRO industry experience Education:BA/BS Attachments:",Clinical Data Manager I Job in East Hanover,"Full Time , Temporary/Contract/Project","East Hanover, NJ",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Data-Manager-I-Job-East-Hanover-NJ-US-164804943.aspx?mescoid=1500154001001&jobPosition=15,,Biotech/R&D/Science,3d4d2badc90b76d059a00d86c0fd3c9d
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:47:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"The world's largest standalone medical technology development company is currently seeking a Quality Engineer in the Brooklyn Center, MN area. This is a 6 month CONTRACT position, with the possibility of extension. No per diem available.Responsibilities for the Quality EngineerProvide Quality Assurance Engineering solutions and support operation for the manufacture of components used in implantable grade, medical devicesMonitor products, processes, and projects & recommend changes to improve operating efficiencyProvide leadership in areas of process engineering, product quality assurance and quality engineering to drive continuous process and product improvementsRequirements for the Quality EngineerBS Degree (Engineering field preferred)7+ years of Quality or Reliability engineering experienceExperience working with the FDA Quality System Regulation or ISO 13485 quality management systems desiredExperience in a quality engineering role in a manufacturing environment is preferredExperience with manufacturing systems such as JDE, Factory Works or SAP a plusBenefits401KHealth InsuranceThis Job is located in Brooklyn Center, MN -> United States",Quality Engineer - QA/Medical Device/Reliability Job in Brooklyn Center,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Brooklyn Center, MN 55428",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-QA-Medical-Device-Reliability-Job-Brooklyn-Center-MN-US-165542874.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=14,35.00 - 41.00 $ /hour,,f9e41494053190d7969b7f21e11747df
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:46:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our food processing facility in Oxnard is seeking Production Leads for the upcoming season. We are coming into our busy season for processing and need qualified Leads to assist in overseeing production. Full time hours with OT hours, $15/hr. Bilingual in English/Spanish a Plus. Job Requirements and Duties:?Efficiently utilize the employees for the production room and rotate personnel to proper positions throughout the shift.?Responsible to room set up at the start of shift rinsing the room before production starts and cleaning at the end of production according to SOP.?Monitor production to ensure all assigned procedures for quality, Safety and regulatory requirements are understood and being followed.?Set up date coders with correct date for boxes, correct date and Country of Origin on bags, as shown on scheduled production paperwork.?Inspect equipment in room daily to ensure it is in working order and functioning properly.?Monitor quality of raw materials and packaging materials to ensure packed product meets standards.?Complete daily paperwork required for each item packed ensuring number of finished goods and raw materials match warehouse numbers.?Release finished goods for distribution.?Communicate with Production Supervisor and Quality as needed.?Able to run all 3 rooms to provide backup as needed.?Reports all injuries immediately to production supervisor.?Follows all company safety policies and procedures and Good Manufacturing Procedure. Education and/or ExperienceHigh school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education.Language SkillsMust be able to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. Must be able to write simple correspondence. Must be able to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. Bilingual English/Spanish helpful.Physical DemandsThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; and reach with hands and arms. Working surfaces may be uneven and often wet.The employee must regularly lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.Work EnvironmentThe work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this job the employee is regularly exposed to wet and/or humid conditions and moving mechanical parts. The employee is occasionally exposed to vibration. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Gloves, hearing protection, beardnets, hairnets and eye protection***Please apply with resume and cover letter today* We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.",Production Lead Job in Oxnard,,"Oxnard, CA 93030",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Lead-Job-Oxnard-CA-US-165939199.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=12,Up to $15.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),9a94c7b2792573a7e8643e7e5f113060
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:08:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose The QA/QC Manager is the company leader in all Quality Assurance and Quality Management programs. It is the responsibility of this person to set the standards for quality in all company activities, therefore it is a necessity for this person to actively support and promote the ideals of ISO 9000 and cGMP and the advantages it brings to Vantage in the market. In addition, this position is responsible for supervising Quality Control and making sure it supports production activities and processes.   Duties and Responsibilities  §  Provides guidance and establish the standards for quality across all aspects of product development, manufacture and distribution.   §  Resolves non-conforming tests in cooperation with QC Chemist  §  Supervises the QC activities and in coordination with the QC Chemist, provides analytical testing of all raw materials and finished goods.  §  Assesses the effectiveness and efficiency of our analytical methods and services and devises improvements as needed to meet customer and/or business requirements. §  Provides timely Customer/Sales support in all inquiries involving the evaluation of products for use by Vantage and customers alike.  §  Evaluates and establishes alternative raw materials and replacement products to ensure compliance to customer requirements.  §  Serves as ISO 9000 quality system coordinator working in concert with the ISO Management representative to ensure the successful maintenance and improvement of our ISO 9000 system.   §  Provides leadership and guidance to QC Chemists, QC Associates and QC technicians.§  Maintains compliance with cGMP requirements and meets FDA requirements §  Provides laboratory support for the chemistry development effort in coordination with the other scientists of Vantage.  §  Works with Vantage’s customers to resolve complaints and quality concerns regarding our products. Provides and initiates root cause - corrective actions in order to prevent a re-occurrence of the issue. ·         Needs something about the monthly metrics. Monthly meetings to resolve open issues. ·         Review and maintain customer specs note special customer requirements. Management and Leadership Responsibilities §  Provides leadership and direction in the application of quality principals such that the other members of the team learn from your experience and research activities. §  Ensures that all assigned personnel also have a thorough understanding of the Mission Statement and Quality Policy. §  Ensures that all assigned employees are familiar with and in compliance with standard operating policies, procedures and directives; support GLP and inspire the team to achieve the highest technical standards of the industry. §  Manages staff by using proper, adequate, and contemporary management practices. §  Provides direction to further professional development and performance improvement of staff. §  Trains, motivates and manages personnel to achieve their full potential and to gain a thorough understanding of the Company’s performance and margin objectives and how they directly impact those objectives. §  Develops and maintains job descriptions, organizational manual and information chart in cooperation with Human Resources. §  Demonstrates and communicates Vantage values and cultural standards. §  Ensures retention of employees and long, prosperous professional relationships with employees §  Performs performance appraisals and career planning in accordance with company policy. §  Develops and maintains substitute and backup assignments. Ensures cross training. Ensures permanent coverage of all areas. §  Sets job priorities schedules and work procedures for staff §  Ensures that staff is adhering to all safety policies and procedures. In the area of safety, leads by example. Adds to and improves the Chemical Hygiene Plan. §  Ability to work in a fast paced environment  Qualifications Education: Bachelor’s degree in Chemistry or Physics, Master’s degree in Chemistry preferred Knowledge: Chemical conceptFormulation and delivery of Active ChemicalQuality Management Systems / ISO 9000Analytical and Instrumental Techniques  Skills/Abilities: Ability to seek critical informationTenacityConceptual thinkingStrategic Influencing Experience: + 10 years in Chemical industry+ 5 years in Personal Care and or Pharma industry+ 10 years’ experience in Management and Leadership+ 5 years of Customer relationship+ 8 years of Analytical Chemistry+ 5 years of Customer service + 10 years of Lab supervision+ 10 years of QC/QA Experience ",QA/QC Manager (Personal Care) Job in Linden,Full Time,"Linden, NJ 07036",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/QA-QC-Manager-Personal-Care-Job-Linden-NJ-US-164848221.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=6,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),cbf50fb3496d06d74e47bec150962395
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:08:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:If you are looking for position where you can make a difference, then this is the job for you!! Our growing, dynamic organization is actively seeking an experienced Regulatory Affairs Coordinator. Basically, we need you to keep us in compliance. You will to be comfortable interacting with executives and external customers as well as government agencies such as the FDA, FTC and others. Research, preparation of docs, licensing, and product knowledge and licensing are just some of the duties you will engage in. There is also a good amount of marketing and product development involved. We will reward you with an awesome location, opportunity to grow along with a competitive compensation package. Apply today. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1027381 Job Experience:,, Previous experience in food, cosmetics or supplement industry required along with a four year degree.",Regulatory Affairs Coordinator -$,Full Time,"Gardena, CA 90247",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Regulatory-Affairs-Coordinator-52-000-Job-Gardena-CA-US-165923235.aspx?mescoid=1100056001001&jobPosition=17,Up to $52000.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),468023a512f330c81c6c10e6d1fb18fb
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:08:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"NO PHONE CALLS OR WALK INSU.S. CITIZENSHIP REQUIREDRobotic Research, a small engineering firm located in Gaithersburg, MD specializing robotics, intelligent control, sensor processing, and computer programming, including design, development, and testing of state-of-the-art autonomous mobility software on various platforms, is current seeking applications for a full-time Small Quadrotor Hobbyist/Technician.Job Summary:  Small Quadrotor hobbyist/technician to support development of small, custom autonomous unmanned Quadrotors, with a strong interest in robotics, experience in electro/mechanical systems a plus; experience in CAD and 3D Printing/rapid prototyping a plus.Demonstrated, proficient hobby quadrotor piloting experience a must.Participation on internal design teams for UAVs. Some travel is required.Qualifications:  High School graduate with reliable transportation.   Candidate should be a flexible team player with good oral skills, with ability to work effectively in a very fast-paced environment.  Candidate should be flexible with workday activities, with ability to drop/hand-off project and begin another upon request.US citizenship required.  Ability to pass a government security clearance investigation and background check a must. Applicants should send a resume to jhughes@roboticresearch.com.  NO PHONE CALLS!  Please put Small Quadrotor Hobbyist in the subject line.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled",Small Quadrotor Hobbyist/Technician Job in Gaithersburg,Full Time,"Gaithersburg, MD 20878",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/Small-Quadrotor-Hobbyist-Technician-Job-Gaithersburg-MD-US-159807870.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=18,,,1bc2c7647240738f2dd42b0548ad74a3
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:08:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"The ideal candidate for the Performance Engineer position will have strong experience in diagnosing performance bottlenecks, developing performance and scalability testing harnesses, and assisting development and cloud teams with performance optimization for native web based applications. Experience with performance and scalability testing, test database creation and development experience in complex enterprise level environments. He/she must be a self-starter, have excellent communication skills and be an adaptable team player.Strong analytical and scripting skills to accurately translate user stories into automated tests.The ability to infer or reverse engineer source code and database schemas in order to develop test harnesses that sufficiently exercise applications for performance and scalability.Strong scripting skillsStrong knowledge and development capabilities in Microsoft SQL ServerStrong knowledge of HTTP headers, request/response model and syntax, and tools for analyzing and modeling HTTP trafficBroad knowledge of Microsoft platforms such as IISBroad knowledge and capabilities in Object Oriented environments, design, and developmentExperience with java applications and tomcat a plus.Experience in the financial services sector, auditing, accounting, and compliance is a plusExperience with Visual Studio testing frameworks or other commercial load testing tools a plusExperience with virtualization, hosted solutions, SaaS, and cloud-based solutions a plusExperience under iterative/agile methodologies a plusExperience with New Relic a plus",Software Performance Engineer Job in Addison,Full Time,"Addison, TX 75001",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/Software-Performance-Engineer-Job-Addison-TX-US-165816517.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=13,,,70d63209fbacb21a3233652b0391abd6
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:08:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"South Central Region (Texas, Oklahoma, Arkansas, Louisiana, Mississippi, Alabama, and Tennessee)Job Summary Alliance Inspection Management (AiM) is the premier new and pre-owned vehicle inspection partnership in North America that combines breakthrough technology with deep industry experience to provide a trustworthy, independent bridge between buyers and sellers. We offer a comprehensive range of vehicle inspection services to verify the condition of new, off-lease and fleet vehicles and other properties at vehicle assembly plants, rail yards, ports, customers’ homes, dealers and auctions. Due to its success and excellent service, AiM is rapidly growing and its Operations Division now seeks a Regional Auction Director that will lead and manage AiM’s auction operations and workforce in the northeast region of the United States.  The Regional Auction Director will be one of six U.S. regional auction directors that reports directly to the Vice President of Regional Auction Operations, and be required to collaborate with his/her counterpart regional director(s) assigned to mobile and new car inspection operations in his/her respective region. The Regional Auction Director’s primary responsibilities will be to ensure that their particular region’s vehicle inspectors at clients’ auction facilities meet quality, production, organizational development, safety, operational excellence, cost and productivity objectives.  In doing so, the Regional Auction Director will manage and help develop AiM’s auction vehicle inspectors located across numerous states within the respective geographical region. The successful candidate will be capable of managing multiple complex priorities simultaneously with a “hands on” style and be expected to exemplify true change leadership in developing his/her team and delivery of annual operating goals/metrics. Essential Job Functions:The following job function statements describe the general nature and level of work being performed.  They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified.  The job function statements reflect expectations of the fully trained, proficient incumbent who meets all performance criteria.1.       Responsible for managing the regional operations and workforce to obtain the goals and objectives set by the company.2.       Directs and provides leadership, coaching, guidance, training and staff development to AiM’s auction vehicle inspectors; interviews and selects area supervisors/inspectors; plans and evaluates employee performance; recommends merit increases, transfers and promotions; counsels and disciplines employees as necessary; recommends termination when appropriate; and monitors time and attendance of subordinates.3.       Collaborates with the company’s VP of Auction Operations to design, develop and apply aggressive process improvement strategies to increase inspector productivity and efficiency, while continuously improving quality and brand image. 4.       Monitors inspection performance within the assigned objectives and follows-up on any problem locations, process breakdowns, or problem vehicles.  Has ultimate responsibility to ensure that the vehicle is inspected in accordance with contractual obligation and that on-time vehicle inspections are done for all units that arrive at various auction locations in order to assess vehicle condition.5.       Manages the vehicle inspection and employee headcount in relation to workload.   6.       In conjunction with the company’s recruiting specialist(s) and Auction Area Managers within the region, finds, develops and maintains a quality workforce that produces efficient and quality results.  Categorizes all inspection processes into groups enabling area supervisors to assign tasks and measure performance of staff against targets.7.       May be required at times to meet with and engage in meetings with customers to discuss performance, quality and any other operational processes. Must be professional and possess strong communication skills.8.       As necessary, performs other related duties of which the above are representative.9.       Light to frequent travel (about 20-40%).10.    Regular and consistent availability and attendance.  Minimum QualificationsThe following qualification statements reflect the minimum skills and abilities required of the qualified applicant. 1.       Job Knowledge and Skill:Comprehensive knowledge of inspection/remarketing process preferred.2.       Experience:Five or more years of comprehensive professional experience in a related field.3.       Supervisory Experience:Five or more years in a managerial role, providing strategy, vision and direction. Activities of subordinates varied considerably in objective and content and encompassed more than one discipline.4.       Education:Bachelor’s degree in a related discipline. Consider equivalent related college or technical courses, seminars, industry related experience.  5.       Computer Skills:Working knowledge of power point, word processor, spreadsheet, other PC applications, ability to adapt to new technology as it becomes available.6.       Communication Skills:Ability to excel in a team environment required.   Must be able to successfully interface with sales/marketing, customer service, logistics, IT, product development and quality departments 7.       Analytical Skills:Strong analytical skills required with strong attention to detail and accuracy. Ability to source, disseminate and properly apply secondary research Physical Requirements:The physical requirements described below are representative of those an employee must normally meet to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable otherwise qualified individuals with disabilities to perform the essential job functions.1.       Travel: Light to frequent overnight travel.  2.       Attendance/AvailabilityRegular and consistent attendance and availabilityCompensation:Salaried/exempt – TBD upon hiring Included in Regional Director bonus program as defined by Sr. Vice President of OperationsBenefits including medical, dental, vision, life insurance and 401 K participation. Includes aCompany Vehicle AiM is an equal opportunity employer All offers would be made conditional upon passing a drug test and background check For consideration please submit resume to HR@aiminspections.com",Regional Director of Auction Operations Job body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Multiple locations,Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Regional-Director-of-Auction-Operations-Job-US-165258629.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=10,,Quality Assurance/Safety,25f7066f56688c055d93045f12d57e29
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:08:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Statistical Programmer STATKING Clinical Services (SCS), a contract research organization for the pharmaceutical and medical device industries located in Fairfield, OH, is seeking a statistical programmer to provide SAS® programming support for clinical trials.  The qualified individual will write SAS® code including the SAS® macro language to manage, process, and statistically analyze efficacy and safety data from clinical trials. STATKING Clinical Services has provided statistical services for clinical trials for twenty-five years.  At SCS you will be an integral part of our data analysis team.  You will work on a number of projects in a variety of drug and medical device areas, providing programming support for new product development and regulatory submissions. This full time position requires: A BS or MS in Statistics or BS Mathematics with a concentration in statistics or BS in Computer ScienceExcellent SAS® programming skills with 0-2 years as a SAS programmer in a pharmaceutical sponsor or Pharmaceutical CRO environmentExcellent oral and written communication skillsAbility to work both independently and in a team environment The following characteristics would be a plus in considering applicants: Excellent SAS® programming skills with 3+ years as a SAS programmer in a pharmaceutical sponsor or Pharmaceutical CRO environmentExperience in the preparation of SDLC documentation for clinical trials software programsExperience in SAS programming for data cleaning and database designExperience in SAS programming as related to the submission of NDAs/PMAs/BLAs STATKING Clinical Services is located in Fairfield, Ohio.  Fairfield is a community of 50,000 directly adjacent to the Cincinnati/Northern Kentucky metroplex.  Medical benefits and a retirement plan are available with this position.  The position is open for immediate hire.  Related job experience will be considered.   No agency referrals will be accepted.  This employer does not participate in the H-1B Visa petition process.           ",Statistical Programmer Job in Fairfield,Full Time,"Fairfield, OH 45014",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Statistical-Programmer-Job-Fairfield-OH-US-154430920.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a0f9de2008b4d8c0220af1a8a5f780f5
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:08:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:Quality control inspectors make sure that products meet standards of quality and safety. For example, they measure and weigh products, examine samples and test them. Quality control inspectors work in a wide range of industries, including food and drink, pharmaceuticals and electronics. Responsible for performing inspections, checks and tests for quality control for the manufacture of products. Essential Duties and Responsibilities: Checks document accuracy Performs quality inspection functions including receiving/incoming inspection, in-process and final inspectionPerforms at least 2 of the following activities within their daily tasks:Inspects electronic, electro-mechanical and automation systems and machines to meet production schedule.Programs and operates CMM.Sets up and performs first article activity.Measures complex weldments and assemblies.Inspects raw materials, components, fabricated/manufactured parts & assemblies to ensure quality standards are met.Performs product inspection and/or audits of quality control programs.Performs inspection of RFK and Ship with Kits.Performs manufacturing inspections, sampling and testing of fabricated components and raw materials.Records defects and takes appropriate action to correct the issue.Audits processes to ensure compliance with standards.Performs other duties as assigned.Generates detailed inspection reports Interfaces with all internal departments and customers on technical issues  Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:  Strong written and verbal communication skills·         Must be able to read and apply production instructions, drawings, BOM schematics, and specifications.·         Requires strong knowledge of blueprint reading, geometric tolerances, and finish requirements.Able to read and interpret specification and standards.Familiar with mechanical measurement techniques and workmanship standards related to paint, plating, power coat, etc.Familiar with weld symbols, call-outs, wiring and/or crimping requirements.·         Precision sheet metal, welding, paint and finish or machining experience desirable.Experience using micrometers, calipers, and other measuring and test equipmentGood working knowledge of MS Office applications and database softwareBasic math abilitiesEducational/Certification Requirement: High School Diploma/equivalentSome technician coursework/AA degree preferredExperience Requirement: Work Experience: 4+ years working in production and/or warehouse environment Experience working in a clean room environment preferred",QA Inspector Job in Chandler,Full Time,"Chandler, AZ 85226",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/QA-Inspector-Job-Chandler-AZ-US-165909424.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=1,18.00 - 21.00 $ /hour,,9c94f8bc2a5470062b8b0274d8708059
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:08:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our food processing plant is in need of QC Lead Technicians for the upcoming season! Great opportunity for QC Technicians who have supervised a team previously, full time hours with OT. $15/hr to start and Bilingual in English/Spanish a Plus.Job Requirements and Duties:The QC Technician will carry out with limited supervision, quality analysis and control for production of product. The Quality Control Technician will work within the laboratory and the processing facility to perform analytical analysis, food safety/quality audits and micro audits/sampling. Daily audits of production procedures including verification of code dates, scales, water levels, plant GMP?s, and documentation ? Line audits against established guidelines and frequency ? Conduct daily audits and work with QC Supervisor and production personnel in addressing items that are out of compliance ? Sample collection, operation of lab equipment, data analysis and entry, shipment of sample ? Obtain and examine product retain shelf life samples ? Calibrates and maintain laboratory equipment ? Performs analytical analysis of all in-process and finished goods produced within the APEX facility ? Performs pre-operational, in-process and post operation food safety and plant sanitation audits ? Performs microbiological/ATP swabbing of plant equipment and facilities ? Places product on hold if deviations from standards occur ? Completes corrective actions for deviations from standards ? Enforces plant QA, hygiene and GMP policies ? Obtains product retain samples for further evaluation ? Completes all quality paperwork in both hard copy and electronic format REQUIRED SKILLS AND ABILITIES:? Must be self-motivated and has the ability to perform multiple tasks ? Ability to communicate in English including writing, speaking and reading, reasonable Spanish desired but not mandatory MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: ? High School Diploma or equivalent; or three to six months of related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience ? Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite: Microsoft Excel, Word and Access ? Valid California Drive License ? Must be able to work with minimal supervision PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS: ? 1-2 years? experience in food manufacturing or food production preferred ? Bachelor?s degree in Food Science or related experience and or/training; or equivalent combination of education and experience PHYSICAL DEMANDS: ? The work environment for this position will be typical of the manufacturing facility. There are portions of the job that will require working in cold environments and in warm environments, loud environments, in proximity of chemicals as well as the laboratory environment. For short periods of time there is work in a frozen environment. ? Must be able to work in a wet, cold or hot environment ***Please apply with resume and cover letter*** We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.",Quality Control Lead Job in Oxnard,,"Oxnard, CA 93030",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Control-Lead-Job-Oxnard-CA-US-165939202.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=10,Up to $15.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),d7a9cf2b6b9f7adf4adba9c31a1eebb8
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:08:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"EssentialDuties Responsible for daily QA functions within high tech food processing plant. Must be detail oriented and can perform various quality tests and inspection duties, document results, and assist in determining corrective action. Place product on hold as necessary, fill out proper reports, and give information to QA Manager. Will work closely with quality and production employees and other staff.   EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE/SKILLS REQUIRED: 1 year of Quality Control testing experience or food industry experience required. Prior experience Good Manufacturing Practices is desired. Must have good written and verbal communication skills. Proficiency in math and computer literacy are required.  VALUES -Works effectively with co-workers, customers and others by sharing ideas in a constructive and positive manner, listening to and objectively considering ideas and suggestions from others; keeping commitments, keeping others informed of work progress, timetables and issues; addressing problems and issues constructively to find mutually acceptable and practical business solutions; addressing others by name, actions, words and deeds.-Punctuality, attendance, working flexible hours according to department needs is crucial to meet daily goals.-Takes ownership of tasks and accepts accountability.  CUSTOMER CARE -Total customer focus.-Always delivers on service and quality-Builds partnerships-Rapport with both internal and external customers-Continuous improvement-Challenges current practices to identify new opportunities and improvements CAN DO —Get results-Take ownership-Accountable-Ensures all tasks are completed according to schedule TEAMWORK -Open and honest-Contributes and is present to all team meetings-Values and respects other team members views-Supports and encourages others-Considers consequences of decisions on other departments PERSONAL DEVELOPMENT -Always looking to learn and improve in role-Aware of own shortcomings and ready to ask for advice and help-Look for guidance if unsure ",Food Technologist - Quality Job in Azusa,Full Time,"Azusa, CA 91702",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/Food-Technologist-Quality-Job-Azusa-CA-US-165649908.aspx?mescoid=1900238001001&jobPosition=20,17.00 - 19.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),ace03bd393937e04b5beb164a33e6956
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:08:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client a global leader in the pharmaceutical industry is looking for a IT Infrastructure Service Manager to join the San Carlos, CA, location.Duties:Contract to hire position. The Infrastructure Service Manager will be primarily responsible for San Carlos Site Infrastructure Management. This role will support 24x7 GxP and non-GxP operations in two buildings. This person will support both PharmOps and TRD associates and be required to communicate effectively across various  functions and with external service providers. Provide direction to local IT team to support 7x24 manufacturing IT services and serve as a liaison with local business to deliver NBS IT servicesDeploy and maintain site infrastructure in collaboration with GIS and GIS service providers (e.g. IBM, BT, Unisys).• Proactively manage site infrastructure and ensure site infrastructure meets business needs in terms of service, capacity and compliance Rollout and support the divisional strategy for IGM in alignment with site IT and Business stakeholders.• Proactively work with site IT and Business stakeholders to implement standards and policies for Information Governance and Management • Responsible for reviewing, coordinating and approving IT infrastructure changes. Works closely with management and business to coordinate and communicate planned and unplanned outages.Ensure site infrastructure is deployed and maintained in a way that meets or exceeds Novartis internal security and quality requirements.• Ensures compliance with GMP/HSE regulations,policies, procedures and standards as appropriate for the role.  Champions a Quality Culture and ensures a safe working environment.• Create, review and approve GxP documentation using Good Documentation Practices. Skills:Minimum 4 years of management experience, managing full time employees, contractors, or vendors.Experience working in a health authority (FDA) regulated environment, including change control, SOP creating, and computer systems validation.Experience in implementing and enforcing corporate and industry security policies and best practices.Technical competency with core IT infrastructure, including, but not limited to Windows Server, DNS, DHCP, Print Services, etc.Technical competency with networking principles, such as routing, VLANS, firewalls, etc.Must have ability to travel locally using own transportation.Education:Minimum 4 year degree in MIS or Computer Science.IT related certifications such as CCNA, CCNE, MCSE, ITIL, are a plus.Start Date:04/11/2016Hours Per Week:40.00Est. End Date:10/11/2016Hours Per Day:8.00",IT Infrastructure Service Manager Job in San Carlos,Full Time,"San Carlos, CA 94070",,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Infrastructure-Service-Manager-Job-San-Carlos-CA-US-165860381.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=16,,,8dbcadfdf53b2c2f92db80455ef785d2
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:08:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionSales Representative As an active participant in the health and nutrition industries, Fenchem Inc. is specialized in developing, manufacturing and marketing active ingredients with high bio-activity and safety, serving the dietary supplements and functional food, feed, and pet food industries with advanced ingredients and science-based nutritional solutions. Fenchem Inc. (www.fenchem.com) is completely committed to the success of every one including both our partners and employees. At Fenchem we are proud to have a unique corporate culture that inspires passion and innovation. We are currently seeking a Sales Representative at our Des Moines location in IA. This full time position offers a competitive salary package, commission & bonus, and benefits.   Description:Develop and execute plan to meet or exceed sales goals and enhance total customer value and service.Manage division sales within us to grow current business and improve customer relationships.Prospect and generate new accounts through cold calling, warm lead cultivation and trade show participation. Work closely with internal parties to maximize use of resources and knowledge in an effort to ensure stable company growth and unity.   Requirements 4 year college degree preferred will substitute years of relevant experience.2+ years of sales experience Self-motivated with highly effective communication skillsStrong planning, organizing and follow up skillsAbility to work in a dynamic multicultural environmentTeam player35% to 40% Business travels in USComputer skills MS office ",Sales Representative/Account Manager IA Job in Des Moines,Full Time,"Des Moines, IA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Sales-Representative-Account-Manager-IA-Job-Des-Moines-IA-US-161091135.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),be001aa27e974381ada1998b51e5dbd9
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:13:00:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Founded in 1978, Universal Health Services, Inc. (UHS)* is one of the nation’s largest and most respected healthcare management companies, operating through its subsidiaries’ acute care hospitals, behavioral health facilities and ambulatory centers nationwide. With more than 65,000 people employed by UHS’ subsidiaries, UHS’ business strategy is to continue to grow by building or purchasing healthcare facilities across the country, while continuing to strengthen UHS’ strong franchise based on exceptional service and effective cost control. Our success is driven by a service philosophy based on integrity, competence and compassion and through a responsive management style. The Program Manager - Team STEEPS (Master Trainer) is responsible for the development, implementation, effectiveness, and success of all (Crew Resource Management) CRM/TeamSTEPPS at UHS. This individual maintains an awareness of, and implements, health care industry best practices in CRM/TeamSTEPPS. Essential Job Duties: Coordinates the planning, implementation, training and ongoing activities of the Crew Resource Management (CRM)/TeamSTEPPS program across the enterprise – in all facilities, units and service lines. Manages/conducts risk assessments. Creates and supervises unit-based CRM/TeamSTEPPS workgroups. Plans, manages, and leads the unit implementations and go-live strategies, including work plans, creation of safety tools, and all associated activities. Coordinates training for Master Trainers, including Teamwork Skills Workshops, Risk Assessment, Leadership Development, and Hardwired Safety Tools Workshops and Implementations. Manages the collection and analysis of program Metrics. Prepares Steering Committee Agendas and participates in Steering Committee meetings. Conducts program audits. Coordinates the creation and implementation of standardized policies and procedures including competency statements. Creates CRM/TeamSTEPPS program measurement plans. Revises, based on data analysis, all course materials for ongoing continuing education and for NEO (New Employee Orientation) training. Measures the efficacy of hardwired safety tools, gaps in knowledge or practice. Detects, evaluates, and defines potential operational issues and opportunities for enhancement or program revision. Provides periodic CRM/TeamSTEPPS status reports. Coordinates CRM/TeamSTEPPS activities with related departments, i.e. Quality and/or Risk. Coordinates activities with vendors (LifeWings). Creates safety improvement by improved communication, teamwork protocols (checklists) and speak up. Ensures compliance of the CRM/TeamSTEPPS program with the Vision, Mission and policy statements, and regulatory and professional standards. Ensures Master Trainers are certified and qualified to conduct all elements of the CRM/TeamSTEPPS project. Ensures institutional leaders conduct Steering Committee meetings, Round, coach low performers, and revise policies and procedures as needed. Ensures that training critique scores are never less than an average of 4 on a 5 point scale. Creates and implements effective hardwired safety tools as measured by 100% compliance in usage. Reaches the institutional goals of the program data collection and analysis plan. Master's Degree with 3+ years experience required.  Valid RN or MD/DO license required or significant experience with TeamSTEPPS as a trainer. Master’s degree required for RN position. Proven leadership success and experience. Project management skills and experience. Ability to devise, test and deliver training materials. Excellent oral, written and presentation skills. Demonstrated ability to be self-directed and excellent organizational, analytical and interpersonal skills. Skilled in team building, communication and conflict management. Certified LifeWings Master CRM/TeamSTEPPS Trainer. UHS offers competitive compensation commensurate with experience and benefits programs including medical, dental, life insurance and 401k. *UHS is a registered trademark of UHS of Delaware, Inc., the management company for Universal Health Services, Inc. and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Universal Health Services, Inc. Universal Health Services, Inc. is a holding company and operates through its subsidiaries including its management company, UHS of Delaware, Inc. All healthcare and management operations are conducted by subsidiaries of Universal Health Services, Inc. To the extent any reference to ""UHS or UHS facilities"" on this website including any statements, articles or other publications contained herein relates to our healthcare or management operations it is referring to Universal Health Services' subsidiaries including UHS of Delaware. Further, the terms ""we,"" ""us,"" ""our"" or ""the company"" in such context similarly refer to the operations of Universal Health Services' subsidiaries including UHS of Delaware. Any employment referenced in this website is not with Universal Health Services, Inc. but solely with one of its subsidiaries including but not limited to UHS of Delaware, Inc. UHS is not accepting unsolicited assistance from search firms for this employment opportunity. Please, no phone calls or emails. All resumes submitted by search firms to any employee at UHS via-email, the Internet or in any form and/or method without a valid written search agreement in place for this position will be deemed the sole property of UHS. No fee will be paid in the event the candidate is hired by UHS as a result of the referral or through other means.  Click Here To Applyhttps://uhs.ats.hrsmart.com/cgi-bin/pm/click.cgi?job_id=147869&site_id=35",Program Manager - Teams STEPPS - Master Trainer Job in King Of Prussia,Full Time Employee,Location:,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Program-Manager-Teams-STEPPS-Master-Trainer-Job-KING-OF-PRUSSIA-PA-US-165421370.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,Quality Assurance/Safety,e8503115510c6930b9b61e76e7901a99
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:12:58:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Applications Due = 04/11/2016General Statement of JobResponsible for work inspecting existing buildings, structures, and sites throughout the Town of Palm Beach. Responsible for enforcement of the Town's Building and Zoning, Licensing, Fire Prevention and Protection, Flood Damage Prevention, Garbage and Trash, Health and Sanitation, Nuisance, Parks and Recreation, Trees and Shrubs, and Landmarks Preservation codes and ordinances.Essential FunctionsMakes inspections throughout the Town to ensure compliance with the codes described in the Code of Ordinances as being under the jurisdiction of the Code Enforcement Board.Gathers evidence where necessary under the supervision of the Building Official and Town Attorney to support the Code Enforcement Board actions to abate the violations.Notifies suspected code violators of code requirements and makes an effort to obtain compliance through negotiation.Gives testimony before the Code Enforcement Board in the form of observations as well as the testimony from Town Inspectors directly responsible for enforcement of certain codes (ie: Plumbing Codes, Electrical Codes).May make inspections or site visits occasionally during evening and/or weekend hours.Minimum and Preferred QualificationsHigh school degree or GED equivalent. Requires a minimum of one year of experience in a variety of building construction work, including responsibility for determining that work met specifications as a Code Officer or Police Officer. Training in Municipal Ordinances and Building and Zoning Codes and their enforcement preferred.Must obtain a Level 1 F.A.C.E. certification within one year from date of hire. Must possess a valid Florida driver's license, Class E.Knowledge, Skills and AbilitiesKnowledge of the Town Building Codes and Zoning Ordinances and Code of Ordinances.Knowledge of modern methods of building construction materials and equipment, as well as accepted safety standards.Knowledge of the legal procedures involved in the proper enforcement of building laws and prosecution of violators.Knowledge and skill in proper inspection methods, coupled with the ability to apply them properly.Knowledge of State Law as it applies to Town Ordinances and Professional licensing procedures.Knowledge of investigative procedures and ability to compile facts in a logical progression so as to be presented to the Code Enforcement Board or a court.Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with associates, departmental officials, and the general public, both in person and over the phone.Ability to interpret sketches, penciled layouts, and blueprints, and to determine conformity to building regulations.Ability to make clear visual observations in the process of performing inspections and other job related duties.Application ProcedureApply to the Town of Palm Beach Human Resources Department by going to www.townofpalmbeach.com, click on the Employment tab, click on the online application system, and select the job title you are interested in. Register as an applicant and complete your applicant profile including your details about your education, employment history, and skills. If you have any questions, please email jobs@townofpalmbeach.com",CODE COMPLIANCE OFFICER I Job in Palm Beach,Full Time,"Palm Beach, FL 33480",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/CODE-COMPLIANCE-OFFICER-I-Job-Palm-Beach-FL-US-165305791.aspx?mescoid=1300073001001&jobPosition=13,19.13 - 24.84 $ /hourHeath and Retirement benefits,Entry Level,fafce7c52727c078f9539e1af8cc203f
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:11:49:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you are passionate about outboards, motorcycles and ATVs, join us: Suzuki - the Choice of Champions! Suzuki is seeking a Quality Research Analyst to be located at its Brea, CA Headquarters responsible for the accumulation and compilation of product failure data and technical information for the production of detailed technical reports relevant to product improvement. A Quality Research Analyst performs necessary product and/or component testing to assist SMC Japan in resolving product quality issues, evaluation testing of new products as required, and technical assistance to other departments to help them achieve their operational goals.Primary Duties and Responsibilities: * Prepare and submit technical reports to SMC Japan by means of investigation and correlation of information. Information sources utilized include but are not limited to direct field analysis, field surveys, Technical Department field personnel, warranty system data, dealer interviews, customer communications, Customer Relations personnel, and outside media sources. * Resolve technical problems by direct field analysis, which may include problem confirmation testing and evaluation of countermeasure parts and procedures. Coordinate product modification operations of new product as required. * Conduct complete inspection and evaluation of returned warranty parts. Install and test returned parts as necessary to verify claimed defect. Report all pertinent data to SMC Japan. Provide failed parts to SMC for their product quality investigation purposes. * Analysis of Marine market trends via surveys from dealers and customers during dealer visits and consumer shows.Job Requirements: * One year experience as a technical representative for a marine manufacturer or distributor, or 2 years’ experience as a technician at a marine dealership. Directly related work experience from other fields may be considered. * High school diploma required. Completion of manufacturer or industry recognized secondary technical training program highly desirable. Associate degree preferred. * Strong demonstrable verbal and written communication skills. * Strong mechanical knowledge, and ability to understand, diagnose, and repair mechanical and electrical systems. * Skill in the proper operation of Marine products. * Must be proficient in the use of computers and the Microsoft Office suite, in particular, Excel, Work and Access programs. * Must be able to lift and carry materials weighing up to 50 pounds. * Must possess vision, hearing and speech to operate machinery and equipment and to communicate clearly both in person and over the telephone. * Must be able to attend meeting at various sites within and away from the City.Suzuki Motor of America, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer",Quality Research Analyst,Full Time,Brea,Marine Mfg & Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Research-Analyst-Marine-Job-Brea-US-165700470.aspx?mescoid=1900305001001&jobPosition=5,,,96687582ea67eddb3542371e131ce747
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:11:49:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Quality Assurance Manager will be responsible for quality review of internal work products and processes, including call monitoring reviews, analyzing internal and external communications, monitoring policy adherence, product service analysis, identifying root cause issues that delay the timely processing of assessments You will be reporting to the Director of Training and Quality Assurance.Client DetailsHealth care company that specializes in long term care insurance services headquarter in Waltham.DescriptionThe Quality Assurance Manager will :Manage a team of 3Identify opportunities to strengthen processes that will improve service delivery and reduce operating costs;Assist in the development of monthly client reports to assist client management in communicating effectively with our customersAssist in presenting QA data to clients, senior management, internal and external partners;Run audits from a work flow, systems conformance and opportunitiesProfileThe ideal Quality Assurance Manager will have:Bachelor degree2 years of experience managing a team of QAAbility to translate data and analysis into meaningful trends is necessaryProficiency identifying trends and developing process improvement proceduresKnowledge of Total Quality Management Processes and ProceduresIndependence with research for methodologies and formulas for reporting. Job OfferCompetitive Salary with great benefits.",Quality Assurance Manager Job in Waltham,"Full Time , Employee","Waltham, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Manager-Job-Waltham-MA-US-165761295.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=11,"65,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",,b758f6b439c93bd9dee0f539b99068c7
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:11:48:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"CLINICAL RESEARCH ASSOCIATE (CRA) - HOMEBASED REQUIREMENT #16-00511 RECRUITER: BRIDGET BURNSJOB LOCATION: VARIOUS, SEE JOB DESCRIPTION FOR SPECIFIC DETAILSMARCH 24, 2016 *** CANDIDATES MUST BE ABLE TO WORK ON OUR PAYROLL AS A W-2 *** Travel domestically (and possibly internationally) as needed to study sites for training and meetings. A minimum of 50% overnight travel might be required. Project Description: Monitor and close out clinical study sites following GCP and ICH guidelines, as well as Client SOP's, and ensure that study milestones are met. The CRA is the central point of communication between the client and investigational sites for all clinical trial related activities. Mentor to CRA's. Trial Lead CRA role for a trial when assigned. Serve as a leader and mentor to other CRA's in all aspects of the CRA role. May represent RAD and region at management meetings or other meetings as assigned and participate in decisions made at assigned meetings (e.g. site selection, site issue resolution). May interview prospective CRA candidates and assist with performance evaluation and management of CRA's. Manage assigned study sites and networks conduction phase I-IV protocols according to the monitoring plan including source document verification. Ensure the site investigator folder is up to date and mirrors the Client TMF. Responsible for collecting regulatory documents from site and filing the Client TMF. Prepare and collect study site documents. Perform Initation Visit and continue to train study personnel as needed on study protocol, procedures, study drug handling and storage, CRF (or eCRF) completion, SAE reporting, GCP, and possibly the drug mechanism. Conduct feasibility and screen potential investigators and networks to evaluate their capabilities for conducting clinical trials. Nominate sites to participate in studies in conjunction with Medical Science Liaison (MSL) ahnd Clinical Research Medical Advisor (CRMA) colleagues. Monitor site drug supply, storage, accountability documentation. Perform interim and final drug return. Responsible for utilizing and updating electronic systems to perform job functions (e.g. Outlook, WinFx, ClinTransfer, IMPACT, IWS, eTMF, webEDI, I.MAN, STARS, Vantage, SSU Database, Investigator Portal, LMS, ESOPs, iLearn, Expense reimbursement, CWT Horizon, Metrixx, Timecard, PMP, multiple eCRF applications). Serve as a reference to other CRA's on electronic systems. May be responsible for assisting with the evaluation, design and implementation of new systems. Ensure that study milestones are met as planned (i.e. database analyses, study startup, recruitment, closeout, etc.). Enforce and follow GCP and ICH requirements as appropriate. Prepare study monitoring reports, per Standard Operation Procedures (SOP's) and applicable regulations. May review and approve monitoring reports of junior CRA's as assigned. Manage data query resolution process with sites and track status updates (i.e. IWS). Perform Site Closeout activities per SOP's and applicable regulations. Attend and participate in disease indication and project specific training and general CRA training as required. Perform additional roles and functions for Clinical Operations as assigned such as a trial Lead CRA, systems superuser, or committee member. Support the successful implementation of innovative processes and technologies. Open Positions in the following locations: Miami, FL Charlotte, NC Atlanta, GA Birmingham, AL Cleveland, OH Houston, TX Dallas, TX Los Angeles, CA San Francisco, CA Minneapolis, MN Detroit, MI Denver, CO New Orleans, LA Orlando, FL Philadelphia, PA Required Skills: Bachelor's degree or higher in a scientific or healthcare discipline preferred. A nursing degree or extensive relevant experience may commensurate. Must be fluent in English (oral and written). Minimum of 3-5 years of experience as a CRA. Solid medical and business knowledge. Demonstrated ability to coordinate, organize, communicate, and manage site activities with knowledge of when to escalate issues to management or clinical team. Advanced understanding of clinical development, knowledge and experience in international (FDA, EMEA, ICH) and local regulations. Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skills. Computer literacy and proficiency. Ability to multi-task and prioritize multiple high-priority projects, site questions, CRA questions, and clinical team inquires while managing responsibilities and deadlines. This 6+ month position starts ASAP. Please E-MAIL your resume (attachment to email) with rate and availability to Bridget: bridget@alphaconsulting.com",Clinical Research Associate (CRA) - Homebased Job function wrap(EL,Full Time,Job location not provided,Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Research-Associate-CRA-Homebased-Job-US-165269723.aspx?mescoid=1900254001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ad7ae0cb7c66636dd5ba9c2049365ccc
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:11:32:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Durr Mechanical Construction, Inc., a prominent mechanical contractor in the tristate area, seeks a Quality Control Inspector with a current Certified Welding Inspector license to support quality control efforts.  Strong experience in utilities, chemical plants and power plants is crucial for success in this role.  The qualified candidate will have working knowledge of ASME, AWS and API codes Standards.  Please present with 5+ years of proved welding inspection experience.  Welding or Mechanical Engineering degree a plus.  Full-time position.  NO RELOCATION OR LIVING STIPEND OFFERED. Please email your resume for immediate consideration to abernstein@durrmech.com.",Quality Control Inspector Job in New York City,Full Time,"New York City, NY 10011",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Control-Inspector-Job-New-York-City-NY-US-165635885.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9a8d8862ace8dceec8e9c5108f4117ed
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:10:56:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Alliance Inspection ManagementJob Description Title: Auto Damage Field InspectorReports to: Area Manager I. SummaryThis is an exciting, challenging and highly visible position. The AiM Auto Damage Field Inspector conducts mobile, used vehicle inspections within a designated geographical area. The field inspector will perform a variety of different inspections ranging from off‐lease vehicles at a lessee’s home or business to major damage vehicles on behalf of an insurance provider. The field inspector will also be cross-trained to perform dealer floor plan audits on behalf of automobile finance companies. The field inspector must maintain high ethical/company standards and policies when conducting inspections and audits on behalf of AiM. All field inspectors are provided with a company vehicle, equipped with GPS technology, subject to satisfactorily meeting all AiM standards/requirements upon being offered a position. II. Essential Duties and Responsibilities •          Vehicleinspections - The field inspector drives tolocations such ashomes, offices, and other fixed sites to perform used vehicle inspections.A field inspector must accurately assess vehicle condition, estimate value of required repairs (using damage estimating software), document findings in a condition report, and transmit completed reports after each inspection.•          Dealer Floor Plan Audits -The field inspectors will be cross-trained to perform dealer floor plan audits based on geographical area and need. The field inspectors will be responsible for a physical count of vehicles, in addition to an audit of dealer’s records including the sale, disposition and proceeds of the vehicles in question. The field inspectors will be responsible for reconciling dealer and AiM customer physical counts, and in some cases, facilitating payment from dealer to the finance company.•          Performance Expectations - Document and record vehicle damages, utilizing proprietary inspection and damage estimating software with laptop computer and digital camera. The field inspectors will be expected to electronically report status of his/ her assignments during the day using AiM’s proprietary scheduling and routing software in order to maintain high productivity each work day. •          Customer Engagement - The field inspectors will be the front line in regards to face-to-face interaction with AiM’s clients including their dealers and lessees. This position will require an increased level of customer service skills combined with a heightened sense of professionalism.•          Other - Perform additional duties as required by the Company. Make continuous recommendations to improve quality and efficiency.•          Regular Attendance and Availability III. Supervisory ResponsibilitiesOn occasion, field inspectors may be asked to train new hire field inspectors and supervise group dealer audits.   RequirementsIV. Required Skills The ideal candidate should display the following skills:•          Teamwork-Balance individual and team responsibilities. •          Highly Motivated - Ambitious and open to working in fast paced environment. •          Attention to Detail - Looks for ways to improve and promote quality.•          Good Communication Skills - Both oral and written •          Management- Ability to manage individual workday and work independently from home with minimal supervision. Ability to exercise independent judgment and discretion, and to conclude as to inspection and audit findings. •          Advanced Computer Skills - Knowledge of basic hardware, operating systems, software and overall functionality with a computer (i.e. email, media download/upload, internet, etc…) V. Qualifications  Education •          High school or GED equivalent required •          Some college level courses and/or technical courses (particularly in the automotive industry) preferred, but not necessary.  Experience•          Minimum 4 years of consistent, full-time work experience•          General knowledge of automotive components preferred. AiM will train the ideal candidate.•          Automotive Estimating/ Repair a plus•          Experience working independently or with limited supervision  VI. Essential Physical RequirementsWork ConditionsMust meet all physical aspects to be able to successfully complete the vehicle inspection routine including; •          Bending/ Kneeling•          Walking •          Standing•          Lifting (up to 25 lbs.)•          Climbing•          Getting in/out of vehicles•          Must be able to work outside in all weather conditions (heat, rain, cold, snow, etc.) Must be able to work extended hours including weekends and holidays if needed Must be able to safely operate a Motor Vehicle •          Possess a valid state issued driver’s license •          Good driving record with no more than one moving violation in the last three years•          Must be 21 years or over due to car rental regulations   VII. Pre-Employment Screening•          Motor Vehicle Report (MVR) review (driving record from state DMV)•          Criminal background screening•          Drug Test•          All candidates considered for employment must satisfactorily pass all elements of the pre- employment screening before a formal offer can be made.  VIII. Travel •          The position requires occasional overnight travel to assist with special projects or increased volumes.  VIV. ClassificationThis position is non-exempt (hourly) and eligible for overtime. Full Time Auction Inspectors (30 or more hours per week) are eligible to participate in AIM’s benefit plans, including medical, dental and 401k (upon completion of the first 60 days of employment, beginning on the first of the next month).   AiM provides equal employment opportunity without regard to an applicant’s race, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation,age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, religion, or veteran status. Applicants with disabilities may be entitled to reasonable accommodation under the terms of the Americans with Disabilities Act and certain state or local laws. A reasonable accommodation is a change in the way things are normally done which will ensure an equal employment opportunity without imposing undue hardship on AiM. Please inform us if you need assistance completing any forms or to otherwise participate in the application process.",Auto Damage Field Inspector Job in Middletown,Full Time Employee,"Middletown, OH","AllAutomotive and Parts MfgTravel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/Auto-Damage-Field-Inspector-Job-Middletown-OH-US-165467443.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=11,14.00 - 16.00 $ /hour,Quality Assurance/Safety,fccf4012716b8170f93db3f89c0d5049
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:10:55:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking a QC Associatefor 1st shift 6 a.m. to 230 p.m.  Temp to perm. In a nutshell, they are seeking an In-process inspector to test their censors.  They will hook up their censors to a machine and run them through a preset of tests.  Pay attn. to detail.  Candidates that have previous medical device inspection or testing exp would be a plus.  JOB FUNCTION: Our client is seeking an enthusiastic Associate to join its Quality Control Department.  This individual will report to the Quality Control Supervisor and will primarily test final products and perform final Quality acceptance activities. RESPONSIBILITIES: • Performs final product testing of multiple products according to internal procedures and standards• Verifies accuracy and completeness of final out-going product Quality records• Reviews manufacturing records to ensure products have met testing and inspection requirements• Assists the Quality Control Team Leader in various capacities as required BASIC QUALIFICATIONS: • Minimum High School Diploma• Minimum 1 year experience in Quality Control/Assurance• Demonstrated results orientation, ability to multi-task, and ability to learn quickly• Ability to use basic computer software (Web-browser, Microsoft Excel, Microsoft Word) DESIRED/PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS: • Experience with electronic instrumentation and testing• Experience in an FDA regulated or standardized Quality System environment (ISO)• Basic knowledge of mathematics, the scientific method, and physical science ",Quality Control Technician Job in Bedford,Full Time,"Bedford, MA",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Control-Technician-Job-Bedford-MA-US-165644349.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=11,17.00 - 17.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),98eb6713f297b5319ece02071bca5740
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:09:47:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"IMMEDIATE  need for a Full-time, Permanent Operations Director to oversee facility in the Southwestern U.S.Location:  TXRelocation provided?  Yes; Full Relocation will be provided for anyone that is not localSalary:  based on experience; target range between ~120,000 to 150,000 + substantial bonus & other perksThis is a very senior level position for someone to be in charge of all site operations at this facility that houses large animalsThis person will act as a General Manager / Site Director and will have the following responsibilities:-Manage all Operations at this site-Will be responsible for all aspects of supply, importation, financial, and management of the importation, housing, and distribution of large animals to facilities within the US as well as internationally-Will have significant participation in strategic planning, departmental budgeting (including P&L responsibility) and operational planning-Responsible for Regulatory Affairs/site compliance with several agencies-Will have oversight of 100+ employees with ~5 direct reportsExperience required:Education: Bachelor's Degree required (Masters preferred)-At least 5-10 years of previous, successful leadership experience.-Operational management experience of large/high-volume facility with large animals -Understanding of supply chain management-Prior financial oversight/understanding of P&LIdeal candidate will have large animal facility oversight experience from the research community including private, contract, government, or academic institutions, or the Health Care, Drug Development, CRO, or Pharmaceutical industries; International business experience preferred from those settings.This is a highly visible role within a large organization and with possibility of upward mobility...this will be an EXCELLENT career move for you!***If you meet the above requirements and are interested in hearing more details about this opportunity, reply with your resume and contact info and you will be contacted for further discussion.***",Director of Operations Job in Texas US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,"Full Time, Employee",TX,Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Operations-Job-TX-US-165834495.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=4,,Biotech/R&D/Science,9e213d9de8eae3bc8378082c93ac7804
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:09:46:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary Position is expected to perform varied and often complex and difficult procedures somewhat independently.  Individual is expected to detect and report problems in standardized procedures due to instrumental, sample, or test system failures. Operates and may maintain, under supervision, test equipment and apparatus of moderate complexity.  May provide information for initial data interpretation and test system conformance to expectations.  Records, compiles and reduces laboratory data in real time in a complete and thorough manner for individual assignments.  May produce reports. A.           Job Duties             Essential Functions: 1.            Ability to stand for long periods of time.2.            Be able to lift a maximum of 40-60 lbs.3.            Be able to work in a freezer (-25oC) for up to 1 hour at a time.4.            Work independently with minimal supervision.5.            Must be able to work with balances, meters, pumps, rotary evaporators, centrifuges, ovens, stir plates, and other standard analytical equipment.6.            Must be able to reach low and high storage areas.7.            Must be able to wash glassware used by the laboratory.8.            Must be able to work with environmental samples like soils, plant parts, animal  tissues, and pond water and sediment.9.            Keep organized records.10.          Additional duties as assigned",Entry Level Chemist Job in Wareham,Full Time,"Wareham, MA 02571",,http://jobview.monster.com/Entry-Level-Chemist-Job-Wareham-MA-US-164855168.aspx?mescoid=1900259001001&jobPosition=7,,Entry Level,15441de13f07cae7bf2bd9cef70617a6
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:09:00:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"I.             POSITION OBJECTIVE  Implements the facility Industrial Hygiene and Medical programs to ensure compliance with all State, Federal and corporate regulations, policies and procedures in our Point Comfort, TX facility.   II.          MAJOR AREAS OF ACCOUNTABILITY   ·            Assignments are generated by the Director of Environmental, Health and Safety Department and the Health and Safety Manager.  Program implementation constitutes the majority of the workload and is largely self-initiated.  Exercises initiative, originality and sound judgment in applying IH methods and techniques to ensure effective solutions to safety concerns. ·            Reviews operations for comparison to established procedures to determine compliance with laws and regulations.  Based upon knowledge of organizational goals and constraints, makes significant commitments of manpower and material. ·            Provides innovative solutions to health and safety issues with a minimum of direction. ·            May participate as a member of internal audit teams to develop procedures for health and safety monitoring and compliance. ·            Responds to emergency situations such as injuries, chemical releases, etc., and assists in the management of the incident.  ·            Participate in the departmental and planning process. Manage the budget for areas of responsibility III.        QUALIFICATIONS A.            TECHNICAL JOB CRITERIA  (Minimal Technical Requirements) ·         Previous Related Experience Requiredo    Ten plus years in industrial hygiene practice and experience in petrochemical or oil refining plant operations preferred. ·         Technical Skills Required To Perform This Jobo    Computer use to include PowerPoint, Word, Excel and various company programs.o    Industrial Hygiene analytical and detection equipment o    Drive motor vehicles   ·         Education  (Minimal Education Needed)o    Bachelor of Science Degree (BS) in Industrial Hygiene or Occupational Safety and Health preferred·         Other Certification/Training Required To Gain Function-Related Technical Knowledgeo    Certification in Industrial Hygiene is preferred.o    Radiation Safety Officer Certification is preferred. o    Potable Water Operator Class D License is preferred. ·         Other Requirements  (Physical/Mental Demand, Schedule/Hours, Travel)o    Climbing, ascending or descending ladders and stairs. o    Walking, standing, or crouching on narrow, slippery or erratically moving surfaces.o    Stooping, bending body downward and forward by bending spine and waist.o    Kneeling; bending legs at knee to come to a rest on knees. o    Crawling about on hands and knees. o    Reaching hands and arms in any direction.o    Standing or walking about, for extended periods of time.o    Pushing, using upper extremities to press against something with steady force in order to thrust forward, downward or outward.o    Pulling, using upper extremities to exert force in order to drag, haul or tug objects in a sustained motion.o    Lifting up to 25 pounds.o    Talking, expressing or exchanging ideas by means of spoken word.o    Normal work schedule is 0745 AM to 445 PM Monday through Friday but will vary depending on demands from plant operations.o    Job may require national and international travelo    Must be able to distinguish colors and depth perception. B.            FUNCTION-SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES/BEHAVIORS   ·         Motivating Others·         Problem Solving and Decision Making·         Innovation and Initiative·         Information Seeking and Gathering·         Conceptual Analytical Thinking·         Organization and Planning   IV.        INDIVIDUAL SPECIFIC JOB TASKS   ·         Serves as the facility technical expert on Industrial Hygiene and Medical issues, responds to technical questions from operating personnel.  As the company expert must maintain a thorough knowledge of current applicable regulations using sources such as Federal/State Register, Agency contacts and Trade Associations to keep abreast of new and modified laws to assure facility can implement management systems to assure compliance. ·         Develops policies as appropriate that provide guidance to employees to achieve compliance with safety and health rules and regulations. ·         Develops training programs as appropriate to achieve proper education of targeted employees. ·         Trains plant employees in matters pertaining to occupational health and the prevention of accidents, including personal protective equipment, respiratory protection, hearing conservation, hazard communication and radiation safety. ·         Develops monitoring strategies, and documents results for chemical and physical exposure levels, and reports findings and suggests control measures. ·         Develops monthly reports for submission to the Group Environmental, Safety and Communications office. ·         Researches Federal, State and Corporate regulations/procedures and incorporates changes into FPC-TX Health and Safety Procedures and the IH SOP manual to maintain compliance with new requirements. ·         Reviews historical data on hygiene sampling to assure that operational procedures meet requirements. ·         Maintains Industrial Hygiene records as per 29 CFR 1910.1020. ·         Makes recommendations to improve safety and health performance of the facility. ·         Complies with company rules, regulations and standard practices governing safety, security, environmental compliance and proper utilization of company property employed in the course of assigned duties. ·         Serves as the Radiation Safety Officer for the facility.  Duties include radiation license amendments, safety training, inspection, testing, monitoring, reporting and recordkeeping related to nuclear level and density devices. ·         Determines whether injuries/illnesses are entered on the OSHA 300 log.  Posts the OSHA Log annually as required by regulation. ·         Collects and compiles chemical storage and usage data for the FPC-TX facility annually, and submits the annual and quarterly Tier 2 Reports. ·         Selects and purchases appropriate Industrial Hygiene monitoring equipment, and ensures the equipment is properly maintained and calibrated. ",Industrial Hygienist Job in Memphis,Full Time,"Memphis, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/Industrial-Hygienist-Job-Memphis-TN-US-165646857.aspx?mescoid=2900540001001&jobPosition=8,,,9a974f2599d3abd59156944fb8767b57
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:08:59:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Commercial Inspector As a result of continued growth and expansion, York Risk Control, a full service nationwide vendor for the insurance and self –insurance industry, is seeking independent Commercial Inspectors to work on an independent contractor basis. Information gathered from the survey/interview process will be reported primarily in checklist and narrative formats and will be submitted via the internet.  Primary responsibilities include inspecting properties such as buildings, industrial operations, vehicles, and recreational facilities to evaluate physical conditions, safety practices and hazardous situations.  You will be required to prepare written reports of findings and generate system recommendations for correction of unsafe conditions.  The number of assignments may vary depending upon geographical location.   Ideal consultant would possess the following: ·         2 year’s experience conducting commercial inspections·         Thorough understanding of Workers’ Compensation, General Liability, Property and Auto Liability Coverages·         Good communication and exceptional writing skills·         Home PC or Laptop with Microsoft Word, High Speed Internet Access, and digital camera for taking property photos·         Ability to travel within a reasonable territory·         Ability to observe business operations and evaluate management practices to determine if safety issues and hazards affecting insurance premium are adequately controlled",Commercial Inspector Job in New York City,Part Time,"New York City, NY 10001",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/Commercial-Inspector-Job-New-York-City-NY-US-165766631.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=9,,,8fe51900b77ccc54311df8ff047b328d
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:08:20:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Senior QA Automation in Salt Lake City, UT.REQUIREMENTS: At least 5 years hands-on experience in QA Engineering 3+ years of experience testing web/ecommerce applications constructed using JSP, JavaScript, AJAX, JQuery, CSS, HTML and related technologies 3+ years writing and debugging Java or .NET programs In-depth understanding of and experience with requirement analysis Experience designing and coding high efficiency tests for scalable, distributed, multi-tiered, fault-tolerant applications in a Windows or Linux environment Current hands-on experience with test automation tools and libraries such as Selenium, TestNG, HtmlUnit, and JMeter Expertise in CI pipeline builds, preferably using Hudson or Jenkins Experience with testing REST-based APIs and Services Excellent verbal and written communication skills Strong sense of self-motivation, organization and attention to detail; strong analytical skills Preference for working in a fast-paced, dynamic environment while juggling multiple projects Proficiency with one scripting language. e.g. Perl, Shell, Python, or Groovy Understanding and effective application of code quality metrics, such as those produced by SonarQube, FindBugs, PMD and other such tools Performance testing experience Comfortable with UNIX or Linux; Jira; Maven Practical SQL skills Exposure to online marketing, PPC, SEO and related disciplines Great sense of time and priority management",Senior QA Automation Job in Salt Lake City,"Full Time, Employee","Salt Lake City, UT 84121",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-QA-Automation-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-165940042.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=18,"80,000.00 - 120,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),8b44964d211535aa1563ff176ccd31f6
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:07:49:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description: The Clinical Laboratory Scientist is responsible for performing and maintaining high complexity laboratory testing on patients' specimens, interpreting and reporting patient results, performing quality control and quality assurance procedures, and complying with all applicable local, state and federal laboratory requirements. The high complexity nature of the work requires excellent attention to detail, effective written and verbal communication skills, the ability to multitask, flexibility with tasks and schedules, and the ability to work independently in a team environment.Responsibilities: Performance of laboratory tests, procedures and analyses according to the laboratory's standard operating procedures.Performance, review and documentation of laboratory quality control procedures.Operation and maintenance of laboratory equipment.Preparation of reagents required for laboratory testing.Review, interpretation and reporting of patient results.Identifying and remedying problems that adversely affect test performance.Reporting all test quality and safety concerns to the Laboratory Manager or Safety Officer.Ensuring your own proper training with the appropriate documentation.Tracking training and competency.Possess and maintain a valid California CLS license with a molecular backgroundPossess and maintain a working knowledge of local, state and federal laboratory regulations.Must be strong with computer Microsoft OfficeAbility to analyze and problem solve complex issues that impact test performance.Strong communication skills with the ability to maintain open communication with coworkers, non-laboratory personnel, and managers.Understanding of standard molecular biology techniques such as DNA, RNA isolation and PCR, RT PCR. Next Generation Sequencing is a plus.SKILLS/EXPERIENCEExpertise in good laboratory practices, knowledge of quality controlExperience with Microsoft office required BA, BS, MS in Molecular Biology, Genetics or related life science field Requires State of California Clinical Laboratory Scientist License (Generalist or CGMBS)Experience in programing and automation desired",Clinical Lab Scientist Job in Los Angeles,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Los Angeles, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Lab-Scientist-Job-Los-Angeles-CA-US-165829217.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=10,,,4a68d65b76ef8ae1c1f8c067fd171ceb
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:07:48:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Major Function Responsible for management of component and product qualityResponsible for planning and development of quality processes and methods.Acts a liaison between Toro, component suppliers and customers in all aspects of warranty and quality issues concerning consumer products. Duties & Responsibilities SUPERVISION: 20%Continuous evaluation of the Quality Management System for effectiveness and adequacy.Ensure product conformity so that the safety of anyone making, using, or servicing our product is secureFacilitate staff in attaining appropriate certifications through ASQ and the effective use of statistical and other tool sets related to six sigma training doctrine.Serves as a member of the Windom leadership team in establishing and achieving plant goalsPrepares and manages budget and planning process including manpower, tools, and equipment, facility needs, capital, training, performance, and safety. QUALITY MANAGEMENT 50%Reviews quality problems with plant management and engineering personnel and directs action required to correct defects.Prepare and communicate data to appropriate parties based on feedback attained from warranty reports, COQ, validation audits, internal audits, andon data, supplier qn's and scorecards, etc. Lead corrective action efforts based on such data.Reviews all new products and component parts and provides planning for a smooth and efficient start up and recommends changes in design where quality can be improved.Responsible for implementation of quality plans designed to prevent defects in supplier components and Toro finished products.Ensures proper and timely communications with Materials and Assembly Operations to maintain quality standards.Review inspection procedures for thoroughness and coordinates improvements with Quality Control engineering.QUALITY TECHNICAL SUPPORT: 20%Coordinate and lead all plant TQM, QES, ISO training, certification procedures, methods and audits. Ensures employees and supervisor training on the application of quality processes. Acts as liaison with; Component Suppliers, Design Engineering, Divisional Quality and Test Departments, and Toro Distributors and Customers to resolve quality / warranty issues and ensure product quality is maintained.Establish and maintains quality standards for all shop auditors and inspectors through Quality training programs. Coordinate external agency calibration of testing equipment and ensure appropriate documentation. SAFETY: 5%Ensure all Employees are trained in Safety Rules and procedures and support and consistently enforce safety policies.Participate in Safety Inspections and support Plant Safety activities.Establish Safety measurement goals and accountability for employees under their direction.Review Department Accident / Investigation reports and participate in preventive/corrective Safety planning. Job DimensionsNumber of exempt: 2 (Product Audit, Receiving Inspection)Nonexempt hourly: 30 - 35 (Line Inspectors, Receiving Inspectors)Indirect labor dollars: to $1M.Required Experience:SG 14: Bachelor's Degree in Engineering, related technical field. Quality Control Technician or Engineering Certificate or supplementary education in Quality Control, inspection equipment, or statistical sampling is essential. ISO, Six Sigma and lean manufacturing experience preferred. Three to five years experience in Quality Control functions with at least one year of experience at the supervisory level.SG 15: Bachelor's Degree in Engineering, related technical field, with a minimum of nine years experience in a manufacturing environment. A minimum of six years department level supervisory experience required.",Quality Manager () Job in Mankato,Full Time Employee,"Mankato, MN 56101",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Manager-20160071-Job-Mankato-MN-US-165373132.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=15,,Quality Assurance/Safety,5b90aee091417bfaab2e0b8dd985f452
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:07:24:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Small, well-established manufacturing / machining companyseeks detail oriented individual to review Quality related records (materialcertifications, inspection reports, etc.) and perform dimensional inspection ofparts.1 year experience minimum requiredDuties: Approves incoming materials by conducting dimensional inspections using calipers, micrometers and other industry-standard measuring equipment Documents inspection results by completing inspection reports and logs Participates in Material Review Board (MRB) with input from a Quality standpoint to gain a disposition on discrepant material. Segregates rejected materials and initiates return of materials for re-work and confirms re-work when materials are received. Communicates with vendors to resolve both material and certification discrepanciesSkills: Drawing Interpretation Math (Converting fractions to decimals,understanding tolerances from drawing) Strong communication, not afraid to askquestions Problem solving, able to follow-up ongoingissues Time Management, able to manage and adjust priorities as required",Quality Inspector Job in Norristown,Employee,"Norristown, PA 19401",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Inspector-Job-Norristown-PA-165533290.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=6,"27,000.00 - 32,000.00 $ /year",,dd6cf87bbac90fb1d34203869e6746ad
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:06:57:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"TechnicianAs a Thompson Technician you'll be at the forefront of the automotive industry, working on some of the most innovative products available on the market and using the latest in diagnostic technology in a state of the art environment. With new innovations regularly coming to market, Thompson Technicians will always be learning and participating in regular training both online and hands on. Working for Thompson is a highly rewarding experience and only the best technicians are employed by our dealerships. If you would like to work with highly skilled Technicians in a safe, friendly, clean and hard working environment, Thompson is the place for you.•Entry Level Lube technicians (Will train)•A, B, C & D Technicians•Used Car Techs with General Auto Repair Experience- PA State Inspection License and emission License required. (M)",Technician Job in Doylestown,Full Time,"Doylestown, PA 18901",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Technician-Job-Doylestown-PA-US-165896229.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),434e268322c3769b87300efd0ce2320a
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:06:56:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"World renowned beverage manufacturer has an IMMEDIATE need for a Quality Assurance Technician to join their Central Florida facility. We are looking for local candidates with a Chemistry/Scientific Degree, QA & beverage testing experience. This is a 2-4 month contract but could be extended. 10am-6:30pm but OT and additional shift coverage may be needed at times. Contractor benefits available. Responsibilities for the QA/QC TechnicianConduct qualitative and quantitative testing of raw materials and in-process materials and finished goods (juice concentrates, flavors, oils, colors, sweeteners, etc) Audit containers, labelers and CIP systems to ensure proper operations.Conduct package quality inspection and quality audits and isolate product that does not meet standards.Receive and test raw materials prior to production process.Requirements for the QA/QC TechnicianChemistry/Scientific Degree is preferred. 3-5 years of QA testing experience within a food/beverage environment. Local to the Orlando, FL area & available to start assignment in April. Benefits for the QA/QC TechnicianContractor benefits. This Job is located in Apopka, FL -> United States",QA/QC Technician - Quality /Beverage /Chemistry / Microbiology Job in Apopka,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Apopka, FL 32703",,http://jobview.monster.com/QA-QC-Technician-Quality-Beverage-Chemistry-Microbiology-Job-Apopka-FL-US-165644852.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=6,20.00 - 21.00 $ /hour,,47798d717d55b69085dfe17bfca164ed
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:05:48:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our food processing plant is in need of QC Lead Technicians for the upcoming season! Great opportunity for QC Technicians who have supervised a team previously, full time hours with OT. $15/hr to start and Bilingual in English/Spanish a Plus.Job Requirements and Duties:The QC Technician will carry out with limited supervision, quality analysis and control for production of product. The Quality Control Technician will work within the laboratory and the processing facility to perform analytical analysis, food safety/quality audits and micro audits/sampling. Daily audits of production procedures including verification of code dates, scales, water levels, plant GMP?s, and documentation ? Line audits against established guidelines and frequency ? Conduct daily audits and work with QC Supervisor and production personnel in addressing items that are out of compliance ? Sample collection, operation of lab equipment, data analysis and entry, shipment of sample ? Obtain and examine product retain shelf life samples ? Calibrates and maintain laboratory equipment ? Performs analytical analysis of all in-process and finished goods produced within the APEX facility ? Performs pre-operational, in-process and post operation food safety and plant sanitation audits ? Performs microbiological/ATP swabbing of plant equipment and facilities ? Places product on hold if deviations from standards occur ? Completes corrective actions for deviations from standards ? Enforces plant QA, hygiene and GMP policies ? Obtains product retain samples for further evaluation ? Completes all quality paperwork in both hard copy and electronic format REQUIRED SKILLS AND ABILITIES:? Must be self-motivated and has the ability to perform multiple tasks ? Ability to communicate in English including writing, speaking and reading, reasonable Spanish desired but not mandatory MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: ? High School Diploma or equivalent; or three to six months of related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience ? Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite: Microsoft Excel, Word and Access ? Valid California Drive License ? Must be able to work with minimal supervision PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS: ? 1-2 years? experience in food manufacturing or food production preferred ? Bachelor?s degree in Food Science or related experience and or/training; or equivalent combination of education and experience PHYSICAL DEMANDS: ? The work environment for this position will be typical of the manufacturing facility. There are portions of the job that will require working in cold environments and in warm environments, loud environments, in proximity of chemicals as well as the laboratory environment. For short periods of time there is work in a frozen environment. ? Must be able to work in a wet, cold or hot environment ***Please apply with resume and cover letter*** We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.",Quality Control Lead Job in Oxnard,,"Oxnard, CA 93030",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Control-Lead-Job-Oxnard-CA-US-165939208.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=4,Up to $15.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),60bad4ca3c0d5b8550e4b5c669ab0746
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:05:47:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Medica Corporation manufactures simple-to-use, highly reliable diagnostic blood testing analyzers. Actively engaged in developing new technology, Medica specifically designs products to enhance productivity and the quality of care in small to medium-size in-vitro diagnostic laboratories. Medica’s clinical chemistry, blood gas, electrolyte, and hematology analyzers are focused on the global need to lower health care costs.Job Purpose:Inspects incoming raw material parts and perform first articles to determine acceptance or rejection based on conformance to documented specifications.Duties: * Uses a variety of basic and advanced equipment, e.g. Coordinate Measuring Machine, optical comparator, micrometers, calipers, gauge pins and blocks, and height gauges, to inspect incoming parts to detailed mechanical drawings and inspection procedures * Establishes and maintains accurate handwritten and electronic inspection and nonconforming material reports. * Conducts in-house calibrations of simple tools, gauges, and equipment using controlled procedures. * Periodically reviews manufacturing records for outgoing product to ensure accuracy and compliance. * Works with Engineers to troubleshoot both manufacturing and design problems as they arise. * Generates change orders to improve and streamline inspection processes. * Performs recordkeeping electronic file management as needed. * Employs technical savvy and manufacturing process knowledge to correct and prevent product nonconformities.* Trains new Inspectors as needed.Skills/Qualifications:* Thorough understanding of mechanical drawings produced to ANSI standards and geometric tolerances is required.  * Experience creating and executing Coordinate Measuring Machine programs is required.  * Knowledge of basic arithmetic and trigonometry is required.* Familiarity with Microsoft Office Applications is required.  * Working knowledge of FDA/ISO regulatory guidelines is desired.",Sr Mechanical Inspector Job in Bedford,Full Time,"Bedford, MA 01730",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Mechanical-Inspector-Job-Bedford-MA-US-165910037.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=20,20.00 - 25.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),17212ad1b9bcde873f9e5812f71d0477
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:05:14:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"(QA) Quality Assurance Job in Charlotte, NC Looking for a qualified applicant for an immediate hire for a Quality Assurance Job in Charlotte, NC. Desired person will have a strong background in QA methodology.  Required Skills:   Minimum experience 5+ years in testing. Agile Testing Experience Knowledge of HP QT or the equivalent software to develop automated scripts. Strong documentation and analytical skills. Need a self starter with strong attention to detail. Knowledge of Rally, JIRA, Caliber, Share Point, Tableau, Toad for DB2, Quality Center, and SQL. Knowledge of relational databases and flat files.  Preferred:Would prefer financial services experience. If you are interested in the QA job in Charlotte, NC then apply today.  ",QA Job in Charlotte,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Charlotte, NC 28255",,http://jobview.monster.com/QA-Job-in-Charlotte-NC-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-165260402.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=6,,Quality Assurance/Safety,c1fe467fb63650128f52cb780b56e841
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:04:57:31,No,jobs.monster.com,".clearfix:before, .clearfix:after { content: "" ""; display: table; } .clearfix:after { clear: both; } .clearfix { *zoom: 1; } .muz_jobad { background: #FFFFFF; } @media screen and (max-width: 750px) { .muz_wrapper { padding: 0 !important; } .muz_jobad, .muz_jobad .muz_sidebar, .muz_jobad .muz_content { width: auto !important; float: none; } .muz_jobad .muz_wrapper .header { margin: 0 5%; } .muz_header img { max-width: 130%; width: auto; height: auto; } .muz_sidebar { margin: 20px 5% 0px; max-width: 247px; } .muz_wrapper .muz_content .muz_middle .apply { float: none; margin: 0 auto !important; display: block; width: 140px; text-align: center; color: #FFFFFF !important; } .muz_wrapper .copyright { margin: 0 5%; } .muz_wrapper h2 { margin: 20px 5%; } .muz_wrapper .scrolling { margin: 0 5%; } } Senior Manager, Quality Assurance Responsibilities The Sr. Manager of Quality Assurance shall have direct accountability, responsibility and authority to lead the corporate quality assurance system that promotes Customer satisfaction and that positively impacts the financial performance of E.ON Energy Services and its Customers. Champion continuous improvement efforts and defect reduction initiatives to establish an effective Quality Management System (QMS).Initiate and implement quality improvement processes and activities as appropriate to improve the performance of the company’s product and service lines and educate and train employees as to their impact in the quality management system.Lead, develop, implement, manage and integrate the Quality Management System for multi-location service facilities across North America and serve as the primary quality control resource for problem identification, resolution, and continuous improvement.Design, implement and document procedures for process control, process improvement, testing and inspection.Establish and implement for monitoring system effectiveness and to enable all employees to make sound product quality decisions.Establish the system, collection and analysis of statistical data to predict trends that will affect improvement of service and product quality and develop process certification standards and lead process certification.Interact with customers to communicate the benefits of the quality program; identify opportunities to improve quality and establish feedback; assure that effective corrective action is implemented.Oversee the tooling calibration and testing program and participate in internal and external quality audits.Establish credibility throughout the organization as an effective developer of solutions to business challenges.Foster a corporate culture that promotes the highest ethical practices and encourages individual integrity and responsibility. Qualifications At least 10 years of experience in the implementation and management of quality assurance systems. Preference given for the following:Experience in the implementation and management of quality assurance systems in a field service industry with multiple geographic facilities and a similarly dispersed labor force.Experience, knowledge and understanding of operations, maintenance and electrical systems, applicable to wind power technology. At a glance Reference no: 43761 Contract term: Regular/Exempt Working hours: Full time Apply online E.ON is committed to equal opportunities and actively promotes diversity, equality and flexibility. E.ON E.ON is an international privately-owned energy supplier. In the 2014 financial year, our staff comprising in excess of more than 58,000 employees based in many countries in Europe as well as in Russia and North America generated sales of around EUR 112 billion. We have an ambitious objective: We want to be the preferred partner for high-value energy offerings for customers. E.ON Climate and RenewablesE.ON is a leading global renewable player and has invested over 10 bn Euro in the renewables business. We play a leading role in the development of the renewables industry worldwide and currently operate over 5 GW of renewable capacity. We plan to expand this portfolio by 2.4 GW until 2020. We focus on onshore, offshore and photovoltaic business in Europe and North America.This means we employ a highly diverse range of talents. Engineers, project managers, business developers, HR professionals - our business is home to all these and more, dedicating themselves to generating energy from onshore and offshore wind technology, photovoltaic.E.ON Climate & Renewables is responsible for E.ON Group’s global activities in industrial-scale renewables. At a glance Reference no: 43761 Contract term: Regular/Exempt Working hours: Full time E.ON Locations Find our locations worldwide Click here www.eon-career.com © E.ON",.clearfix:before,,".clearfix:before, .clearfix:after { content: "" ""; display: table; } .clearfix:after { clear: both; } .clearfix { *zoom: 1; } .muz_jobad { background: #FFFFFF; } @media screen and (max-width: 750px) { .muz_wrapper { padding: 0 !important; } .muz_jobad, .muz_jobad .muz_sidebar, .muz_jobad .muz_content { width: auto !important; float: none; } .muz_jobad .muz_wrapper .header { margin: 0 5%; } .muz_header img { max-width: 130%; width: auto; height: auto; } .muz_sidebar { margin: 20px 5% 0px; max-width: 247px; } .muz_wrapper .muz_content .muz_middle .apply { float: none; margin: 0 auto !important; display: block; width: 140px; text-align: center; color: #FFFFFF !important; } .muz_wrapper .copyright { margin: 0 5%; } .muz_wrapper h2 { margin: 20px 5%; } .muz_wrapper .scrolling { margin: 0 5%; } } Senior Manager, Quality Assurance Responsibilities The Sr. Manager of Quality Assurance shall have direct accountability, responsibility and authority to lead the corporate quality assurance system that promotes Customer satisfaction and that positively impacts the financial performance of E.ON Energy Services and its Customers. Champion continuous improvement efforts and defect reduction initiatives to establish an effective Quality Management System (QMS).Initiate and implement quality improvement processes and activities as appropriate to improve the performance of the company’s product and service lines and educate and train employees as to their impact in the quality management system.Lead, develop, implement, manage and integrate the Quality Management System for multi-location service facilities across North America and serve as the primary quality control resource for problem identification, resolution, and continuous improvement.Design, implement and document procedures for process control, process improvement, testing and inspection.Establish and implement for monitoring system effectiveness and to enable all employees to make sound product quality decisions.Establish the system, collection and analysis of statistical data to predict trends that will affect improvement of service and product quality and develop process certification standards and lead process certification.Interact with customers to communicate the benefits of the quality program; identify opportunities to improve quality and establish feedback; assure that effective corrective action is implemented.Oversee the tooling calibration and testing program and participate in internal and external quality audits.Establish credibility throughout the organization as an effective developer of solutions to business challenges.Foster a corporate culture that promotes the highest ethical practices and encourages individual integrity and responsibility. Qualifications At least 10 years of experience in the implementation and management of quality assurance systems. Preference given for the following:Experience in the implementation and management of quality assurance systems in a field service industry with multiple geographic facilities and a similarly dispersed labor force.Experience, knowledge and understanding of operations, maintenance and electrical systems, applicable to wind power technology. At a glance Reference no: 43761 Contract term: Regular/Exempt Working hours: Full time Apply online E.ON is committed to equal opportunities and actively promotes diversity, equality and flexibility. E.ON E.ON is an international privately-owned energy supplier. In the 2014 financial year, our staff comprising in excess of more than 58,000 employees based in many countries in Europe as well as in Russia and North America generated sales of around EUR 112 billion. We have an ambitious objective: We want to be the preferred partner for high-value energy offerings for customers. E.ON Climate and RenewablesE.ON is a leading global renewable player and has invested over 10 bn Euro in the renewables business. We play a leading role in the development of the renewables industry worldwide and currently operate over 5 GW of renewable capacity. We plan to expand this portfolio by 2.4 GW until 2020. We focus on onshore, offshore and photovoltaic business in Europe and North America.This means we employ a highly diverse range of talents. Engineers, project managers, business developers, HR professionals - our business is home to all these and more, dedicating themselves to generating energy from onshore and offshore wind technology, photovoltaic.E.ON Climate & Renewables is responsible for E.ON Group’s global activities in industrial-scale renewables. At a glance Reference no: 43761 Contract term: Regular/Exempt Working hours: Full time E.ON Locations Find our locations worldwide Click here www.eon-career.com © E.ON",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Manager-Quality-Assurance-Job-Austin-Chicago-TX-US-165699180.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=7,,,af3f29aaada6094219df7593aa201143
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:04:56:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our food processing plant is in need of QC Lead Technicians for the upcoming season! Great opportunity for QC Technicians who have supervised a team previously, full time hours with OT. $15/hr to start and Bilingual in English/Spanish a Plus.Job Requirements and Duties:The QC Technician will carry out with limited supervision, quality analysis and control for production of product. The Quality Control Technician will work within the laboratory and the processing facility to perform analytical analysis, food safety/quality audits and micro audits/sampling. Daily audits of production procedures including verification of code dates, scales, water levels, plant GMP?s, and documentation ? Line audits against established guidelines and frequency ? Conduct daily audits and work with QC Supervisor and production personnel in addressing items that are out of compliance ? Sample collection, operation of lab equipment, data analysis and entry, shipment of sample ? Obtain and examine product retain shelf life samples ? Calibrates and maintain laboratory equipment ? Performs analytical analysis of all in-process and finished goods produced within the APEX facility ? Performs pre-operational, in-process and post operation food safety and plant sanitation audits ? Performs microbiological/ATP swabbing of plant equipment and facilities ? Places product on hold if deviations from standards occur ? Completes corrective actions for deviations from standards ? Enforces plant QA, hygiene and GMP policies ? Obtains product retain samples for further evaluation ? Completes all quality paperwork in both hard copy and electronic format REQUIRED SKILLS AND ABILITIES:? Must be self-motivated and has the ability to perform multiple tasks ? Ability to communicate in English including writing, speaking and reading, reasonable Spanish desired but not mandatory MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: ? High School Diploma or equivalent; or three to six months of related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience ? Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite: Microsoft Excel, Word and Access ? Valid California Drive License ? Must be able to work with minimal supervision PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS: ? 1-2 years? experience in food manufacturing or food production preferred ? Bachelor?s degree in Food Science or related experience and or/training; or equivalent combination of education and experience PHYSICAL DEMANDS: ? The work environment for this position will be typical of the manufacturing facility. There are portions of the job that will require working in cold environments and in warm environments, loud environments, in proximity of chemicals as well as the laboratory environment. For short periods of time there is work in a frozen environment. ? Must be able to work in a wet, cold or hot environment ***Please apply with resume and cover letter*** We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.",Quality Control Lead Job in Oxnard,,"Oxnard, CA 93030",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Control-Lead-Job-Oxnard-CA-US-165939206.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=3,Up to $15.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),99d94bb46583923c0bc84eb920a55738
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:04:15:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"American Technical Associates, Inc., (ATA), a Knoxville, TN based technical staffing/search firm, is recruiting for the following short term temporary positions in the Loudon,TN area.QC Laboratory Technicians12 hour weekly rotating shifts (4 on 2 off)1-3 months, possibly longerEssential Duties:The Lab Technicians will analyze samples throughout the process, finished products, and research samples to ensure the quality of the process and help improve operations within the facility. They must ensure the products meet the customer requirements.This position requires a self starter with the ability to learn quickly and manage a diverse workload. The candidate will be working in a manufacturing environment working closely with Process Operators and Engineers.Daily activities will include field sampling, analyzing samples received from the various process steps, testing final product against release specifications, and associated documentation· Routine qualitative and quantitative analysis of in process and finished samples using HPLC; GC; AA; GPC; NIR; Refractometer; UV Spectrophotometer; pH meter; Microscopy; Wet Chemistry; Microbiology; physical testing with moisture balance and sieves · Data entry; Documentation of laboratory work using laboratory worksheets; documentation must be detailed, accurate and meet cGMP requirements· Process troubleshooting · Communication of results· Performing routine laboratory maintenance tasks including organization and cleaning of work areas, checking for expired reagents and standards, disposal of product samples, and chemicals· Standard and sample solution preparation· Calibration, maintenance and operation of lab instrumentationSKILLS, KNOWLEDGE, EDUCATION REQUIRED:· BS degree in a science or technical area is preferred but not required· QC laboratory experience OR have proven technical skills including experience with various laboratory methodology and equipment is a plus · Good troubleshooting skills· Ability to multi-task and prioritize with accuracy and attention to detail· Ability to work in a fast-paced environment· Excellent computer skills· Excellent communication skillsATA is an Equal Opportunity EmployerQualified candidates please respond with a MSWord resume",Lab Technician Job in Loudon,Full Time,"Loudon, TN 37774",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Lab-Technician-Job-Loudon-TN-US-165775093.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=7,15.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,919f2bdc1e760f206949ecaed798997c
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:04:15:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for an Analytical Chemist/ QC Chemist for a growing medical device company in North Atlanta market to perform and support the transfer and implementation of analytical methods, equipment, and testing of raw/ in process materials for manufacturing facility.   Must be able to assess the purity, potency, efficacy, and other performance characteristics of the materials for the purpose of supporting both manufacturing and quality assurance in the production, release, and monitoring of established product lines.   Must interpret and report final results in accordance with company standard operating procedures, cGMPs and FDA guidelines.   Must be able to work well in a team environment and participate in work groups to support product implementation and increase productivity.      Job Requirements/Background Skills Required:  BS in Chemistry or related field with at least two(2) years in a cGMP regulated industry with knowledge of Pharmaceutical or medical device industry experience (current) required.  Must be familiar with common laboratory techniques such as HPLC, GC, instrumental particle size/surface area measurements, FTIR, NIR, UV/VIS, KF, use of analytical balances, pH meters and common USP wet chemical techniques.  Those with proven analytical method validation and transfer experience to include Method Transfer, IQ, PQ and Equipment Validation encouraged to apply.    Must be a highly motivated, goal oriented achiever with ability to prioritize and organize own work semi-independently.  Strong documentation and report writing skills to include USP, cGMPs and GLP lab practices.   ",QC Chemist Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30328",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals;Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/QC-Chemist-Job-Atlanta-GA-US-165905410.aspx?mescoid=1900259001001&jobPosition=5,,Biotech/R&D/Science,a5aebddf9fd4c5ed2915cea7ad431921
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:03:49:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a UAT Tester Lead / SQA 4 in Charlotte, North Carolina (NC).Overview:The Counterparty Credit Risk Management (CCRM) is responsible for ensuring that an appropriate Risk Management framework exists for the primary trading and lending desks and products that they offer, with particular emphasis on Counterparty Credit Risk. These tasks include the identification, measurement and aggregation, approval, pricing and reporting of counterparty credit risk. CCRM is seeking an experienced UAT Senior Tester to participate in business testing and documentation activities for a large scale multi-year initiative. The scope of the project includes replacement of the current risk management platform, enhancement of data integrity processes and technical infrastructure and enrichment of monitoring and reporting processes.The project will be delivered over 24 Agile sprints (6 releases) concluding in November 2017. The most substantial aspect of this role will be to work with the Business SMEs to develop and document test plans, test scenarios, test cases, and reporting. The approach is comprised of end user testing for the functional components following each sprint and release, end-to-end integrated testing and parallel systems run upon completion of all development.Responsibilities: Create UAT test scenarios in partnership with Business SMEs Create UAT test cases in partnership with Business SMEs Conduct UAT test scenario and test case walk-throughs for Business SME review/approval Participate in UAT test case execution Attend Daily Defect triage meetings Attend Daily Execution meetings Create UAT Traceability Matrix for the workstream Participate in identifying Regression UAT test cases in partnership with the Business SME to ensure inclusion in a Regression Test BedREQUIREMENTS: 4+ years of UAT testing experience in financial services industry 3+ years of information technology quality assurance and systems application testing experience Established track record of building strong business and technology partner relationships Experience working with end users and Business SMEs Intermediate to expert in the use of HP-ALM, Excel, PowerPoint, and Word Ability to work on multiple complex tasks simultaneously Excellent written and verbal communication skills Ability to work effectively in a fast paced and high pressure environment with an aggressive project timelinePreferred Qualifications: Experience with Agile development methodology Experience with Technology project management methodology Experience participating in testing activities in the Capital Markets arena Experience with Capital Market Risk and / or Trading systems platforms and the development of business processes on these platforms",UAT Tester Lead / SQA  Job in Charlotte,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Charlotte, NC 28202",,http://jobview.monster.com/UAT-Tester-Lead-SQA-4-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-165377733.aspx?mescoid=1500137001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1c85a319518f09cf7711e2fa640b1cba
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:03:48:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Quality ManagerThis position is responsible for support, enhancements and continued development of our Plant/Manufacturing Systems. The successful candidate will act as the technical lead, as well as an individual contributor on these engagements, contributing to design, development and integration into enterprise systems.ResponsibilitiesEvaluates electrical systems, products, components, and applications by designing and conducting research programs; applying knowledge of electricity and materialsConfirms system's and components' capabilities by designing testing methods; testing propertiesDevelops electrical products by studying customer requirements; researching and testing manufacturing and assembly methods and materialsDevelops manufacturing processes by designing and modifying equipment for building and assembling electrical components; soliciting observations from operatorsAssures product quality by designing electrical testing methods; testing finished products and system capabilitiesPrepares product reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trendsProvides engineering information by answering questions and requestsMaintains product and company reputation by complying with federal and state regulationsKeeps equipment operational by following manufacturer's instructions and established procedures; requesting repair serviceMaintains product data base by writing computer programs; entering dataMaintains professional and technical knowledge by attending educational workshops; reviewing professional publications; establishing personal networks; participating in professional societiesEducationCandidate must be able to work for any employer within the US without requiring any sponsorshipExperience in large capital projects is preferredAdditional experiences desired include; automated controls, utility systems, monitoring and process control, power distribution, continuous improvement and facilities managementExperience with SQL programming and relational databasesExperience in Windows operating system management and configuration as it pertains to a networked manufacturing environment",Quality Technician Job in Syracuse,Full Time,"Syracuse, NY",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Technician-Job-Syracuse-NY-US-165898442.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0531b8f160eb70e4296acf0b1e04b38b
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:03:25:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description: VTR provides responsive, accurate and value-optimized staffing and talent acquisition solutions for clients in the Aerospace and Defense industries. At VTR, we are always looking for people who are dedicated at what they do, exceptional team players, and driven by success. If this sounds like you, we would like to help you find the next opportunity in your career.   Position Title:   Quality Systems Specialist 2   Job Description: Assists in review of proposals, contracts, regulatory, program and customer requirements to prepare quality assurance plans and tests for hardware and software products, processes and services. Maintains Quality directives, policies, processes, procedures and metrics to assure program, contract, customer, regulatory requirements, international standards and working agreements are deployed using established procedures. Collects and verifies data to support the identification of root cause routine problems. Provides ideas and concepts for corrective action development. Supports quality source selection and process reviews of suppliers'' ability to meet program quality requirements. Assists with hardware, software and system level audits to determine compliance with quality management system standards, configuration assurance, related business, regulatory and customer requirements. Documents audit results in standard formats. Compiles data and provides recommendations for material review disposition. Works under general supervision.   Education: Bachelor's degree and typically 3 or more years' related work experience, a Master's degree and typically 1 or more years' related work experience or an equivalent combination of education and experience.   VTR offers numerous opportunities throughout the United States. VTR continually seeks Quality Assurance professionals encompassing Quality Engineers, Source Inspectors, Auditors, Expeditors, and individuals experienced in Production Control and Supplier Surveillance. For details on other positions offered through VTR, please contact us and visit our website at www.vtri.net . 　 VTR is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer. We consider qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, ancestry, age, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, genetic information, medical condition, disability, marital status, or protected veteran status. Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.br{line-height:1px;}",Supplier Quality Specialist Job in Jacksonville,Full Time,"Jacksonville, FL",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/Supplier-Quality-Specialist-Job-Jacksonville-FL-US-165459941.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cc0b419c5a35803e4b64b8c8585afd62
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:03:24:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Systems Quality Assurance Analyst in West Des Moines, Iowa (IA).Responsibilities: Creates, prepares and implements systems quality assurance reviews for numerous applications Responsible for primary development of testing strategies Consults with users, providing advice and direction Performs more complex analysis of business requirements and system specifications May serve as a coordinator for all testing activities on a project Creates test plans and scripts for own projects May lead and review test plans written by others Performs moderately complex to complex test data conditioning, regression testing and testing validation Provides specific guidance on defects to developers Gives direction to less experienced analysts Logs, tracks, and verifies resolution of software and specification defects Documents all phases of the Systems QA processREQUIREMENTS: 5+ years IT quality assurance and systems/application testing experience Any relevant education and/or training will be considered a plus",Systems Quality Assurance Analyst Job in West Des Moines,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","West Des Moines, IA 50266",,http://jobview.monster.com/Systems-Quality-Assurance-Analyst-Job-West-Des-Moines-IA-US-165375710.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d4a726124c53e46eabe7528b5ce5aa6c
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:03:24:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"City of North Charleston Systems Technician Under occasional supervision, performs routine to complex technical work in the design, maintenance and troubleshooting of computer software, hardware and network systems. Provides user support and assistance as needed. Technical college diploma in computer technology, computer networking or related field supplemented by two to three years of responsible experience in computer technology. Salary starting at $43,549 for entry level, or higher DOQ. A South Carolina driver’s license required; City offers an excellent fringe benefit package and health insurance. Please submit City application to the City of North Charleston, P.O. Box 190016, North Charleston, SC 29419-9016 by April 25. To download the job description and our required application go to www.northcharleston.org. EOE.",Systems Technician Job in Charleston,Full Time,"Charleston, SC 29419",Government and Military,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Systems-Technician-Job-Charleston-SC-US-165942180.aspx?ch=newschar&mescoid=1700221001001&jobPosition=16,,,0ed9b65da3aec67f24da3468db0f2b5a
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:03:24:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"PM Lead:The PM Lead actively works collaboratively with the Development Team Leader (DTL) who are responsible for overall team leadership to ensure robust and balanced cross-functional planning, decision-making, implementation, monitoring, and reporting of Development Team activities.  They must be able to both provide strategic vision and guide the teams to develop integrated plans for successfully executing the strategy. Essential functions required for the job: • Coordinate and drive development process planning activities of the Development Teams including Integrated Development Plans, Long Range Plan, budget inputs, and go/no go criteria. • Work closely with the Development Team to facilitate the elaboration, approval and execution of the global program strategy, as well as facilitate decision-making process for their program(s) • Develop, prioritize, document and communicate measurable annual and long range plans. • Provide best in class operational excellence and program management expertise to drive Development Team members towards excellence in execution. • Maintain the overall development plans and provide program inputs into Portfolio Management process• Close collaboration with DTL and functional team members to ensure coordinated evaluation of product opportunities and development scenarios, as well as development of comprehensive integrated recommendations (eg, to Governance Committees) and strategic and operational product plans based on program defined objectives. • Implement development plan by managing E/GDT operations: o Develop and Track project timelines and budget; o Drive team meetings/agendas/minutes including drive and track ‘actions’ o Facilitate team goal setting and tracking to ensure adherence to plan and strategy, and end of year team evaluation process o Coordinate Development Team communications to ensure team member alignment o Issue and present reports to senior management on a routine basis Education & Experience Requirements: • Advanced degree in life sciences or related filed; PhD or MBA with relevant pharmaceutical industry experience preferred • Minimum of 10 years of experience in pharmaceutical drug development with at least 5 years of experience in a program management or team leadership function. • Have a past record of achievement in leading and managing programs and product development with a thorough understanding of the global drug development process at a strategic level. • Track record of success leading project teams toward BLA/ MAA submissions; broader global experience a plus. • Strong business acumen and highly developed negotiation skills • Demonstrated experience in most stages of development and (pre-clinical through post launch) • Ability to manage multiple complex cross-functional teams and processes • Strong understanding and competency in planning processes and decision making • Demonstrated experience using standard program management tools and software including integrated development plans, timelines, risk management, and budget development and monitoring.  ",Project Manager Job in Philadelphia,,Location: ,,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-159858580.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=8,,,c87e9aa1edd40683d793733bae37a4ae
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:02:58:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is a World Class manufacturing company in the Bowling Green, Kentucky area.  They have an immediate need for an experienced EH&S Specialist.This is a very visible position and will be responsible for all EPA standards and conforming with State and local regulations,  Will also work with OSHA programs, training, and audits.A four year degree is required as well as experience in a manufacturing facility.  Must have an understanding or experience of ISO 14001.  The successful candidate needs the ability to teach and coach employees and motivate them to follow the rules and be safety proactive.  Needs to also have strong verbal and written communication skills.Your resume will be handled in the strictest of confidence and will not be sent anywhere without your consent.",Environmental Health and Safety Specialist Job in Bowling Green,Full Time,"Bowling Green, KY",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Environmental-Health-Safety-Specialist-Job-Bowling-Green-KY-US-165810770.aspx?mescoid=2900540001001&jobPosition=7,"60,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /yearExcellent Benefits and Opportunities",Experienced (Non-Manager),2741a37e4be27dce644e01542ccf3127
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:02:57:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Description:We currently are seeking a talented, strategic, and innovative Senior Formulator.   This key position is based in our 24/7 Manufacturing facility located in San Fernando, CA (So. CA).  For more than 40 years, Pharmavite has been a trusted leader in the wellness industry, recognized for providing quality vitamins, minerals and supplements and all natural snacks under our Nature Made® and SOYJOY® brand names.   Who We Are: People creating new products for better health worldwide.  What We Do: Inspiring the healthiest you through more complete nutrition… Wherever you are in life.    As a member of the Pharmavite team, employees enjoy competitive salaries and an exceptional benefits package featuring medical, dental, vision, 401K, life insurance, and long term disability coverage. In addition, employees enjoy educational assistance, credit union membership, substantial discounts on our products, and 11 paid holidays per year. Position Summary:Independently provides effective and functional technical support for all dosage form development. Effectively manage and champion all technical aspects of the product development process from pre-formulation to commercialization, utilizing standard best practices and procedures with hands on formulations, scale up and commercialization support. Improves current products, addresses manufacturing issues, evaluates new and alternate raw materials, reformulates existing products and seeks cost savings. Produces and maintains documentation on all projects in a timely fashion. Effectively interfaces with regulatory affairs, R&D and other cross-functional disciplines to accomplish project goals.Responsibilities:Independently develops formulations for a variety of oral solid dosage and delivery forms.Prepares stability, consumer, and clinical samples. Prepares, reviews, and/or approves stability protocols. Monitors, evaluates and summarizes the results of stability studies.Improves work flow by studying process flowcharts, recommending modifications in work flow, work stations and products, developing new procedures, recommending equipment modifications and purchasesPerforms process improvement projects and analyzes formulas for reformulation. Creates rework procedures and prepares Master Batch Records.Assists manufacturing with processing and thru-put goals by using statistical analysis programs for overall product improvement. For assigned manufacturing responsibilities, provides technical support to Operations by establishing the requirements for batch manufacturing and overseeing the execution of any required studies.Trains others in developing new products; conducts appropriate experiments and instructs in the proper use of laboratory and manufacturing equipment.Responsible for coordination and execution of benchtop, pilot, manufacturing scale-up and verification batches. Provides technical and scientific input, support and assistance to other technical disciplines. Maintains accurate records of all development projects. Prepares technical documents relevant to area of responsibility such as SOP's, electronic master batch records, raw material and product specifications, technical reports, lab book documentation and technology transfer documentations.Ensures efficient operations in assigned project areas in accordance with Pharmavite Safety Requirements, SOP's and GMP's. Ensures functional operation and preventative maintenance of equipment to reduce/eliminate accidental injury.Maintains awareness of current developments in the functional discipline. Develops a network of outside contacts such as vendors, consultants, educators and appropriate continuing education courses.Interfaces with other operating units within and outside the department. Presents ideas and suggestions for new products, product or process improvements and improved laboratory operationsPerforms other related duties as assignedMinimum Qualifications:Education:Requires a four year college or university degree or its equivalent in Pharmacy, Chemistry, Food Science, Chemical Engineering or related field. Certification:  None.Experience:Requires a minimum of four years industry formulation development experience with four years of related experience.Knowledge/Skills/Abilities:Requires:Comprehensive knowledge and practical experience with product/process development, processing laboratory techniques and regulatory requirements and a firm foundation in chemistry, mathematics, pharmaceutics and/or food science. Proficient in oral and written communication skills as well as effective organizational and supervisory skills and the ability to make presentations and recommendations in the area of responsibility. Must be able to communicate effectively in a cross functional team environment and have the ability to statistically analyze data. Knowledgeable of Design of Experiment is preferred. Working knowledge of solid dosage form equipment such as tablet presses, capsule machines, tablet coaters and granulation equipment is a plus.Must have computer literacy to include word processing and spreadsheet software. Sound judgment and decision making skill.Physical Requirements: Manufacturing and general office environment.Environment:Exposure to disagreeable elements is negligible.  Frequent work in pilot plant and production facilities.Safety:The incumbent must be able to perform this job safely in accordance with standard operating procedures and good manufacturing practices, without endangering the health or safety of self or others.Supervisory Responsibility:None but guides and assigns the work of others (formulators and technicians). Pharmavite is an equal employment and affirmative action employer F/M/Disability/Vet.Visit our Product Web Sites: http://www.naturemade.com/ http://www.soyjoy.com/",Food Science Senior Formulator / SF Job in San Fernando,Full Time Employee,"San Fernando, CA 91340",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/Food-Science-Senior-Formulator-SF3078-Job-San-Fernando-CA-US-164627851.aspx?mescoid=1900238001001&jobPosition=17,,Biotech/R&D/Science,2de85be85b0d3f990f496bc9eab1ffce
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:02:04:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"DAMASCUS BAKERIESInnovative Baking, Old-Fashioned ExcellenceBrooklyn, New York; Newark, New Jersey (1 mile from Newark Airport)www.damascusbakery.com DAMASCUS BAKERIES is a 3rd Generation Bakery founded in 1930.  We have two baking facilities: Brooklyn, New York; Newark, NJ, our newer 125,000 sq. ft. facility, which is being transitioned into our primary Bakery, R&D Center and Corporate Offices.  Our products include Pitas, Lavash, Wraps, Flatbreads, Pizza Crusts, Breadsticks, Sandwich Buns, and more. We have a very strong- and even historic- presence in the Metro New York market.  Since 2000, we have expanded our capacity and distribution to the National Market, supplying and partnering with many of America's top QSR's, Casual Dining Restaurants, Food Service Establishments, Retail, Club and Natural Stores, Institutions, Distributors, and other Bakeries.  For many of our customers, we have been the Product Development arm that has created some of America's most Successful and Award Winning Flatbreads.We are an SQF Level 3 company that currently employs between 150-200 people, some who have been with us for more than 40 years.   We are a company that thrives to ""Bake a Difference"".  We are a company that is also responsible to its communities and environment.We are a 24/7 operation and we are seeking a very 'Hands-On' Team player to help us with our continued growth in the Quality Control department. The incumbent must be bi-lingual and be able to work weekends and support the Production department at both our Newark, NJ locations. This position will require the ability to work weekend schedules supporting hours of our 24/7 operation.We are seeking the following support:1.      Train and coach machine operators to focus on specification targets.2.      Ensure that 100% correct product & process specifications are being communicated throughout the bakery.3.      Monitor total quality throughout the organization; ordering through shipment.4.      Coach all employees to work safely; communicate all potential safety issues to supervisors and management5.      Perform scheduled checks throughout the facility at quality control points, (QCP’s). 6.      Ensure all other QC Checks are performed correctly. 7.      Ensure the packaging table uses the correct materials specified on the monitors.8.      Help coordinate changeovers in packaging and processing.9.      Support Quality Assurance with all of the necessary paperwork at the completion of each shift. 10.  Advise Quality Assurance of any deviations that can affect quality or food safety.11.  Ensure that employees adhere to GMP’s and that SSOP’s for sanitation are followed.12.  Assist in the product evaluation of finished goods.13.  Implement and support all programs in the Quality Systems Manual. Qualifications: Minimum High School diploma. 2 or more years of advanced education preferred.2 years of experience in quality assurance or quality control, preferably in the food industry.Must be able to work both independently and in a group setting.Must have excellent verbal and written communication skills in the English language. Bilingual, (English/Spanish) a plus.Must have the ability to work as required when scheduled including the weekends as this is a 24 hour/7 day a week operation.Must be proficient in Microsoft Excel, WordNO AGENCIES PLEASE, Thank you.",Process Improvement Technician Job in Newark,Full Time,"Newark, NJ 07114",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Process-Improvement-Technician-Job-Newark-NJ-US-165876310.aspx?mescoid=1700218001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4591c2e8ff0722cd2fb6a63b540c32c9
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:01:46:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manufacturer has opening on 3rd shift for a Quality Control Inspector.   Candidatewith 3 years’ experience as a quality control inspector in a manufacturing setting preferred.  Experience using measuring devices and blue print readingrequired.  Must be able to read and write English, work overtime, have good attendance and be willing to work 3rd shift.  Qualified candidates please email resume and cover letter to Twilson@thefgi.com or complete a company application at The Fountainhead Group, Inc. 23 Garden St., NY Mills, NY 13417 from 8 am to 4 pm Monday thru Friday.  No phone calls. The Fountainhead Group, Inc. is an AAE/EEO employer.",Quality Control Inspector - rd Shift Job in Ny Mills,Full Time,"Ny Mills, NY 13417",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Control-Inspector-3rd-Shift-Job-NY-Mills-NY-US-164371356.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5adfa422adb8392260d8e47977949765
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:01:45:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking a dependable and qualified representative to join our Quality Control department as a Quality Control Technician. This position will service our Spring City location. Responsibilities include testing, implementing and complying with quality assurance methods and procedures to provide customers with high quality products. This includes but is not limited to performing tests of concrete and aggregates, and preparing test reports as required. Must be able to certify concrete loads being delivered in accordance with industry regulations; check loads for proper procedure and time of mixing.Requirements:Must have a high school diploma or equivalent and a valid PA driver’s license.Experience working in Concrete or Sand and Gravel Industry.ACI Concrete Field Testing Technician Grade I and PQS Level I certification is a plus. Basic Math and Computer skills.Must be able to climb, bend, push, and lift up to 50 lbs. several times daily.Must be able to travel to plants/offices and to job sites-typically within 2 mile radius ",Quality Control Technician Job in Spring City,Full Time,"Spring City, PA 19475",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Control-Technician-Job-Spring-City-PA-US-165294933.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=19,17.00 - 18.50 $ /hour,,2d8e5672d5d183613faf92e400627238
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:01:00:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have an immediate need for a Lead QA Automation Tools Expert to work on a long term consulting assignment with our direct financial client located in NYC, NY.  We are working directly with the hiring manager for this role. For immediate consideration, please send resumes to psharma@dataincusa.com or call 201-957-1740 extension: 347 for immediate consideration. Looking for Lead QA Testers who are Experts or Guru in Automation Tools with overall software testing experience and specific testing experience in the 'Financial Services' business domain (preferably in Foreign Exchange (FX), Payment - RTGS, SWIFT) LOCAL CANDIDATES ONLY!!Role:The role is required to perform hands-on QA Test Lead activities to set up / configure testing related tools across the organization, develop appropriate document artifacts to enable the Quality Assurance and Testing team to use the different tools, create a knowledge repository for these tools and provide the necessary training to the Quality Assurance and Testing team to use these tools.Skills Required:7-10 years of hands-on testing experience across different test / project methodologies, testing types and tools.Strong Experience on activities relating to the administration / management of testing tools is required.MUST HAVE strong  hands on experience with  QMetry Test Management Selenium Automation tool and JIRA Defect Management Tool.Extensive overall software testing experience and specific testing experience in the 'Financial Services' business domain (preferably in Foreign Exchange (FX), Payment - RTGS, SWIFT).Very good knowledge of testing tools and the setting up / configuration of these tools.Capable of producing quality document artifacts.Good understanding of test processes and project processes.Substantial level of work experience in the 'Financial Services' business domain.Good team player with excellent team / people management skills.Successfully working in a high pressure / changing environment to tight timescales and aggressive deadlines.Skills Desired:QMetry Test Management ToolSelenium Automation Tool.JIRA Defect Management Tool.Certification in Software Testing (CSTE, ISTQB)Responsibilities:Conduct Testing Tools Administration / ManagementProvide expert advice for configuring the different testing tools chosen by the organization.Set up / configure testing related tools chosen by the organization across different test environments.Identify the documentation required to capture the details necessary to maintain the testing tools chosen by the organization.Develop the appropriate document artifacts required to capture the details necessary to maintain the testing tools chosen by the organization.Create a knowledge repository for the testing tools chosen by the organization (within the Quality Assurance and Testing department SharePoint site).Provide the required training to the Quality Assurance and Testing team to use the testing tools chosen by the organization.Identify and plan the sub-tasks required to achieve the above listed responsibilities.Provide regular progress reports to the Quality Assurance and Testing reporting line.Identify and escalate Risks / Issues / Dependencies to appropriate stakeholders as required.Liaise within the Quality Assurance and Testing department and other stakeholders as required to achieve the above listed responsibilities.Liaise with relevant stakeholders to address knowledge gaps and queries.Attend / arrange meetings, workshops (within the QA department and with other stakeholders) as required.Understand and adhere to the Test Process followed by the Quality Assurance and Testing department.Adhere to the communication strategy followed by the Quality Assurance and Testing department.Follow the reporting structure and format adapted by the Quality Assurance and Testing department.Identify process improvement items / areas and contribute to them.Identify and record best practices associated with the role. ",Lead QA Automation Tools Expert Job in New York City,Full Time,"New York City, NY 10001",,http://jobview.monster.com/Lead-QA-Automation-Tools-Expert-Job-New-York-City-NY-US-165901869.aspx?mescoid=1500137001001&jobPosition=14,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),3f9e07baeffcbf057bc17b6ac223fd3e
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:00:58:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"The position summary states the general nature and purpose of the job. Overall accountabilities are defined in this section. This position assists the Food Safety Manager to ensure the food safety system at the plant is properly written, documented and implemented - thus ensuring USDA regulatory compliance and the production of safe and wholesome meat products. The Food Safety Analyst position is for Food Safety employees with the appropriate educational requirements as well as two plus years of experience in Food Safety. Responsibilities and tasks are written as follows: 20% HACCP Programs and Food SafetyAssists in development, implementation and compliance with HACCP programs that support the safe handling of food by recording and analyzing critical control point records that track product through the plant ensuring the safety of food products at all times.Properly review and scrutinize all aspects of the food safety system and meat production processes.20% USDA Regulatory RequirementsEnsure the USDA regulatory requirements for Food Safety are met.This is key because the USDA's interpretation of the “rules” is constantly changing.Revise and update food safety programs and procedures including the annual reassessment of all programs.20% Sanitation ChecksConducts pre-operation sanitation checks to ensure all pre-operation sanitation has been done correctly.Determines need for re-sampling of equipment and directs sanitation and plant personnel to perform the re-sampling. 20% Food Safety DeficienciesCommunicates findings regarding food safety deficiencies to Plant Food Safety Manager and provides feedback, recommendations and instruction and training to plant employees regarding food safety deficiencies and corrective actions as needed.20% Leadership and ExpertiseProvides technical leadership and scientific expertise regarding food safety and sanitation to plant personnel.Other DutiesIn plants with a Corporate Food Safety Manager, this position assumes the management role when the Corporate Food Safety Manager is at other plants.To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals to perform the essential functions.Bachelor's of Science degree and two plus years related experience or equivalent combination of education and experience.Ability to use exposure monitoring equipment, interpret and communicate results.Knowledge of Microsoft Suite software, e.g. Excel, Word and PowerPoint.SAP experience a plus.Detail oriented.Strong organizational skills.Strong interpersonal and technical skills.PI93332012Apply Here",Food Safety Analyst Job in Kinston,Full Time Employee,"Kinston, NC 28504",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Food-Safety-Analyst-Job-Kinston-NC-US-165647685.aspx?mescoid=2900540001001&jobPosition=3,,Quality Assurance/Safety,394dd71241be3fbf043ea5d7e90f00b6
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:00:24:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Amazon Payments' vision is that every Amazon customer will pay with Amazon Payments every time and every place s/he transacts anywhere online. Our team is building secure identity verification and suspicious activity detection & prevention systems that need to scale to the exponential growth in Amazon Payments products. We support products such as Selling on Amazon, Login & Pay with Amazon, Mechanical Turk, Amazon Local Register and certain AWS products. The list is still increasing. We want our account holders to be able to easily add new products, while continually monitoring for suspicious activity. We are leveraging Machine Learning to build systems that understand our account holder's behavior, and can detect changes in that pattern. We are building systems that leverage unique storage systems such as graph database technologies. We are building on a sophisticated rules management platform to give our Compliance offers control over compliance and risk calculations.As part of this, do you like being the voice of our customers and own the quality for the product? Do you think automation when wanting to test? Does driving quality upstream seem logical to you? Our team is looking for an experienced and motivated Senior Quality Assurance Engineer to define and raise the bar on quality for the product and be the quality leader on the team.The Role:This position will involve developing test strategy, executing test cases, test automation, and ultimately being a strong advocate for quality on the team. The right candidate for this role is someone who can quickly ramp up & understand the internals of our systems and independently debug issues & define long term QA solutions. The candidate will also define and implement processes to continuously dive quality upstream and make our systems predictable. Along with owning the quality roadmap for the team, the right candidate will also mentor junior QA engineers to be successful in defining and driving quality . We use agile development and are looking for candidates who can thrive in a fast paced, high energy work environment where we deliver lots of value to our customers, in a very short time. We also have a ton of fun!  Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or equivalent 6+ years of experience, which may be composed of experience as a QA Engineer, or experience as an SDET. 4+ years of expertise in automation using a programing language. Experience developing high quality test plans and test cases Strong knowledge of QA methodology and tools Ability to understand technical specifications and analyze data Experience in scripting and user level test automation Comfortable communicating cross-functionally and across management levels in formal and informal settings Strong organizational and problem solving skills with great attention to detail, including the ability to track multiple test executions simultaneously and report results Ability to programmatically test a product, measure test coverage, develop the best automation, drive testability and diagnostic ability into the product, while promoting best practices in quality areas.   Experience with testing interactive web applications (JavaScript, AJAX, JQuery, CSS, HTML5) Experience test automation for mobile applications and devices Experience with test and behavior driven development Experience with but not limited to JUnit/TestNG, JBehave (or other BDD framework), Selenium, mock objects.Amazon is an equal opportunity employer ",Quality Assurance Engineer Job in Seattle,,"Seattle, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Engineer-Job-Seattle-WA-US-165667063.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=20,,Quality Assurance/Safety,c6f30c4dff8244e96ee72aee00c51b8a
United States of America,US,07/Jun/2016:00:24:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Laulima Government Solutions is the second company established as the Family of Companies (FOCs) under the Alaka`ina Foundation, a Native Hawaian Organization (NHO).  The Foundation Family of Companies (FOCs) also includes Ke`aki Technologies and Kūpono Government Services.  Alaka`ina is the parent 501(c)3 of the Alaka`ina Foundation whose activities principally benefit the youth of Hawaii.  A portion of the profits generated by the FOCs helps support Alaka`ina charitable efforts which includes providing innovative educational programs that combine leadership, science & technology, and environmental stewardship. Laulima has an exciting opportunity for a Medical Laboratory Scientist (MLS) in Frederick, MD supporting the military medical community. The MLS will serve as a Medical Laboratory Scientist performing complex and general laboratory testing in support of Good Laboratory Practice (GLP) in a BSL-4 containment laboratory and BSL 2-3 laboratories. DUTIES INCLUDE: ·         Will be responsible for maintenance, operation, and quality management of all clinical laboratory equipment in accordance with 42CFRPart 493, the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 (CLIA), and standards established by the College of American Pathologists in BSL 1-4.  ·         Responsible for providing support to the Clinical Laboratory and the CDC LRN, as well as the Chief, Division of Medicine, and Chief, Clinical Laboratory.·         Serve as a Medical Laboratory Scientist performing clinical laboratory work supporting research programs and testing of clinical specimens.·         Perform Clinical Chemistry, Clinical Hematology and Clinical Urinalysis techniques such as Chemistry Profiles and Complete Blood Counts (CBC).·         Perform microbiological and related biological and bio-chemical examinations on clinical and environmental specimens for the detection and identification of microbial agents of disease.·         Perform proficiency testing on simulated specimens.·         Prepare and examine slide preparations for the detection of microbial agents.·         Accurately read, interpret and record the results of laboratory tests.·         Perform proper Quality Control (QC) and Maintenance procedures IAW CAP and GLP SOPs and appropriately maintain records, logs, and reports.·         Provide technical and complex information clearly to research scientist, physicians and medical personnel.·         Assist in research, planning and evaluation of alternate methods and testing procedures, assist with training of laboratory or other related personnel.·         Review and follow current literature to maintain state-of-art-methodology and technologies in the Clinical Lab field.·         Participate in specimen collection when required according to test requested; maintain responsibility for patient identification, specimen labeling and collection verification, or instructing patients or other healthcare providers in collection and preservation techniques.·         Assist in preparing the Clinical Lab for inspection by the College of American Pathology (CAP), GLP audits and other regulatory agencies.·         Maintain the laboratory including keeping equipment and work areas in a clean, orderly, and safe manner, and maintaining inventories of laboratory supplies.·         Create and maintain laboratory and office documents including standard operating procedures (SOPs), logs for equipment use and supply purchases.·         Write SOPs for methods used in the laboratory, generate and maintain written records for supplies inventory.·         Maintain laboratory and office written records in a neat and timely manner.  The use of a computer for processing, analyzing, and storing data is required.·         Prepare and submit reports of work and work results and outcomes. Participate in meetings and presentations related to assigned duties and/or work performed.·         Abide by and conform to all rules, regulations, policies and procedures established by Fort Detrick and the facility.·         Provide continuing written summaries, reports, and other documents as needed in support of Division of Medicine and Clinical Laboratory.·         Interact with the medical and non-medical community as needed to accomplish approved tasks.·         Evaluate laboratory information and report results according to protocols mandated by CAP and GLP·         Perform daily, weekly and monthly maintenance in accordance with SOPs.·         Troubleshoot chemistry, hematology and microbiology equipment at the user level.·         Recognize anomalies in testing results and know how to correct problems with the instrumentation.·         Performs equipment validations, calibrations, quality controls, statistical control of observed data, and recording normal operations.·         Provide oversight and review of test results and procedures performed by Medical Laboratory Technician. REQUIREMENTS: ·         Required Education:o   Bachelor’s degree or higher in Biology, Microbiology, Chemistry, or other scientific field of study.·         Required Experience:o   A minimum of 2 years of post-graduate work experience in a high complexity testing clinical laboratory or in a research setting.o   Must have experience in Chemistry, Hematology, and Urinalysis, with experience in coagulation and microbiology highly desirable.o   Must be familiar with 42CFRPart 493, CLIA, and CAP standards, including the maintenance, operation, and quality management of all systems associated with the above statutes and/or standards.o   Shall be required to work at biosafety level 2 through 4 (BSL-2, BSL-3, and BSL-4) conditions.o   Must be willing to develop and learn new techniques when required, and must demonstrate an acceptable level of performance independently carrying out clinical laboratory support to the Division of Medicine (DoM) within the facility.  Performance is evaluated based on the completeness, accuracy and timeliness of results, conformance to established policies, standards and objectives, and, effectiveness of communications and interpersonal skills.·         Required Certification:o   Enrollment in the Biological Personnel Reliability Program (BPRP) for handling select agents is required and must be maintained.  Due to the requirement to enroll in a BPRP program, the contractor shall be able to pass a DoD BPRP health and security screening.·         Preferred Skills & Experience:o   Knowledge of or experience with GLP work desired.   CLEARANCE: ·         Must have a favorably adjudicated Single Scoped Background Investigation (SSBI) completed. ·         An FBI Security Risk Assessment (SRA) must also be completed and approved.  Laulima Government Solutions is a fast growing government service provider. Employees enjoy competitive salaries; a 401K plan with company match; medical, dental, disability, and life insurance coverage; tuition reimbursement; paid time off; and 10 paid holidays. Laulima Government Solutions is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. For additional information on Laulima Government Solutions, please visit www.laulimags.com. We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer of individuals with disabilities and veterans. We are proud to state that we do not discriminate in employment decisions on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin or disability status. If you are a person with a disability and you need an accommodation during the application process, please click here to request accommodation. We E-Verify all employees.",Medical Laboratory Scientist (MLS) Job in Frederick,"Full Time, Employee","Frederick, MD 21701",,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Laboratory-Scientist-MLS-Job-Frederick-MD-US-164751619.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=7,,Biotech/R&D/Science,27ce885643e0512e920b3aeeaa331a48
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:14:58:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you’ve been searching for a way to incorporate your love of aesthetics and making people beautiful into a full time job opportunity, look no further! Our client is on the lookout for an enthusiastic candidate with a passion for fashion who is eager to get their marketing career underway. Currently representing over 50 new fashion & beauty brands nationwide, our client is looking for a Cosmetics Marketing Assistant who can help them make brand to consumer connections with these brands across the Philadelphia area. Daily Responsibilities of the Cosmetics Marketing Assistant:Demonstrate key brand & product features at various locations. Travel to onsite campaign locations will be required.Preform product demonstrators and identify key product attributes.Create consumer & brand connections to increase brand loyalty and recognition.Deliver in-depth product knowledge to customers and educate them on the benefits of each product with the goal of successfully impacting sales performance and generating product sales to assit with the overall marketing plan for each client brand.RequirementsRequirements:Sales, Retail, Promotion, Cosmetic/Fashion or Hospitality experience is a huge asset! Full training will be provided so entry level candidates and recent graduates are encouraged to apply for this role.Ability to adapt to a variety of different people on a daily basisComfortable in a large group setting and with face to face consumer interactionAbility to work both independently and in a group environmentKey Words: Entry Level, Brand/Product Marketing, Account Management, Business Development, Sales / Marketing Strategizing, Product Management, Direct Marketing (CRM), Sales Executive, Marketing Assistant, Account Sales",Cosmetics Marketing Assistant Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time, Employee","Philadelphia, PA 19104",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/cosmetics-marketing-assistant-job-philadelphia-pa-us-169422283.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=14,,Marketing/Product,83ec7f5c05cea5fe18c305ddafd32bce
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:15:48:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"A growing food company located near Kenosha, WI is currently seeking a 2nd shift Production Superintendent. The ideal candidate will be responsible for monitoring operations to ensure compliance of procedures pertaining to food safety and quality during manufacturing process and oversee 4-6 Production Supervisors. This position will report to the Operations Manager. In return the company offers a fantastic starting salary plus a 15% bonus. This job will have the following responsibilities:Assesses work performance of direct reports to ensure expectations are met. Working knowledge of procedures, planning, SAP and equipmentProvide leadership and direction to department employeesIdentify and analyze problems, create and implement solutionsCarry out supervisory responsibilities within organizations policiesQualifications & Requirements:BS/BA degree (preferred)3+ years' experience in a management role (required)Experience in a food manufacturing environment (required) Meat background (preferred)Open to shift APPLY NOW AS THIS IS AN IMMEDIATE NEED!If you are interested in this position, please send your latest resume and salary requirements to tcardoni@judge.com",Production Superintendent Job in Kenosha,"Full Time, Employee","Kenosha, WI",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/production-superintendent-job-kenosha-wi-us-169038898.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=11,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,ba6b6ec9cabca8eb5e60ecc5e6ad2310
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:15:49:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview: We are the maker, marketer and distributor of branded food products that have been American favorites for decades. Our employees located in more than 20 offices and plants across North America rally around our mission, Reinvigorating Iconic Brands. We work to transform our brands to be more profitable for our customers and more enjoyable for our consumers.   At Pinnacle Foods, every employee has the opportunity to make an impact—from marketing and research & development, to manufacturing, finance and sales—each function plays a critical role in our success. By living our values of trust, candor and ownership we create great relationships that help us deliver results and drive meaningful change for our brands and business.   The Engineering Manager is responsible for all aspects of engineering for the plant. This position is expected to provide leadership, technical expertise and drive results across capital execution, site asset and productivity improvements relative to capital related activities while ensuring the highest levels of safety, quality, sanitation and regulatory compliance. Responsibilities:   Principal Duties and Responsibilities:   Responsible for Continuous Improvement programs related to engineering, to generate improvement plans that feature both short and long-term improvements, with and without capital investment. Business driver of Value Stream Mapping and Lean Processes Drive key initiatives throughout the facility in the areas of  fixed asset management, plant layout & flow manufacturing, managing floating bottlenecks, FDA/GMP/AIB compliance, safety and automation Ensure team members are adequately trained on new technologies (CMMS, electrical controls, and other manufacturing technology. Engages in the typical responsibilities of a manager requiring planning, evaluating, organizing, integrating and delegating. Serve as a Change Agent responsible for elevating staff member’s capabilities for the benefit of the organization. Drive key capital initiatives around refrigeration systems, plant utility systems, high-speed processing, and packaging/material handling systems Manage and implement all aspects of the capital expenditure process including; Budget control, Capital project initiation, document preparation and implementation.  Development of long range (3 – 5 year) capital plans Provide strategic leadership with use of new technologies. Act as technical resource to plant leadership team. Coaching and development of direct reports. * Completion of special projects, duties and assignments.  Qualifications: Bachelors degree in Engineering, Masters degree preferred 8-10 years progressive experience in manufacturing engineering, with at least 3 years in a management role  Extensive knowledge of operations from a technical perspective. High level management and business skills, extensive financial knowledge base as well as understanding of employment policies/procedures. Organizational, interpersonal, communication and conflict resolution skills Able to influence and impact all levels in the organization   Pinnacle Foods is an Affirmative Action/EEO Employer –qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard toprotected veteran or disability status, race/color, religion, gender, nationalorigin, age, sexual orientation, gender expression, gender identity or anyother legally protected basis.  ",Engineering Manager Job in Centralia,Full Time Employee,"Centralia, IL",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/engineering-manager-job-centralia-il-us-168003969.aspx?mescoid=1100041001001&jobPosition=2,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,19511f6d0bf7c529ea533756b1e379e5
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:16:57:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Help us help our customers realize their dreams of a beautiful home! -Join The #1 Furniture Company-Join The #1 Furniture Brand Ashley Furniture Industries, Inc. is the largest manufacturer of furniture in the world. Established in 1945, Ashley offers one of the industry’s broadest product assortments to retail partners in 123 countries. Design, Build, Deliver: Using our internationally acclaimed in-house design team, we create the look without paying expensive design fees. Then, by adhering to some of the most efficient production standards in the world, we are able to maximize productivity and minimize waste, generating additional savings for you. Finally, all orders are filled from strategically located regional warehouses and are serviced by our own fleet of trucks, the largest in the industry. Essential Functions and Responsibilities: Make employment decisions and/or recommendations on hiring, improvement plans, transfers, promotions, corrective actions, terminations, pay adjustments. Make decisions relative to requests for time off. Listen, respond and address employee concerns. Coordinate with other supervision to ensure all operation activities are coordinated as an integrated whole. Coordinate the work and activities of employees by directing members of a department to meet production goals. Make decisions and solves problems by analyzing information and evaluating results to optimize production.  Audit production on a daily basis to ensure standard operating procedures are being met.  Facilitate employee training through safety training and weekly team meetings to ensure employees are educated on departmental issues and aware of the company’s goals and objectives. Manage and improve functional areas and institute performance measures through use and interpretation of Continuous Improvement tools.  Improve working conditions and processes (safety, quality, productivity, and cost) including supporting and directing employee to participate in improvement programs. Manage employee performance and assist employees in making improvements to their performance through coaching, mentoring and administering performance reviews. Recommend, plan and/or implement employee training and skill development activities. Make decisions and solves problems by analyzing information and evaluating results to optimize production. Analyzes and resolves employees’ problems in a timely manner. Communicate product or material issues with appropriate individuals in operations. Audit, maintain, and ensure employee time-keeping and absentee records are accurate. Attend all required meetings and training sessions.  Maintain departmental equipment to ensure proper and safe operations.  Maintains a safe work environment by ensuring employees wear PPE (personal protective equipment) and through safety compliance. Assist functional area Superintendent to improve systems of production control, standard operating procedures, safety, quality control and performance management. Support and ensure Ashley Furniture’s policies and procedures are administered and followed. Maintain reliable attendance.  Complete other duties, assignments, and special projects as requested. Education:  Required: High school diploma or equivalent Desired: Associates degree in supervisory management or related field  Experience: Two-years of experience in a manufacturing environment Previous experience in supervision preferred Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:  Manufacturing equipment and processes related to the department  Working knowledge of Continuous Improvement tools Documents management system Record Management Read Blueprints Work in a demanding, fast-paced environment Address difficult employee/vendor/production issues Create, interpret, and analyze Continuous Improvement tools Manage multiple tasks simultaneously Identify and analyze constraint processes and implement solutions Strong detail, analytical and problem solving skills Manage resources to optimum potential - equipment, facilities, employees and material Effective interpersonal communication skills Handle multiple projects simultaneously and within established time constraints Provide effective leadership: promote teamwork, and a demonstrated ability to lead people to get results Work independently as well as in team environment Must obtain powered industrial vehicle license Strong mechanical aptitude    We are an equal opportunity employer and provide a drug free working environment. While Ashley appreciates the interest of all candidates only those meeting specific position requirements may be contacted. Principals Only",Production Supervisor rd Shift Job in Arcadia,,Ashley Furniture Industries,"Arcadia, WI 54612",http://jobview.monster.com/production-supervisor-3rd-shift-job-arcadia-wi-us-169071238.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=14,,,37dbc37ea6617c372daf6c5b93028684
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:16:58:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionWe are currently looking for an Administrative Assistant to provide support for one of our busy sales offices. This position is responsible for providing day to day operational assistance to the sales manager as well as overseeing all office administration duties. Responsibilities Include:Ordering supplies for the office and sales associatesEnsuring the integrity and accuracy of all record keepingProcessing all real estate transactionsCoordinating all advertising activities and budgets for the officeMaintaining the multiple listing and other data processing systemsContacting vendors when services are needed for the office equipmentGenerating check authorizations to vendors as neededAdditional office support duties as assignedJob Qualifications 1-3 years office administration experience Real Estate office experience is a plus Proficient in standard Microsoft Office software including Outlook, Word, Excel and PowerPoint Strong computer skills a must Excellent communication skills - written and oral Must be highly organized and able to multi-task effectively Exhibit a positive and professional demeanor",Administrative Assistant Job in Burlington,Full Time,"Burlington, NJ",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-burlington-nj-us-172613465.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),43e13400bcbd652fc3a1d960fa05aa1c
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:17:40:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Seeking an experienced Administrative Assistant to work with a prestigious company. The Administrative Assistant will provide general office support, travel arrangements, type correspondence, schedule meetings, expense reports, lunches, and is proficient in Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook.The Company offers excellent benefits, company perks, and great work environment. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. Please contact Mary @ AppleOne Pasadena for this position! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074950 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant - GREAT PAY UP TO K !!! Job in Alhambra,Full Time Employee,"Alhambra, CA 91801",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-great-pay-up-to-50k-!!!-job-alhambra-ca-us-172669108.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ec7ac9504dda69805db44102f355c75e
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:17:48:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Office AssistantAre you looking to get to work quickly? We have 4 positions for Office Assistant’s in Nashville, TN that are needed immediately.Company Profile:Global Service provider that works directly with Insurance Companies, dealerships and body shopsHas been in business since 1998Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseYour Role:The Office Assistant will be responsible for working between two databases with billing information. They will copy billing information from one database and paste it into another so that billing can be processed. Heavy data entryAnswer incoming phone calls from customersInput information into computer systemSchedule technicians Follow up on billingBackground Profile:1+ years of experience in an administrative functionHigh School diploma or equivalentMUST be able to think outside of the boxMUST be computer savvy and be able to learn computer programs quicklyMust be comfortable with the ‘copy and paste’ function and know how to attach documentsPrevious customer service experienceStrong attention to detailExcellent communication skillsPlease visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/administrative.html Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC). https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/nashville.html  ",Office Assistant Job in Nashville,"Full Time, Employee","Nashville, TN",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/office-assistant-job-nashville-tn-us-172806261.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=6,12.00 - 14.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,2574e9bfac6fde1f22919a6a897b1da9
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:17:49:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative Assistant Terra Staffing Group - Bellevue, WA Posted: 9/28/2016 - Expires: 11/27/2016 Job ID: 172969369",Administrative Assistant Job in Bellevue,Job Type Full Time Employee,"Bellevue, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-bellevue-wa-us-172969369.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=6,$13.00+ /hour,Career Level Entry Level,328e783901d4020ba055238271115c10
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:18:32:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview:   At Perficient you’ll deliver mission-critical technology and business solutions to Fortune 500 companies and some of the most recognized brands on the planet. And you’ll do it with cutting-edge technologies, thanks to our close partnerships with the world’s biggest vendors. Our network of offices across North America, as well as locations in India and China, will give you the opportunity to spread your wings, too.   We’re proud to be publicly recognized as a “Top Workplace” year after year. This is due, in no small part, to our entrepreneurial attitude and collaborative spirit that sets us apart and keeps our colleagues impassioned, driven, and fulfilled.   About Our (add business unit practice and description)   Perficient currently has a career opportunity for a Forecast Support Specialist in our (location ) office located in (city, state).   Job Overview: The Forecast Support Specialist receives direction from the Business Operations Manager and works closely with the Project Managers to ensure that project forecasts are entered into Oracle timely and accurately.   Responsibilities: Builds positive relationships and partnerships across the business and functional teams. Seeks escalation assistance when appropriate. Meets service-level expectations while producing quality results. Works under minimal supervision. Creates project forecasts in Oracle using information provided by the Project Managers for input. Monitors Time Entry Compliance for business units.  Follows up with resources who are not compliant. Works closely with the Business Coordinator team to ensure that hours are coded to the correct project in Oracle. Interacts professionally and effectively through verbal and written communication with all professional contacts. Independently accomplishes multiple tasks to meet established service level standards.   Qualifications: High level of responsiveness and exceptional customer service. Self-motivated individual who has the adaptability to work effectively as part of a team and as an individual; possesses a ‘whatever it takes’ philosophy. Ability to work effectively in a fast-paced environment. Strong attention to detail. Effective and professional oral and written communication skills. Bachelor's degree in a business field is preferred. Intermediate knowledge of Microsoft Office products. Experience with Oracle Projects desired. Working conditions: Work is performed in a normal office setting with minimal exposure to health or safety hazards. Substantial time is spent working on a computer.  Light physical effort is required, including the handling of average-weight objects up to 10 pounds and some standing, walking, sitting, reaching, talking, hearing, grasping, lifting, etc.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform essential functions.  Environment can be demanding and fast paced. Work schedule is generally 40 hours a week, but hours could exceed 40 hours based on demands.  Perficient full-time employees receive complete and competitive benefits. We offer a collaborative work environment, competitive compensation, generous work/life opportunities and an outstanding benefits package that includes paid time off plus holidays. In addition, all colleagues are eligible for a number of rewards and recognition programs including billable bonus opportunities. Encouraging a healthy work/life balance and providing our colleagues great benefits are just part of what makes Perficient a great place to work.    More About Perficient   Perficient is the leading digital transformation consulting firm serving Global 2000 and enterprise customers throughout North America. With unparalleled information technology, management consulting and creative capabilities, Perficient and its Perficient Digital agency deliver vision, execution and value with outstanding digital experience, business optimization and industry solutions.   Our work enables clients to improve productivity and competitiveness; grow and strengthen relationships with customers, suppliers and partners; and reduce costs.  Perficient's professionals serve clients from a network of offices across North America and offshore locations in India and China. Traded on the Nasdaq Global Select Market, Perficient is a member of the Russell 2000 index and the S&P SmallCap 600 index.   Perficient is an award-winning IBM Premier Business Partner, a Microsoft National Service Provider and Gold Certified Partner, an Oracle Platinum Partner, an Adobe Business Solution Partner, and a Salesforce Gold Consulting Partner.   Perficient is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national, origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.   Disclaimer:   The above statements are not intended to be a complete statement of job content, rather to act as a guide to the essential functions performed by the employee assigned to this classification.  Management retains the discretion to add or change the duties of the position at any time.   ",Forecast Support Specialist Job in St. Louis,,"St. Louis, MO",,http://jobview.monster.com/forecast-support-specialist-job-st.-louis-mo-us-172791976.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=10,,"High level of responsiveness and exceptional customer service. Self-motivated individual who has the adaptability to work effectively as part of a team and as an individual; possesses a ‘whatever it takes’ philosophy. Ability to work effectively in a fast-paced environment. Strong attention to detail. Effective and professional oral and written communication skills. Bachelor's degree in a business field is preferred. Intermediate knowledge of Microsoft Office products. Experience with Oracle Projects desired. Working conditions: Work is performed in a normal office setting with minimal exposure to health or safety hazards. Substantial time is spent working on a computer.  Light physical effort is required, including the handling of average-weight objects up to 10 pounds and some standing, walking, sitting, reaching, talking, hearing, grasping, lifting, etc.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform essential functions.  Environment can be demanding and fast paced. Work schedule is generally 40 hours a week, but hours could exceed 40 hours based on demands.  Perficient full-time employees receive complete and competitive benefits. We offer a collaborative work environment, competitive compensation, generous work/life opportunities and an outstanding benefits package that includes paid time off plus holidays. In addition, all colleagues are eligible for a number of rewards and recognition programs including billable bonus opportunities. Encouraging a healthy work/life balance and providing our colleagues great benefits are just part of what makes Perficient a great place to work.    More About Perficient   Perficient is the leading digital transformation consulting firm serving Global 2000 and enterprise customers throughout North America. With unparalleled information technology, management consulting and creative capabilities, Perficient and its Perficient Digital agency deliver vision, execution and value with outstanding digital experience, business optimization and industry solutions.   Our work enables clients to improve productivity and competitiveness; grow and strengthen relationships with customers, suppliers and partners; and reduce costs.  Perficient's professionals serve clients from a network of offices across North America and offshore locations in India and China. Traded on the Nasdaq Global Select Market, Perficient is a member of the Russell 2000 index and the S&P SmallCap 600 index.   Perficient is an award-winning IBM Premier Business Partner, a Microsoft National Service Provider and Gold Certified Partner, an Oracle Platinum Partner, an Adobe Business Solution Partner, and a Salesforce Gold Consulting Partner.   Perficient is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national, origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.   Disclaimer:   The above statements are not intended to be a complete statement of job content, rather to act as a guide to the essential functions performed by the employee assigned to this classification.  Management retains the discretion to add or change the duties of the position at any time.   ",aa260b1b13dda41069358815c2805033
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:18:56:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking to work in an environment which respects and values your passion and commitment to the customer?  How about working for a company that develops and rewards people while working with the openness and integrity?Then uncover your true potential at Williams Lea.The Office Services Associate is a member of the on-site Williams Lea team delivering exceptional customer service at our client locations. Responsibilities include mail distribution, copy services, hospitality and conference room set-up, reception assistance and other general office duties as needed.Job Responsibilities:Process high volumes of incoming and outgoing mail. Deliver mail and packages throughout the client location, following applicable distribution procedures.Complete large numbers of reprographics requests according to job ticket instructions.Bind, cut, and/or assemble reprographics jobs as necessary.Load copiers with paper and toner as needed.Set-up conference rooms including audio/visual equipment, furniture configuration, and food/beverages as needed.Assist with reception coverage, including managing multiple phone lines and visitor check-in.Handle sensitive and/or confidential documents and information.Communicate with manager and client on job or deadline issues.Job Requirements:High school diploma or equivalent.Minimum of one-year office service experience, preferably in a legal, banking or large corporate environment.Ability to work in a fast-paced team environment.Attention to detail with emphasis on accuracy and quality.Ability to prioritize work to balance multiple projects and deadlines.Excellent verbal and written communication skills.Exceptional customer service skills.Basic computer skills required.Must be able to lift up to 50 lbs. on a regular basis.Must be able to work standing up all or most of the time.It is the policy of Williams Lea to ensure equal employment opportunity without discrimination or harassment on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, national origin, alienage or citizenship status, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity of expression, marital or domestic/civil partnership status, disability, veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law.Williams Lea is a drug-free workplace and performs pre-employment substance abuse testing.WLRSR",Office Services Associate Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/office-services-associate-job-austin-tx-us-172674404.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=8,,Administrative/Clerical,363ecb8608d6ba3dc6497a4564a1fb8b
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:18:58:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Superior Group is looking for an IT Support Assistant II for our client in Greenwood, SC.Provides desktop, basic application, and telecom support on site including the resolution of tickets (incidents and requests) generated by the Service Desk ticketing system. This position will participate in the centralized support for IT applications and systems to ensure timely, reliable, cost effective service to employees and customers. Performs daily activities relating to IT support of Data Networks - especially LAN, PCs, Servers, Telephony, and related systems. Operates computer and peripheral equipment to process data by performing the following duties: Enters commands on computer and peripheral equipment such as tape drive, printer, data communications equipment, and plotter, to integrate and operate equipment. Loads peripheral equipment with selected materials such as tapes and printer paper for operating runs, or oversees loading of peripheral equipment by peripheral equipment operators. Enters commands to clear computer system and start operation. Observes peripheral equipment and error messages displayed on monitor of terminal to detect faulty output or machine stoppage. Enters commands to correct error or stoppage and resume operations. Notifies supervisor of errors or equipment stoppage. Clears equipment at end of operating run and reviews schedule to determine next assignment. Records problems that have occurred, such as down time, and actions taken. Answers telephone calls to assist computer users encountering problem. Assists work Duties and Responsibilities • Perform a variety of material transaction activities including (But not limited to:) Possesses a detailed technical understanding of existing systems. Performs testing and evaluation of systems as part of a team. Performs analysis of system related issues. Creates system documentation and best practices in concert with other team members. The successful candidate will also be responsible for working collaboratively with the regional support team and corporate IT functional groups and participates on initiatives that are part of business processes, which raise the quality of support provided across the entire organization. This position may be responsible for all IT infrastructure initiatives and directives that impact the location. They may be the primary IT support point of contact for business leadership at the site. Participates in the research of assigned technologies, determines business requirements, and proposes changes. Required Skills / Qualifications:A+ Certification Minimum of 5 years’ experience in supporting Windows-based PCs in a networked environmentHigh School DiplomaPreferred Skills / Qualifications:Ideal candidate would have a 4-year undergraduate degree in an IT-related major.Go Beyond. EEO Employer - Minorities / Females / Disabled / Veterans / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity",IT Support Assistant II Job in Greenwood,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Greenwood, SC 29646",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/it-support-assistant-ii-job-greenwood-sc-us-172971144.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=18,,Administrative/Clerical,4fa8df457c349427cc1135dc5e7d2975
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:19:26:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Bilingual Administrative Assistant – Part Time Our client in The Woodlands, TX is seeking a Part Time Bilingual Administrative Assistant to join their team on a direct hire basis. Company Profile:Our client is an up-and-coming financial services firm set in a beautiful office in The Woodlands.  Features and Benefits:This is a privately owned & operated group with flexible hours and room for growth in the position.   It is a professional yet laid-back office environment.   Though a part-time position, you are still eligible for a quarterly bonus based on individual and company performance.Bilingual Administrative Assistant Role:The Bilingual Administrative Assistant is primarily responsible for managing all general office functions.  Daily duties would include: • Present a professional and pleasant manner and create a welcome atmosphere for guests• Answer phone and take messages in courteous manner • Prepare client paperwork when necessary • General administrative tasks such as filing, copying, scanning documents, calling clients, etc. • Ad hoc projects as directed by management This role is essential to the growth of the office.  The Bilingual Administrative Assistant will handle day-to-day operations which allows the owner to focus on revenue-generating duties.  A self-driven professional with a heart for customer service would be a great fit for this role. Bilingual Administrative Assistant Background Profile:3+ years of previous administrative experience is preferred High School diploma required, some college is preferred Bilingual in Spanish is required; fluency is preferred but conversational proficiency may be consideredPrior experience in marketing, social media activities, and advertising is a big plus Ability to attend occasional off-site educational workshops Strong organizational skills with ability to prioritize work Please visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/the-woodlands.html and https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/administrative.html Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Bilingual Administrative Assistant – Part Time  Job in The Woodlands,"Full Time, Employee","The Woodlands, TX",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-administrative-assistant-%E2%80%93-part-time-job-the-woodlands-tx-us-172836650.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=3,,Administrative/Clerical,b091385d0e55a079348365b471ff197c
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:19:28:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"What you'll be doing: In this role you will be supporting two executives and one Director with administrative duties. You must have excellent calendaring skills in Outlook, and be proficient with Microsoft Excel, PowerPoint, and Word. You must be professional and have top notch phone skills. Responsibilities:- Professional demeanor- Solid organization, planning and communication skills- Able to multi-task and prioritize- Top notch phone and calendar skills (Outlook)- Personal initiative and willing team player-must work closely with Enterprise Operational Planning ManagerWorking hours: Monday through Friday, standard business hoursSoftware: --Proficient with main Microsoft tools (Excel, Power point, Word)Minimum Requirements:--High School Diploma or equivalent.--Similar position with 2 - 5 years of similar experience Pay Rate: $14.57/hour. Contracted assignment 3 months. Shift Required: Monday - Friday, standard business hoursRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Administrative Assistant Job in San Antonio,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Antonio, TX 78288",BankingFinancial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-san-antonio-tx-us-172948170.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=3,14.57 - 14.57 $ /hour,,45ef724d1fe2482bc03222148731a552
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:19:43:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Partner with project team members to analyze and resolve various questions and issues related to Workday business processes and transactions. Position Duties: Activities may include entering test scenario's, correcting data, researching questions or issues submitted by Global HR GSCs or other HR counterparts and/or working with the project team to identify and implement technical solutions. Position is a support role requiring more work direction whereby worker follows generally defined procedures. Project based position that brings expertise in one or more project management skill sets (strategic analysis, consultation, project management tools). Will also lead and execute projects related to HR reporting and analysis. Responsibilities may include: Coordinating the project schedule, communications creation and delivery, data analysis, regression test and review. Partners with the HR leadership team, business owners, and/ or functional representatives to develop metrics and reporting specifications. Ensure effective reporting and analyses of data and critical business metricsPrior experience with HR transactions and data required, attention to detail, proven ability to analyze information and determine appropriate course of action. Preferred Qualifications: • Experience with HCM Workday • Prior project experience, testing, analysis of HR transactions and data Soft Skills: Team player, willing to jump in to ambigious activities, communications skills, ability to work and communicate clearly with individuals globallyTo learn more about Volt, please visit: http://www.volt.com and to see more of our job postings, please visit: http://jobs.volt.com Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer",HR Specialist  Job in Saint Paul,Full Time Employee,"Saint Paul, MN",,http://jobview.monster.com/hr-specialist-1-job-saint-paul-mn-us-173012556.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=14,,General/Other: Administrative/Clerical,ae95282674ff52ba1bafa8344da8a4ed
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:19:51:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary: Manage and direct the operations of each building to which assigned, at the least possible cost to produce the maximum return of the investment dollar. Essential Job Duties:     1.                      Responsible for the day-to-day operational management of all aspects of the property(ies) to assure maintenance of approved quality standards.      2.                      Coordinates all fire, life safety and other safety programs as established and followed within established guidelines.  Maintain established programs of safety and security for building occupants and property.     3.                      Maintain appropriate standards of physical maintenance and housekeeping.  Establish and monitor preventative maintenance schedules.  Prepare or supervise the daily work schedule for operations, and coordination of all in-house construction.  Conduct quarterly and annual building inspections.     4.                      Manage staff on-site for the assigned property(ies).     5.                      Assist in the annual interior and exterior office building inspection and prepare a report.      6.                      Maintain proper control of materials and supplies for property(ies).     7.                      Maintain accurate personnel records.     8.                      Conduct employee relations program, which encompasses employment interviews, employee discipline, and union grievances (if applicable).     9.                      Prepare and audit annual operating budgets.  Prepare monthly report of operation for review with owner. 10.                      Prepare lease abstracts and, in some cases, may have final approval authority of all lease abstracts and final document output 11.                      Review and approval of payables and receivables as prepared at the site level.  Review and supervise all accounting output as prepared by the accounting department as required by the property.  Process all security deposits. 12.                      Provide proper tenant relations for tenant services, alterations, decorations and construction work being done in the building. 13.                      Review specifications prepared for service contracts.  Assist with selection and final award of contract services, vendor negotiation of service agreements and the overall monitoring of vendor performance to assure full compliance with standards established within the service agreement. 14.                      Secure bids for capital expenditures – submit to owner for review. 15.                      Communicate with other departments to coordinate work and achieve objectives. 16.                      Approve, coordinate and review construction plans and approve standard rules and regulations to be followed by construction personnel or tenant. 17.                      Build and maintain client relationships. Other Job Functions: Attendance of all scheduled Property Management staff meeting and annual conference participation in trade and Processional Associate (BOMA, IREM, IFMA). Skills, Education And Experience: ·         Bachelor’s degree and/or CPM and or RPA designation. ·         Minimum 10 years combined facility/property management experience preferably in commercial management. ·         Previous experience in construction management. ·         Excellent oral and written communication skills. ·         Ability to handle multiple projects and decisions in critical situations. ·         May perform other duties as assigned   Physical Requirements Rarely (0-12%) Occasionally (12-33%) Frequently (34-66%) Regularly (67-100%) Seeing: Must be able to read reports and use computer       X Hearing: Must be able to hear well enough to communicate with co-workers       X Standing / Walking     X   Climbing / Stooping / Kneeling   X     Lifting / Pulling /Pushing   X     Fingering / Grasping / Feeling: Must be able to write, type and use phone system       X   Working Conditions:  Normal working conditions with the absence of disagreeable elements.   Note:  The statements herein are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees, and are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified.   Newmark Grubb Knight Frank is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V Req. Code : 4546",General Manager Job in San Francisco,"Full Time, Employee","San Francisco, CA 94105",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/general-manager-job-san-francisco-ca-us-172980200.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=14,,Office ManagementGeneral/Other: Administrative/ClericalProperty Management,981e00b349cbff3ea26f734fd6ac8552
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:19:58:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"LOOKING FOR A COMPANY THAT VALUES YOUR SKILLS? A job with AT&T as a Office Support Clerk can provide you with exactly that! Take advantage of our paid training and wide range of career possibilities. AT&T offers a competitive salary and benefits that include medical, dental, paid vacation, and more! The wages for this position is $491.00 per week Our Office Support Clerks are responsible for the opening and processing of incoming mail payments in our high paced Remittance Center. What you'll do as an AT&T Office Support Clerk: Identify different types of mail and sort, log and prepare envelopes for the extraction area Operate high speed mail opening equipment Manually open mail and sort of contents based on procedures Process customer payments via 10-key pad Complete change of address ordersOur Office Support Clerks must be able to: Work in a physically strenuous environment where standing for most of the day is required Handle a high volume of work efficiently and effectively Work early hours and on weekends Qualify on pre-employment screening: B- TAB - Telephone Ability Battery Test study guides can be found at: www.att.jobs/test-guides.aspx",Office Support Clerk TEMPORARY FULL TIME Job in Lisle,,"Lisle, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/office-support-clerk-temporary-full-time-job-lisle-il-us-171448867.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=10,,,ceccd369df80a1714c2181cf8b6d7c09
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:19:59:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Local Contract Specialist (Remote) Position Description CGI Federal, a leader in providing business process outsourcing services to public housing authorities throughout the US, is looking for individuals to fill the roles of Local Contract Specialists (LCS). Working remotely from his/her home in the State of FL and under the direction of the Local Services Manager / State Contract Manager, the LCS is responsible for the timely and accurate completion of specified core tasks for approximately 45 multi-family housing contracts subsidized under HUD’s Project Based Section 8 Housing program, which is part of a contract administration case management team. The LCS works closely with property owners to ensure compliance pursuant to HUD policy. Specific responsibilities will include the following: Ensure 100% of onsite reviews are properly scheduled and performed in compliance with contractual and client requirements Effectively compile and writes Management and Occupancy Review (MOR) reports detailing specific findings, criteria and corrective actions in the monitoring of project compliance in the following areas: Marketing and Tenant Selection, Leasing and Occupancy, Rent Determination and Subsidy Requests, Management of Maintenance Program, Response to Safety Concerns, Management of Tenant Relations, Review of Fair Housing/EEOC policies and procedures Timely and accurate follow-up to ensure adequate responses to close the MOR report Establish and maintain good relations with owners, residents and their representatives, neighborhood groups and local governments Respond fully and promptly to inquiries and dispatches from Contract Specialists, Quality Assurance personnel, Finance and Reporting personnel and Customer Contact personnel Maintain complete and detailed files and provide the Team Leader and/or Manager with data and records requested in a timely manner Successfully complete all required training programs within prescribed period Participate in ensuring a fully functional contract administration case management system to meet 100% of the required deadlines and avoid contractual penalties. The LCS will work from their home-based office, but will be required to go to a CGI federal office when needed and have their own high-speed Internet access To be considered for one of these challenging positions, applicants must have a majority of the following skills, knowledge and abilities: Bachelor’s degree is preferred, but relevant experience will be considered in lieu of degree 2-5 years property management, claims processing or case management preferred Professional, organized and effective verbal and written communication skills Skills in the areas of business math, data entry, record keeping and account management Competent in the Use of MS Office, particularly Word, Excel, and Outlook Assisted housing programs expertise is highly desired** This position requires 50-75% travel Your future duties and responsibilities Required qualifications to be successful in this role At CGI, we’re a team of builders. We call our employees members because all who join CGI are building their own company - one that has grown to 65,000 professionals located in 40 countries. Founded in 1976, CGI is a leading IT and business process services firm committed to helping clients succeed. We have the global resources, expertise, stability and dedicated professionals needed to achieve results for our clients - and for our members. Come grow with us. Learn more at www.cgi.com This is a great opportunity to join a winning team. CGI offers a competitive compensation package with opportunities for growth and professional development. Benefits for full-time, permanent members start on the first day of employment and include a paid time-off program and profit participation and stock purchase plans.We wish to thank all applicants for their interest and effort in applying for this position, however, only candidates selected for interviews will be contacted. No unsolicited agency referrals please.All CGI offers of employment in the U.S. are contingent upon the ability to successfully complete a background investigation. Background investigation components can vary depending upon specific assignment, or upon any US government security clearance if required. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, gender Identity, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, pregnancy, or other status protected by law. CGI will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with CGI’s legal duty to furnish information. Please click here to Apply On-Line.Cliquez svp ici pour postuler en ligne.",Local Contract Specialist (Remote) Job in Jacksonville,,"Jacksonville, FL",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/local-contract-specialist-remote-job-jacksonville-fl-us-172904116.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),dea01c733b8b7047d2f37c3e13cc1902
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:20:57:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Operations Admin (Easton, PA) Schedule:  nights, 6:30 PM – 5:00 AM The operations administrative role provides support to the management team in a variety of administrative tasks.Responsibilities include:·         Clear flags in systems and assess attendance point for associates for unexcused absences.Collect/organize time off request forms for employees from managers and associates. Get approvals from managers for vacation requests as required.·         Ensure proper coding of “time paid not work” and “time not paid, not worked” such as Vacation (vacp)/Paid Personal Time (pers)/Voluntary Time-off (vto)/Lack of Work (low) for associates.·         Make points corrections for staffing agency as directed by Human Resources (HR)·         Make points corrections for associates as directed by site leaders or Human Resources·         Identify, track and reconcile missing: in, out and lunch punchesWith manager approval, clear discrepancies associated with Time Off Task flags·         Enter punches for orientation time for staffing agency new hires.·         Input corrective action documentation into GAPS system·         Research associates counseling history as needed to confirm correct level for next counseling, dates of prior counselings, etc. or provide summary of performance history for manager to use in making a recommendation for termination.·         Submit counselings for both direct-employees and staffing agency associates (including tracking approval and printing for managers)·         Print attendance counselings sent out by HR and organize with other counselings so managers have one complete set of what they need to deliver·         Print/post rates throughout shift for all associates on set schedule·         Answer questions for associates on points/vacp/pers balances as required. Help escalate discrepancies to HR and resolve.·         Additional Responsibilities may also include: Assisting with safety and dock audits and/or type and publish them for managers·         Assisting managers run/track production reports, update operations reports as needed, work on projects for creating reports, etc. The Process Assistant is assigned to the Area Manager, and will hold responsibilities specific to the different Fulfillment Center areas.Basic Qualifications •Administrative experience•Computer skills including Microsoft Office Suite (Excel, PowerPoint, Word)  Preferred Qualifications •Experience utilizing a time and attendance system•Experience within a manufacturing or production environment•Ability to multi-task and manage details of different processes efficiently•Strong organizational skills•Excellent oral and written communication skills•Must be able to work independently, seek answers when help is needed and motivated to seek out additional tasks for completion•Must adhere to confidentiality expectations• Ability to quickly pick up new software and tools",Operations Admin Job in Easton,,"Easton, PA 18045",,http://jobview.monster.com/operations-admin-job-easton-pa-us-172996145.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=17,,Administrative/Clerical,0c49e8de686fb1fcda9d1855925e901c
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:20:58:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br /> Job Description Clean Harbors is seeking a Central Maintenance Planner to join our growing team.  This role is responsible for third party repairs on company vehicles and equipment. The planner ensures that vehicles and equipment are repaired and put back into service as quickly as possible. The planner reviews external vendor quotes for pricing and accuracy, while ensuring all necessary repairs are completed in a timely manner. Responsibilities: Facilitate outsourced maintenance repair requests with field employees, management, and the internal maintenance organization; Review maintenance history and determine best course of action for repair request Follow repair process from quote to repair completion and communicate status of repair timeline to all necessary parties; Track all repairs in the Clean Harbors Asset Management system including repair order notes, quotes, inspection forms, purchase orders, and final invoices Code all repairs using Vehicle Maintenance Reporting Standards (VMRS) Review all quotes and identify areas where repair cost can be reduced / eliminated Identify rework scenarios where repairs should be denied and or be covered under OEM or aftermarket parts warranty Participate in the Central Maintenance call center and field questions from field employees, management, and vendors requesting updates on repair status Drive utilization of preferred vendor network and train field employees on maintenance procedures and processes Assist in breakdown requests by finding local vendors and initiating repairs Update asset management system with asset attributes, such as engine make, model, pictures, other classifications  Competencies: High School Diploma required, Bachelor’s Degree preferred Knowledge of fleet maintenance systems and processes Ability to create actionable items out of data and information Strategic planning, coupled with tactical execution Ability to use computer and applicable company software. Proficient in MS Office Applications - MS Excel, MS Outlook Able to apply standards and processes that maintain regulatory compliance Strong leadership and personnel development skills Financial understanding, with the ability to set strategy against financial goals Understanding of metrics that drive fleet maintenance performance Ability to work across business lines in a matrix organization Strong negotiation skills Demonstrated project and change leadership ability Ability to facilitate/train others, and ability to navigate and handle difficult conversations.  Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market.  For many positions, we have implemented a Competency Based Progression and Pay Program, which directly rewards employees for developing increased proficiency in their key job functions through training and experience. At Clean Harbors you are offered unique opportunities for all stages of your career.  Clean Harbors offers all eligible employees a comprehensive benefits package including:•     Competitive annual salary (CBPP Competency Based Pay Program)•     Opportunities for growth, development and internal promotion•     Health, Dental and Life Insurance•     401K, tuition reimbursement, and generous paid time off•     Company paid certifications, licenses and training To learn more about our company visit us at www.cleanharbors.com We thank all those interested in joining the Clean Harbors team; however only those that complete the online application and meet the minimum job qualifications will be considered for this role. Clean Harbors is a Military & Veteran friendly company. *CHP Potential Applicants:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Central Maintenance Planner Job in Norwell,Full Time Employee,"Norwell, MA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/central-maintenance-planner-job-norwell-ma-us-172922260.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=3,,Administrative/Clerical,7b115d764f741821bae4ac95bfcf3f04
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:21:17:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Textile Manufacturing Company is seeking a Bilingual Spanish/ Korean Administrative Assistant with background supporting the Administration Department. Aside from scheduling and organizing meetings, they must coordinate travel, organize department activities for all members of the department. This person will also create and develop visual presentations for the Executive team. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075026 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Bilingual Administrative Assistant PAYING UP TO $,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA 90017",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-administrative-assistant-paying-up-to-50-000-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172735723.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d636ef7fd216198fa19d832faf52cf21
United States of America,US,08/Jun/2016:21:47:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is searching for an Accounting Manager in Cambridge, MA.Responsibilities Include:All Areas: Participate in the continuous assessment of payroll, accounts payable and month end close processes and procedures, and process re-engineering, to improve efficiency, effectiveness and customer service Identify and implement best practices relating to payroll and accounts payable Provide exceptional customer service; establish and maintain collaborative working relationships with all areas of the college Fully utilize technology in the design and delivery of servicesGeneral Accounting: Together with the Assistant Controller and GL Accountant, ensure that the monthly, quarterly and year end close process is complete, accurate and timely Oversee monthly and year end accounts payable accrual process Prepare or review account reconciliations and analyses; monitor budget to actual variances Responsible for annual audit schedules and inquiries for areas of responsibility Assist in annual budget processPayroll: Manage all aspects of multi-state, weekly and semi-monthly payroll processing, including compliance with federal, state local laws, client policies and the client's three collective bargaining agreements; collaborate with HR and Academic Affairs offices as necessary Process payroll, if necessary, as a backup to the payroll staff Review semimonthly payroll for adjunct faculty Ensure compliance with 403b plan for employee and employer contributions; responsible for annual 403b plan census and audit, in collaboration with HR Oversee procedures and reporting that support Affordable Care Act compliance Lead the implementation of additional payroll solutions, such as ADP Self Service and Time and Attendance Prepare payroll related budget schedules and ad hoc reports as requested Prepare compensation schedules for Form 990, MA PC and other state regulatory reportsREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance or Business required; Master's degree or CPA a plus 3 - 5 years of experience in general accounting, accounts payable and multi-state payroll Supervisory experience Experience with ADP Must be proficient with Excel at an advanced level Experience in Higher Education preferred Understanding of and experience in non-profit accounting preferred Experience with Microsoft Dynamics SL or GP, Jenzabar preferredKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Accounting Manager Job in Cambridge,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Cambridge, MA 02138",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-manager-job-cambridge-ma-us-171794728.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),31238d062a8905c84bad01c8d95f9296
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:21:40:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"CareersUSA, a leader in the staffing industry with over 35 years of experience, has a job opportunity available.Our client is seeking an Human Resources Assistant in Conshohocken, PA.Earn $12.00 to $14.00 per hour at this full-time, temporary position.  Work 40 hours per week, Monday through Friday, 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM.Job Description:Coordinate, process and maintain integrity of Human Resource data and personnel files Partner with Human Resource Service Center to ensure coordination of all HR processes Partner with location HR Generalist to follow up on reports (i.e. unemployment, workers’ compensation, coworker relations, etc.) Administrative support for coworker programs (i.e. wellness, recognition, uniforms, training, anniversary awards, drug and alcohol testing, etc.) Order and maintain corresponding supplies and materials Compile personnel statistics and reports (i.e. demographics, turnover, etc.) Assist the HR team to administer the Learning & Development programs (i.e. course schedule, registrations, attendance tracking, preparation of materials, room set, etc.) Assist the HR team with the onboarding process for new coworkers (i.e. scheduling, paperwork, uniform distribution, etc.) Assist the Business Navigator Operations Manager/Administration Manager with timekeeping responsibilities (time punches, reporting, adjustments, reconciliation, etc.) Requirements:Bachelors Degree Strong attention to detail Excellent verbal and written communication skills Ability to maintain confidentially Good organizational skills A passion for company values Computer aptitude Computer literate Contribute to the company environment where the culture is a strong and living reality that embraces the diversity of coworkers and customersContact Information:CareersUSA - King of Prussia Ph: 610-279-7900 Fx: 610-279-4351 E-mail: kop@careersusa.com",Human Resources Assistant Job in Conshohocken,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Conshohocken, PA 19428",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resources-assistant-job-conshohocken-pa-us-172994366.aspx?mescoid=4300725001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c1511d5e3038d725a20f4927a34c9867
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:21:47:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you’re passionate about working with animals – and giving pet parents exceptional service – Petco is the place for you. At Petco, you can take your skills and passion and build a career that you’ll love with a strong, growing leader in the pet care industry. Working at Petco will open up a world of opportunities for you to pursue your professional goals – the kinds of opportunities only possible with a retail leader with over 1,300 stores covering the entire country and Puerto Rico. At this exciting event, you’ll be able to explore multiple opportunities in our Staten Island area Petco store, including: •Guest Experience Specialist•Pet Stylist •Grooming Salon Apprentice•Dog Training Apprentice Take the first step! Apply on-line at www.mypetcocareer.com before attending one of the below events.Interviews will take place on Saturday November 5th from 12pm-4pm and Friday December 2nd from 12pm-4pm at the location listed below:Petco #2771 Staten Island-NY2752 Veterand Rd WestStaten Island, NY 10309-2500718-227-9723 As a key member of our team, you’ll work in a fast-paced and fun environment with other great people who share your values. You’ll also enjoy our ""Total Rewards"" package that includes competitive compensation and many attractive benefits: • Medical, Dental and Vision Plans • Flexible Spending Accounts • Paid Time Off (PTO) • 401(k) with Company Match • Employee Discounts $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } }); Report","Petco - SP/BB Job Application for Petco- Staten Island-NY Job Fair! | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":",Employee,"Address Staten Island, New York 10309",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/petco-staten-island-ny-job-fair!-job-staten-island-ny-us-172921652.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=8,,,94f87b8ce40a2dc4b20192670ba3997b
United States of America,US,10/Jun/2016:21:48:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Responsibilities 1) Responds to all open scheduling customer follow-up requests and provides proper resolution. 2) Analyzes current-month technician work schedules for optimal placement of work orders. 3) Performs outbound calls to schedule work orders with customers. 4) Update Mission with clear/concise notes indicating details of conversation with customer in response to their request. 5) Regularly work and communicate with technicians, managers, and planners to ensure proper scheduling. Education and Experience Requirements • High School Diploma or General Education Degree (GED); or three to six months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Skill in providing superior customer service • Skill in written and verbal communications • Skill in attention to detail • Skill in maintaining time management and organizational skills • Skill in being flexible with work priorities • Ability to multi-task and work in a fast-paced environment • Skill/knowledge with Microsoft Office applications (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint) Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability Apply Now",Customer Follow-up Request Specialist Job in Nicholasville,"Full Time, Employee","Nicholasville, KY",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-follow-up-request-specialist-job-nicholasville-ky-us-172850964.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=2,,Administrative/Clerical,58f901c5098095f5f7a542b9710418df
